717
Alberta
 Website  www.alberta.caAlberta  is a province of Canada. It had an estimated population of 3.7 million in 2010() making it the most populous of Canadas three prairie provinces. Alberta and its neighbour, Saskatchewan, were established as provinces on September 1, 1905.()Alberta is located in Canada, bounded by the provinces of Columbia to the west and Saskatchewan to the east, the Territories to the north, and the state of Montana to the south. Alberta is one of three Canadian provinces and territories to border only a single U.S. state and is also one of only two provinces that are landlocked.Edmonton, the city of Alberta, is located near the geographic centre of the province and is the primary supply and service hub for Canadas oil sands and other northern resource industries. Approximately  south of the capital is Calgary, Albertas largest city and a major distribution and transportation hub. According to recent population estimates, these two metropolitan areas have now both exceeded 1 million people.() Census agglomerations in the province include Lethbridge, Red Deer, Prairie, Hat, Wood Buffalo (includes McMurray), Lloydminster, Brooks, Okotoks, Camrose, Canmore, Cold Lake, and Wetaskiwin.(  Notable tourist destinations in the province include Canmore, Sylvan Lake, Drumheller, Banff, and Jasper.Alberta is named after Princess Louise Caroline Alberta (18481939),() the fourth daughter of Victoria, the of Canada until 1901, and Prince Consort. Princess Louise was the wife of the Marquess of Lorne, General of Canada from 1878 to 1883. Lake Louise, the Village of Caroline, and Alberta were also named in honour of Princess Louise.The current Premier of the province is Redford. Geography Alberta, with an area of () is the fourth largest province after Quebec, Ontario, and British Columbia. To the south, the province borders on the parallel north, separating it from the U.S. state of Montana, while on the north the parallel north divides it from the Territories. To the east the meridian west separates it from the province of Saskatchewan, while on the west its boundary with British Columbia follows the meridian west south from the Northwest Territories at 60N until it reaches the Divide at the Mountains, and from that point follows the line of peaks marking the Continental Divide in a generally southeasterly direction until it reaches the Montana border at 49N.The province extends  north to south and  east to west at its maximum width. Its highest point is  at the summit of Mount Columbia in the Rocky Mountains along the southwest border, while its lowest point is  on the River in Buffalo National Park in the northeast.()With the exception of the semi-arid steppe of the southeastern section, the province has adequate resources. There are numerous rivers and lakes used for swimming, fishing and a range of sports. There are three large lakes, Lake Claire () in Buffalo National Park, Slave Lake (), and Athabasca () which lies in both Alberta and Saskatchewan. The longest river in the province is the River which travels  from the Icefield in the Rocky Mountains to Lake Athabasca.() The largest river is the Peace River with an average flow of 2161 m3/s. The Peace River originates in the Rocky Mountains of northern British Columbia and flows through northern Alberta and into the River, a tributary of the River.File:Moraine Lake 17092005.jpg|thumb|250px|right|Lake in National Park.Albertas capital city, Edmonton, is located approximately in the geographic centre of the province. It is the most northerly major city in Canada, and serves as a gateway and hub for resource development in northern Canada. The region, with its proximity to Canadas largest fields, has most of western Canadas oil refinery capacity. Calgary is located approximately  south of Edmonton and  north of Montana, surrounded by extensive ranching country. Almost 75% of the provinces population lives in the Corridor.Most of the northern half of the province is forest, while the Mountains along the southwestern boundary are largely forested (see Mountain forests and Columbia foothills forests). The southern quarter of the province is prairie, ranging from prairie in the southeastern corner to mixed grass prairie in an arc to the west and north of it. The central parkland region extending in a broad arc between the prairies and the forests, from Calgary, north to Edmonton, and then east to Lloydminster, contains the most fertile soil in the province and most of the population. Much of the unforested part of Alberta is given over either to grain or to farming, with farming more common in the north and centre, while ranching and agriculture predominate in the south.()The Alberta badlands are located in southeastern Alberta, where the Deer River crosses the flat prairie and farmland, and features deep canyons and striking landforms. Provincial Park, near Alberta, showcases the badlands terrain, desert flora, and remnants from Albertas past when dinosaurs roamed the then lush landscape. Climate Alberta has a dry climate with warm summers and cold winters. The province is open to cold arctic weather systems from the north, which often produce extremely cold conditions in winter. As the fronts between the air masses shift north and south across Alberta, temperature can change rapidly. Arctic air masses in the winter produce extreme minimum temperatures varying from  in northern Alberta to  in southern Alberta. In the summer, continental air masses produce maximum temperatures from  in the mountains to  in southern Alberta.()Alberta extends for over  from north to south; its climate, therefore, varies considerably. Average temperatures in January range from  in the south to  in the north, and in July from  in the south to  in the north.  The climate is also influenced by the presence of the Rocky Mountains to the southwest, which disrupt the flow of the prevailing westerly winds and cause them to drop most of their moisture on the western slopes of the mountain ranges before reaching the province, casting a shadow over much of Alberta. The northerly location and isolation from the weather systems of the Ocean cause Alberta to have a dry climate with little moderation from the ocean. Annual precipitation ranges from  in the southeast to  in the north, except in the foothills of the Rocky Mountains where rainfall can reach  annually.(In the summer, the average daytime temperatures range from around  in the Rocky Mountain valleys and far north to  in the dry prairie of the southeast. The northern and western parts of the province experience higher rainfall and lower evaporation rates caused by cooler summer temperatures. The south and east-central portions are prone to drought-like conditions sometimes persisting for several years, although even these areas can receive heavy precipitation.Alberta is a sunny province. Annual bright sunshine totals range between 1900 and 2500 hours per year. Northern Alberta receives about 18 hours of daylight in the summer.(In southwestern Alberta, the cold winters are frequently interrupted by warm, dry winds blowing from the mountains, which can propel temperatures upward from frigid conditions to well above the freezing point in a very short period. During one chinook recorded at Creek, temperatures soared from  to  in one hour.(  The region around Lethbridge has the most chinooks, averaging 30 to 35 chinook days per year, while Calgary has a Christmas only 59% of the time as a result of these winds. Northern Alberta is mostly covered by boreal forest and has a climate. The agricultural area of southern Alberta have a semi-arid steppe climate because the annual precipitation is less than the water that evaporates or is used by plants. The southeastern corner of Alberta, part of the Triangle, experiences greater summer heat and lower rainfall than the rest of the province, and as a result suffers frequent yield problems and occasional severe droughts. Western Alberta is protected by the mountains and enjoys the mild temperatures brought by winter winds. Central and parts of northwestern Alberta in the Peace River region are largely aspen parkland, a biome transitional between prairie to the south and boreal forest to the north.After Ontario, Alberta is the most likely region in Canada to experience tornadoes. Thunderstorms, some of them severe, are frequent in the summer, especially in central and southern Alberta. The region surrounding the Corridor is notable for having the highest frequency of hail in Canada, which is caused by lifting from the nearby Rocky Mountains, enhancing the updraft/downdraft cycle necessary for the formation of hail.Image:Banff Trail 2.jpg|Winter climate at Banff Trail station in Calgary.Image:DinosaurProvincialParkHoodoo.jpg|Hoodoos in Provincial Park.Image:May 2011 Wildfires in Alberta, Canada.jpg|Satellite image of wildfires in Alberta. Ecology  Flora In central and northern Alberta the arrival of spring brings the prairie crocus anemone, the three flowered avens, bean, wild rose and other early flowers. The advancing summer introduces many flowers of the sunflower family, until in August the plains are one blaze of yellow and purple. The southern and east central parts of Alberta are covered by a short, nutritious grass, which dries up as summer lengthens, to be replaced by hardy perennials such as the prairie coneflower, fleabane, and sage. Both yellow and white clover fill the ditches with their beauty and aromatic scents.The trees in the parkland region of the province grow in clumps and belts on the hillsides. These are largely deciduous, typically aspen, poplar, and willow. Many species of willow and other shrubs grow in virtually any terrain. On the north side of the North Saskatchewan River evergreen forests prevail for hundreds of thousands of square kilometres. Aspen poplar, poplar (or cottonwood), and birch are the primary large deciduous species. Conifers include pine, Rocky Mountain pine, pine, both white and black spruce, and the deciduous conifer tamarack. Fauna Image:Ovis canadensis 2.jpg|thumb|right|200px|The sheep is Albertas provincial animalThe four climatic regions (alpine, forest, parkland, and prairie) of Alberta are home to many different species of animals. The south and central prairie was the land of the bison, commonly known as buffalo, its grasses providing pasture and breeding ground for millions of buffalo. The buffalo population was decimated during early settlement, but since then buffalo have made a comeback, living on farms and in parks all over Alberta.Alberta is home to many large carnivores. Among them are the grizzly and black bears, which are found in the mountains and wooded regions. Smaller carnivores of the canine and feline families include coyotes, wolves, fox, lynx, bobcat and lion (cougar).Herbivorous animals are found throughout the province. Moose, deer, and deer are found in the wooded regions, and pronghorn can be found in the prairies of southern Alberta. sheep and goats live in the Mountains. Rabbits, porcupines, skunks, squirrels and many species of rodents and reptiles live in every corner of the province. Alberta is home to only one variety of snake, the prairie rattlesnake.thumb|left|200px|Water birds in EdmontonCentral and northern Alberta and the region farther north is the nesting ground of many migratory birds. Vast numbers of ducks, geese, swans and pelicans arrive in Alberta every spring and nest on or near one of the hundreds of small lakes that dot northern Alberta. Eagles, hawks, owls and crows are plentiful, and a huge variety of smaller seed and insect-eating birds can be found. Alberta, like other temperate regions, is home to mosquitoes, flies, wasps, and bees. Rivers and lakes are populated with pike, walleye, whitefish, rainbow, speckled, and brown trout, and even sturgeon. Turtles are found in some water bodies in the southern part of the province. Frogs and salamanders are a few of the amphibians that make their homes in Alberta.Alberta is the only province in Canadaas well as one of the few places in the worldthat is free of Norwegian rats.() Since the early 1950s, the government of Alberta has operated a rat-control program, which has been so successful that only isolated instances of wild rat sightings are reported, usually of rats arriving in the province aboard trucks or by rail. In 2006, Alberta Agriculture reports zero findings of wild rats; the only rat interceptions have been domesticated rats that have been seized from their owners. It is illegal for individual Albertans to own or keep Norwegian rats of any description; the animals can be kept in the province by only zoos, universities and colleges, and recognized research institutions. In 2009, several rats werefound and captured, in small pockets in Southern Alberta,() putting Albertas rat-free status in jeopardy. History File:Alexander Rutherford.jpg|right|thumb|150px|C. Rutherford, Albertas first premierThe first people in Alberta were Paleo-Indians who arrived in Alberta at least 10,000 years ago, toward the end of the ice age. They probably migrated from Siberia to Alaska on a land bridge across the Strait, and then may have moved down the east side of the Mountains through Alberta to settle the Americas. Alternatively they may have migrated down the coast of British Columbia and then moved inland.() Over time they differentiated into various Nations peoples, including the Indian tribes of southern Alberta such as those of the Confederacy and the Cree, who generally lived by hunting buffalo (bison), and the more northerly tribes such as the Cree and  Chipewyan who hunted, trapped, and fished for a living.()After the British arrival in Canada, approximately half of the province of Alberta, south of the River drainage, became part of Land which consisted of all land drained by rivers flowing into Bay. This area was granted by II of England to the Bay Company (HBC) in 1670, and rival fur trading companies were not allowed to trade in it. After the arrival of Canadians in the west around 1731, they settled near fur trading posts, establishing communities such as Lac La Biche and Bonnyville. Fort La Jonquire was established near what is now Calgary in 1752.The Athabasca River and the rivers north of it were not in HBC territory because they drained into the Ocean instead of Hudson Bay, and they were prime habitat for fur-bearing animals. The first explorer of the Athabasca region was Pond, who learned of the Portage, which allowed travel from southern  rivers into the rivers north of Ruperts Land.  Fur traders formed the West Company (NWC) of Montreal to compete with the HBC in 1779. The NWC occupied the northern part of Alberta territory. Peter Pond built Fort Athabasca on Lac la Biche in 1778. Roderick Mackenzie built Chipewyan on Lake Athabasca ten years later in 1788. His cousin, Sir Alexander Mackenzie, followed the Saskatchewan River to its northernmost point near Edmonton, then setting northward on foot, trekked to the Athabasca River, which he followed to Lake Athabasca. It was there he discovered the mighty outflow river which bears his namethe Riverwhich he followed to its outlet in the Ocean. Returning to Lake Athabasca, he followed the Peace River upstream, eventually reaching the Ocean, and so he became the first white man to cross the North American continent north of Mexico.()The extreme southernmost portion of Alberta was part of the French (and Spanish) territory of Louisiana, sold to the United States in 1803; in 1818, the portion of Louisiana north of the Forty-Ninth Parallel was ceded to Great Britain.Fur trade expanded in the north, but bloody battles occurred between the rival HBC and NWC, and in 1821 the British government forced them to merge to stop the hostilities. The amalgamated Hudsons Bay Company dominated trade in Alberta until 1870, when the newly formed Government purchased Ruperts Land. Northern Alberta was included in the Territory until 1870, when it and Ruperts land became Canadas Territories.The district of Alberta was created as part of the North-West Territories in 1882. As settlement increased, local representatives to the North-West Legislative Assembly were added. After a long campaign for autonomy, in 1905 the district of Alberta was enlarged and given provincial status, with the election of Cameron Rutherford as the first premier. Demographics Alberta has enjoyed a relatively high rate of growth in recent years, mainly because of its burgeoning economy. Between 2003 and 2004, the province had high birthrates (on par with some larger provinces such as British Columbia), relatively high immigration, and a high rate of interprovincial migration when compared to other provinces.()Approximately 81% of the population live in urban areas and only about 19% live in rural areas. The Calgary-Edmonton Corridor is the most urbanized area in the province and is one of the most densely populated areas of Canada.() Many of Albertas cities and towns have also experienced very high rates of growth in recent history. Over the past century, Albertas population rose from 73,022 in 1901 to 2,974,807 in 2001() and 3,290,350 according to the 2006 census.()The 2006 census found that English, with 2,576,670 native speakers, was the most common mother tongue of Albertans, representing 79.99% of the provinces population. The next most common mother tongues were various languages with 97,275 native speakers (3.02%), followed by German with 84,505 native speakers (2.62%) and French with 61,225 (1.90%).()Other mother tongues (in decreasing order) include: Punjabi, with 36,320 native speakers (1.13%); Tagalog, with 29,740 (0.92%); Ukrainian, with 29,455 (0.91%); Spanish, with 29,125 (0.90%); Polish, with 21,990 (0.68%); Arabic, with 20,495 (0.64%); Dutch, with 19,980 (0.62%); and Vietnamese, with 19,350 (0.60%). The most common aboriginal language is Cree 17,215 (0.53%). Other common  mother tongues include Italian with 13,095 speakers (0.41%); Urdu with 11,275 (0.35%); and Korean with 10,845 (0.33%); then Hindi 8,985 (0.28%); Persian 7,700 (0.24%); Portuguese 7,205 (0.22%); and Hungarian 6,770 (0.21%).(Figures shown are for the number of single language responses and the percentage of total single-language responses.)(Alberta has considerable ethnic diversity. In line with the rest of Canada, many immigrants originated from England,  Scotland, Ireland and Wales, but large numbers also came from other parts of Europe, notably Germans, French, Ukrainians and Scandinavians.() According to Statistics Canada, Alberta is home to the second highest proportion (two percent) of Francophones in western Canada (after Manitoba). Despite this, relatively few Albertans claim French as their mother tongue. Many of Albertas French-speaking residents live in the central and northwestern regions of the province.As reported in the 2001 census, the Chinese represented nearly four percent of Albertas population, and East Indians represented more than two percent. Both Edmonton and Calgary have historic Chinatowns, and Calgary has Canadas third largest Chinese community. The Chinese presence began with workers employed in the building of the Canadian Pacific Railway in the 1880s. Aboriginal Albertans make up approximately three percent of the population.In the 2006 Canadian census, the most commonly reported ethnic origins among Albertans were: 885,825 English (27.2%); 679,705 German (20.9%); 667,405 Canadian (20.5%); 661,265 Scottish (20.3%); 539,160 Irish (16.6%); 388,210 French (11.9%); 332,180 Ukrainian (10.2%); 172,910 Dutch (5.3%); 170,935 Polish (5.2%); 169,355 American Indian (5.2%); 144,585 Norwegian (4.4%); and 137,600 Chinese (4.2%). (Each person could choose as many ethnicities as were applicable.)()Amongst those of British origins, the Scots have had a particularly strong influence on place-names, with the names of many cities and towns including Calgary, Airdrie, Canmore, and Banff having Scottish origins.Alberta is the third most diverse province in terms of minorities after British Columbia and Ontario with 13.9% of the population consisting of minorities.() Nearly one-fourth of the populations of Calgary and Edmonton belong to a visible minority group.()Aboriginal Identity Peoples make up 5.8% of the population, about half of whom consist of American Indians and the other half are Metis. There are also small number of Inuit people in Alberta.() The number of Aboriginal Identity Peoples have been increasing at a rate greater than the population of Alberta.(As of the 2001 Census the largest religious group was Roman Catholic, representing 25.7% of the population. Alberta had the second highest percentage of non-religious residents in Canada (after British Columbia) at 23.1% of the population. Of the remainder, 13.5% of the population identified themselves as belonging to the Church of Canada, while 5.9% were Anglican. Lutherans made up 4.8% of the population while Baptists comprised 2.5%.The remainder belonged to a wide variety of different religious affiliations, none of which constituted more than 2% of the population. The Mormons of Alberta reside primarily in the extreme south of the province and made up 1.7% of the population. Alberta has a population of Hutterites, a communal Anabaptist sect similar to the Mennonites (Hutterites represented 0.4% of the population while Mennonites were 0.8%), and has a significant population of Seventh-day Adventists at 0.3%. Alberta is home to several Rite Churches as part of the legacy of Eastern European immigration, including the Catholic Eparchy of Edmonton, and the Orthodox Church of Canadas Western Diocese which is based in Edmonton.()Muslims, Sikhs, and Hindus live in Alberta. Muslims constituted 1.7% of the population, Sikhs 0.8% and Hindus 0.5%. Many of these are recent immigrants, but others have roots that go back to the first settlers of the prairies.( Canadas oldest mosque, the Mosque is located in Edmonton,() whereas the Canadas largest mosque, the Nur mosque is located in Calgary.() Jews constituted 0.4% of Albertas population. Most of Albertas 13,000 Jews live in Calgary (7,500) and Edmonton (5,000).(AM YisraelThe Jewish Communities of Canada) Municipalities ;Largest metro areas and municipalities by population as of 2006File:Edmonton Skyline Panorama.jpg|thumb|800px|center|EdmontonFile:Calgary panorama-2.jpg|thumb|800px|center|Calgary Economy Albertas economy is one of the strongest in Canada, supported by the burgeoning petroleum industry and to a lesser extent, agriculture and technology. The per capita GDP in 2007 was by far the highest of any province in Canada at C$74,825. This was 61% higher than the national average of C$46,441 and more than twice that of some of the Atlantic provinces. In 2006 the deviation from the national average was the largest for any province in Canadian history.() According to the 2006 census,() the median annual family income after taxes was $70,986 in Alberta (compared to $60,270 in Canada as a whole).The Calgary-Edmonton Corridor is the most urbanized region in the province and one of the densest in Canada. The region covers a distance of roughly 400 kilometres north to south. In 2001, the population of the Calgary-Edmonton Corridor was 2.15 million (72% of Albertas population).() It is also one of the fastest growing regions in the country. A 2003 study by Bank Financial Group found the corridor to be the only Canadian urban centre to amass a U.S. level of wealth while maintaining a Canadian style of life, offering health care benefits. The study found that GDP per capita in the corridor was 10% above average U.S. metropolitan areas and 40% above other Canadian cities at that time.The Institute states that Alberta also has very high levels of freedom and rates Alberta as the freest economy in Canada,() and the second freest economy amongst U.S. states and Canadian provinces.() Industry File:Syncrude mildred lake plant.jpg|thumb|right|250px|Mildred Lake mine site and plant at the Oil Sands.Alberta is the largest producer of conventional crude oil, crude, gas and gas products in the country. Alberta is the worlds 2nd largest exporter of natural gas and the 4th largest producer.() Two of the largest producers of petrochemicals in America are located in central and north-central Alberta. In both Red Deer and Edmonton, world class polyethylene and vinyl manufacturers produce products shipped all over the world, and Edmontons oil refineries provide the raw materials for a large petrochemical industry to the east of Edmonton.The oil sands have estimated oil reserves approximately equal to the oil reserves of the rest of the world, estimated to be 1.6 trillion barrels (254 km3). With the development of new extraction methods such as assisted gravity drainage, which was developed in Alberta, bitumen and synthetic crude oil can be produced at costs close to those of conventional crude. Many companies employ both conventional strip mining and non-conventional situ methods to extract the bitumen from the sands. With current technology and at current prices, about 315 billion barrels (50 km3) of bitumen are recoverable. McMurray, one of Canadas fastest growing  cities, has grown enormously in recent years because of the large corporations which have taken on the task of oil production. As of late 2006 there were over $100 billion in oil sands projects under construction or in the planning stages in northeastern Alberta.()Another factor determining the viability of oil extraction from the sands is the price of oil. The price increases since 2003 have made it more than profitable to extract this oil, which in the past would give little profit or even a loss.With concerted effort and support from the provincial government, several high-tech industries have found their birth in Alberta, notably patents related to interactive crystal display systems.(Interactive display systemUS Patent U.S. Patent No. 5,448,263; U.S. Patent for Touch Sensitive TechnologySMART Technologies) With a growing economy, Alberta has several financial institutions dealing with civil and private funds. Agriculture and forestry File:Warner Elevator Row.jpg|thumb|250px|right|The elevator row, the last surviving elevator row in Alberta, currently unprotected.Agriculture has a significant position in the provinces economy. The province has over three million head of cattle,(Alberta Livestock InspectionsAugust 2006Alberta Government, Department of Agriculture) and Alberta beef has a healthy worldwide market. Nearly one half of all Canadian beef is produced in Alberta. Alberta is one of the prime producers of plains buffalo (bison) for the consumer market. Sheep for wool and mutton are also raised.Wheat and canola are primary farm crops, with Alberta leading the provinces in spring wheat production; other grains are also prominent. Much of the farming is dryland farming, often with fallow seasons interspersed with cultivation. Continuous cropping (in which there is no fallow season) is gradually becoming a more common mode of production because of increased profits and a reduction of soil erosion. Across the province, the once common elevator is slowly being lost as rail lines are decreasing; farmers typically truck the grain to central points.Alberta is the leading beekeeping province of Canada, with some beekeepers wintering hives indoors in specially designed barns in southern Alberta, then migrating north during the summer into the Peace River valley where the season is short but the working days are long for honeybees to produce honey from clover and fireweed. Hybrid canola also requires bee pollination, and some beekeepers service this need.The vast northern forest reserves of softwood allow Alberta to produce large quantities of lumber, oriented strand board (OSB) and plywood, and several plants in northern Alberta supply North America and the Rim nations with bleached pulp and newsprint. Tourism File:Stephen Avenue.jpg|thumb|250px|right|Avenue, Calgary.Alberta has been a tourist destination from the early days of the twentieth century, with attractions including outdoor locales for skiing, hiking and camping, shopping locales such as Edmonton Mall, Stampede, outdoor festivals, professional athletic events, international sporting competitions such as the Games and Games, as well as more eclectic attractions. There are also natural attractions like Island National Park, Buffalo National Park, and the Icefield.According to Alberta Economic Development, Calgary and Edmonton both host over four million visitors annually. Banff, Jasper and the Rocky Mountains are visited by about three million people per year.() Alberta tourism relies heavily on Ontario tourists, as well as tourists from other parts of Canada, the States, and many international countries.Albertas Rocky Mountains include well known tourist destinations Banff National Park and National Park. The two mountain parks are connected by the scenic Parkway. Banff is located  west of Calgary on Highway 1, and Jasper is located  west of Edmonton on Highway. Five of Canadas fourteen UNESCO heritage sites are located within the province: Rocky Mountain Parks, International Peace Park, Wood Buffalo National Park, Provincial Park and Buffalo Jump.File:Lake Louise 17092005.jpg|thumb|250px|right|Lake Louise in the Rockies.About 1.2 million people visit the of Stampede,() a celebration of Canadas own West and the cattle ranching industry. About 700,000 people enjoy Edmontons Ex (formerly Klondike Days).() Edmonton was the gateway to the only all-Canadian route to the Yukon gold fields, and the only route which did not require gold-seekers to travel the exhausting and dangerous Pass.Another tourist destination that draws more than 650,000 visitors each year is the Drumheller Valley, located northeast of Calgary. Drumheller, Dinosaur Capital of The World, offers the Royal Tyrrell Museum of Palaeontology. Drumheller also had a rich mining history being one of Western Canadas largest coal producers during the war years. The Canadian Badlands has much to offer in the way of attractions, cultural events, celebrations, accommodations and service.Located in east-central Alberta is Prairie Railway Excursions, a popular tourist attraction operated out of Stettler. It boasts one of the few operable steam trains in the world, offering trips through the rolling prairie scenery. Alberta Prairie Railway Excursions caters to tens of thousands of visitors every year.Alberta is an important destination for tourists who love to ski and hike; Alberta boasts several world-class resorts such as Village, Lake Louise, Basin, Norquay and Nakiska. Hunters and fishermen from around the world are able to take home impressive trophies and tales from their experiences in Albertas wilderness. Taxation The provinces revenue comes mainly from royalties on non-renewable natural resources (30.4%), personal income taxes (22.3%), corporate and other taxes (19.6%), and grants from the federal government primarily for infrastructure projects (9.8%).() Albertans are the lowest-taxed people in Canada, and Alberta is the only province in Canada without a provincial tax (though residents are still subject to the federal sales tax, the Goods and Services Tax of 5%.) It is also the only Canadian province to have a single rate of taxation for personal income taxes which is 10% of taxable income.()The Alberta tax system maintains a progressive character by allowing residents to earn $16,161 before becoming subject to provincial taxation in addition to a variety of tax deductions for persons with disabilities, students, and the aged.() Albertas municipalities and school jurisdictions have their own governments which (usually) work in co-operation with the provincial government.Alberta also privatized alcohol distribution.  The privatization increased outlets from 304 stores to 1,726; 1,300 jobs to 4,000 jobs; and 3,325 products to 16,495 products.() Tax revenue also increased from $400 million to $700 million. Transportation File:DavidThompsonHighway.JPG|right|thumb|220px|David Thompson Highway outside of National Park.Alberta has over  of highways and roads, of which nearly  are paved. The main north-south corridor is Highway 2, which begins south of Cardston at the Carway border crossing and is part of the Corridor. Highway 4, which effectively extends 15 into Alberta and is the busiest U.S. gateway to the province, begins at the Coutts border crossing and ends at Lethbridge. Highway 3 joins Lethbridge to Fort Macleod and links Highway 4 to Highway 2. Highway 2 travels northward through Fort Macleod, Calgary, Red Deer, and Edmonton.North of Edmonton, the highway continues to Athabasca, then northwesterly along the south shore of Slave Lake into High Prairie, north to Peace River, west to Fairview and finally south to Prairie, where it ends at an interchange with Highway 43. The section of Highway 2 between Calgary and Edmonton has been named the Elizabeth II Highway to commemorate the visit of the monarch in 2005.  Highway 2 is supplemented by two more highways that run parallel to it: Highway 22, west of Highway 2, known as Cowboy Trail, and Highway 21, east of Highway 2. Highway 43 travels northwest into Grande Prairie and the River Country; Highway 63 travels northeast to McMurray, the location of the Athabasca Oil Sands.Alberta has two main east-west corridors. The southern corridor, part of the Highway system, enters the province near Medicine Hat, runs westward through Calgary, and leaves Alberta through Banff National Park. The northern corridor, also part of the Trans-Canada network and known as the Highway (Highway 16), runs west from Lloydminster in eastern Alberta, through Edmonton and National Park into Columbia. One of the most scenic drives is along the Parkway, which runs for  between Jasper and Lake Louise, with mountain ranges and glaciers on either side of its entire length.Another major corridor through central Alberta is Highway 11 (also known as the David Thompson Highway), which runs east from the Saskatchewan River Crossing in Banff National Park through Mountain House and Red Deer, connecting with Highway 12  west of Stettler. The highway connects many of the smaller towns in central Alberta with Calgary and Edmonton, as it crosses Highway 2 just west of Red Deer.Urban stretches of Albertas major highways and freeways are often called trails. For example, Highway 2, the main north-south highway in the province, is called Trail as it passes through Calgary but becomes Trail (for southbound traffic) and Boulevard (for northbound traffic) as it enters Edmonton and then turns into St. Albert Trail as it leaves Edmonton for the City of St. Albert. Calgary, in particular, has a tradition of calling its largest urban expressways trails and naming many of them after prominent Nations individuals and tribes, such as Trail, Deerfoot Trail, and Trail.Calgary, Edmonton, Red Deer, Medicine Hat, and Lethbridge have substantial transit systems. In addition to buses, Calgary and Edmonton operate rail transit (LRT) systems. LRT, which is underground in the downtown core and on the surface outside of it, was the first of the modern generation of light rail systems to be built in North America, while the Calgary C-Train has one of the highest number of daily riders of any LRT system in North America.Alberta is well-connected by air, with airports in both Calgary and Edmonton. International Airport and International Airport are the fourth and fifth busiest in Canada respectively. Calgarys airport is a hub for WestJet Airlines and a regional hub for Canada. Calgarys airport primarily serves the Canadian prairie provinces (Alberta, Saskatchewan and Manitoba) for connecting flights to British Columbia, eastern Canada, 15 major US centres, nine European airports, one Asian airport and four destinations in Mexico and the Caribbean.()  Edmontons airport acts as a hub for the Canadian north and has connections to all major Canadian airports as well as 10 major US airports, 3 European airports and 6 Mexican and Caribbean airports.()There are over  of operating mainline railway, and many tourists see Alberta aboard Rail or Mountaineer. The Pacific Railway and National Railway companies operate railway freight across the province. Health care File:Alberta Childrens Hospital 3+4.jpg|thumb|220px|right|Childrens HospitalAs with all Canadian provinces, Alberta provides for all citizens and residents through a funded health care system. Alberta became Canadas second province (after Saskatchewan) to adopt a Douglas-style program in 1950, a precursor to the modern medicare system.Albertas health care budget is currently $13.2 billion during the 20082009 fiscal year (approximately 36% of all government spending), making it the best funded health care system per-capita in Canada. Every hour more than $1.5 million is spent on health care in the province.()File:University Hospital Complex University Of Alberta Edmonton Alberta Canada 02A.jpg|thumb|220px|left|of Alberta Hospital complex.A highly educated population and burgeoning economy have made Alberta a national leader in health education, research, and resources. Many notable facilities include the Medical Centre, the Lougheed Centre, General Hospital, Childrens Hospital, Grace Womens Health Centre, The University of Calgary Medical Centre (UCMC), Baker Cancer Centre and Cardiovascular Institute of Alberta, in Calgary; In Edmonton, the of Alberta Hospital,  the Royal Alexandra Hospital, the Alberta Heart Institute, the Lois Hole Hospital for Women, the Childrens Hospital, the Alberta Diabetes Institute, the Cancer Institute, and the Rexall Centre for Pharmacy and Health Research in Edmonton. Currently under construction in Edmonton is the new $909 million Clinic, which will provide a similar research, education, and care environment as the Clinic in the States.()Care in Alberta is administered by the unified Alberta Health Services Board. Prior to July 1, 2008, Alberta was divided into nine health regions: Regional Health Authority: Health Region, Health (Edmonton), Health, Thompson Regional Health Authority, Central Health, Lights Health Region, Health Region and Country Health Region.The Trauma Air Rescue Society, a nonprofit organization, provides an ambulance service to all but the most remote areas of Alberta, and some adjoining areas of British Columbia.() Government File:Edmonton leg.jpg|thumb|240px|right|Albertas Legislative Building in Edmonton.The government of Alberta is organized as a parliamentary democracy with a unicameral legislature.  Its unicameral legislaturethe Legislative Assemblyconsists of eighty-three members.Locally municipal governments and school boards are elected and operate separately. Their boundaries do not necessarily coincide.  Municipalities where the same body act as both local government and school board are formally referred to as counties in Alberta.As Canadas of state, Elizabeth II is the head of state for the Government of Alberta. Her duties in Alberta are carried out by Lieutenant Governor Ethell.  Although the lieutenant governor is technically the most powerful person in Alberta, he is in reality a figurehead whose actions are restricted by custom and constitutional convention.  The government is therefore headed by the premier. The current premier is Redford who was elected as leader of the governing Progressive Conservatives on October 1, 2011.  Redford was sworn in as the 14th of Alberta on October 7, 2011.The Premier is a Member of the Legislative Assembly, and he draws all the members of his Cabinet from among the members of the Legislative Assembly.The City of Edmonton is the seat of the provincial governmentthe capital of Alberta.Albertas elections tend to yield results which are much more conservative than those of other Canadian provinces. Alberta has traditionally had three political parties, the Progressive Conservatives (Conservatives or Tories), the Liberals, and the social democratic New Democrats. A fourth party, the strongly conservative Social Credit Party, was a power in Alberta for many decades, but fell from the political map after the Progressive Conservatives came to power in 1971. Since that time, no other political party has governed Alberta. In fact, only four parties have governed Alberta: the Liberals, from 1905 to 1921; the Farmers of Alberta, from 1921 to 1935; the Social Credit Party, from 1935 to 1971, and the currently governing Progressive Conservative Party, from 1971 to the present.Alberta has had occasional surges in separatist sentiment. Even during the 1980s, when these feelings were at their strongest, there has never been enough interest in secession to initiate any major movements or referendums. There are several groups wishing to promote the independence of Alberta in some form currently active in the province.In the 2008 provincial election, held on March 3, 2008, the Progressive Conservative Party was re-elected as a majority government with 72 of 83 seats, the Liberal Party was elected as the Official Opposition with nine members, and two New Democratic Party members were elected.() Education File:SAIT Heart Building 2.jpg|thumb|right|220px|Heritage Hall at Polytechnic.As with any Canadian province, the Alberta Legislature has (almost) exclusive authority to make laws respecting education. Since 1905 the Legislature has used this capacity to continue the model of locally elected public and separate school boards which originated prior to 1905, as well as to create and/or regulate universities, colleges, technical institutions and other educational forms and institutions (public charter schools, private schools, home schooling). Elementary schools There are forty-two public school jurisdictions in Alberta, and seventeen operating separate school jurisdictions. Sixteen of the operating separate school jurisdictions have a Catholic electorate, and one (St. Albert) has a Protestant electorate. In addition, one Protestant separate school district, Glen Avon, survives as a ward of the St. Paul Education Region. The City of Lloydminster straddles the Alberta/Saskatchewan border, and both the public and separate school systems in that city are counted in the above numbers: both of them operate according to Saskatchewan law.For many years the provincial government has funded the greater part of the cost of providing K12 education. Prior to 1994 public and separate school boards in Alberta had the legislative authority to levy a local tax on property, as supplementary support for local education. In 1994 the government of the province eliminated this right for public school boards, but not for separate school boards. Since 1994 there has continued to be a tax on property in support of K12 education; the difference is that the mill rate is now set by the provincial government, the money is collected by the local municipal authority and remitted to the provincial government. The relevant legislation requires that all the money raised by this property tax must go to the support of K12 education provided by school boards. The provincial government pools the property tax funds from across the province and distributes them, according to a formula, to public and separate school jurisdictions and Francophone authorities.Public and separate school boards, schools, and schools all follow the Program of Studies and the curriculum approved by the provincial department of education (Alberta Education). Home schoolers may choose to follow the Program of Studies or develop their own Program of Studies.  Public and separate schools, charter schools, and approved private schools all employ teachers who are certificated by Alberta Education, they administer Provincial Achievement Tests and Diploma Examinations set by Alberta Education, and they may grant high school graduation certificates endorsed by Alberta Education. Universities File:Saint Josephs College University Of Alberta Edmonton Alberta Canada 02A.jpg|thumb|230px|right|St. Josephs College at the of Alberta.The of Alberta, established in Edmonton in 1908, is Albertas oldest and largest university. The of Calgary, once affiliated with the University of Alberta, gained its autonomy in 1966 and is now the second largest university in Alberta. There is also University, which focuses on distance learning, and the of Lethbridge, both of which are located in their title cities.In early September 2009, Royal University became Calgarys second public university, and in late September 2009, a similar move made MacEwan University Edmontons second public university. There are 15 colleges that receive direct public funding, along with two technical institutes, Alberta Institute of Technology and Alberta Institute of Technology.()There is also a large and active private sector of post-secondary institutions, mostly Christian Universities, bringing the total number of universities to twelve, plus a University in Calgary, the only location in Canada. Students may also receive government loans and grants while attending selected private institutions. There has been some controversy in recent years over the rising cost of post-secondary education for students (as opposed to taxpayers). In 2005, Premier Klein made a promise that he would freeze tuition and look into ways of reducing schooling costs.() So far, no plan has been released by the government of Alberta. Culture File:StampedeRodeo2002.JPG|200px|right|thumb|The Stampede.Summer brings many festivals to the province of Alberta, especially in Edmonton. The Fringe Festival is the worlds  second largest after Edinburghs. Both Calgary and Edmonton host a number of annual festivals and events including folk music festivals. With a large number of summer and winter events, Edmonton prides itself as being the Festival City. The citys heritage days festival sees the participation of over 70 ethnic groups. Edmontons Churchill Square is home to a large number of the festivals, including the large Taste of Edmonton & Works Art & Design Festival throughout the summer months.The City of Calgary is also famous for its Stampede, dubbed The Greatest Outdoor Show on Earth. The Stampede is Canadas biggest rodeo festival and features various races and competitions, such as roping and riding. In line with the western tradition of rodeo are the cultural artisans that reside and create unique Alberta western heritage crafts.The Centre hosts a range of festivals and other events including the international Mountain Film Festival. These cultural events in Alberta highlight the provinces cultural diversity. Most of the major cities have several performing theatre companies who entertain in venues as diverse as Edmontons Arts Barns and the Winspear Centre for Music. Both Calgary and Edmonton are home to Football League and Hockey League teams. Soccer, union and lacrosse are also played professionally in Alberta.PaleontologyFile:Pachyrhinosaurus skull.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Pachyrhinosaurus skull. Large quantities of this genus are preserved in the Formation.Alberta has one of the greatest diversities and abundances of Cretaceous dinosaur fossils in the world.( Taxa are represented by complete fossil skeletons, isolated material, microvertebrate remains, and even mass graves.( At least 38 dinosaur specimens are known from the province.( The Formation, Formation and Park Formations collectively comprise the Judith River Group and are the most thoroughly studied dinosaur bearing strata in Alberta.( The stratigraphy of the River Group has a confusing history due partly to the use of the Montana-Alberta border as an artificial division between equivalent strata.( The modern Judith River Group stratigraphy was not finalized until 1993 when Eberth and Hamblin divided the Oldman Formation in two to create the new Dinosaur Park Formation.( The resulting paleontological confusion was resolved by Currie who relocated old quarries dinosaurs had been found in and determined their distribution within the modern stratigraphic framework.(Dinosaur-bearing strata are distributed widely through-out Alberta.( The Provincial Park area contains outcrops of the Dinosaur Park Formation and Oldman Formation.( In the central and southern regions of Alberta are intermittent Formation outcrops.( In the Valley and Edmonton regions there are exposed Horseshoe Canyon facies. Other formations have been recorded as well, like the Milk River and Foremost Formations.( However, these latter two have a lower diversity of documented dinosaurs, primarily due to their lower total fossil quantity and neglect from collectors who are hindered by the isolation and scarcity of exposed outcrops.( Their dinosaur fossils are primarily teeth recovered from microvertebrate fossil sites.( Additional geologic formations that have produced only few fossils are the River Group and Mary River Formations of the southwest and the northwestern Formation.( The Wapiti Formations contains two Pachyrhinosaurus bone beds that break its general trend of low productivity, however.( The Formation represents strata deposited during a transgression.( Dinosaurs are known from this Formation, but represent specimens washed out to sea or reworked from older sediments.(Ryan, M. J., and Russell, A. P., 2001. Dinosaurs of Alberta (exclusive of  Aves): In: Mesozoic Vertebrate Life, edited by Tanke, D. H., and Carpenter,  K., Indiana University Press, pp. 279-297.) Friendship partners Alberta has relationships with several provinces, states, and other entities worldwide.(Alberta Twinning Relationships. Retrieved on 12 Aug 2011.)*  Jalisco, Mexico, Special Relationships*  Hokkaido, Japan, Special Relationships*  Gyeongsangnam-do, Korea, Special Relationships*  KhantyMansi, Russia, Special Relationships*  Yamalo-Nenets, Russia, Special Relationships*  Neuqun, Argentina, Economic MOUs*  Mpumalanga, Africa, Governance Projects*  Heilongjiang, Republic of China, Special Relationships*  Tyumen, Russia, Special Relationships*  Montana, States of America, Transboundary Partnerships*  Gangwon-do, Korea, Special RelationshipsSee also References Further reading * postscript  * postscript   * postscript  * postscript  * postscript   * postscript    External links * Government of Alberta website* * Provincial Archives of Alberta website* Travel Alberta* Alberta Encyclopedia* CBC Digital ArchivesStriking Oil in Alberta* CBC Digital ArchivesElecting Dynasties: Alberta Campaigns 1935 to 2001* CBC Digital ArchivesAlberta @ 100list af:Albertaang:Albertaar:arc:ast:Albertaaz:Albertazh-min-nan:Albertabe-x-old:bs:Albertabr:Albertabg:ca:Albertacs:Albertaco:Albertacy:Albertada:Albertade:Albertaet:Albertael:es:Albertaeo:Albertoeu:Albertafa:fr:Albertafy:Albertaga:Albertagv:Albertagd:Albertagl:Albertahy:hi:hr:Albertaio:Albertaid:Albertaos:(fylki)it:Albertahe:jv:Albertakl:Albertakn:pam:Albertaka:kw:Albertasw:Albertala:Albertalv:Albertalt:Albertalij:Alberta(tartomny)mk:mr:mn:nah:Albertanl:Albertaja:frr:Albertano:Albertann:Albertaoc:Albrtapnb:pms:Albertapl:Albertapt:Albertaro:Albertaru:sah:sq:Albertasimple:Albertask:Alberta(provinca)sr:sh:Albertafi:Albertasv:Albertatl:Albertata:th:tr:Albertauk:ur:ug:Albrtavi:Albertavo:Albertafiu-vro:Albertawar:Albertayi:bat-smg:Albertazh:
1164
Artificial_intelligence
File:TOPIO 3.0.jpg|350px|thumb|TOPIO, a robot, played tennis at Tokyo Robot Exhibition (IREX) 2009.(Artificial intelligence (AI) is the intelligence of machines and the branch of science that aims to create it. AI textbooks define the field as the study and design of intelligent agents( where an agent is a system that perceives its environment and takes actions that maximize its chances of success.( John McCarthy, who coined the term in 1956,( defines it as the science and engineering of making intelligent machines.(The field was founded on the claim that a central property of humans, intelligencethe sapience of sapienscan be so precisely described that it can be simulated by a machine.(See the Dartmouth proposal, under Philosophy, below.) This raises philosophical issues about the nature of the mind and the ethics of creating artificial beings, issues which have been addressed by myth, fiction and philosophy since antiquity.( Artificial intelligence has been the subject of optimism,(The optimism referred to includes the predictions of early AI researchers (see optimism in the history of AI) as well as the ideas of modern transhumanists such as Kurzweil.) but has also suffered setbacks(The setbacks referred to include the ALPAC report of 1966, the abandonment of perceptrons in 1970, the Lighthill Report of 1973 and the collapse of the lisp machine market in 1987.) and, today, has become an essential part of the technology industry, providing the heavy lifting for many of the most difficult problems in computer science.(AI research is highly technical and specialized, and deeply divided into subfields that often fail to communicate with each other.( Subfields have grown up around particular institutions, the work of individual researchers, the solution of specific problems, longstanding differences of opinion about how AI should be done and the application of widely differing tools. The central problems of AI include such traits as reasoning, knowledge, planning, learning, communication, perception and the ability to move and manipulate objects.( General intelligence (or AI) is still among the fields long term goals.( HistoryThinking machines and artificial beings appear in myths, such as Talos of Crete, the bronze robot of Hephaestus, and Pygmalions Galatea.( Human likenesses believed to have intelligence were built in every major civilization: animated images were worshipped in Egypt and Greece( and humanoid automatons were built by Yan Shi, of Alexandria and Al-Jazari.( It was also widely believed that artificial beings had been created by ibn Hayyn, Loew and Paracelsus.( By the 19th and 20th centuries, artificial beings had become a common feature in fiction, as in Shelleys Frankenstein or apeks (Rossums Universal Robots).( McCorduck argues that all of these are examples of an ancient urge, as she describes it, to forge the gods.( Stories of these creatures and their fates discuss many of the same hopes, fears and ethical concerns that are presented by artificial intelligence.Mechanical or formal reasoning has been developed by philosophers and mathematicians since antiquity. The study of logic led directly to the invention of the programmable digital electronic computer, based on the work of mathematician Turing and others. Turings of computation suggested that a machine, by shuffling symbols as simple as 0 and 1, could simulate any conceivable act of mathematical deduction.(This insight, that digital computers can simulate any process of formal reasoning, is known as the thesis.)( This, along with concurrent discoveries in neurology, theory and cybernetics, inspired a small group of researchers to begin to seriously consider the possibility of building an electronic brain.(The field of AI research was founded at a conference on the campus of College in the summer of 1956.( The attendees, including John McCarthy, Minsky, Newell and Simon, became the leaders of AI research for many decades.( They and their students wrote programs that were, to most people, simply astonishing:(Russell and Norvig write it was astonishing whenever a computer did anything kind of smartish. ) computers were solving word problems in algebra, proving logical theorems and speaking English.( By the middle of the 1960s, research in the U.S. was heavily funded by the Department of Defense( and laboratories had been established around the world.( AIs founders were profoundly optimistic about the future of the new field: Simon predicted that machines will be capable, within twenty years, of doing any work a man can do and Minsky agreed, writing that within a generation ... the problem of creating artificial intelligence will substantially be solved.(They had failed to recognize the difficulty of some of the problems they faced.(See ) In 1974, in response to the criticism of James Lighthill and ongoing pressure from the US Congress to fund more productive projects, both the U.S. and British governments cut off all undirected exploratory research in AI. The next few years, when funding for projects was hard to find, would later be called the winter.(In the early 1980s, AI research was revived by the commercial success of systems,( a form of AI program that simulated the knowledge and analytical skills of one or more human experts. By 1985 the market for AI had reached over a billion dollars. At the same time, Japans generation computer project inspired the U.S and British governments to restore funding for academic research in the field.( However, beginning with the collapse of the Machine market in 1987, AI once again fell into disrepute, and a second, longer lasting winter began.(In the 1990s and early 21st century, AI achieved its greatest successes, albeit somewhat behind the scenes. Artificial intelligence is used for logistics, mining, diagnosis and many other areas throughout the technology industry.(The success was due to several factors: the increasing computational power of computers (see law), a greater emphasis on solving specific subproblems, the creation of new ties between AI and other fields working on similar problems, and a new commitment by researchers to solid mathematical methods and rigorous scientific standards.(On 11 May 1997, Deep Blue became the first computer chess-playing system to beat a reigning world chess champion, Kasparov.() In 2005, a Stanford robot won the Grand Challenge by driving autonomously for 131 miles along an unrehearsed desert trail.(DARPA Grand Challenge  home page)In February 2011, in a Jeopardy! show exhibition match, IBMs answering system, Watson, defeated the two greatest Jeopardy! champions, Rutter and Jennings, by a significant margin.()The leading-edge definition of artificial intelligence research is changing over time. One pragmatic definition is: AI research is that which computing scientists do not know how to do cost-effectively today. For example, in 1956 character recognition (OCR) was considered AI, but today, sophisticated OCR software with a context-sensitive checker and checker software comes for free with most scanners. No one would any longer consider already-solved computing science problems like OCR artificial intelligence today.Low-cost entertaining chess-playing software is commonly available for tablet computers. DARPA no longer provides significant funding for chess-playing computing system development. The Kinect which provides a 3D bodymotion interface for the 360 uses algorithms that emerged from lengthy AI research,(Kinects AI breakthrough explained) but few consumers realize the technology source.AI applications are no longer the exclusive domain of of defense R&D, but are now common place consumer items and inexpensive intelligent toys.In common usage, the term AI no longer seems to apply to off-the-shelf solved computing-science problems, which may have originally emerged out of years of AI research. Problems Can a machine act intelligently? is still an problem. Taking A machine can act intelligently as a hypothesis, many researchers have attempted to build such a machine.The general problem of simulating (or creating) intelligence has been broken down into a number of specific sub-problems. These consist of particular traits or capabilities that researchers would like an intelligent system to display. The traits described below have received the most attention.(Deduction, reasoning, problem solving Early AI researchers developed algorithms that imitated the step-by-step reasoning that humans use when they solve puzzles or make logical deductions.( By the late 1980s and 90s, AI research had also developed highly successful methods for dealing with uncertain or incomplete information, employing concepts from probability and economics.(For difficult problems, most of these algorithms can require enormous computational resources  most experience a explosion: the amount of memory or computer time required becomes astronomical when the problem goes beyond a certain size. The search for more efficient problem solving algorithms is a high priority for AI research.(Human beings solve most of their problems using fast, intuitive judgments rather than the conscious, step-by-step deduction that early AI research was able to model.( AI has made some progress at imitating this kind of sub-symbolic problem solving: agent approaches emphasize the importance of sensorimotor skills to higher reasoning; net research attempts to simulate the structures inside human and animal brains that give rise to this skill.Knowledge representationright|thumb|An ontology represents knowledge as a set of concepts within a domain and the relationships between those concepts.representation( and engineering( are central to AI research. Many of the problems machines are expected to solve will require extensive knowledge about the world. Among the things that AI needs to represent are: objects, properties, categories and relations between objects;( situations, events, states and time;( causes and effects;( knowledge about knowledge (what we know about what other people know);( and many other, less well researched domains. A representation of what exists is an ontology (borrowing a word from traditional philosophy), of which the most general are called upper ontologies.(Among the most difficult problems in knowledge representation are:;reasoning and the problem: Many of the things people know take the form of working assumptions. For example, if a bird comes up in conversation, people typically picture an animal that is fist sized, sings, and flies. None of these things are true about all birds. John McCarthy identified this problem in 1969( as the qualification problem: for any commonsense rule that AI researchers care to represent, there tend to be a huge number of exceptions. Almost nothing is simply true or false in the way that abstract logic requires. AI research has explored a number of solutions to this problem.(;The breadth of knowledge: The number of atomic facts that the average person knows is astronomical. Research projects that attempt to build a complete knowledge base of knowledge (e.g., Cyc) require enormous amounts of laborious ontological engineering  they must be built, by hand, one complicated concept at a time.( A major goal is to have the computer understand enough concepts to be able to learn by reading from sources like the internet, and thus be able to add to its own ontology.;The subsymbolic form of some knowledge: Much of what people know is not represented as facts or statements that they could express verbally. For example, a chess master will avoid a particular chess position because it feels too exposed() or an art critic can take one look at a statue and instantly realize that it is a fake.() These are intuitions or tendencies that are represented in the brain non-consciously and sub-symbolically.( Knowledge like this informs, supports and provides a context for symbolic, conscious knowledge. As with the related problem of sub-symbolic reasoning, it is hoped that situated AI or intelligence will provide ways to represent this kind of knowledge.(PlanningImage:Hierarchical-control-system.svg|thumb| A control system is a form of system in which a set of devices and governing software is arranged in a hierarchy.Intelligent agents must be able to set goals and achieve them.( They need a way to visualize the future (they must have a representation of the state of the world and be able to make predictions about how their actions will change it) and be able to make choices that maximize the utility (or value) of the available choices.(In classical planning problems, the agent can assume that it is the only thing acting on the world and it can be certain what the consequences of its actions may be.( However, if this is not true, it must periodically check if the world matches its predictions and it must change its plan as this becomes necessary, requiring the agent to reason under uncertainty.(planning uses the cooperation and competition of many agents to achieve a given goal. behavior such as this is used by algorithms and intelligence.(Learninglearning( has been central to AI research from the beginning.(Turing discussed the centrality of learning as early as 1950, in his classic paper Machinery and Intelligence. ) In 1956, at the original Dartmouth AI summer conference, Solomonoff wrote a report on unsupervised probabilistic machine learning: An Inductive Inference Machine.((pdf scanned copy of the original) (version published in 1957, An Inductive Inference Machine, IRE Convention Record, Section on Information Theory, Part 2, pp. 56-62))learning is the ability to find patterns in a stream of input. learning includes both classification and numerical regression. Classification is used to determine what category something belongs in, after seeing a number of examples of things from several categories. Regression takes a set of numerical input/output examples and attempts to discover a continuous function that would generate the outputs from the inputs. In learning( the agent is rewarded for good responses and punished for bad ones. These can be analyzed in terms of theory, using concepts like utility. The mathematical analysis of machine learning algorithms and their performance is a branch of computer science known as learning theory.(Natural language processingFile:ParseTree.svg|thumb| A tree represents the syntactic structure of a sentence according to some grammar.language processing( gives machines the ability to read and understand the languages that humans speak. Many researchers hope that a sufficiently powerful natural language processing system would be able to acquire knowledge on its own, by reading the existing text available over the internet. Some straightforward applications of natural language processing include retrieval (or mining) and translation.(Motion and manipulationThe field of robotics( is closely related to AI. Intelligence is required for robots to be able to handle such tasks as object manipulation( and navigation, with sub-problems of localization (knowing where you are), mapping (learning what is around you) and planning (figuring out how to get there).(Perceptionperception( is the ability to use input from sensors (such as cameras, microphones, sonar and others more exotic) to deduce aspects of the world. vision( is the ability to analyze visual input. A few selected subproblems are recognition,( facial recognition and recognition.(Social intelligencerobot at MIT Museum.jpg|thumb|Kismet, a robot with rudimentary social skillsEmotion and social skills( play two roles for an intelligent agent. First, it must be able to predict the actions of others, by understanding their motives and emotional states. (This involves elements of theory, theory, as well as the ability to model human emotions and the perceptual skills to detect emotions.) Also, for good interaction, an intelligent machine also needs to display emotions. At the very least it must appear polite and sensitive to the humans it interacts with. At best, it should have normal emotions itself.CreativityA sub-field of AI addresses creativity both theoretically (from a philosophical and psychological perspective) and practically (via specific implementations of systems that generate outputs that can be considered creative, or systems that identify and assess creativity). A related area of computational research is Intuition and Imagination.General intelligenceMost researchers hope that their work will eventually be incorporated into a machine with general intelligence (known as AI), combining all the skills above and exceeding human abilities at most or all of them.( A few believe that anthropomorphic features like consciousness or an brain may be required for such a project.((Many of the problems above are considered AI-complete: to solve one problem, you must solve them all. For example, even a straightforward, specific task like translation requires that the machine follow the authors argument (reason), know what is being talked about (knowledge), and faithfully reproduce the authors intention (social intelligence). translation, therefore, is believed to be AI-complete: it may require AI to be done as well as humans can do it.( Approaches There is no established unifying theory or paradigm that guides AI research. Researchers disagree about many issues.(Nils Nilsson writes: Simply put, there is wide disagreement in the field about what AI is all about .) A few of the most long standing questions that have remained unanswered are these: should artificial intelligence simulate natural intelligence by studying psychology or neurology? Or is human biology as irrelevant to AI research as bird biology is to engineering?(Can intelligent behavior be described using simple, elegant principles (such as logic or optimization)? Or does it necessarily require solving a large number of completely unrelated problems?(Can intelligence be reproduced using high-level symbols, similar to words and ideas? Or does it require sub-symbolic processing?(John Haugeland, who coined the term GOFAI (Good Old-Fashioned Artificial Intelligence), also proposed that AI should more properly be referred to as intelligence, a term which has since been adopted by some non-GOFAI researchers.http://citeseerx.ist.psu.edu/viewdoc/download?doi10.1.1.38.8384&reprep1&typepdfhttp://books.google.com/books?hlen&lr&ida_ZR81Z25z0C&oifnd&pgPA63&dqrelated:iCpuTpmGk6gJ:scholar.google.com/&otsn1-TsvqXGJ&sig1xthOJ2WQmKtdSt7ISFH2yu2l3Q#vonepage&q&ffalsehttp://www.imagination-engines.com/ Cybernetics and brain simulation is currently no consensus on how closely the brain should be simulated.In the 1940s and 1950s, a number of researchers explored the connection between neurology, theory, and cybernetics. Some of them built machines that used electronic networks to exhibit rudimentary intelligence, such as Grey Walters turtles and the Hopkins Beast. Many of these researchers gathered for meetings of the Teleological Society at University and the Club in England.( By 1960, this approach was largely abandoned, although elements of it would be revived in the 1980s. Symbolic When access to digital computers became possible in the middle 1950s, AI research began to explore the possibility that human intelligence could be reduced to symbol manipulation. The research was centered in three institutions: CMU, Stanford and MIT, and each one developed its own style of research. Haugeland named these approaches to AI good old fashioned AI or GOFAI.(; Cognitive simulation: Economist Simon and Newell studied human problem solving skills and attempted to formalize them, and their work laid the foundations of the field of artificial intelligence, as well as science, research and science. Their research team used the results of  psychological experiments to develop programs that simulated the techniques that people used to solve problems. This tradition, centered at Mellon University would eventually culminate in the development of the Soar architecture in the middle 80s.((; Logic-based: Unlike Newell and Simon, John McCarthy felt that machines did not need to simulate human thought, but should instead try to find the essence of abstract reasoning and problem solving, regardless of whether people used the same algorithms.( His laboratory at Stanford (SAIL) focused on using formal logic to solve a wide variety of problems, including representation, planning and learning.( Logic was also focus of the work at the of Edinburgh and elsewhere in Europe which led to the development of the programming language Prolog and the science of programming.(; Anti-logic or scruffy: Researchers at MIT (such as Minsky and Papert)( found that solving difficult problems in vision and language processing required ad-hoc solutions  they argued that there was no simple and general principle (like logic) that would capture all the aspects of intelligent behavior. Schank described their anti-logic approaches as scruffy (as opposed to the neat paradigms at CMU and Stanford).( knowledge bases (such as Lenats Cyc) are an example of scruffy AI, since they must be built by hand, one complicated concept at a time.(; Knowledge-based: When computers with large memories became available around 1970, researchers from all three traditions began to build knowledge into AI applications.( This knowledge revolution led to the development and deployment of systems (introduced by Feigenbaum), the first truly successful form of AI software.( The knowledge revolution was also driven by the realization that enormous amounts of knowledge would be required by many simple AI applications. Sub-symbolic During the 1960s, symbolic approaches had achieved great success at simulating high-level thinking in small demonstration programs. Approaches based on cybernetics or networks were abandoned or pushed into the background.(The most dramatic case of sub-symbolic AI being pushed into the background was the devastating critique of perceptrons by Minsky and Papert in 1969. See of AI, winter, or Rosenblatt.) By the 1980s, however, progress in symbolic AI seemed to stall and many believed that symbolic systems would never be able to imitate all the processes of human cognition, especially perception, robotics, learning and recognition. A number of researchers began to look into sub-symbolic approaches to specific AI problems.(; Bottom-up, embodied, situated, behavior-based or AI: Researchers from the related field of robotics, such as Brooks, rejected symbolic AI and focused on the basic engineering problems that would allow robots to move and survive.( Their work revived the non-symbolic viewpoint of the early cybernetics researchers of the 50s and reintroduced the use of theory in AI. This coincided with the development of the mind thesis in the related field of science: the idea that aspects of the body (such as  movement, perception and visualization) are required for higher intelligence.; Computational Intelligence: Interest in networks and connectionism was revived by Rumelhart and others in the middle 1980s.( These and other sub-symbolic approaches, such as systems and computation, are now studied collectively by the emerging discipline of intelligence.(StatisticalIn the 1990s, AI researchers developed sophisticated mathematical tools to solve specific subproblems. These tools are truly scientific, in the sense that their results are both measurable and verifiable, and they have been responsible for many of AIs recent successes. The shared mathematical language has also permitted a high level of collaboration with more established fields (like mathematics, economics or research). Stuart Russell and Norvig describe this movement as nothing less than a revolution and the victory of the neats.( Critiques argue that these techniques are too focussed on particular problems and have failed to address the long term goal of general intelligence. Integrating the approaches ;Intelligent agent paradigm: An agent is a system that perceives its environment and takes actions which maximize its chances of success. The simplest intelligent agents are programs that solve specific problems. More complicated agents include human beings and organizations of human beings (such as firms). The paradigm gives researchers license to study isolated problems and find solutions that are both verifiable and useful, without agreeing on one single approach. An agent that solves a specific problem can use any approach that works  some agents are symbolic and logical, some are sub-symbolic networks and others may use new approaches. The paradigm also gives researchers a common language to communicate with other fieldssuch as theory and economicsthat also use concepts of abstract agents. The intelligent agent paradigm became widely accepted during the 1990s.(;architectures and architectures: Researchers have designed systems to build intelligent systems out of interacting agents in a system.( A system with both symbolic and sub-symbolic components is a intelligent system, and the study of such systems is intelligence systems integration. A control system provides a bridge between sub-symbolic AI at its lowest, reactive levels and traditional symbolic AI at its highest levels, where relaxed time constraints permit planning and world modelling.( Brooks architecture was an early proposal for such a hierarchical system.( Tools In the course of 50 years of research, AI has developed a large number of tools to solve the most difficult problems in science. A few of the most general of these methods are discussed below. Search and optimization Many problems in AI can be solved in theory by intelligently searching through many possible solutions:( Reasoning can be reduced to performing a search. For example, logical proof can be viewed as searching for a path that leads from premises to conclusions, where each step is the application of an rule.( Planning algorithms search through trees of goals and subgoals, attempting to find a path to a target goal, a process called analysis.( Robotics algorithms for moving limbs and grasping objects use local searches in space.( Many learning algorithms use search algorithms based on optimization.Simple exhaustive searches( are rarely sufficient for most real world problems: the search space (the number of places to search) quickly grows to astronomical numbers. The result is a search that is too slow or never completes. The solution, for many problems, is to use heuristics or rules of thumb that eliminate choices that are unlikely to lead to the goal (called pruning the tree). Heuristics supply the program with a best guess for the path on which the solution lies.(A very different kind of search came to prominence in the 1990s, based on the mathematical theory of optimization. For many problems, it is possible to begin the search with some form of a guess and then refine the guess incrementally until no more refinements can be made. These algorithms can be visualized as blind climbing: we begin the search at a random point on the landscape, and then, by jumps or steps, we keep moving our guess uphill, until we reach the top. Other optimization algorithms are annealing, search and optimization.(computation uses a form of optimization search. For example, they may begin with a population of organisms (the guesses) and then allow them to mutate and recombine, selecting only the fittest to survive each generation (refining the guesses). Forms of computation include intelligence algorithms (such as ant colony or swarm optimization)( and algorithms (such as algorithms and programming).( Logic Logic( is used for knowledge representation and problem solving, but it can be applied to other problems as well. For example, the satplan algorithm uses logic for planning( and logic programming is a method for learning.(Several different forms of logic are used in AI research. Propositional or logic( is the logic of statements which can be true or false. logic( also allows the use of quantifiers and predicates, and can express facts about objects, their properties, and their relations with each other. logic,( is a version of first-order logic which allows the truth of a statement to be represented as a value between 0 and 1, rather than simply True (1) or False (0). systems can be used for uncertain reasoning and have been widely used in modern industrial and consumer product control systems. logic( models uncertainty in a different and more explicit manner than fuzzy-logic: a given binomial opinion satisfies belief + disbelief + uncertainty  1 within a distribution. By this method, ignorance can be distinguished from probabilistic statements that an agent makes with high confidence.logics, logics and circumscription( are forms of logic designed to help with default reasoning and the problem. Several extensions of logic have been designed to handle specific domains of knowledge, such as: logics;( calculus, calculus and calculus (for representing events and time);( causal calculus;( belief calculus; and logics.(Probabilistic methods for uncertain reasoningMany problems in AI (in reasoning, planning, learning, perception and robotics) require the agent to operate with incomplete or uncertain information. AI researchers have devised a number of powerful tools to solve these problems using methods from probability theory and economics.(networks( are a very general tool that can be used for a large number of problems: reasoning (using the inference algorithm),( learning (using the algorithm),( planning (using networks)( and perception (using Bayesian networks).( Probabilistic algorithms can also be used for filtering, prediction, smoothing and finding explanations for streams of data, helping perception systems to analyze processes that occur over time (e.g., Markov models or filters).(A key concept from the science of economics is utility: a measure of how valuable something is to an intelligent agent. Precise mathematical tools have been developed that analyze how an agent can make choices and plan, using theory, analysis,( information value theory.( These tools include models such as decision processes,( dynamic networks,( theory and design.( Classifiers and statistical learning methods The simplest AI applications can be divided into two types: classifiers (if shiny then diamond) and controllers (if shiny then pick up). Controllers do however also classify conditions before inferring actions, and therefore classification forms a central part of many AI systems. Classifiers are functions that use matching to determine a closest match. They can be tuned according to examples, making them very attractive for use in AI. These examples are known as observations or patterns. In supervised learning, each pattern belongs to a certain predefined class. A class can be seen as a decision that has to be made. All the observations combined with their class labels are known as a data set. When a new observation is received, that observation is classified based on previous experience.(A classifier can be trained in various ways; there are many statistical and learning approaches. The most widely used classifiers are the neural network,(methods such as the vector machine,(neighbor algorithm,(mixture model,(Bayes classifier,(and decision tree.(The performance of these classifiers have been compared over a wide range of tasks. Classifier performance depends greatly on the characteristics of the data to be classified. There is no single classifier that works best on all given problems; this is also referred to as the no free lunch theorem. Determining a suitable classifier for a given problem is still more an art than science.( Neural networks File:Artificial neural network.svg|thumb|A neural network is an interconnected group of nodes, akin to the vast network of neurons in the brain.The study of neural networks( began in the decade before the field AI research was founded, in the work of Pitts and McCullough. Other important early researchers were Rosenblatt, who invented the perceptron and Werbos who developed the backpropagation algorithm.(The main categories of networks are acyclic or neural networks (where the signal passes in only one direction) and neural networks (which allow feedback). Among the most popular feedforward networks are perceptrons, perceptrons and basis networks.( Among recurrent networks, the most famous is the net, a form of attractor network, which was first described by Hopfield in 1982.( Neural networks can be applied to the problem of control (for robotics) or learning, using such techniques as learning and learning.(temporal memory is an approach that models some of the structural and algorithmic properties of the neocortex.( Control theory theory, the grandchild of cybernetics, has many important applications, especially in robotics.( Languages AI researchers have developed several specialized languages for AI research, including Lisp( and Prolog.(Evaluating progress In 1950, Alan Turing proposed a general procedure to test the intelligence of an agent now known as the test. This procedure allows almost all the major problems of artificial intelligence to be tested. However, it is a very difficult challenge and at present all agents fail.(Artificial intelligence can also be evaluated on specific problems such as small problems in chemistry, hand-writing recognition and game-playing. Such tests have been termed matter expert Turing tests. Smaller problems provide more achievable goals and there are an ever-increasing number of positive results.(The broad classes of outcome for an AI test are: (1) Optimal: it is not possible to perform better. (2) Strong super-human: performs better than all humans. (3) Super-human: performs better than most humans. (4) Sub-human: performs worse than most humans. For example, performance at draughts is optimal,( performance at chess is super-human and nearing strong super-human (see chess#Computers versus humans) and performance at many everyday tasks (such as recognizing a face or crossing a room without bumping into something) is sub-human.A quite different approach measures machine intelligence through tests which are developed from mathematical definitions of intelligence. Examples of these kinds of tests start in the late nineties devising intelligence tests using notions from complexity and compression.( Two major advantages of mathematical definitions are their applicability to nonhuman intelligences and their absence of a requirement for human testers. Applications File:Automated online assistant.png|thumb|An online assistant providing customer service on a web page - one of many applications of artificial intelligence.Artificial intelligence techniques are pervasive and are too numerous to list.  Frequently, when a technique reaches mainstream use, it is no longer considered artificial intelligence; this phenomenon is described as the effect.() Competitions and prizes There are a number of competitions and prizes to promote research in artificial intelligence. The main areas promoted are: general machine intelligence, conversational behavior, data-mining, driverless cars, robot soccer and games. Platforms A platform (or platform) is defined as some sort of hardware architecture or software framework (including application frameworks), that allows software to run. As Rodney Brooks(Brooks, R.A., How to build complete creatures rather than isolated cognitive simulators, in K. VanLehn (ed.), Architectures for Intelligence, pp. 225239, Lawrence Erlbaum Associates, Hillsdale, NJ, 1991.) pointed out many years ago, it is not just the artificial intelligence software that defines the AI features of the platform, but rather the actual platform itself that affects the AI that results, i.e., we need to be working out AI problems on real-world platforms rather than in isolation.A wide variety of platforms has allowed different aspects of AI to develop, ranging from systems, albeit PC-based but still an entire real-world system, to various robot platforms such as the widely available Roomba with open interface.(Hacking Roomba  Search Results  atmel) Philosophy Artificial intelligence, by claiming to be able to recreate the capabilities of the human mind, is both a challenge and an inspiration for philosophy. Are there limits to how intelligent machines can be? Is there an essential difference between human intelligence and artificial intelligence? Can a machine have a mind and consciousness? A few of the most influential answers to these questions are given below.(;Turings polite convention: If a machine acts as intelligently as a human being, then it is as intelligent as a human being. Turing theorized that, ultimately, we can only judge the intelligence of a machine based on its behavior. This theory forms the basis of the test.(;The Dartmouth proposal: Every aspect of learning or any other feature of intelligence can be so precisely described that a machine can be made to simulate it. This conjecture was printed in the proposal for the Dartmouth Conference of 1956, and represents the position of most working AI researchers.(; Newell and Simons physical symbol system hypothesis: A physical symbol system has the necessary and sufficient means of general intelligent action. Newell and Simon argue that intelligences consists of formal operations on symbols.( Dreyfus argued that, on the contrary, human expertise depends on unconscious instinct rather than conscious symbol manipulation and on having a feel for the situation rather than explicit symbolic knowledge. (See critique of AI.)(Dreyfus criticized the necessary condition of the symbol system hypothesis, which he called the psychological assumption: The mind can be viewed as a device operating on bits of information according to formal rules. )(; incompleteness theorem: A system (such as a computer program) can not prove all true statements.(This is a paraphrase of the relevant implication of Gdels theorems.) Penrose is among those who claim that Gdels theorem limits what machines can do. (See Emperors New Mind.)(; Searles strong AI hypothesis: The appropriately programmed computer with the right inputs and outputs would thereby have a mind in exactly the same sense human beings have minds.( John Searle counters this assertion with his room argument, which asks us to look inside the computer and try to find where the mind might be.(; The brain argument: The brain can be simulated. Moravec, Kurzweil and others have argued that it is technologically feasible to copy the brain directly into hardware and software, and that such a simulation will be essentially identical to the original.( Predictions Artificial Intelligence is a common topic in both fiction and projections about the future of technology and society. The existence of an artificial intelligence that rivals human intelligence raises difficult ethical issues, and the potential power of the technology inspires both hopes and fears.In fiction, Artificial Intelligence has appeared fulfilling many roles, includinga servant (R2D2 in Wars),a law enforcer (K.I.T.T. Knight Rider),a comrade (Lt. Commander Data in Trek: The Next Generation),a conqueror/overlord (Matrix),a dictator (Folded Hands),a benevolent provider/de facto ruler (Culture),an assassin (Terminator),a sentient race (Battlestar Galactica/Transformers),an extension to human abilities (in the Shell)and the savior of the human race (Daneel Olivaw in the Robot Series).Shelleys Frankenstein considers a key issue in the of artificial intelligence: if a machine can be created that has intelligence, could it also feel? If it can feel, does it have the same rights as a human? The idea also appears in modern fiction, including the films I Robot, Runner and Artificial Intelligence, in which humanoid machines have the ability to feel human emotions. This issue, now known as rights, is currently being considered by, for example, Californias for the Future, although many critics believe that the discussion is premature.( The subject is profoundly discussed in the 2010 documentary film & Pray.(http://www.plugandpray-film.de/en/content.html Independent documentary Plug & Pray, featuring Joseph Weizenbaum and Raymond Kurzweil)Martin Ford, author of The Lights in the Tunnel: Automation, Accelerating Technology and the Economy of the Future,() and others argue that specialized artificial intelligence applications, robotics and other forms of automation will ultimately result in significant unemployment as machines begin to match and exceed the capability of workers to perform most routine and repetitive jobs. Ford predicts that many knowledge-based occupationsand in particular entry level jobswill be increasingly susceptible to automation via expert systems, machine learning(Machine Learning: A Job Killer?) and other AI-enhanced applications. AI-based applications may also be used to amplify the capabilities of low-wage offshore workers, making it more feasible to outsource knowledge work.(Weizenbaum wrote that AI applications can not, by definition, successfully simulate genuine human empathy and that the use of AI technology in fields such as service or psychotherapy(In the early 70s, Colby presented a version of Weizenbaums ELIZA known as DOCTOR which he promoted as a serious therapeutic tool. ) was deeply misguided. Weizenbaum was also bothered that AI researchers (and some philosophers) were willing to view the human mind as nothing more than a computer program (a position now known as computationalism). To Weizenbaum these points suggest that AI research devalues human life.(Many futurists believe that artificial intelligence will ultimately transcend the limits of progress. Kurzweil has used law (which describes the relentless exponential improvement in digital technology) to calculate that computers will have the same processing power as human brains by the year 2029. He also predicts that by 2045 artificial intelligence will reach a point where it is able to improve itself at a rate that far exceeds anything conceivable in the past, a scenario that fiction writer Vinge named the singularity.(Robot designer Moravec, cyberneticist Warwick and inventor Kurzweil have predicted that humans and machines will merge in the future into cyborgs that are more capable and powerful than either.( This idea, called transhumanism, which has roots in Huxley and Ettinger, has been illustrated in fiction as well, for example in the manga in the Shell and the science-fiction series Dune.Fredkin argues that artificial intelligence is the next stage in evolution, an idea first proposed by Samuel Butlers among the Machines (1863), and expanded upon by George Dyson in his book of the same name in 1998.(McCorduck writes that all these scenarios are expressions of the ancient human desire to, as she calls it, forge the gods.(See also* intelligence in fiction* Intelligence (journal)* intelligence (video games)* intelligence* sciences* artificial intelligence* of basic artificial intelligence topics* Artificial intelligence researchers* List of important AI publications* List of AI projects* of emerging technologies* of scientific journals* of mind* singularity* Language Learning* Description of Machine Learning field References  Notes ((TOPIO:* * ))(Definition of AI as the study of agents:* , which provides the version that is used in this article. Note that they use the term computational intelligence as a synonym for artificial intelligence.*  (who prefer the term rational agent) and write The whole-agent view is now widely accepted in the field .* )(Although there is some controversy on this point (see ), McCarthy states unequivocally I came up with the term in a c|net interview. )(McCarthys definition of AI:* )(This is a central idea of McCorducks Machines That Think. She writes: I like to think of artificial intelligence as the scientific apotheosis of a venerable cultural tradition.  Artificial intelligence in one form or another is an idea that has pervaded Western intellectual history, a dream in urgent need of being realized.  Our history is full of attemptsnutty, eerie, comical, earnest, legendary and realto make artificial intelligences, to reproduce what is the essential usbypassing the ordinary means. Back and forth between myth and reality, our imaginations supplying what our workshops couldnt, we have engaged for a long time in this odd form of self-reproduction.  She traces the desire back to its Hellenistic roots and calls it the urge to forge the Gods. )(AI applications widely used behind the scenes:* * * )(Pamela  writes of the rough shattering of AI in subfieldsvision, natural language, decision theory, genetic algorithms, robotics ... and these with own sub-subfieldthat would hardly have anything to say to each other.)(This list of intelligent traits is based on the topics covered by the major AI textbooks, including:* * * * )(General intelligence (AI) is discussed in popular introductions to AI:*  and )(AI in myth:* * )(images as artificial intelligence:*  (statue of Amun)* These were the first machines to be believed to have true intelligence and consciousness. Trismegistus expressed the common belief that with these statues, craftsman had reproduced the true nature of the gods, their sensus and spiritus. McCorduck makes the connection between sacred automatons and Mosaic law (developed around the same time), which expressly forbids the worship of robots )(Humanoid automata:Yan Shi:* of Alexandria:* Al-Jazari:* von Kempelen:* )(Artificial beings:ibn Hayyns Takwin:* Loews Golem:* * Paracelsus Homunculus:* )(AI in early science fiction.* )(Formal reasoning:* )(AIs immediate precursors:* * * * See also . Among the researchers who laid the foundations of AI were Turing, Von Neumann, Wiener, Shannon, McCullough, Pitts and Hebb.)(conference:* * , who writes the conference is generally recognized as the official birthdate of the new science.* , who call the conference the birth of artificial intelligence.* )(Hegemony of the Dartmouth conference attendees:* , who write for the next 20 years the field would be dominated by these people and their students.* )(Golden years of AI (successful symbolic reasoning programs 1956-1973):* * * * The programs described are Bobrows STUDENT, Newell and Simons Theorist and Winograds SHRDLU.)(DARPA pours money into undirected pure research into AI during the 1960s:* * * )(AI in England:* )(Optimism of early AI:* Simon quote:  quoted in .* Minsky quote:  quoted in .)(First Winter, Amendment, report* * * * )(Expert systems:* ,* * ,* * * )(Boom of the 1980s: rise of systems, Fifth Generation Project, Alvey, MCC, SCI:* * * * )(Second winter:* * * )(Formal methods are now preferred (Victory of the neats):* * )(Problem solving, puzzle solving, game playing and deduction:* ,* ,* ,* )(Uncertain reasoning:* ,* ,* ,* )(Intractability and efficiency and the explosion:* )(Psychological evidence of sub-symbolic reasoning:*  showed that people do poorly on completely abstract problems, but if the problem is restated to allow the use of intuitive intelligence, performance dramatically improves. (See selection task)*  have shown that people are terrible at elementary problems that involve uncertain reasoning. (See of cognitive biases for several examples).*  have controversially argued that even our skills at mathematics depend on knowledge and skills that come from the body, i.e. sensorimotor and perceptual skills. (See Mathematics Comes From))(representation:* ,* ,* ,* ,* )(engineering:* ,* ,* )(Representing categories and relations: networks, logics, inheritance (including frames and scripts):* ,* ,* ,* )(Representing events and time:calculus, calculus, calculus (including solving the problem):* ,* ,* )(Causal calculus:* )(Representing knowledge about knowledge: calculus, logics:* ,* )(Ontology:* )(problem:* * While McCarthy was primarily concerned with issues in the logical representation of actions,  apply the term to the more general issue of default reasoning in the vast network of assumptions underlying all our commonsense knowledge.)(Default reasoning and logic, logics, circumscription, world assumption, abduction (Poole et al. places abduction under default reasoning. Luger et al. places this under uncertain reasoning):* ,* ,* ,* )(Breadth of commonsense knowledge:* ,* ,* ,*  (Introduction))(Expert knowledge as embodied intuition:*  (Dreyfus is a philosopher and critic of AI who was among the first to argue that most useful human knowledge was encoded sub-symbolically. See critique of AI)*  (Gladwells Blink is a popular introduction to sub-symbolic reasoning and knowledge.)*  (Hawkins argues that sub-symbolic knowledge should be the primary focus of AI research.))(Planning:* ,* ,* ,* ,* )(Information value theory:* )(Classical planning:* ,* ,* ,* )(Planning and acting in non-deterministic domains: conditional planning, execution monitoring, replanning and continuous planning:* )(Multi-agent planning and emergent behavior:* )(Learning:* ,* ,* ,* ,* )(learning:** )(learning theory:* CITATION IN PROGRESS.)(language processing:* * * * )(Applications of natural language processing, including retrieval (i.e. mining) and translation:* ,* )(Robotics:* ,* ,* )(Moving and space:* )(mapping (localization, etc):*)(perception:* * )(vision:* * * )(recognition:* *)facial recognition and recognition.(recognition:*)(Emotion and computing:* * )(Edelman, Aleksander and others have both argued that consciousness is required for strong AI. (; ))(brain arguments: AI requires a simulation of the operation of the human brain* * A few of the people who make some form of the argument:* * * The most extreme form of this argument (the brain replacement scenario) was put forward by Glymour in the mid-70s and was touched on by Pylyshyn and Searle in 1980.)(complete: )(Biological intelligence vs. intelligence in general:* , who make the analogy with engineering.* , who writes that there are two major branches of artificial intelligence: one aimed at producing intelligent behavior regardless of how it was accomplioshed, and the other aimed at modeling intelligent processes found in nature, particularly human ones.* , a paper in Science, which describes McCathys indifference to biological models. Kolata quotes McCarthy as writing: This is AI, so we dont care if its psychologically real. McCarthy recently reiterated his position at the AI@50 conference where he said Artificial intelligence is not, by definition, simulation of human intelligence .)(vs. scruffies:* * * )(Symbolic vs. sub-symbolic AI:* , who uses the term sub-symbolic.)()(Cognitive simulation, Newell and Simon, AI at CMU (then called Tech):* * )(Soar (history):* * )(McCarthy and AI research at SAIL and SRI:* * )(AI research at Edinburgh and in France, birth of Prolog:* * )(AI at MIT under Minsky in the 1960s :* * * )(Cyc:* , who calls it a determinedly scruffy enterprise* * * )(Knowledge revolution:* * )(Embodied approaches to AI:* * * )(Revival of connectionism:* * )(intelligence* IEEE Computational Intelligence Society)(The agent paradigm:* * * The definition used in this article, in terms of goals, actions, perception and environment, is due to . Other definitions also include knowledge and learning as additional criteria.)(architectures, intelligent systems:* * )(control system:* Albus, J. S. 4-D/RCS reference model architecture for unmanned ground vehicles. In G Gerhart, R Gunderson, and C Shoemaker, editors, Proceedings of the SPIE AeroSense Session on Unmanned Ground Vehicle Technology, volume 3693, pages 1120)(architecture:* CITATION IN PROGRESS.)(algorithms:* * * * )(chaining, chaining, clauses, and logical deduction as search:* * * * )(space search and planning:* * * )(Uninformed searches (first search, first search and general space search):* * * * )(Heuristic or informed searches (e.g., greedy best first and A*):* ,* ,* ,* )(Optimization searches:* * * )(life and society based learning:* )).(programming and algorithms:* ,* .* * * )(Logic:* ,* ,* ,* )(Satplan:* ,* ,* )(based learning, based learning, logic programming, based reasoning:* ,* ,* ,* )(logic:* ,* * )(logic and features such as equality:* ,* ,* ,* ,* )(logic:* )(logic:* CITATION IN PROGRESS.)(Stochastic methods for uncertain reasoning:* ,* ,* ,* ,* )(networks:* ,* ,* ,* )(inference algorithm:* ,* ,* ,* )(learning and the algorithm:* ,* ,* )(decision theory snd Bayesian networks:* )(Stochastic temporal models:* Bayesian networks:* Markov model:* filters:* )(theory and analysis:* ,* )(decision processes and dynamic networks:* )(theory and design:* )(Statistical learning methods and classifiers:* ,* )(methods such as the vector machine,(methods:* )(neighbor algorithm:* )(mixture model:* )(Bayes classifier:* )(Decision tree:* ,* ,* )(Classifier performance:* )(Neural networks and connectionism:* ,* ,* ,* )(Backpropagation:* ,* ,* )(neural networks, perceptrons and basis networks:* * )(neural networks, nets:* * )(learning, Hebbian coincidence learning, networks and attractor networks:* )(temporal memory:* )(theory:* ,* )(Lisp:* * ,* )(Prolog:* ,* )(The test:Turings original publication:* Historical influence and philosophical implications:* * * * )(matter expert Turing test:* CITATION IN PROGRESS.)(Mathematical definitions of intelligence:* * * )(AI:* CITATION IN PROGRESS.)(of AI. All of these positions in this section are mentioned in standard discussions of the subject, such as:* * )(Dartmouth proposal:*  (the original proposal)*  (historical significance))(The symbol systems hypothesis:* * * )(critique of artificial intelligence:* , * * * ,)(The Mathematical Objection:* * Making the Mathematical Objection:* * Refuting Mathematical Objection:*  under (2) The Mathematical Objection* Background:* , , , )(This version is from , and is also quoted in . Searles original formulation was The appropriately programmed computer really is a mind, in the sense that computers given the right programs can be literally said to understand and have other cognitive states.  . Strong AI is defined similarly by : The assertion that machines could possibly act intelligently (or, perhaps better, act as if they were intelligent) is called the weak AI hypothesis by philosophers, and the assertion that machines that do so are actually thinking (as opposed to simulating thinking) is called the strong AI hypothesis.)(Searles Room argument:* . Searles original presentation of the thought experiment.* .Discussion:* * * )(rights:* * Prematurity of:* In fiction:*  discusses Frankenstein and identifies the key ethical issues as scientific hubris and the suffering of the monster, i.e. rights.)(AI could decrease the demand for human labor:* * )(Weizenbaums critique of AI:* * * * Weizenbaum (the AI researcher who developed the first chatterbot program, ELIZA) argued in 1976 that the misuse of artificial intelligence has the potential to devalue human life.)(singularity:* * * )(Transhumanism:* * * )(AI as evolution:* Fredkin is quoted in .* postscript, Letter to the Editor.* )AI textbooks * * * * *  History of AI * *  Other sources *  accessdate2007-08-30*  BibTex Internet Archive* .* * * * * * * * * * * * * * .* * * * * * .* * * * * .* * * * * * * * * * .* , Presidential Address to the for the Advancement of Artificial Intelligence.* * * * * * * * .* * *  Further reading *TechCast Article Series, John Sagi, Framing Consciousness* Margaret, Mind As Machine, University Press, 2006* Johnston, John (2008) The Allure of Machinic Life: Cybernetics, Artificial Life, and the New AI, MIT Press* Myers, Courtney Boyd ed. (2009). The AI Report. Forbes June 2009* * Sun, R. & Bookman, L. (eds.), Computational Architectures: Integrating Neural and Symbolic Processes. Kluwer Academic Publishers, Needham, MA. 1994. External links * What Is AI?  An introduction to artificial intelligence by AI founder John McCarthy.* * * AITopics  A large directory of links and other resources maintained by the for the Advancement of Artificial Intelligence, the leading organization of academic AI researchers.* Artificial Intelligence Discussion groupartificialintellektt-lnginteligencijaartificialinteligenceintelligensIntelligenzet:Tehisintellektartificialinteligentecoartifizialartificielleartificilartificialgan:ko:inteligencijainteligentesobuatanartificialis:Gervigreindartificialeartificialisintelektsintelektasmenliintelligenciaml:buatan my:intelligentieja:intelligensintelligensartificiala inteligencjaartificialIntelligenceartificialartificialeintelligenceinteligenciainteligencainteligencijafi:TekolyintelligensArtipisyalth:zekakylartificialtu nhn tofiu-vro:Kunstmistusnga intelihensyazh-yue:intelektszh:
1548
Alexander_Emanuel_Agassiz
 children  L. AgassizAlexander Emmanuel Rodolphe Agassiz (December 17, 1835  March 27, 1910), son of Agassiz and stepson of Cabot Agassiz, was an American scientist and engineer.()BiographyAgassiz was born in Neuchtel, Switzerland and emigrated to the States with his father in 1849. He graduated from University in 1855, subsequently studying engineering and chemistry, and taking the degree of of science at the scientific school of the same institution in 1857; and in 1859 became an assistant in the States Coast Survey.Thenceforward he became a specialist in marine ichthyology, but devoted much time to the investigation, superintendence and exploitation of mines. J. Hulbert, a friend of Agassizs brother-in-law, Adams Shaw, had discovered a rich copper lode known as the conglomerate on the Peninsula Superior in Michigan. He persuaded them, along with a group of friends, to purchase a controlling interest in the mines, which later became known as the and Hecla Mining Company based in Michigan. He was elected a Fellow of the Academy of Arts and Sciences in 1862.() Up until the summer of 1866, Agassiz worked as an assistant in the museum of natural history that his father founded at Harvard. That summer, he took a trip to see the mines for himself and he afterwards became treasurer of the enterprise. Over the winter of 1866 and early 1867, mining operations began to falter due to the difficulty of extracting copper from the conglomerate. Hulbert had sold his interests in the mines and had moved on to other ventures. But Agassiz refused to give up hope for the mines, and he returned to the mines in March 1867 with his wife and young son. At that time, Calumet was a remote settlement, virtually inaccessible during the winter and very far removed from civilization even during the summer. With insufficient supplies at the mines, Agassiz struggled to maintain order, while back in Boston, Shaw was saddled with debt and the collapse of their interests. Shaw obtained financial assistance from John Simpkins, the selling agent for the enterprise to continue operations. Agassiz continued to live at Calumet, making gradual progress in stabilising the mining operations, such that he was able to leave the mines under the control of a general manager and return to Boston in 1868 before winter closed navigation.The mines continued to prosper and in May 1871, several mines were consolidated to form the and Hecla Mining Company with Shaw as its first president. In August, 1871, Shaw retired to the board of directors and Agassiz became president, a position he held until his death.Agassiz was a major factor in the mines continued success and visited the mines twice a year. He innovated by installing a giant engine, known as the Superior, which was able to lift 24 tons of rock from a depth of 1,200 metres (4,000 ft). He also built a railroad and dredged a channel to navigable waters. However, after a time the mines did not require his full-time year-round attention and he returned to his interests in natural history at Harvard.Out of his copper fortune, he gave some US$500,000 to Harvard for the museum of comparative zoology and other purposes.In 1875 he surveyed Titicaca, Peru, examined the copper mines of Peru and Chile, and made a collection of Peruvian antiquities for the of Comparative Zoology, of which he was curator from 1874 to 1885.  He assisted Wyville Thomson in the examination and classification of the collections of the 1872 Challenger Expedition, and wrote the Review of the Echini (2 vols., 18721874) in the reports.Between 1877 and 1880 he took part in the three dredging expeditions of the steamer Blake of the Coast Survey, and presented a full account of them in two volumes (1888). In 1896 Agassiz visited Fiji and Queensland and inspected the Barrier Reef, publishing a paper on the subject in 1898.Of Agassizs other writings on marine zoology, most are contained in the bulletins and memoirs of the museum of comparative zoology; but he published in 1865, with Cary Agassiz, his stepmother, Seaside Studies in Natural History, a work at once exact and stimulating, and in 1871 Marine Animals of Massachusetts Bay.Agassiz served as a president of the National Academy of Sciences, which since 1913 has awarded the Agassiz Medal in his memory. He died in 1910 on board the RMS Adriatic en route to New York from Southampton. Publications * * * * * * * * * * * See also*familyReferences* *External links* National Mining Hall of Fame:  Alexander Agassiz* AgassizAgassizAgassizEmanuel AgassizEmanuel AgassizEmanuel Agassizja:AgassizEmanuel AgassizAgassiz
2547
Agent_Orange
Army Huey helicopter spraying Agent Orange over Vietnamese agricultural landAgent Orange is the code name for one of the herbicides and defoliants used by the U.S. military as part of its warfare program, Ranch Hand, during the War from 1961 to 1971. Vietnam estimates 400,000 people being killed or maimed, and 500,000 children born with defects.(York,Geoffrey; Mick, Hayley; Last Ghost of the Vietnam War, The Globe and Mail, July 12, 2008)A 50:50 mixture of 2,4,5-T and 2,4-D, it was manufactured for the Department of Defense primarily by Corporation and Chemical. The 2,4,5-T used to produce Agent Orange was later discovered to be contaminated with 2,3,7,8-tetrachlorodibenzodioxin, an extremely toxic compound. It was given its name from the color of the orange-striped 55 US gallon (200 L) barrels in which it was shipped, and was by far the most widely used of the so-called Herbicides.(During the Vietnam War, between 1962 and 1971, the United States military sprayed nearly  of chemical herbicides and defoliants in Vietnam, eastern Laos and parts of Cambodia, as part of Ranch Hand.(Pellow, David N. Resisting Global Toxics: Transnational Movements for Environmental Justice, MIT Press, 2007, p. 159, (ISBN 0-262-16244-X).)(Stellman et al. 2003: pp 681687) The programs goal was to defoliate forested and rural land, depriving guerrillas of cover; another goal was to induce draft urbanization, destroying the ability of peasants to support themselves in the countryside, and forcing them to flee to the U.S. dominated cities, thus depriving the guerrillas of their rural support base and food supply.(Stellman et al. 2003: pp 681687)(The US began to target food crops in October 1962, primarily using Blue. In 1965, 42 percent of all herbicide spraying was dedicated to food crops.( Rural-to-urban migration rates dramatically increased in South Vietnam, as peasants escaped the destruction and famine in the countryside by fleeing to the U.S.-dominated cities. The urban population in South Vietnam nearly tripled: from 2.8 million people in 1958, to 8 million by 1971. The rapid flow of people led to a fast-paced and uncontrolled urbanization; an estimated 1.5 million people were living in Saigon slums, while many South Vietnamese elites and U.S. personnel lived in luxury.(Luong, 2003: pp. 4)United States Air Force records show that at least 6,542 spraying missions took place over the course of Operation Ranch Hand.() By 1971, 12 percent of the total area of South Vietnam had been sprayed with defoliating chemicals, at an average concentration of 13 times the recommended USDA application rate for domestic use.(SBSG, 1971: p. 36) In South Vietnam alone, an estimated 10 million hectares of agricultural land were ultimately destroyed.(Luong, 2003: p. 3) In some areas TCDD concentrations in soil and water were hundreds of times greater than the levels considered safe by the Environmental Protection Agency.(Fawthrop, Tom; Vietnams war against Agent Orange, BBC News, June 14, 2004)(Fawthrop, Tom; Agent of Suffering, Guardian, February 10, 2008) Overall, more than 20% of South Vietnams forests were sprayed at least once over a nine year period.()Chemical description and toxicologyChemically, Agent Orange is an approximately 1:1 mixture of two herbicides  acid (2,4-D) and acid (2,4,5-T)  in iso-octyl ester form.(IOM, 1994: p. 90)Numerous studies have examined health effects linked to Agent Orange, its component compounds, and its manufacturing byproducts.(Frumkin, 2003: pp.245255)Prior to the controversy surrounding Agent Orange, there was already a large body of scientific evidence linking 2,4,5-T and 2,4-D to serious negative health effects and ecological damage.(Young, 2009: p. 2) But in 1969, it was revealed to the public that the 2,4,5-T was contaminated with a dioxin, 2,3,7,8-tetrachlorodibenzodioxin (TCDD), and that the TCDD was causing many of the previously unexplained adverse health effects which were correlated with Agent Orange exposure.(Young, 2009: p. 6) TCDD has been described as perhaps the most toxic molecule ever synthesized by man.(Schuck, 1987: p. 18) Internal memoranda revealed Monsanto Corporation (a manufacturer of 2,4,5-T) had informed the U.S. government as early as 1952 that 2,4,5-T was contaminated with a toxic contaminant.(Schuck, 1987: p. 17) In the manufacture of 2,4,5-T, accidental overheating of the reaction mixture easily causes the product to condense into the toxic self-condensation product TCDD. At the time, precautions were not taken against this unintended side reaction, which caused also the disaster in Italy in 1976. In addition to this, 2,4,5-T is hazardous in its own right.In 1979, the Yale biologist Arthur Galston, who specialized in herbicide research, published a review of what was known at the time about the toxicity of TCDD. Even vanishingly small quantities of dioxin in the diet caused adverse health effects when tested on animals.( Since then, TCDD has been comprehensively studied. It has been associated with increased neoplasms in every animal bioassay reported in the scientific literature.(Dwyer and Flesch-Janys, Editorial: Agent Orange in Vietnam, Journal of Public Health, April 1995, Vol 85. No. 4, p. 476) The National Toxicology Program has classified TCDD as known to be a human carcinogen, frequently associated with soft-tissue sarcoma, lymphoma, lymphoma and lymphocytic leukemia (CLL).(Committee Recommendations: 2,3,7,8- Tetrachlorodibenzo-p-dioxin (TCDD))(NTP, 2006: )While the two herbicides that make up Agent Orange, 2,4-D and 2,4,5-T, remain toxic over a short perioda scale of days or weeksthey quickly degrade. A 1969 report authored by K. Diane Courtney and others found 2,4,5-T could cause birth defects and stillbirths in mice.(Buckingham, 1992: Chapter IX  Ranch Hand Ends) Several studies have shown an increased rate of cancer mortality for workers exposed to 2,4,5-T. In one such study, from Germany, the risk of cancer mortality increased by 170% after working for 10 years at the 2,4,5-T-producing section of a Hamburg manufacturing plant.( Three studies have suggested prior exposure to Agent Orange poses an increased risk of myelogenous leukemia in the children of Vietnam veterans.(Starting in 1991, the US Congress asked the of Medicine to review the scientific literature on Agent Orange and the other herbicides used in Vietnam, including their active ingredients and the dioxin contaminant. The IOM found an association between dioxin exposure and diabetes.(IOM, 2000)(Data Suggest a Possible Association Between Agent Orange Exposure and Hypertension, Office of News and Public Information, National Academy of Sciences. Quote: the report also concluded that there is suggestive but limited evidence that AL amyloidosis is associated with herbicide exposure (accessed:19 May 2008))Early developmentIn 1943 plant biologist Galston began studying the compound acid as a plant growth hormone, in an attempt to adapt soybeans to a short growing season. Galston found that excessive usage of the compound caused catastrophic defoliation  a finding later used by his colleague Ian Sussex to develop the family of herbicides used in Operation Ranch Hand.(Pearce, Jeremy; Arthur Galston, Agent Orange Researcher, Is Dead at 88  Obituary New York Times, June 23, 2008 (accessed August 18, 2008)) Galston was especially concerned about the compounds side effects to humans and the environment.(Peterson, Doug Arthur W. Galston: Matters of Light, LASNews Magazine, of Illinois, Spring 2005)In 1943, the U.S. Department of the Army contracted the University of Chicago to study the effects of 2,4-D and 2,4,5-T on cereal grains (including rice) and broadleaf crops. From these studies arose the concept of using aerial applications of herbicides to destroy enemy crops to disrupt their food supply. In early 1945, the U.S. army ran tests of various 2,4-D and 2,4,5-T mixtures at the Army Airfield in Florida, which is now listed as a Used Defense Site (FUDS).(Young, 2009: p.24)(Verwey, 1977: p. 111)Use in the Vietnam WarDuring the Vietnam War, between 1962 and 1971, the United States military sprayed nearly  of chemical herbicides and defoliants in Vietnam, eastern Laos and parts of Cambodia, as part of the aerial defoliation program known as Ranch Hand.(( The goal was to defoliate rural/forested land, depriving guerrillas of food and cover and clearing in sensitive areas such as around base perimeters.(Tucker, Spencer. Encyclopedia of the Vietnam War: Political, Social and Military History. ABC-CLIO, Inc. Santa Barbara. 1998.) The program was also a part of a general policy of draft urbanization, which aimed to destroy the ability of peasants to support themselves in the countryside, forcing them to flee to the U.S. dominated cities, depriving the guerrillas of their rural support base.((Spraying was usually done either from helicopters or from low-flying Provider aircraft, fitted with sprayers and MC-1 Hourglass pump systems and  chemical tanks. Spray runs were also conducted from trucks, boats, and backpack sprayers.(Schuck, 1987: p. 16)(Agent Orange and Cancer, American Cancer Society, 2010)(Young, 2009: p. 26)The first batch of herbicides was unloaded at Son Nhut Air base in South Vietnam, on January 9, 1962.(Hay, 1982: p. 151) Air Force records show at least 6,542 spraying missions took place over the course of Operation Ranch Hand.( By 1971, 12 percent of the total area of South Vietnam had been sprayed with defoliating chemicals, at an average concentration of 13 times the recommended USDA application rate for domestic use.( In South Vietnam alone, an estimated 10 million hectares of agricultural land were ultimately destroyed.( In some areas, TCDD concentrations in soil and water were hundreds of times greater than the levels considered safe by the Environmental Protection Agency.((The campaign destroyed  of upland and mangrove forests and millions of acres of crops. Overall, more than 20% of South Vietnams forests were sprayed at least once over a nine year period.((In 1965, members of the U.S. Congress were told crop destruction is understood to be the more important purpose ... but the emphasis is usually given to the jungle defoliation in public mention of the program.(Verwey, 1977: p. 113) Soldiers were told they were destroying crops because they were going to be used to feed guerrillas. They later discovered nearly all of the food they had been destroying was not being produced for guerrillas; it was, in reality, only being grown to support the local civilian population. For example, in Quang Ngai province, 85% of the crop lands were scheduled to be destroyed in 1970 alone. Widespread famine occurred as a result, leaving hundreds of thousands of people malnourished or starving.(Verwey, 1977: p. 116)The U.S. military began targeting food crops in October 1962, primarily using Blue; the American public was not made aware of the crop destruction programs until 1965 (and it was then believed that crop spraying had begun that spring). In 1965, 42 percent of all herbicide spraying was dedicated to food crops. The first official acknowledgement of the programs came from the Department in March 1966.((Many experts at the time, including Arthur Galston, the biologist who developed and intensively studied TCDD, opposed herbicidal warfare, due to concerns about the side effects to humans and the environment by indiscriminately spraying the chemical over a wide area. As early as 1966, resolutions were introduced to the Nations charging that the U.S. was violating the 1925 Protocol, which regulated the use of chemical and biological weapons.((Schuck, 1987: p. 19)Effects on the Vietnamese peopleHealth effectsThe Vietnam Red Cross reported as many as 3 million Vietnamese people have been affected by Agent Orange, including at least 150,000 children born with birth defects.( According to Vietnamese Ministry of Foreign Affairs, 4.8 million Vietnamese people were exposed to Agent Orange, resulting in 400,000 people being killed or maimed, and 500,000 children born with birth defects.(Children in the areas where Agent Orange was used have been affected and have multiple health problems, including cleft palate, mental disabilities, hernias, and extra fingers and toes.( In the 1970s, high levels of dioxin were found in the milk of South Vietnamese women, and in the blood of U.S. soldiers who had served in Vietnam.() The most affected zones are the mountainous area along Truong Son (Long Mountains) and the border between Vietnam and Cambodia. The affected residents are living in substandard conditions with many genetic diseases.(Vietnam Ministry of Foreign Affairs  Support Agent Orange Victims in Vietnamese.)File:Agent-orange-dead-deformed-babies.jpg|thumb|right|Vietnamese babies, deformed and stillborn after prenatal dioxin exposure from Agent OrangeAbout 28 of the former US military bases in Vietnam where the herbicides were stored and loaded onto airplanes may still have high level of dioxins in the soil, posing a health threat to the surrounding communities. Extensive testing for dioxin contamination has been conducted at the former US airbases in Da Nang, Phu Cat and Bien Hoa. Some of the soil and sediment on the bases have extremely high levels of dioxin requiring remediation. The Da Nang Airbase has dioxin contamination up to 350 times higher than international recommendations for action.(Hatfield Consultants. Evaluation of Contamination at the Agent Orange Dioxin Hot Spots in Bien Hoa, Phu Cat and Vicinity, Vietnam. June 2009)(Hatfield Consultants and the Office of the National Steering Commitee 33. Assessment of dioxin contamination in the environment and human population in the vicinity of Da Nang Airbase, Viet Nam. Vancouver, Canada: Hatfield Consultants, 2007. Final Report.) The contaminated soil and sediment continue to affect the citizens of Vietnam, poisoning their food chain and causing illnesses, serious skin diseases and a variety of cancers in the lungs, larynx, and prostate.()Ecological effectsAbout 17.8% (3,100,000 ha) of the total forested area of Vietnam was sprayed during the war, which dramatically disrupted ecological equilibrium. Furthermore, the persistent nature of dioxins, erosion caused by loss of protective tree cover, and loss of seeding forest stock, meant reforestation was difficult or impossible in many areas.(Furukawa, 2004: p. 215) Many defoliated forest areas were quickly invaded by aggressive pioneer species, such as bamboo and grass, which make it unlikely the forests will be able to regenerate. Animal species diversity was also significantly impacted: in one study, a Harvard biologist found 24 species of birds and 5 species of mammals in a sprayed forest, while in two adjacent sections of unsprayed forest there were 145 and 170 species of birds and 30 and 55 species of mammals.()Dioxins from Agent Orange have persisted in the Vietnamese environment since the war, settling in the soil and sediment and entering into food chain through the animals and fish that feed in the contaminated areas. Movement of dioxins through the web has resulted in bioconcentration and biomagnification.() The areas most heavily contaminated with dioxins are the sites of former U.S. air bases.(Furukawa, 2004: pp. 221222)Sociopolitical effectsThe Corporations Memorandum 5446-ISA/ARPA states: the fact that the VC obtain most of their food from the neutral rural population dictates the destruction of civilian crops ... if they (the VC) are to be hampered by the crop destruction program, it will be necessary to destroy large portions of the rural economy  probably 50% or more.(Verwey, 1977: p.115)Rural-to-urban migration rates dramatically increased in South Vietnam, as peasants escaped the destruction in the countryside by fleeing to the U.S.-dominated cities. The urban population in South Vietnam more than tripled: from 2.8 million people in 1958, to 8 million by 1971. The rapid flow of people led to a fast-paced and uncontrolled urbanization; an estimated 1.5 million people were living in Saigon slums, while many South Vietnamese elites and U.S. personnel lived in luxury.(Effects on U.S. veteransStudies of veterans who served in the South during the war have increased rates of cancer, nerve, digestive, skin and respiratory disorders. Veterans from the south had higher rates of throat cancer, acute/chronic leukemia, Hodgkins lymphoma and non-Hodgkins lymphoma, prostate cancer, lung cancer, soft tissue sarcoma and liver cancer. Other than liver cancer, these are the same conditions the US Veterans Administration has found to be associated with exposure to Agent Orange/dioxin, and are on the list of conditions eligible for compensation and treatment.()Military personnel who loaded airplanes and helicopters used in Ranch Hand probably sustained some of the heaviest exposures. Members of the Chemical Corps, who stored and mixed herbicides and defoliated the perimeters of military bases, are also thought to have had some of the heaviest exposures. Others with potentially heavy exposures included members of Army Special Forces units who defoliated remote campsites, and members of Navy river units who cleared base perimeters.(Frumkin, 2003: p. 3)  Military members who served on Okinawa also claim to have been exposed to the chemical.(Mitchell, Jon, Evidence for Agent Orange on Okinawa, Times, 12 April 2011, p. 12.)While in Vietnam, the veterans were told not to worry, and were persuaded the chemical was harmless.(Hermann, Kenneth J.; Killing Me Softly: How Agent Orange Murders Vietnams Children, Political Affairs, April 25, 2006) After returning home, Vietnam veterans began to suspect their ill health or the instances of their wives having miscarriages or children born with birth defects may be related to Agent Orange and the other toxic herbicides to which they were exposed in Vietnam. Veterans began to file claims in 1977 to the Department of Veterans Affairs for disability payments for health care for conditions they believed were associated with exposure to Agent Orange, or more specifically, dioxin, but their claims were denied unless they could prove the condition began when they were in the service or within one year of their discharge.By April 1993, the Department of Veterans Affairs had only compensated 486 victims, although it had received disability claims from 39,419 soldiers who had been exposed to Agent Orange while serving in Vietnam.()Legal and diplomatic proceedingsUS veterans class action lawsuit against manufacturersSince at least 1978, several lawsuits have been filed against the companies which produced Agent Orange, among them Dow Chemical, Monsanto, and Shamrock.Mayerson of the firm Mayerson Law Offices, P.C. was an early pioneer in Agent Orange litigation, working with renowned environmental attorney Yannacone in 1980 on the first class-action suits against wartime manufacturers of Agent Orange. In meeting Dr. Ronald A. Codario, one of the first civilian doctors to see afflicted patients, Mayerson, so impressed by the fact an M.D. would show so much interest in a Vietnam veteran, forwarded more than a thousand pages of information on Agent Orange and the effects of dioxin on animals and humans to Codarios office the day after he was first contacted by the doctor.(Wilcox, 1983: ) The corporate defendants sought to escape culpability by blaming everything on the U.S. government.()The Mayerson Law Offices, P.C., with Sgt. E. Hartz as their principal client, filed the first Agent Orange class action lawsuit, in Pennsylvania in 1980, for the injuries soldiers in Vietnam suffered through exposure to toxic dioxins in the Agent Orange defoliant.(http://news.google.com/newspapers?nid1347&dat19800125&idZdMSAAAAIBAJ&sjid0_oDAAAAIBAJ&pg5065,3012612 Dying Veteran May Speak From Beyond The Grave In Court: Ledger) Attorney Hy Mayerson co-wrote the brief that certified the Agent Orange Product Liability action as a action, the largest ever filed as of its filing.(Croft, Steve; Agent Orange, CBS Evening News, May 7, 1980) Hartzs deposition was one of the first ever taken in America, and the first for an Agent Orange trial, for the purpose of preserving testimony at trial, as it was understood that Hartz would not live to see the trial because of the tumor that began to develop while he was a member of Force, Forces, and LRRPs in Vietnam.()(Pottstown Mercury) The firm also located and supplied critical research to the Veterans lead expert, Dr. Ronald A. Codario, M.D., including about 100 hundred articles from toxicology journals dating back more than a decade, as well as data about where herbicides had been sprayed, what the effects of dioxin had been on animals and humans, and every accident in factories where herbicides were produced or dioxin was a contaminant of some chemical reaction.(In 1984, the class-action suit was settled out of court for $180 million; slightly over 45% of this was ordered to be paid by Monsanto alone.()() Many veterans who were victims of Agent Orange exposure were outraged the case had been settled instead of going to court, and felt they had been betrayed by the lawyers. Fairness Hearings were held in five major American cities, where veterans and their families discussed their reactions to the settlement, and condemned the actions of the lawyers and courts, demanding the case be heard before a jury of their peers. Federal Judge Julius Weinstein refused the appeals, claiming the settlement was fair and just. By 1989, the veterans fears were confirmed when it was decided how the money from the settlement would be paid out. A totally disabled Vietnam veteran would receive a maximum of $12,000 spread out over the course of 10 years. Furthermore, by accepting the settlement payments, disabled veterans would become ineligible for many state benefits that provided far more monetary support than the settlement, such as food stamps, public assistance, and government pensions. A widow of a Vietnam veteran who died of Agent Orange exposure would only receive $3700.()In 2004, Jill Montgomery, a spokesperson for Monsanto, said Monsanto should not be liable at all for injuries or deaths caused by Agent Orange, saying: We are sympathetic with people who believe they have been injured and understand their concern to find the cause, but reliable scientific evidence indicates that Agent Orange is not the cause of serious long-term health effects.()New Jersey Agent Orange CommissionIn 1980, Jersey created the New Jersey Agent Orange Commission, the first state commission created to study its effects. The commissions research project in association with University was called The Pointman Project. It was disbanded by Governor Todd Whitman in 1996.(New York Times, July 3, 1996)During Pointman I, commission researchers devised ways to determine small dioxin levels in blood. Prior to this, such levels could only be found in the adipose (fat) tissue. The project compared dioxin levels in a small group of Vietnam veterans who had been exposed to Agent Orange with a group of matched veterans who had not served in Vietnam. The results of this project were published in the Journal of the American Medical Association in 1988.(Journal of the American Medical Association, Vol. 259 No. 11, March 18, 1988)The second phase of the project continued to examine and compare dioxin levels in various groups of Vietnam veterans, including Army, Marines and brown water riverboat Navy personnel.US CongressIn 1991, the US Congress enacted the Orange Act, giving the Department of Veterans Affairs the authority to declare certain conditions presumptive to exposure to Agent Orange/dioxin, making these veterans who served in Vietnam eligible to receive treatment and compensation for these conditions.(Agent Orange  Office of Public Health and Environmental Hazards) The same law required the National Academy of Sciences to periodically review the science on dioxin and herbicides used in Vietnam to inform the Secretary of Veterans Affairs about the strength of the scientific evidence showing association between exposure to Agent Orange/dioxin and certain conditions.(PL 102-4 and The National Academy of Sciences)Through this process, the list of presumptive conditions has grown since 1991, and currently the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs has listed prostate cancer, respiratory cancers, multiple myeloma, type II diabetes, Hodgkins disease, non-Hodgkins lymphoma, soft tissue sarcoma, chloracne, porphyria cutanea tarda, peripheral neuropathy, chronic lymphocytic leukemia, and spina bifida in children of veterans exposed to Agent Orange as conditions associated with exposure to the herbicide. This list now includes B cell leukemias, such as hairy cell leukemia, Parkinsons disease and ischemic heart disease, these last three having been added on August 31, 2010. Several highly placed individuals in government are voicing concerns about whether some of the diseases on the list should, in fact, actually have been included.()U.S./Vietnamese government negotiationsIn 2002, Vietnam and the US held a joint conference on Human Health and Environmental Impacts of Agent Orange. Following the conference, the US Institute of Environmental Health Sciences (NIEHS) began scientific exchanges between the US and Vietnam, and began discussions for a joint research project on the human health impacts of Agent Orange. (Young, 2009: p. 310)These negotiations broke down in 2005, when neither side could agree on the research protocol and the research project was cancelled. More progress has been made on the environmental front. In 2005, the first US-Vietnam workshop on remediation of dioxin was held. (Young, 2009: p. 310)Starting in 2005, the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) began to work with the Vietnamese government to measure the level of dioxin at the Nang Airbase. Also in 2005, the Joint Advisory Committee on Agent Orange, made up of representatives of Vietnamese and US government agencies, was established. The committee has been meeting yearly to explore areas of scientific cooperation, technical assistance and environmental remediation of dioxin.()A breakthrough in the diplomatic stalemate on this issue occurred as a result of United States President George W. Bushs state visit to Vietnam in November 2006. In the joint statement, President Bush and Triet agreed further joint efforts to address the environmental contamination near former dioxin storage sites would make a valuable contribution to the continued development of their bilateral relationship.(Joint Statement Between the Socialist Republic of Vietnam and the United States of America. Pres. George W Bush Whitehouse Press office. Accessed December 31, 2008. (original no longer available PDF available at http://www.warlegacies.org/Bush.pdf.))In late May 2007, President Bush signed into law a supplemental spending bill for the war in Iraq and Afghanistan that included an earmark of $3 million specifically for funding for programs for the remediation of dioxin hotspots on former US military bases, and for public health programs for the surrounding communities;(Martin, May 2009: p. 2) some authors consider this to be completely inadequate, pointing out that the U.S. airbase in Nang, alone, will cost $14 million to clean up, and that three others are estimated to require $60 million for cleanup.( The appropriation was renewed in the fiscal year 2009 and again in FY 2010. An additional $12 million was appropriated in the fiscal year 2010 in the Supplemental Appropriations Act and a total of $18.5 million appropriated for fiscal year 2011.()  Secretary of State Hillary Clinton stated during a visit to Hanoi in October 2010 that the US government would begin work on the clean-up of dioxin contamination at the Da Nang airbase. ()  In June 2011 a ceremony was held at Da Nang airport to mark the start of US-funded decontamination of dioxin hotspots in Vietnam. $32m has so far been allocated by the US congress to fund the program.(http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/world-asia-pacific-13808753)Vietnamese victims class action lawsuit in U.S. courtsOn January 31, 2004, a rights group, the Vietnam Association for Victims of Agent Orange/dioxin (VAVA), filed a lawsuit in the States District Court for the Eastern District of New York in Brooklyn, against several U.S. companies for liability in causing personal injury, by developing and producing the chemical. Dow Chemical and Monsanto were the two largest producers of Agent Orange for the U.S. military, and were named in the suit, along with the dozens of other companies (Diamond Shamrock, Uniroyal, Thompson Chemicals, Hercules, etc.). On March 10, 2005, Judge B. Weinstein of the Eastern District  who had presided over the 1984 US veterans class action lawsuit  dismissed the lawsuit, ruling there was no legal basis for the plaintiffs claims. He concluded Agent Orange was not considered a poison under law at the time of its use by the U.S.; the U.S. was not prohibited from using it as a herbicide; and the companies which produced the substance were not liable for the method of its use by the government. The U.S. government was not a party in the lawsuit, due to immunity, and the court ruled the chemical companies, as contractors of the US government, shared the same immunity. The case was appealed and heard by the Circuit Court of Appeals on June 18, 2007. The Court of Appeals upheld the dismissal of the case, stating the herbicides used during the war were not intended to be used to poison humans and therefore did not violate international law.(February 22, 2008 Decision by the Second Circuit Court of Appeals re: Vietnam Association of Victims of Agent Orange v. Dow Chemical Co.) The Supreme Court declined to consider the case.Three judges on the Second Circuit Court of Appeals in Manhattan heard the appeal on June 18, 2007. They upheld Weinsteins ruling to dismiss the case. They ruled that, though the herbicides contained a dioxin (a known poison), they were not intended to be used as a poison on humans. Therefore, they were not considered a chemical weapon and thus not a violation of international law. A further review of the case by the whole panel of judges of the Court of Appeals also confirmed this decision. The lawyers for the Vietnamese filed a petition to the US Supreme Court to hear the case. On March 2, 2009, the Supreme Court denied certiorari and refused to reconsider the ruling of the Court of Appeals.()In a November 2004 International poll of 987 people, 79% of respondents thought the US chemical companies which produced Agent Orange defoliant should compensate US soldiers who were affected by the toxic chemical used during the war in Vietnam. 51% said they supported compensation for Vietnamese Agent Orange victims.(Vietnam Ministry of Foreign Affairs; Americans support compensations for Agent Orange victims: poll, November 22, 2004)Help for those affected in VietnamTo assist those who have been affected by Agent Orange/dioxin, the Vietnamese have established peace villages, which each host between 50 and 100 victims, giving them medical and psychological help. As of 2006, there were 11 such villages, thus granting some social protection to fewer than a thousand victims. U.S. veterans of the war in Vietnam and individuals who are aware and sympathetic to the impacts of Agent Orange have supported these programs in Vietnam. An international group of veterans from the U.S. and its allies during the Vietnam War working with their former enemy  veterans from the Vietnam Veterans Association  established the Vietnam Friendship Village() outside of Hanoi.The center provides medical care, rehabilitation and vocational training for children and veterans from Vietnam who have been affected by Agent Orange. In 1998, The Red Cross established the Vietnam Agent Orange Victims Fund to provide direct assistance to families throughout Vietnam that have been affected. In 2003, the Association of Victims of Agent Orange (VAVA) was formed. In addition to filing the lawsuit against the chemical companies, VAVA provides medical care, rehabilitation services and financial assistance to those injured by Agent Orange.()The Vietnamese government provides small monthly stipends to more than 200,000 Vietnamese believed affected by the herbicides; this totaled $40.8 million in 2008 alone. The Vietnam Red Cross has raised more than $22 million to assist the ill or disabled, and several U.S. foundations, United Nations agencies, European governments and nongovernmental organizations have given a total of about $23 million for site cleanup, reforestation, health care and other services to those in need.(Statement by Amb. Ngo Quang Xuan to the U.S. House Foreign Affairs Subcommittee of Asia, Pacific and Global Environment, June 2009, p. 3)Vuong Mo of the Vietnam News Agency described one of centers:():May is 13, but she knows nothing, is unable to talk fluently, nor walk with ease due to for her bandy legs. Her father is dead and she has four elder brothers, all mentally retarded ... The students are all disabled, retarded and of different ages. Teaching them is a hard job. They are of the 3rd grade but many of them find it hard to do the reading. Only a few of them can. Their pronunciation is distorted due to their twisted lips and their memory is quite short. They easily forget what theyve learned ... In the Village, it is quite hard to tell the kids exact ages. Some in their twenties have a physical statures as small as the 7- or 8-years-old. They find it difficult to feed themselves, much less have mental ability or physical capacity for work. No one can hold back the tears when seeing the heads turning round unconsciously, the bandy arms managing to push the spoon of food into the mouths with awful difficulty ... Yet they still keep smiling, singing in their great innocence, at the presence of some visitors, craving for something beautiful.On June 16, 2010, members of U.S.-Vietnam Dialogue Group on Agent Orange/Dioxin unveiled a comprehensive 10-year Declaration and Plan of Action to address the toxic legacy of Agent Orange and other herbicides in Vietnam. The Plan of Action was released as an Aspen Institute publication and calls upon the U.S. and Vietnamese governments to join with other governments, foundations, businesses, and nonprofits in a partnership to clean up dioxin hot spots in Vietnam and to expand humanitarian services for people with disabilities there.(Public-private group has plan in the works to resolve issue. chicagotribune.com (December 8, 2009). Retrieved on January 27, 2011.)(Plan addresses Agent Orange legacy in Vietnam  World news  World environment  msnbc.com. MSNBC (June 16, 2010). Retrieved on January 27, 2011.)(Special Report: Agent Orange. Washingtonmonthly.com (January 6, 2010). Retrieved on January 27, 2011.) On September 16, 2010, Senator Patrick Leahy (D-VT) acknowledged the work of the Dialogue Group by releasing a statement on the floor of the United States Senate. The statement urges the U.S. government to take the Plan of Actions recommendations into account in developing a multi-year plan of activities to address the Agent Orange/dioxin legacy.(Congressional Record  Senate, September 16, 2010)Use outside VietnamWhile Agent Orange was only used between 1965 and 1970, 2,4-D, 2,4,5-T and other herbicides were used by the US military from the late 1940s through the 1970s.(Agent Orange information site)(Specifics of Agent Orange use)United StatesIn 1978, the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency suspended spraying of Agent Orange in National Forests, due to a threefold increase in miscarriages in women living near forests that had been sprayed.(Nass, Meryl; Monsantos Agent Orange: The Persistent Ghost from the Vietnam War, Organic Consumers Association, 2002)(Nicosia and Swofford, 2004: p. 446)A December 2006 Department of Defense report listed Agent Orange testing, storage, and disposal sites at 32 locations throughout the United States, as well as in Canada, Thailand, Puerto Rico, Korea, and in the Pacific Ocean.(Young, 2006: pp. 56) The Veteran Administration has also acknowledged that Agent Orange was used domestically by U.S. forces in test sites throughout the US. Air Force Base in Florida was one of the primary testing sites throughout the 1960s.()KoreaAgent Orange was used in Korea in the late 1960s.() Republic of Korea troops were the only personnel involved in the spraying, which occurred along the Demilitarized Zone (DMZ). Citing declassified U.S. Department of Defense documents, Korean officials fear thousands of its soldiers may have come into contact with the deadly defoliant in the late 1960s and early 1970s. According to one top government official, as many as 30,000 Korean veterans are suffering from illness related to their exposure. The exact number of GIs who may have been exposed is unknown. But C. David Benbow, a North Carolina attorney who served as a sergeant with Co. C, 3rd Battalion, 23rd Infantry Regiment, 2nd Infantry Division, along the DMZ in 196869, estimates as many as 4,000 soldiers at any given time could have been affected..()In 1999, about 20,000 South Koreans filed two separated lawsuits against U.S. companies, seeking more than $5 billion in damages. After losing a decision in 2002, they filed an appeal.In January 2006, the South Korean Appeals Court ordered Dow Chemical and Monsanto to pay $62 million in compensation to about 6,800 people. The ruling acknowledged that the defendants failed to ensure safety as the defoliants manufactured by the defendants had higher levels of dioxins than standard, and, quoting the U.S. National Academy of Science report, declared that there was a causal relationship between Agent Orange and 11 diseases, including cancers of the lung, larynx and prostate. The judges failed to acknowledge the relationship between the chemical and peripheral neuropathy, the disease most widespread among Agent Orange victims according to the News.The United States local press KPHO-TV in Phoenix, Arizona alleged that the United States Army has buried Agent Orange in Camp Carroll, the U.S. Army base located in Gyeongsangbuk-do, Korea.() It is based on the claim of three U.S. Army veterans. They claimed approximately 250 55 gallon drums of Agent Orange were buried at Camp Carroll in 1978, which was indicated as Chemicals type Agent Orange or Province of Vietnam, Compound Orange with stripe around the barrel dated 1967 for the Republic of Vietnam. The South Korean Ministry of Environment announced that they will request cooperative investigation at Camp Carroll officially.()  The USFK issued a statement that confirmed that barrels were buried there, but all (plus an additional 60 tons of soil) were removed in 1996. ()Canadian Forces Base Gagetown (New Brunswick, Canada)The U.S. military, with the permission of the Canadian government,() tested herbicides, including Agent Orange, in the forests near the Forces Base Gagetown in New Brunswick in 1966 and 1967. On September 12, 2007, Thompson, of Veterans Affairs, announced that the of Canada was offering a one-time gratia payment of $20,000 as the compensation package for Agent Orange exposure at CFB Gagetown.()On July 12, 2005, Merchant Law Group LLP on behalf of over 1,100 Canadian veterans and civilians who were living in and around the CFB Gagetown filed a lawsuit to pursue action litigation concerning Agent Orange and Agent Purple with the Court of Canada.()On August 4, 2009, the case was rejected by the court due to lack of evidence. The ruling was appealed.()(Berry, Shawn; Moncton judge rules in Agent Orange lawsuit, Times & Transcript, August 4, 2009)Queensland, AustraliaIn 2008 Australian researcher Jean Williams claimed that cancer rates in the town of Innisfail, Queensland were 10 times higher than the state average due to secret testing of Agent Orange by the Australian military scientists during the Vietnam War. Williams, who had won the Order of Australia medal for her research on the effects of chemicals on U.S. war veterans, based her allegations on Australian government reports found in the Australian War Memorial museum archives. A former soldier, Ted Bosworth, backed up the claims, saying that he had been involved in the secret testing. The Queensland health department claimed that cancer rates in Innisfail were not higher than those in other parts of the state.(McMahon, Barbara; Australia cancer deaths linked to Agent Orange, Guardian, May 19, 2008)New ZealandThe use of Agent Orange has been controversial in New Zealand, because of exposure of New Zealand troops to it and because of the production of Agent Orange for Vietnam and other users at a Ivon Watkins-Dow chemical plant in Paritutu, Plymouth. There have been continuing claims that the suburb of Paritutu has also been polluted; see New Zealand in the Vietnam War.(;NZPA Concern prompts review of Dioxin study, New Zealand Herald, November 25, 2006)There are many cases of New Zealand soldiers developing cancers such as bone cancer from exposure to Agent Orange.BrazilThe Brazilian government used Agent Orange to defoliate a large section of the rainforest so that Alcoa could build the dam to power mining operations. Large areas of rainforest were destroyed, along with the homes and livelihoods of thousands of rural peasants and indigenous tribes.()Malayan EmergencySmall scale defoliation experiments using 2-4-D and 2-4-5-T were conducted by the British during the Emergency in 1951. Areas of jungle close to roadways were cleared using chemical defoliation to help prevent ambushes by Communist Terrorists.()Ontario, CanadaOn February 17, 2011, the Star revealed that the same toxins used to strip the jungles of Vietnam were also employed to clear extensive plots of land in Ontario.() The same day, in response to the Toronto Star article, the Ontario provincial government launched a probe into the use of Agent Orange.()On February 18, 2011, Ontarios Ministry of Natural Resources widened the probe of Agent Orange spraying to include all areas of the province where government managed forests on Crown land.()The Toronto Star reported that, records from the 1950s, 60s and 70s show forestry workers, often students and junior rangers, spent weeks at a time as human markers holding red, helium-filled balloons on fishing lines while low-flying planes sprayed toxic herbicides including an infamous chemical mixture known as Agent Orange on the brush and the boys below.(See also* issues with war* Teratogen* SyndromeReferencesNotesBibliography* ** * * * * * * Martin, Michael F.; Vietnamese Victims of Agent Orange and US-Vietnam Relations, Congressional Research Service, report to States Congress, May 28, 2009* * * NTP (National Toxicology Program); Toxicology and Carcinogenesis Studies of 2,3,7,8-Tetrachlorodibenzo-p-dioxin (TCDD) in Female Harlan Sprague-Dawley Rats (Gavage Studies), CASRN 1746-01-6, April 2006.* * * * * * *   readers should note that both of Youngs books were commissioned by the Department of Defense, Office of the Deputy Under Secretary of Defense (Installations and Environment)Further readingBooks* * * * * * * * * * * Journal articles / Papers* Weisman, Joan Murray. The Effects of Exposure to Agent Orange on the Intellectual Functioning, Academic Achievement, Visual Motor Skill, and Activity Level of the Offspring of Vietnam War Veterans. Doctoral thesis. Hofstra University. 1986.* Kuehn, Bridget M.; Agent Orange Effects, Journal of the American Medical Association, 2010;303(8):722.Government/NGO reports* Agent Orange in Vietnam: Recent Developments in Remediation: Testimony of Ms. Tran Thi Hoan, Subcommittee on Asia, the Pacific and the Global Environment, U.S. House of Representatives, Committee on Foreign Affairs. July 15, 2010* Agent Orange in Vietnam: Recent Developments in Remediation: Testimony of Dr. Nguyen Thi Ngoc Phuong, Subcommittee on Asia, the Pacific and the Global Environment, U.S. House of Representatives, Committee on Foreign Affairs. July 15, 2010* Agent Orange Policy, American Public Health Association, 2007* Assessment of the health risk of dioxins, Health Organization/Programme on Chemical Safety, 1998*Operation Ranch Hand: Herbicides In Southeast Asia History of Operation Ranch Hand, 1983*Agent Orange Dioxin Contamination in the Environment and Food Chain at Key Hotspots in Viet Nam Boivin, TG, et al, 2011News* Fawthrop, Tom; Agent of suffering, Guardian, February 10, 2008* Cox, Paul; The Legacy of Agent Orange is a Continuing Focus of VVAW, The Veteran, Veterans Against the War, Volume 38, No. 2, Fall 2008.* Barlett, Donald P. and Steele, James B.; Monsantos Harvest of Fear, Vanity Fair May 2008* Quick, Ben The Boneyard Orion Magazine, March/April 2008* Cheng, Eva; Vietnams Agent Orange victims call for solidarity, Green Left Weekly, September 28, 2005* Children and the Vietnam War 3040 years after the use of Agent Orange* Tokar, Brian; Monsanto: A Checkered History, Z Magazine, March 1999Video* Agent Orange: The Last Battle. Dir. Stephanie Jobe, Adam Scholl. DVD. 2005* HADES Dir. Caroline Delerue, Screenplay Mauro Bellanova 2011External links*Vietnamese Victims of Agent Orange web site*U.S. Environmental Protection Agency  Dioxin Web site*Agent Orange/Dioxin Lawsuit in Vietnam Pictorial, Vietnam News Agency*Agent Orange Office of Public Health and Environmental Hazards, Department of Veteran Affairs*Poisoned Lives*The Aspen Institute Advocacy and Exchange Program on Agent Orange/Dioxin*Make Agent Orange History*Agent Orange Record*/ Hatfield ConsultantstaronjaOrangeOrangeOrangeNaranjaOrangeorangelaranxaOranyeArancioOranyeOrangeOrangeja:OrangeOrangelaranjaOrangeOrangeOrangeOrangeOrangec da camzh:
3229
Outback
Image:Yalgoo Shire.jpg|thumb|280px|A tourism sign post Western AustraliaImage:Dogfence.jpg|thumb|right||The Fence near PedyImage:Fitzgerald River National Park DSC04436.JPG|thumb|right|River National Park in Western AustraliaThe Outback is the vast, remote, arid area of Australia,  term colloquially can refer to any lands outside the main areas. The term the outback is generally used to refer to locations that are comparatively more remote than those areas named bush.OverviewThe outback is home to a diverse set of animal species, such as the kangaroo, emu and dingo. The Fence was built to restrict dingo movements into agricultural areas towards the south east of the continent. The marginally fertile parts are primarily utilised as rangelands and have been traditionally used for sheep or cattle grazing, on stations which are leased from the Federal Government. While small areas of the outback consist of clay soils the majority has exceedingly infertile palaeosols. Riversleigh, in Queensland, is one of Australias most renowned fossil sites and was recorded as a Heritage site in 1994. The  area contains fossil remains of ancient mammals, birds and reptiles of Oligocene and Miocene age.HistoryEarly European exploration of inland Australia was sporadic. More focus was on the more accessible and fertile coastal areas. The first party to successfully cross the Blue Mountains just outside Sydney was led by Blaxland in 1813, 25 years after the colony was established. People starting with Oxley in 1817, 1818 and 1821, followed by Sturt in 18291830 attempted to follow the westward-flowing rivers to find an inland sea, but these were found to all flow into the River and River which turn south.Over the period 1858 to 1861, McDouall Stuart led six expeditions north from Adelaide into the outback, culminating in successfully reaching the north coast of Australia and returning, without the loss of any of the partys members lives. This contrasts with the ill-fated and Wills expedition in 186061 which was much better funded, but resulted in the deaths of three of the four members of the transcontinental party.The Telegraph line was constructed in the 1870s along the route identified by Stuart, who had found enough water to support the needed repeater stations.Exploration of the outback continued in the 1950s when Beadell explored, surveyed and built many roads in support of the nuclear weapons tests at Field and Maralinga and rocket testing on the Prohibited Area. Mineral exploration continues as new mineral deposits are identified and developed.While the early explorers used horses to cross the outback, the first woman to make the journey riding a horse was Hingley, who rode from Broome to Cairns in 2006.(First woman conquers Outback)MiningOther than agriculture and tourism, the main economic activity in this vast and sparsely settled area is mining. Owing to the complete absence of mountain building and glaciation since the Permian (in many areas since the Cambrian) ages, the outback is extremely rich in iron, aluminium, manganese and uranium ores, and also contains major deposits of gold, nickel, iron, lead and zinc ores. Because of its size, the value of grazing and mining is considerable. Major mines and mining areas in the outback include opals at Coober Pedy, Lightning Ridge and White Cliffs, metals at Broken Hill, Tennant Creek, Olympic Dam and the remote Mine. Oil and gas are extracted in the Basin around Moomba.In Western Australia the diamond mine in the (Western Australia) is the worlds biggest producer of natural diamonds and contributes approximately one-third of the worlds natural supply. The Pilbara regions economy is dominated by mining and petroleum industries.(The Pilbaras oil and gas industry is the regions largest export industry earning $5.0 billion in 2004/05 accounting for over 96% of the States production. source  WA.gov.au) Most of Australias ore is also mined in the Pilbara and it also has one of the worlds major manganese mines, Woodie Woodie. Population Owing to the low and erratic rainfall over most of the outback, combined with soils which are usually not very fertile, inland Australia is relatively sparsely settled. More than 90 percent of Australians live in urban areas on the coast. However the outback and the history of its exploration and settlement provides Australians with a culturally valued backdrop, and stories of swagmen, squatters, and bushrangers are central to the national ethos. The song Matilda, which is about a swagman and squatters, is probably Australias best internationally known and most well-loved song.Aboriginal communities in outback regions have not been displaced as they have been in areas of intensive agriculture and large cities, in coastal areas. So a significant proportion of the countrys indigenous population lives in the Outback,(World Book Encyclopedia) in areas such as the Pitjantjatjara Yankunytjatjara lands in northern South Australia.MedicineImage:Outback.jpg|thumb|right|Flying over western South Wales. Near the bottom of the picture, a squiggly line appears; apparently, a creek created by recent rain.EducationIn most outback communities, the number of children is too small for a conventional school to operate. Children are educated at home by the of the Air. Originally the teachers communicated with the children via radio, but now satellite telecommunication is used instead.Some children attend boarding school, mostly only those in secondary school.TerminologyCulturally, many urban Australians have had very generalised terms for the otherwise complex range of environments that exist within the inland and tropical regions of the continent. Regional terminology can be very specific to specific locations in each mainland state.The concept of back country, which initially meant land beyond the settled regions, was in existence in 1800. Crossing of the Blue Mountains and other exploration of the inland however gave a different dimension to the perception. The term outback was first used in print in 1869, when the writer clearly meant west of Wagga Wagga, New South Wales.(Coupe, Sheena (ed.),  Frontier Country, Vol. 1, Weldon Russell Publishing, Willoughby, 1989, ISBN 1 875202 01 3)It is colloquially said that the outback is located beyond the Stump. The location of the black stump may be some hypothetical location or may vary depending on local custom and folklore. It has been suggested that the term comes from the Black Stump Wine Saloon that once stood about 10 kilometres out of New South Wales on the Gunnedah Road. It is claimed that the saloon, named after the nearby Black Stump Run and Black Stump Creek, was an important staging post for traffic to north-west New South Wales and it became a marker by which people gauged their journeys.()Image:West MacDonnell National Park.JPG|thumb|left|The MacDonnell Ranges in the Territory are found in the centre of the country.The Never-Never is a term referring to remoter parts of the Australian outback. The outback can be also referred to as back of beyond,  back o Bourke although these terms are more frequently used when referring to something a long way from anywhere, or a long way away. The well-watered north of the continent is often called the End and the arid interior The Red Centre, owing to its vast amounts of red soil and sparse greenery amongst its landscape.Wildlifethumb|100px|right|A Brumby in the OutbackThe Australian Outback is full of very well-adapted wildlife, although much of it may not be immediately visible to the casual observer.  Many animals, such as kangaroos and dingoes, hide in bushes to rest and keep cool during the heat of the day.Birdlife is prolific, most often seen at waterholes at dawn and dusk.  Huge flocks of budgerigars, cockatoos, corellas and galahs are often sighted. On bare ground or roads during the winter, various species of snakes and lizards bask in the sun, but they are rarely seen during the summer months.Feral animals such as camels thrive in central Australia, brought to Australia by the early Afghan drivers. Feral horses known as brumbies are station horses that have run wild.  Feral pigs, foxes, cats and rabbits are also imported animals that degrade the environment, so time and money is spent eradicating them in an attempt to help protect fragile rangelands.TourismFile:Coober-Pedy-Oodnadatta-4WD-Mail-Truck-In-The-Outback.JPG|thumb|The Pedy Oodnadatta One Day Mail Run OKA bus in the outback. The bus serves as a tour bus and mail carrier.Image:ISS007 Gosses Bluff.jpg|thumb|right|Bluff crater, one of a number of meteor craters that can be found across outback Australia.There are many popular tourist attractions in the outback. Some of the well known destinations include:*Springs, Northern Territory*Stockmans Hall of Fame*Queensland*Hill, New South Wales*Broome*Pedy, South Australia*Marbles*National Park*Western Australia*Tjuta (The Olgas)*Katherine Gorge*Kings Canyon (Watarrka)*Ranges*Mia*Isa, Queensland*Augustus National Park*Creek, Northern Territory*Uluru (Ayers Rock)*Lakes RegionVisitors to the outback often drive their own or rented vehicles, or take organised tours. Travel through remote areas on main roads is easily done and requires no planning.  However travel through very remote areas, on isolated tracks, requires planning and a suitable, reliable vehicle (usually a drive). On very remote routes considerable supplies and equipment may be required, this can include prearranged caches. It is not advisable to travel into these especially remote areas with a single vehicle, unless fully equipped with good communication technology (e.g. a satellite phone, EPIRB etc.).  Many visitors prefer to travel in these areas in a convoy. Deaths from tourists and locals becoming stranded on outback trips occasionally occur, sometime because insufficient water and food supplies were taken, or because people have walked away from their vehicle in search of help.  Travellers through very remote areas should always inform a reliable person of their route and expected destination arrival time, and remember that a vehicle is much easier to locate in an aerial search, than a person, so in the event of a breakdown, they must not leave their vehicle.Transportthumb|right|A road sign warning of potentially dangerous conditions ahead.The outback is criss-crossed by historic tracks. Most of the major highways have an excellent bitumen surface and other major roads are usually well-maintained dirt roads.  Tracks in very sandy or exceedingly rocky areas may require high-clearance four wheel drives and spare fuel, tyres, food and water before attempting to travel them, however most outback roads are easily traversed in ordinary vehicles, provided care is taken.  Drivers unused to dirt roads should be especially cautious  it is recommended that drivers reduce their speed, drive with extra care, and avoid driving at night because animals can stray on to roads.  Travelling in remote areas in northern Australia is not advisable during the wet season (November to April), as heavy tropical downpours can quickly make dirt roads impassable. In the remotest parts of Australia fuel sellers are located hundreds of kilometres apart, so spare fuel must be carried or refuelling spots calculated carefully in order not to run out of fuel in between towns. In addition, multiple trailer trucks (known as Road Trains) traverse these roads and extreme care must be taken when around these vehicles, due to their weight, length (often three full trailers long) and amount of dust thrown up by 46+ tyres.The Highway runs from north to south through the centre of the continent, roughly paralleled by the railway. There is a proposal to develop some of the roads running from the SW to the NE to create an all-weather road named the Highway, crossing the continent diagonally from Western Australia (north of Kalgoorlie, through the Northern Territory to Winton, in Queensland.Air transport is relied on for mail delivery in some areas, owing to sparse settlement and wet-season road closures.  Most outback mines have an airstrip and many have a fly-out workforce. Most outback stations and stations have an airstrip and quite a few have their own light plane. Medical and ambulance services are provided by the Flying Doctor Service. The of the Air is a radio-based school using the RFDS radios.* Track* Developmental Road* Stock Route* Track* Sue Highway* French Line* Highway* River Road* Central Road* Highway* Line* Road* Track* Highway* Track* Developmental Road* Highway* Road* Highway* Track* Track* Track* LineSee also*Australia*Country*outback literature of the 20th centuryReferencesFurther reading*Dwyer Andrew (2007) Outback - Recipes and Stories from the Campfire Miegunyah Press ISBN 978 0 522 85380 3* Read, Ian G.(1995) Australias central and western outback : the driving guide Crows Nest, N.S.W. Little Hills Press. Little Hills Press explorer guides ISBN 1863150617* Year of the Outback 2002, Western Australia Perth, W.A.External links*From this Broken Hill*Beautiful Australian Outback - slideshow by magazineca:Outbackda:Outbackde:Outbackes:Outbackeu:Outbackfr:Outbackko:it:Outbackhu:Outbacknl:Outbackja:nn:Outbackpt:Outbacksimple:Outbacksl:Outbacksv:Outback
3464
Botswana
 footnotes                Botswana, officially the Republic of Botswana (), is a country located in Africa. The citizens are referred to as Batswana (singular: Motswana). Formerly the British protectorate of Bechuanaland, Botswana adopted its new name after becoming independent within the Commonwealth on 30 September 1966. It has held free and fair democratic elections since independence.Botswana is flat, and up to 70% is covered by the Desert. It is bordered by Africa to the south and southeast, Namibia to the west and north, and Zimbabwe to the northeast. Its border with Zambia to the north is poorly defined but at most is a few hundred meters long. (Zambia-Botswana border)A mid-sized, landlocked country of just over two million people, Botswana is one of the most sparsely populated countries in the world. Botswana was one of the poorest countries in Africa when it gained independence from Britain in 1966, with a GDP per capita of about US$70. Botswana has transformed itself, becoming one of the fastest-growing economies in the world to a GDP (purchasing power parity) per capita of about $14,800 (2010 IMF estimate). The country also has a strong tradition as a democracy.HistoryImage:Gaboronecitycentre.JPG|thumb|left|City centre buildings in Gaborone, Botswanathumb|left|A traditional dwellingIn the 19th century, hostilities broke out between Tswana inhabitants of Botswana and Ndebele tribes who were making incursions into the territory from the north-east. Tensions also escalated with the Boer settlers from the Transvaal to the east. After appeals by the Batswana leaders III, Bathoen and Sebele for assistance, the British Government put Bechuanaland under its protection on 31 March 1885. The northern territory remained under direct administration as the Bechuanaland Protectorate and is modern-day Botswana, while the southern territory became part of the Colony and is now part of the northwest province of South Africa. The majority of Setswana-speaking people today live in South Africa.When the of South Africa was formed in 1910 out of the main British colonies in the region, the Bechuanaland Protectorate, Basutoland (now Lesotho) and Swaziland (the High Commission Territories) were not included, but provision was made for their later incorporation. However, a vague undertaking was given to consult their inhabitants, and although successive South African governments sought to have the territories transferred, Britain kept delaying; consequently, it never occurred. The election of the Nationalist government in 1948, which instituted apartheid, and South Africas withdrawal from the Commonwealth in 1961, ended any prospect of incorporation of the territories into South Africa.An expansion of British central authority and the evolution of tribal government resulted in the 1920 establishment of two advisory councils to represent both Africans and Europeans. Proclamations in 1934 regularized tribal rule and powers. A European-African advisory council was formed in 1951, and the 1961 constitution established a consultative legislative council.In June 1964, Britain accepted proposals for a democratic self-government in Botswana. The seat of government was moved in 1965 from Mafikeng in South Africa, to the newly established Gaborone, which sits near its border. The 1965 constitution led to the first general elections and to independence on 30 September 1966. Khama, a leader in the independence movement and the legitimate claimant to the Ngwato chiefship, was elected as the first president, re-elected twice.The presidency passed to the sitting vice president, Masire, who was elected in his own right in 1984 and re-elected in 1989 and 1994. Masire retired from office in 1998. The presidency passed to the sitting vice president, Mogae, who was elected in his own right in 1999 and re-elected in 2004. The presidency passed in 2008 to Khama (son of the first president), who resigned his position as leader of the Defence Force to take up this civilian role.A long-running dispute over the northern border with Namibias Strip was the subject of a ruling by the Court of Justice in December 1999, which ruled that Island belongs to Botswana.()Politics and governmentThe politics of Botswana take place in a framework of a representative democratic republic, whereby the of Botswana is both of state and of government, and of a system. power is exercised by the government. power is vested in both the government and the of Botswana. The most recent election, its tenth, was held on 16 October 2009.Since independence was declared, the party system has been dominated by the Democratic Party. The judiciary is independent of the executive and the legislature. According to International, Botswana is the least corrupt country in Africa and ranks similarly close to Portugal and South Korea.(Transparency International 2008 Corruption Perception Index 2008. Retrieved 7-23-09.) The national anthem is leno la rona.Administrative divisionsBotswana is divided into 16 districts  10 rural districts and 6 urban districts.#Central District#District#District#District#District#North-East District#Ngamiland District#South-East District#Southern District#DistrictGeography and environmentFile:Flying-female-Lechwe.jpg|thumb|A lechwe in the DeltaAt  Botswana is the worlds 47th-largest country (after Ukraine). It is comparable in size to Madagascar, and is slightly smaller than the U.S. state of Texas or the Canadian province of Manitoba. It lies between latitudes 17 and 27S, and longitudes 20 and 30E.The country is predominantly flat, tending toward gently rolling tableland. Botswana is dominated by the Desert, which covers up to 70% of its land surface. The Delta, the worlds largest inland delta, is in the northwest. The Pan, a large salt pan, lies in the north.The River Basin, the major landform of all of Africa, lies partly in Botswana, in the southeast of the country. The Chobe River lies to the north, providing a boundary between Botswana and Namibia (Caprivi Region). The Chobe River meets with the Zambezi River at a place called Kazungula (meaning a small sausage tree, a point where Sebitwane and his Makololo tribe crossed the Zambezi into Zambia).Botswana has diverse areas of wildlife habitat. In addition to the delta and desert areas, there are grasslands and savannas, where Wildebeest, antelopes, and other mammals and birds are found. Northern Botswana has one of the few remaining large populations of the endangered Wild Dog. National Park, found in the District, has the worlds largest concentration of elephants. The park covers about  and supports about 350 species of birds.thumb|left|Sunrise in BotswanaThe Chobe National Park and Game Reserve (in the Okavango Delta) are major tourist destinations. Other reserves include the Kalahari Game Reserve located in the Kalahari desert in District; Pans National Park and Pan National Park are in Central District in the Pan. Mashatu Game Reserve is privately owned: located where the River and Limpopo River meet in eastern Botswana. The other privately owned reserve is Nature Reserve near Gaborone. There are also specialised sanctuaries like the Khama Rhino Sanctuary (for Rhinoceros) and Makgadikgadi Sanctuary (for Flamingos). They are both located in Central District.Environmental problemsImage:Moremi gorge 2.jpg|thumb|left|upright|Moremi Gorge, in the Tswapong Hills east of Palapye, Botswana. The porous rock absorbs rainwater, which then seeps out forming permanent cascades and pools. The hills provide one of Botswanas two breeding sites for the endangered vulture.thumb|Tourists at Chobe National ParkImage:Baobob tree.jpg|thumb|upright|A tree (Adansonia digitata)Botswana is currently facing two major environmental problems: drought and desertification.  The desertification problems predominantly stem from the severe times of drought in the country.  Due to the drought, 75% of the countrys human and animal populations are dependent on groundwater.  Groundwater use has eased the effects of drought, but has left a toll on the land. Groundwater is retrieved through drilling deep boreholes, which leads to the erosion of the land.  Surface water is very scarce in Botswana and less than 5% of the agriculture in the country is sustainable by rainfall.  Due to this 95% of the country raises cattle and livestock as a means for an income.  Therefore, it is not a surprise to see that 71% of the countrys land is used for communal grazing, which has been a major cause for the desertification of the country.()Since raising livestock has proven to be profitable for the people of Botswana, the land is continuing to be exploited. The animal populations have continued to dramatically increase. From 1966 to 1991 the livestock population has increased from 1.7 million to 5.5 million(.  Similarly, the human population has increased from 574,000 in 1971 to 1.5 million in 1995, nearly a 200% increase.  Over 50% of all households in Botswana own cattle, which is presently the largest single source of rural income.  Rangeland degradation or desertification is regarded as the reduction in land productivity as a result of overstocking and overgrazing or as a result of veld product gathering for commercial use.  Degradation is exacerbated by the effects of drought and climate change.(  It has been reported that the Delta is drying up due to the increased grazing of livestock.() The Okavango Delta is one of the major semi-forested wetlands in Botswana, the largest inland delta in the world and is a crucial ecosystem to the survival of many animals.(The Department and Forestry and Range Resources has already begun to implement project to reintroduce indigenous vegetation into communities in Kgalagadi South, Kweneng North and Boteti.() Reintroduction of indigenous vegetation will help with the degradation of the land. The States Government has also entered into an agreement with Botswana, giving them $7 million US dollars to reduce Botswanas debt by $8.3 million US dollars.  The stipulation of the US reducing Botswanas debt is that Botswana will focus on more extensive conservation of the land.(The Nations Development Programme claims that a major problem behind the overexploitation of resources, including land, in Botswana, is due to the poverty level.  To help change this the UNDP joined in with a project started in the southern community of Struizendam in Botswana.  The purpose of the project is to draw from indigenous knowledge and traditional land management systems.  The leaders of this movement are supposed to be the people in the community, in order to draw these in, in turn increasing their possibilities to earn an income and thus decreasing poverty.  The UNDP also stated that the government has to effectively implement policies to allow people to manage their own local resources and are giving the government information to help with policy development()DefenceAt the time of independence, Botswana had no armed forces. It was only after attacks from the Rhodesian and South African armies that the Defence Force (BDF) was formed in self-defence in 1977. The president is commander in chief and appoints a defence council. The BDF has approximately 12,000 members.Following political changes in South Africa and the region, the BDFs missions have increasingly focused on prevention of poaching, preparing for disasters, and foreign peacekeeping. The United States has been the largest single foreign contributor to the development of the BDF, and a large segment of its officer corps has received U.S. training. It is considered an apolitical and professional institution.EconomyFile:Mochudi.jpg|thumb|Mochudi, one of the larger villages in Botswanathumb|An aerial view over Gaborone, BotswanaImage:Debswana HQ.jpg|thumb|Headquarters of Debswana Diamond Company Ltd in Gaborone, BotswanaSince independence, Botswana has had one of the fastest growth rates in capita income in the world.(US Department of State website, Background Note: Botswana, May 2009. Retrieved 7-23-09.) Botswana has transformed itself from one of the poorest countries in the world to a middle-income country. By one estimate, it has the fourth highest national income at power parity in Africa, giving it a standard of living around that of Mexico and Turkey.()According to the Monetary Fund, growth averaged over 9% per year from 1966 to 1999. Botswana has a high level of economic freedom compared to other African countries.() The government has maintained a sound policy, despite consecutive budget deficits in 2002 and 2003, and a negligible level of foreign debt. It earned the highest sovereign rating in Africa and has stockpiled foreign exchange reserves (over $7 billion in 2005/2006) amounting to almost two and a half years of current imports.Debswana, the largest diamond mining company operating in Botswana, is 50% owned by the government.() Mineral industry provides about 40% of all government revenues.() In 2007, significant quantities of uranium were discovered, and mining is projected to begin by 2010. Several international mining corporations have established regional headquarters in Botswana, and prospected for diamonds, gold, uranium, copper, and even oil, many coming back with positive results. Government announced in early 2009, that they would try and shift their economic dependence on diamonds, over serious concern that diamonds are predicted to dry out in Botswana over the next twenty years.thumb|350px|Botswanas trading partners in 2004. Source: CIA World Factbook.An array of financial institutions populates the countrys financial system, with pension funds and commercial banks being the two most important segments by asset size. Banks remain profitable, well-capitalized, and liquid, as a result of growing national resources and high interest rates.()Botswanas competitive banking system is one of Africas most advanced. Generally adhering to global standards in the transparency of financial policies and banking supervision, the financial sector provides ample access to credit for entrepreneurs. The opening of Capital Bank in 2008 brought the total number of licensed banks to eight. The government is involved in banking through state-owned financial institutions and a special financial incentives program that is aimed at increasing Botswanas status as a financial centre. Credit is allocated on market terms, although the government provides subsidized loans. Reform of non-bank financial institutions has continued in recent years, notably through the establishment of a single financial regulatory agency that provides more effective supervision. The government has abolished exchange controls, and with the resulting creation of new portfolio investment options, the Botswana Stock Exchange is growing.The constitution prohibits the nationalization of private property and provides for an independent judiciary, and the government respects this in practice. The legal system is sufficient to conduct secure commercial dealings, although a serious and growing backlog of cases prevents timely trials. The protection of intellectual property rights has improved significantly. Botswana is ranked second only to South Africa among sub-Saharan Africa countries in the 2009 International Property Rights Index.While generally open to foreign participation in its economy, Botswana reserves a number of sectors for citizen participation. Increased foreign investment plays a significant role in the privatization of state-owned enterprises. Investment regulations are transparent, and bureaucratic procedures are streamlined and open, although somewhat slow. Investment returns such as profits and dividends, debt service, capital gains, returns on intellectual property, royalties, franchises fees, and service fees can be repatriated without limits.DemographicsFile:Gathering food in the Okavango.jpg|thumb|A girl in the Delta.Botswanas main ethnic groups are Batswana, BaKalanga, Bushmen or AbaThwa also known as Basarwa. Other tribes are Bayei, Bambukushu, Basubia, Baherero and Bakgalagadi. Other groups of ethnicities in Botswana include whites and Indians, both groups being roughly equally small in number. Botswanas Indian population is made up of many Indian-Africans of several generations, from Mozambique, Kenya, Tanzania, Mauritius, South Africa, and so on, as well as first generation Indian immigrants. The white population is native to Botswana or from other parts of Africa including Zimbabwe and South Africa. The white population speaks either English or Afrikaans and makes up roughly 3% of the population.Since 2000, because of deteriorating economic conditions in Zimbabwe, the number of in Botswana has risen into the tens of thousands.()Fewer than 10,000 Bushmen are still living the traditional hunter-gatherer style of life. Since the mid-1990s the central government of Botswana has been trying to move San out of their lands.(African Bushmen Tour U.S. to Fund Fight for Land. National Geographic News.) The UNs top official on rights, Prof. Anaya, has condemned Botswanas persecution of the Bushmen in a report released in February 2010.()()LanguageImage:Khutse Kalahari Lodge.jpg|thumb|A rondavel at Khutse Kalahari Lodge, Botswana.The official language of Botswana is English although Setswana is widely spoken across the country. In Setswana prefixes are more important than they are in many other languages. These prefixes include Bo, which refers to the country, Ba, which refers to the people, Mo, which is one person, and Se which is the language. For example, the main tribe of Botswana is the Tswana people, hence the name Botswana for its country. The people as a whole are Batswana, one person is a Motswana, and the language they speak is Setswana.ReligionbarsAn estimated 70 percent of the countrys citizens identify themselves as Christians. Anglicans, Methodists, and the United Congregational Church of Southern Africa make up the majority of Christians. There are also congregations of Lutherans, Roman Catholics, Seventh-day Adventists, Baptists, the Dutch Reformed Church, Mennonites, Mormons, Jehovahs Witnesses, and other Christian sects.According to the 2001 census, the countrys Muslim community, primarily of South Asian origin, numbers slightly more than 5,000. The 2001 census also lists approximately 3,000 Hindus and 700 Bahais. Approximately 20 percent of citizens espouse no religion. Religious services are well attended in both rural and urban areas.()Healthexpectancy at birth was 55 in 2009 according to the World Bank, having previously fallen from a peak of 64.1 in 1990 to a low of 49 in 2002.()HIV/AIDSLike elsewhere in Sub-Saharan Africa, the impact of AIDS is considerable. Economic development spending was cut by 10% in 20023 as a result of recurring budget deficits and rising expenditure on healthcare services. Botswana has been hit very hard by the pandemic; in 2006 it was estimated that expectancy at birth had dropped from 65 to 35 years.()The prevalence of HIV/AIDS in Botswana was estimated at 24% for adults in 2006.() In 2003, the government began a comprehensive program involving free or cheap generic anti-retroviral drugs as well as an information campaign designed to stop the spread of the virus.  The promiscuous nature of many sexual relationships further impacts the health situation; so much so that it has given rise to a Love Vocabulary() that is unique to the region.Approximately one in six Batswana has HIV, giving Botswana the second highest infection rate in the world after nearby Swaziland.() The government recognizes that AIDS will affect the economy and is trying to combat the epidemic, including free anti-retroviral drug treatment and a nation-wide Prevention of Mother-to-Child Transmission program. Botswana has reduced HIV transmission from infected mothers to their children from about 40% to just 4%.CancerThe Association of Botswana is a voluntary organization. The association is a member of the Union for International Cancer Control. The Association supplements existing services through provision of cancer prevention and health awareness programmes, facilitating access to health services for cancer patients and offering support and counseling to those affected.()EducationImage:University of Botswana dorms.jpg|thumb|Residence hall of the of Botswana in Gaborone, BotswanaBotswana has made great strides in educational development since independence in 1966. At that time there were very few graduates in the country and only a very small percentage of the population attended secondary school. Botswana increased its adult literacy rate from 69% in 1991 to 83% in 2008.()With the discovery of diamonds and the increase in government revenue that this brought, there was a huge increase in educational provision in the country. All students were guaranteed ten years of basic education, leading to a Junior Certificate qualification. Approximately half of the school population attends a further two years of secondary schooling leading to the award of the General Certificate of Secondary Education (BGCSE). Secondary education in Botswana is neither free nor compulsory.After leaving school, students can attend one of the six technical colleges in the country, or take vocational training courses in teaching or nursing. The best students enter the of Botswana, College of Agriculture http://www.bca.bw, and The Accountancy College in Gaborone. Many other students end up in the numerous private tertiary education colleges around the country. A high majority of these students are government sponsored. A larger influx of tertiary students is expected when construction of the nations second international university, The International University of Science and Technology, is completed in Palapye.One notable International University is University of Creative Technology that offers various Degree(s) in Arts. This has helped many youths develop and create their own businesses across the country.The quantitative gains have not always been matched by qualitative ones. Primary schools in particular still lack resources, and the teachers are less well paid than their secondary school colleagues. The Botswana Ministry of Education() is working to establish libraries in primary schools in partnership with the Library Project.() The of Botswana hopes that by investing a large part of national income in education, the country will become less dependent on diamonds for its economic survival, and less dependent on expatriates for its skilled workers. Botswana invests 21% of its government spending in education.(In January 2006, Botswana announced the reintroduction of school fees after two decades of free state education(BBC News website, Botswana brings back school fees. Retrieved 2009-23-7.) though the government still provides full scholarships with living expenses to any Botswana citizen in university, either at the University of Botswana or if the student wishes to pursue an education in any field not offered locally, such as medicine, they are provided with a full scholarship to study abroad.SportsFootball is the most popular sport in Botswana. Other popular sports are cricket, tennis, rugby, softball, handball, golf and and field.( )() Botswana is an associate member of the Cricket Council.Botswana has yet to win a medal at the Olympics, but in 2011 Montsho became world champion in the 400 metres and won Botswanas first athletics medal on world level.  Another famous Botswana athlete is high jumper Kgosiemang, three times African champion.The card game bridge has a strong following; it was first played in Botswana over 30 years ago and grew in popularity during the 1980s. Many British expatriate school teachers informally taught the game in Botswanas secondary schools. The Botswana Bridge Federation (BBF) was founded in 1988 and continues to organize tournaments. Bridge has remained popular and the BBF has over 800 members.() In 2007, the BBF invited the Bridge Union to host a week-long teaching program in May 2008.()CultureFile:Tsodilo Hills rock paintings4.jpg|thumb|Rock paintings of HillsBesides referring to the language of the dominant people groups in Botswana, Setswana is the adjective used to describe the rich cultural traditions of the Batswana-whether construed as members of the Tswana ethnic groups or of all citizens of Botswana.The Scottish writer, Alexander McCall Smith, has written a number of popular novels (1 Ladies Detective Agency series) about Botswana that entertain as well as inform the reader about the culture and customs of Botswana.MusicTswana music is mostly vocal and performed without drums; it also makes heavy use of string instruments. Tswana folk music has instruments such as Setinkane, Segankure/Segaba, and for the last few decades, the guitar has been celebrated as a versatile music instrument for Tswana music.Visual artsIn the northern part of Botswana, women in the villages of Etsha and Gumare are noted for their skill at crafting baskets from Palm and local dyes. The baskets are generally woven into three types: large, lidded baskets used for storage, large, open baskets for carrying objects on the head or for winnowing threshed grain, and smaller plates for winnowing pounded grain. The artistry of these baskets is being steadily enhanced through color use and improved designs as they are increasingly produced for commercial use.Other notable artistic communities include Pottery and Weavers, both located in the southeastern part of Botswana.The oldest paintings from both Botswana and South Africa depict hunting, animal and human figures, and were made by the Khoisan (!Kung San/Bushmen) over twenty thousand years ago within the Kalahari desert.In addition to these more traditional arts there are a number of extremely talented artists who use modern means to express themselves. There are a few galleries around Botswana that display paintings and sculptures. Some pieces are inspired by the beautiful Botswana landscapes and others by the people themselves.CuisineImage:Boerewors raw.jpg|thumb|right|200px|BoereworsThe cuisine of Botswana is unique but also shares some characteristics with other cuisine of Africa. Examples of Botswana food are Pap, Boerewors, Samp, Vetkoek and worms. A food unique to Botswana includes Seswaa, heavily salted mashed-up meat.HolidaysImage:Miss Botswana 08 Itseng Kgomotso.jpg|thumb|upright|Kgomotso, Miss Botswana 2008, during Miss World 2008See also*of Nations*in Botswana*of Botswana*stamps and postal history of Bechuanaland Protectorate*in Botswana*blockNotes and referencesFurther reading*.* Alexander McCall Smith: The No.1 Ladies Detective Agency series.* Michael Stanley: A Carrion Death  part of the Detective Kubu seriesExternal links* http://www.botswanaportal.com*****list listace:Botswanaaf:Botswanaals:Botsuanaam:ang:Botswanaar:an:Botswanaroa-rup:Botswanafrp:Botsouanaast:Botsuanaaz:Botsvanabm:Botswanabn:zh-min-nan:Botswanabe:be-x-old:bcl:Botswanabo:bs:Bocvanabr:Botswanabg:ca:Botswanacv:ceb:Botswanacs:Botswanacy:Botswanada:Botswanapdc:Botswanade:Botsuanadv:Dine Bikyahet:Botswanael:es:Botsuanaeo:Bocvanoext:Botsuanaeu:Botswanaee:Botswanafa:hif:Botswanafo:Botsvanafr:Botswanafy:Botswanaff:BotswanaBhotsuinVotswaangag:Botsvanagd:Botsuanade Botsuana - Republic of Botswanahak:Pok-tsh-ng-napko:ha:Botswanahy:hi:hr:Bocvanaio:Botswanaig:Botswanailo:Botswanabpy:id:Botswanaia:Botswanaie:Botswanaos:zu:IButswanais:Botsvanait:Botswanahe:jv:Botswanakn:pam:Botswanaka:ks:kk:kw:Botswanarw:Botswanaky:sw:Botswanakg:Botswanaht:Botswanaku:Botswanaltg:Botsvanala:Botswanalv:Botsvanalb:Botswanalt:Botsvanalij:Btswanali:Botswanaln:Botswanajbo:botsuanaslmo:Botswanahu:Botswanamk:ml:mt:Botswanamr:arz:mzn:ms:Botswanamn:nah:Botzhuanana:Botwananl:Botswanaja:pih:Botswanano:Botswanann:Botswananov:Botswanaoc:Botswanauz:Botsvanapnb:pap:Botswanaps:pms:Botswanands:Botswanapl:Botswanapt:Botswanakaa:Botsvanacrh:Botsvanaksh:Botswanaro:Botswanarm:Botswanaqu:Butswanaru:sah:se:Botswanasa:sg:Botswanasc:Botzuanasco:Botswanastq:Botsuanatn:Botswanasq:Bocvanascn:Botsuanasimple:Botswanass:Butjwnask:Botswanasl:Bocvanaszl:Botswanaso:Botswanackb:sr:sh:Bocvanafi:Botswanasv:Botswanatl:Botswanata:tt:te:th:ti:tg:ve:Vhu-Tswanatr:Botsvanaudm:uk:ur:ug:vec:Botswanavi:Botswanavo:Zvannfiu-vro:Botswanawa:Boswanazh-classical:war:Botswanawo:Botswanawuu:ts:Botswanayo:Btswnzh-yue:diq:Botswanazea:Botswanabat-smg:Botsvanazh:
3698
Economy_of_Burundi
spelling    Burundi is a landlocked, resource-poor country with an underdeveloped manufacturing sector. The mainstay of the Burundian economy is agriculture, accounting for 54%of GDP in 1997. Agriculture supports more than 70% of the labour force, the majority of whom are subsistence farmers. Although Burundi is potentially self-sufficient in food production, the ongoing civil war, overpopulation, and erosion have contributed to the contraction of the economy by 25% in recent years. Large numbers of displaced persons have been unable to produce their own food and are largely dependent on international humanitarian assistance. Burundi is a net food importer, with food accounting for 17% of imports in 1997.AgricultureThe main crop of Burundi is coffee, which accounted for 78.5% of exports in 1997. This dependence on coffee has increased Burundis vulnerability to seasonal yields and international coffee prices.It generates about 90 percent of export revenues, making the country particularly vulnerable to terms of trade shocks: the current account deficit in 2007 ran at 15 percent of GDP.(MFW4A) Coffee is the largest state-owned enterprise. In recent years, the government has tried to attract private investment to this sector, with some success. Efforts to privatize other publicly held enterprises have stalled. Other principal exports include tea and raw cotton. Burundi is the largest banana market in Africa.IndustryLittle industry exists except the processing of agricultural exports. Although potential wealth in petroleum, nickel, copper, and other natural resources is being explored, the uncertain security situation has prevented meaningful investor interest. Industrial development also is hampered by Burundis distance from the sea and high transport costs. Tanganyika remains an important trading point. The trade embargo, lifted in 1999, negatively impacted trade and industry. Since October 1993 the nation has suffered from massive ethnic-based violence which has resulted in the death of perhaps 250,000 people and the displacement of about 800,000 others. Foods, medicines, and electricity remain in short supply.Burundi is heavily dependent on bilateral and multilateral aid, with external debt totalling $1.247 billion (1.247 G$) in 1997. A series of largely unsuccessful 5-year plans initiated in July 1986 in partnership with the World Bank and the International Monetary Fund attempted to reform the foreign exchange system, liberalize imports, reduce restrictions on international transactions, diversify exports, and reform the coffee industry.thumb|200px|left|Goat rearing has been promoted as a source of income for rural-dwelling Burundians.IMF structural adjustment programs in Burundi were suspended following the outbreak of the crisis in 1993. The World Bank has identified key areas for potential growth, including the productivity of traditional crops and the introduction of new exports, light manufactures, industrial mining, and services. Other serious problems include the states role in the economy, the question of governmental transparency, and debt reduction.To protest the 1996 coup by President Buyoya, neighbouring countries imposed an economic embargo on Burundi. Although the embargo was never officially ratified by the Nations Security Council, most countries refrained from official trade with Burundi. Following the coup, the States also suspended all but humanitarian aid to Burundi. The regional embargo was lifted on January 23, 1999, based on progress by the government in advancing national reconciliation through the Burundi peace process.References*ReferencesExternal links**Burundi latest trade data on ITC Trade Mapde Burundide Burundidu Burundide Burundidi Burundide BurundiBurundido Burundi
4482
Liberal_Party_(UK)
colours  Yellow; historically orange, and before that greenThe Liberal Party was one of the two major political parties of the Kingdom during the 19th and early 20th centuries. It was a third party of negligible importance throughout the latter half of the 20th Century, before merging with the Social Democratic Party (SDP) in 1988 to form the present day Democrats. The party was generally considered to be on the centre-left of the political spectrum, and advocated liberalism.It grew out of the Whig Party in 1859, and Gladstone carried the party through governments in the late 19th century. The party split over the issue of Irish Home Rule, but returned to power in 1906 through a landslide victory. During this time in government, the Liberals are credited with the so-called Liberal Reforms, which saw the creation of a basic state. During World War I, the Liberals governed Britain through a coalition with the Conservatives, which ended in 1922. In the 1920s, the Labour Party permanently replaced the Liberals as Britains main centre-left party, and the Liberals went into decline, which culminated in them winning as few as 6 seats at general elections during the 1950s. A comeback of sorts was seen during the 1960s and 1970s, but it was not until 1981, when the Liberals allied with the newly formed SDP to form the Alliance, that the party enjoyed significant electoral success. In the 1983 general election, the alliance took 25% of the popular vote, but this only translated into 23 seats. During 1988, the Liberals formally merged with the SDP to form the Liberal Democrats, though a small splinter Liberal Party was formed in 1989 by former members opposed to the merger.IdeologyDuring the 19th century the Liberal Party was broadly in favour of what would today be called liberalism: supporting laissez-faire economic policies such as trade and minimal government interference in the economy (this doctrine was usually termed Liberalism after the era Liberal Prime Minister Ewart Gladstone). The Liberal Party favoured social reform, personal liberty, reducing the powers of Crown and the of England (many of them were Nonconformists) and an extension of the electoral franchise. Sir William Harcourt, a prominent Liberal politician in the Victorian era, said this about liberalism in 1872:File:Leeds Town Hall, General Election results.jpg|thumb|right|A crowd waits outside Town Hall to see them elect a Liberal Party candidate during the 1880 general elections.If there be any party which is more pledged than another to resist a policy of restrictive legislation, having for its object social coercion, that party is the Liberal party. (Cheers.) But liberty does not consist in making others do what you think right, (Hear, hear.) The difference between a free Government and a Government which is not free is principally thisthat a Government which is not free interferes with everything it can, and a free Government interferes with nothing except what it must. A despotic Government tries to make everybody do what it wishes; a Liberal Government tries, as far as the safety of society will permit, to allow everybody to do as he wishes. It has been the tradition of the Liberal party consistently to maintain the doctrine of individual liberty. It is because they have done so that England is the place where people can do more what they please than in any other country in the world...It is this practice of allowing one set of people to dictate to another set of people what they shall do, what they shall think, what they shall drink, when they shall go to bed, what they shall buy, and where they shall buy it, what wages they shall get and how they shall spend them, against which the Liberal party have always protested.(The Times (31 December 1872), p. 5.)The political terms of modern, progressive or new Liberalism began to appear in the mid to late 1880s and became increasingly common to denote the tendency in the Liberal Party to favour an increased role for the state as more important than the classical liberal stress on self-help and freedom of choice.(W. H. Greenleaf, The British Political Tradition. Volume II: The Ideological Heritage (London: Methuen, 1983), p. 143.)By the early 20th century the Liberals stance began to shift towards New Liberalism, what would today be called liberalism: a belief in personal liberty with a support for government intervention to provide minimum levels of welfare.() This shift was best exemplified by the Liberal government of Henry Asquith and his Chancellor Lloyd George, whose reforms in the early 1900s created a basic state.()David Lloyd George adopted a programme at the 1929 general election entitled We Can Conquer Unemployment!, although by this stage the Liberals had declined to third-party status. The Liberals now (as expressed in the Liberal Yellow Book) regarded opposition to state intervention as being a characteristic of right-wing extremists.(Liberal Industrial Inquiry, Britains Industrial Future (London, 1928), p. 453.)After nearly becoming extinct in the 1940s and 50s, the Liberal Party revived its fortunes somewhat under the leadership of Grimond in the 1960s, by positioning itself as a radical centrist non-socialist alternative to the Conservative and Labour Party governments of the time.()Originsthumb|left|Viscount PalmerstonThe Liberal Party grew out of the Whigs, which had its origins as an aristocratic faction in the reign of Charles II. The Whigs were in favour of reducing the power of The Crown and increasing the power of the Parliament. Although their motives in this were originally to gain more power for themselves, the more idealistic Whigs gradually came to support an expansion of democracy for its own sake. The great figures of reformist Whiggery were James Fox (died 1806) and his disciple and successor Earl Grey. After decades in opposition the Whigs came to power under Grey in 1830 and carried the First Reform Act in 1832.The Reform Act was the climax of Whiggery but also brought about the Whigs demise. The admission of the middle classes to the franchise and to the House of Commons led eventually to the development of a systematic class liberalism and the end of Whiggery, although for many years reforming aristocrats held senior positions in the party. In the years after Greys retirement the party was led first by Lord Melbourne, a fairly traditional Whig, and then by Lord John Russell, the son of a Duke but a crusading radical, and Lord Palmerston, a renegade Irish Tory and essentially a conservative, although capable of radical gestures.As early as 1839 Russell had adopted the name Liberal Party, but in reality the party was a loose coalition of Whigs in the of Lords and Radicals in the Commons. The leading Radicals were Bright and Cobden, who represented the manufacturing towns that had gained representation under the Reform Act. They favoured social reform, personal liberty, reducing the powers of the Crown and the of England (many of them were Nonconformists), avoidance of war and foreign alliances (which were bad for business), and above all trade. For a century free trade was the one cause which could unite all Liberals.In 1841 the Liberals lost office to the Conservative Party under Sir Peel, but their period in opposition was short, because the Conservatives split over the repeal of the Laws, a free trade issue, and a faction known as the Peelites (but not Peel himself, who died soon after), defected to the Liberal side. This allowed ministries led by Russell, Palmerston and the Peelite Lord Aberdeen to hold office for most of the 1850s and 1860s. The leading Peelite was Ewart Gladstone, who was a zealous reforming of the Exchequer in most of these governments. The formal foundation of the Liberal Party is traditionally traced to 1859 and the formation of Palmerstons second government.The Whig-Radical amalgam could not become a true modern political party, however, while it was dominated by aristocrats, and it was not until the departure of the Two Terrible Old Men, Russell and Palmerston, that Gladstone could become the first leader of the modern Liberal Party. This was brought about by Palmerstons death in 1865 and Russells retirement in 1868. After a brief Conservative interlude (during which the Second Reform Act was passed by agreement between the parties), Gladstone won a huge victory at the 1868 election and formed the first Liberal government. The establishment of the party as a national membership organisation came with the foundation of the Liberal Federation in 1877.The Gladstonian erathumb|right|William GladstoneFor the next thirty years Gladstone and Liberalism were synonymous. The Grand Old Man, as he became known, was Minister of the United Kingdom four times and the powerful flow of his rhetoric dominated British politics even when he was out of office. His rivalry with the Conservative leader Disraeli became legendary. Gladstone was a Church Anglican and enjoyed the company of aristocrats, but he grew ever more progressive as he grew older: he was, as one wit put it, a Tory in all but essentials. Queen Victoria, who had grown up as a Whig supporter under the tutelage of Melbourne, became a Conservative in reaction to Gladstones moralising Liberalism.Gladstones great achievements in office were his reforms to education, land reform (particularly in Ireland, where he ended centuries of landlord oppression), the disestablishment of the (Anglican) of Ireland through the Church Act 1869, the introduction of democratic local government, reform allowing the ballot (the Act 1872) and removing electoral corruption, the abolition of patronage in the civil service and the army, and the Third Reform Act which greatly extended the vote to almost all adult males. Gladstones reforming tendencies were borne partly out of his visit to Lancashire during The Cotton Famine, where he was impressed by class qualities. It was during the 1860s that Gladstone became known as The Peoples William.()In foreign policy, Gladstone was in general against foreign entanglements but did not resist the reality of imperialism. For example, he approved of the occupation of Egypt by British forces in 1882.In the 1874 general election Gladstone was defeated by the Conservatives under Disraeli during a sharp recession. He formally resigned as Liberal leader and was succeeded by the Marquess of Hartington, but he soon changed his mind and returned to active politics. He strongly disagreed with Disraelis pro-Ottoman foreign policy and in 1880 he conducted the first outdoor mass-election campaign in Britain, known as the campaign. The Liberals won a large majority in the 1880 election. Hartington ceded his place and Gladstone resumed office.Among the consequences of the Reform Act (188485) was the giving of the vote to the Catholic peasants in Ireland, and the consequent creation of an Parliamentary Party led by Stewart Parnell. In the 1885 general election this party won the balance of power in the House of Commons, and demanded Home Rule as the price of support for a continued Gladstone ministry. Gladstone personally supported Home Rule, but a strong Unionist faction led by Chamberlain, along with the last of the Whigs, Hartington, opposed it.The result was a catastrophic split in the Liberal Party, and heavy defeat in the 1886 election at the hands of Lord Salisbury. There was a final weak Gladstone ministry in 1892, but it also was dependent on Irish support and failed to get Irish Home Rule through the House of Lords. Gladstone finally retired in 1894, and his ineffectual successor, Lord Rosebery, led the party to another heavy defeat in the 1895 general election.Another consequence of the Third Reform Act was the rise of Lib-Lab candidates, in the absence of any committed Labour Party. The Act split all county constituencies (which were represented by multiple MPs) in to single-member constituencies, roughly corresponding to population patterns. In areas with working class majorities, in particular coal-mining areas, Lib-Lab candidates were popular, and they received sponsorship and endorsement from unions. In the first election after the Act was passed (1885), thirteen were elected, up from two in 1874. The Third Reform Act also facilitated the demise of the Whig old guard: in two-member constituencies, it was common to pair a Whig and a radical under the Liberal banner. After the Third Reform Act, fewer Whigs were selected as candidates.()The Liberal zenithImage:Asquith Q 42036.jpg|thumb|right|Henry AsquithThe Liberals languished in opposition for a decade, while the coalition of Salisbury and Chamberlain held power. The 1890s were marred by infighting between the three principal successors to Gladstone, party leader William Harcourt, former Prime Minister Lord Rosebery, and Gladstones personal secretary, Morley. This intrigue finally led Harcourt and Morley to resign their positions in 1898 as they continued to be at loggerheads with Rosebery over Irish home rule and issues relating to imperialism. Replacing Harcourt as party leader was Sir Campbell-Bannerman. Harcourts resignation briefly muted the turmoil in the party, but the beginning of the Boer War soon nearly broke the party apart, with Rosebery and a circle of supporters including important future Liberal leaders H.H. Asquith, Edward Grey, and Richard Burdon Haldane forming a clique dubbed the Liberal Imperialists that supported the government in the prosecution of the war. On the other side, more radical members of the party formed a Pro-Boer faction that denounced the conflict and called for an immediate end to hostilities. Quickly rising to prominence among the Pro-Boers was David Lloyd George, a relatively new MP and a master of rhetoric, who took advantage of having a national stage to speak out on a controversial issue to make his name in the party. Harcourt and Morley also sided with this group, though with slightly different aims. Campbell-Bannerman tried to keep these forces together at the head of a moderate Liberal rump, but in 1901 he delivered a speech on the governments methods of barbarism in South Africa that pulled him further to the left and nearly tore the party in two. The party was saved after Salisburys retirement in 1902 when his successor, Arthur Balfour, pushed a series of unpopular initiatives such as a new education bill and Joseph Chamberlain called for a new system of protectionist tariffs. Campbell-Bannerman was able to rally the party around the traditional liberal platform of free trade and land reform and led them to the greatest election victory in their history. This would prove the last time the Liberals won a majority in their own right.Although he presided over a large majority, Sir Henry Campbell-Bannerman was overshadowed by his ministers, most notably Henry Asquith at the Exchequer, Grey at the Foreign Office, Richard Burdon Haldane at the War Office and Lloyd George at the Board of Trade. An ill Campbell-Bannerman retired in 1908 and died later that year. He was succeeded by Asquith, who stepped up the governments radicalism. Lloyd George succeeded Asquith at the Exchequer, and was in turn succeeded at the Board of Trade by Churchill, a recent defector from the Conservatives.The Liberals pushed through much legislation, including the regulation of working hours, Insurance and welfare. It was at this time that a political battle over the so-called Budget resulted in the passage of an act ending the power of the of Lords to block legislation. The cost was high, however, as the government was required by the king to call two general elections in 1910 to validate its position and ended up frittering away most of its large majority, being left once again dependent on the Irish Nationalists.As a result Asquith was forced to introduce a new third Home Rule bill in 1912. Since the House of Lords no longer had the power to block the bill, the Unionists Volunteers led by Sir Carson, launched a campaign of opposition that included the threat of armed resistance in Ulster and the threat of mutiny by army officers in Ireland in 1914 (see Incident). In their resistance to Home Rule the Ulster Protestants had the full support of the Conservatives, whose leader, Andrew Bonar Law, was of Ulster-Scots descent. The country seemed to be on the brink of civil war when War I broke out in August 1914.The war struck at the heart of everything British Liberals believed in. The party became divided over the distinctly illiberal policies that were introduced under her auspices, including conscription and the Defence of the Realm Act. Several Cabinet ministers resigned, and Asquith, the master of domestic politics, proved a poor war leader. Lloyd George and Churchill, however, were zealous supporters of the war, and gradually forced the old pacifist Liberals out. The poor British performance in the early months of the war forced Asquith to invite the Conservatives into a coalition (on 17 May 1915). This marked the end of the last all-Liberal government. This coalition fell apart at the end of 1916, when the Conservatives withdrew their support from Asquith and gave it to Lloyd George instead, who became Prime Minister at the head of a coalition government largely made up of Conservatives. Asquith and his followers moved to the opposition benches in Parliament and the Liberal Party was split once again.Liberal declineImage:David Lloyd George.jpg|thumb|right|Lloyd GeorgeIn the 1918 general election Lloyd George, the Man Who Won the War, led his coalition into another election, and won a sweeping victory over the Asquithian Liberals and the newly emerging Labour Party. Lloyd George and the Conservative leader Andrew Bonar Law wrote a joint letter of support to candidates to indicate they were considered the official Coalition candidates  this coupon as it became known was issued against many sitting Liberal MPs, often to devastating effect, though not against Asquith himself. Asquith and most of his colleagues lost their seats. Lloyd George still claimed to be leading a Liberal government, but he was increasingly under the influence of the rejuvenated Conservative party. In 1922 the Conservative backbenchers rebelled against the continuation of the coalition, citing in particular the Crisis over Turkey and Lloyd Georges corrupt sale of honours amongst other grievances, and Lloyd George was forced to resign. The Conservatives came back to power under Bonar Law and then Baldwin.At the 1922 and 1923 elections the Liberals won barely a third of the vote and only a quarter of the seats in the House of Commons, as many radical voters abandoned the divided Liberals and went over to Labour. In 1922 Labour became the official opposition. A reunion of the two warring factions took place in 1923 when the new Conservative Prime Minister Baldwin committed his party to protective tariffs, causing the Liberals to reunite in support of free trade. The party gained ground in the 1923 general election but ominously made most of its gains from Conservatives whilst losing ground to Labour  a sign of the partys direction for many years to come. The party remained the third largest in the House of Commons, but the Conservatives had lost their majority. There was much speculation and fear about the prospect of a Labour government, and comparatively little about a Liberal government, even though it could have plausibly presented an experienced team of ministers compared to Labours almost complete lack of experience, as well as offering a middle ground that could get support from both Conservatives and Labour in crucial Commons divisions. But instead of trying to force the opportunity to form a Liberal government, Asquith decided instead to allow Labour the chance of office in the belief that they would prove incompetent and this would set the stage for a revival of Liberal fortunes at Labours expense. It was a fatal error.Image:UK popular vote.svg|thumb|300px|left|Share of the vote received by Conservatives (blue), Whigs/Liberals/Liberal Democrats (orange), Labour (red) and others (grey) in general elections since 1832.(Table 2.01 Summary Results of General Elections 18322005 (UK), British electoral facts, 18322006, by Colin Rallings and Michael Thrasher, 7th edition, 2007, ISBN 978-0-7546-2712-8, p. 59.)(Election 2010 Results, BBC News.) Following success as the successor to the Whig party, the partys share of the popular vote plummeted after the First World War as it lost votes to the new Labour party and fractured into groups such as the National and Coalition Liberals.Labour was determined to destroy the Liberals and become the sole party of the left.  MacDonald was forced into a snap election in 1924, and although his government was defeated, he achieved his objective of virtually wiping the Liberals out as many more radical voters now moved to Labour whilst moderate middle-class Liberal voters concerned about socialism moved to the Conservatives. The Liberals were reduced to a mere forty seats in Parliament, only seven of which had been won against candidates from both parties and none of these formed a coherent area of Liberal survival. The party seemed finished and during this period some Liberals, such as Churchill, went over to the Conservatives, while others went over to Labour. (Several Labour ministers of later generations, such as Foot and Benn, were the sons of Liberal MPs.)Asquith died in 1928 and the enigmatic figure of Lloyd George returned to the leadership and began a drive to produce coherent policies on many key issues of the day. In the 1929 general election he made a final bid to return the Liberals to the political mainstream, with an ambitious programme of state stimulation of the economy called We Can Conquer Unemployment!, largely written for him by the Liberal economist Maynard Keynes. The Liberals gained ground, but once again it was at the Conservatives expense whilst also losing seats to Labour. Indeed the urban areas of the country suffering heavily from unemployment, which might have been expected to respond the most to the radical economic policies of the Liberals, instead gave the party its worst results. By contrast most of the partys seats were won either due to the absence of a candidate from one of the other parties or in rural areas on the fringe, where local evidence suggests that economic ideas were at best peripheral to the electorates concerns. The Liberals now found themselves with 59 members holding the balance of power in a Parliament where Labour was the largest party but lacked an overall majority. Lloyd George offered a degree of support to the Labour government in the hope of winning concessions, including a degree of electoral reform to introduce the vote, but this support was to prove bitterly divisive as the Liberals increasingly divided between those seeking to gain what Liberal goals they could achieve, those who preferred a Conservative government to a Labour one and vice-versa.The last majority Liberal Government in Britain was elected in 1906. The pre-World War I period in Britain was a period of worker strikes and civil unrest involving many violent confrontations between the police/troops, and civilians. Other issues of the period included the suffragettes and the Irish Independence movement.After the carnage of 1914-1918 the democratic reform of the of the People Act 1918 instantly tripled the number of people allowed to vote in Britain from 7 to 21 million. The Labour Party benefited the most from this huge change in the British electorate, forming its first minority government in 1924.The splits over the National Governmentthumb|140px|Herbert SamuelIn 1931 MacDonalds government fell apart under the Great Depression, and the Liberals agreed to join his National Government, dominated by the Conservatives. Lloyd George himself was ill and did not actually join. Soon, however, the Liberals faced another divisive crisis when a National Government was proposed to fight the 1931 general election with a mandate for tariffs. From the outside, Lloyd George called for the party to abandon the government completely in defence of free trade, but only a few MPs and candidates followed. Another group under Sir John Simon then emerged, who were prepared to continue their support for the government and take the Liberal places in the Cabinet if there were resignations. The third group under Sir Herbert Samuel pressed for the parties in government to fight the election on separate platforms. In doing so the bulk of Liberals remained supporting the government, but two distinct Liberal groups had emerged within this bulk  the Liberal Nationals (officially the National Liberals after 1947) led by Simon, also known as Simonites, and the Samuelites or official Liberals, led by Samuel who remained as the official party. Both groups secured about 34 MPs but proceeded to diverge even further after the election, with the Liberal Nationals remaining supporters of the government throughout its life. There were to be a succession of discussions about them rejoining the Liberals, but these usually foundered on the issues of free trade and continued support for the National Government. The one significant reunification came in 1946 when the Liberal and Liberal National party organisations in London merged.The official Liberals found themselves a tiny minority within a government committed to protectionism. Slowly they found this issue to be one they could not support. In early 1932 it was agreed to suspend the principle of collective responsibility to allow the Liberals to oppose the introduction of tariffs. Later in 1932 the Liberals resigned their ministerial posts over the introduction of the Ottawa Agreement on Preference. However, they remained sitting on the government benches supporting it in Parliament, though in the country local Liberal activists bitterly opposed the government. Finally in late 1933 the Liberals crossed the floor of the House of Commons and went into complete opposition. By this point their number of MPs was severely depleted. In the 1935 general election, just 17 Liberal MPs were elected, along with Lloyd George and three followers as independent Liberals. Immediately after the election the two groups reunited, though Lloyd George declined to play much of a formal role in his old party. Over the next ten years there would be further defections as MPs deserted to either the Liberal Nationals or Labour. Yet there were a few recruits, such as Davies, who had deserted to the National Liberals in 1931 but now returned to the party during the War II and who would lead it after the war.Near extinctionSamuel had lost his seat in the 1935 election and the leadership of the party fell to Sir Archibald Sinclair. With many traditional domestic Liberal policies now regarded as irrelevant, he focused the party on opposition to both the rise of Fascism in Europe and the appeasement foreign policy of the British government, arguing that intervention was needed, in contrast to the Labour calls for pacifism. Despite the partys weaknesses, Sinclair gained a high profile as he sought to recall the Campaign and once more revitalise the Liberals as the party of a strong foreign policy.In 1940 they joined Churchills wartime coalition government, with Sinclair serving as of State for Air, the last British Liberal to hold Cabinet rank office for seventy years. However, it was a sign of the partys lack of importance that they were not included in the Cabinet. At the 1945 general election, Sinclair and many of his colleagues lost their seats to both Conservatives and Labour. By 1951 there were only six MPs; all but one of them were aided by the fact that the Conservatives refrained from fielding candidates in those constituencies. In 1957 this total fell to five when one of the Liberal MPs died and the subsequent by-election was lost to the Labour Party, which selected the former Liberal Deputy Leader Lady Megan Lloyd George as its own candidate. The Liberal Party seemed close to extinction. During this low period, it was often joked that Liberal MPs could hold meetings in the back of one taxi.Liberal revivalThrough the 1950s and into the 1960s the Liberals survived only because a handful of constituencies in rural Scotland and Wales clung to their Liberal traditions, whilst in two English towns, Bolton and Huddersfield, local Liberals and Conservatives agreed to each contest only one of the towns two seats. Grimond, for example, who became Liberal leader in 1956, was MP for the remote Orkney and Shetland islands. Under his leadership a Liberal revival began, marked by the Orpington by-election of March 1962 which was won by Eric Lubbock. There,  the Liberals won a seat in the London suburbs for the first time since 1935.The Liberals became the first of the major British political parties to advocate British membership of the Economic Community. Grimond also sought an intellectual revival of the party, seeking to position it as a non-socialist radical alternative to the Conservative government of the day. In particular he canvassed the support of the young post-war university students and recent graduates, appealing to younger voters in a way that many of his recent predecessors had not, and asserting a new strand of Liberalism for the post-war world.The new middle-class suburban generation began to find the Liberals policies attractive again. Under Grimond (who retired in 1967) and his successor, Thorpe, the Liberals regained the status of a serious third force in British politics, polling up to 20% of the vote but unable to break the duopoly of Labour and Conservative and win more than fourteen seats in the Commons. An additional problem was competition in the Liberal heartlands in Scotland and Wales from the National Party and Cymru who both grew as electoral forces from the 1960s onwards. Although Hooson held on to the seat of Montgomeryshire, upon Davies death in 1962, the party lost its other Welsh five Welsh seats between 1950 and 1966. In September 1966 the Liberal Party formed their own state party, moving the Liberal Party into a fully federal structure.(Russell Deacon (2011) History of the Welsh Liberal party, Welsh Academic Press) In local elections Liverpool remained a Liberal stronghold, with the party taking the plurality of seats on the elections to the new Liverpool Metropolitan Borough Council in 1973. In the February 1974 general election the Conservative government of Heath won a plurality of votes cast, but the Labour Party gained a plurality of seats due to the Ulster Unionist MPs refusing to support the Conservatives after the Northern Ireland Agreement. The Liberals now held the balance of power in the Commons. Conservatives offered Thorpe the Office if he would join a coalition government with Heath. Thorpe was personally in favour of it, but the party insisted on a clear government commitment to introducing representation and a change of Prime Minister. The former was unacceptable to Heaths Cabinet and the latter to Heath personally, so the talks collapsed. Instead a minority Labour government was formed under Wilson but with no formal support from Thorpe. In the October 1974 general election the Liberals slipped back slightly and the Labour government won a wafer-thin majority.Thorpe was subsequently forced to resign after allegations about his private life. The partys new leader, Steel, negotiated the pact with Wilsons successor as Prime Minister, Callaghan. According to this pact, the Liberals would support the government in crucial votes in exchange for some influence over policy. The agreement lasted from 1977 to 1978, but proved mostly fruitless, for two reasons: the Liberals key demand of representation was rejected by most Labour MPs, whilst the contacts between Liberal spokespersons and Labour ministers often proved detrimental, such as between finance spokesperson Pardoe and of the Exchequer Healey, who were mutually antagonistic.Alliance with Social DemocratsWhen the Labour government fell in 1979, the Conservatives under Thatcher won a victory which served to push the Liberals back into the margins. In 1981 defectors from the moderate wing of the Labour Party, led by former Cabinet ministers Jenkins, Owen and Williams, founded the Social Democratic Party. The new party and the Liberals quickly formed an alliance (which briefly topped the opinion polls before being overtaken by the Tories) and fought the 1983 and 1987 general elections jointly as the Alliance. During 1982 and 1983, at the depths of Labours fortunes under Foot, there was much talk of the Alliance becoming the dominant party of the left and even of Jenkins becoming Prime Minister. In fact, while the Alliance won over 20% of the vote each time, it was still a long way behind Labour in terms of seats and as a result was disbanded after the 1987 election, with the two parties merging the following year to form the Social and Liberal Democrats, who a year after that become the Liberal Democrats.Merger with Social DemocratsIn 1988 the Liberals and Social Democrats merged to create what came to be called the Liberal Democrats. Over two-thirds of the members, and all the serving MPs, of the Liberal Party joined this party, led first jointly by Steel and the SDP leader Robert Maclennan, and later by Ashdown (198899), Kennedy (19992006), Menzies Campbell (200607) and Clegg (incumbent).Though the merger process was traumatic and the new party suffered a few years of extremely poor poll results, it gradually found much greater electoral success than the Liberal Party had done in the post-war era. In the 2005 general election, the Liberal Democrats elected 62 MPs to the House of Commons, a far cry from the days when the Liberals had just 5 MPs and Liberalism as a political force had seemed moribund.As was the case with the Liberal Party for most of the 20th century, the Liberal Democrats face constant questioning about which of the other two parties they are closer to, in particular about which they would support in the event of a parliament. The party is keen to maintain its independent identity however, and argues that the need for a modern Liberal force in British politics has never been greater.In the 2010 General Election, the Conservative Party won more seats than any other, but not enough to form a majority government. After several days of negotiation, the Liberal Democrats agreed to join the Conservatives as part of a coalition government.The post-1988 Liberal PartyA group of Liberal opponents of the merger with the Social Democrats, including Meadowcroft (formerly Liberal MP for Leeds West) and Paul Wiggin (who served on Peterborough City Council as a Liberal), continued under the old name of the Liberal Party. This was legally a new organisation (the headquarters, records, assets and debts of the old party were inherited by the Liberal Democrats), but its constitution asserts it to be the same Liberal party. The party retains minor influence in some local councils. Meadowcroft himself eventually joined the Liberal Democrats in 2007.Liberal leaders 18591988Liberal Leaders in the House of Lords, 18591988*George Leveson-Gower, 2nd Earl Granville 18591865*Russell, 1st Earl Russell 18651868*George Leveson-Gower, 2nd Earl Granville 18681891*Wodehouse, 1st Earl of Kimberley 18911894*Philip Primrose, 5th Earl of Rosebery 18941896*Wodehouse, 1st Earl of Kimberley 18961902*Spencer, 5th Earl Spencer 19021905*Robinson, 1st Marquess of Ripon 19051908*Robert Crewe-Milnes, 1st Marquess of Crewe 19081923*Grey, 1st Viscount Grey of Fallodon 19231924*Lygon, 7th Earl Beauchamp 19241931*Isaacs, 1st Marquess of Reading 19311936*Crewe-Milnes, 1st Marquess of Crewe 19361944*Samuel, 1st Viscount Samuel 19441955*Rea, 2nd Baron Rea 19551967*Byers, Baron Byers 19671984*Seear, Baroness Seear 19841988Liberal Leaders in the House of Commons, 18591916*John Temple, 3rd Viscount Palmerston 18591865*Ewart Gladstone 18651875*Spencer Compton Cavendish, Marquess of Hartington 18751880*Ewart Gladstone 18801894*Sir William Vernon Harcourt 18941898*Sir Henry Campbell-Bannerman 18991908*Henry Asquith, 1st Earl of Oxford and Asquith (1925) 19081916Leaders of the Liberal Party, 19161988*Henry Asquith, 1st Earl of Oxford and Asquith (1925) 19161926**Donald Maclean, Acting Leader 19191920*Lloyd George 19261931*Sir Herbert Samuel 19311935*Sir Archibald Sinclair 19351945*Davies 19451956*Grimond 19561967*Thorpe 19671976*Grimond  1976 (Acting Leader)*Steel 19761988See also*Liberal MPs (UK)*of Liberal Party (UK) MPs*to liberal theory*worldwide*of liberal parties*democracy*in the United Kingdom*of United Kingdom Liberal Party Leaders*List of Liberal Chief Whips*President of the Liberal Party*of the United Kingdom*Liberalism*of liberal theorists*of UK Liberal Party general election manifestosNotesReferences*Chris Cook, A Short History of the Liberal Party, 19002001 (6th edition). Basingstoke: Palgrave, 2002. ISBN 0-333-91838-X.*Jonathan Parry, The Rise and Fall of Liberal Government in Victorian Britain. Yale, 1993.ISBN 0-300-06718-6.*David Dutton, A History of the Liberal Party in the 20th Century, Palgrave Macmillan, 2004. ISBN 0-333-74656-2.External links*Liberal Democrat History Group*Catalogue of the Liberal Party papers (mostly dating from after 1945) at LSE Archives ( ) ()Liberal (Regne Unit)strana (Spojen krlovstv)Ryddfrydol (DU)PartyLiberal del Reino Unidoliberal (Britio)libral (Royaume-Uni)Liberale (Regno Unito) ( ) ( )Liberalis (Britanniarum Regnum)partija (Jungtin Karalyst)()liberale parti (Storbritannia)Liberalna (brytyjska)Liberal (Reino Unido) ()strana (Spojen krovstvo)(Yhdistynyt kuningaskunta)Party (Storbritannien) ( )()
4910
Beryl
The mineral beryl is a beryllium aluminium cyclosilicate with the formula Be3Al2(SiO3)6. The hexagonal crystals of beryl may be very small or range to several meters in size. Terminated crystals are relatively rare. Pure beryl is colorless, but it is frequently tinted by impurities; possible colors are green, blue, yellow, red, and white.EtymologyThe name beryl is derived (via Latin: beryllus, French: beryl, and English: beril) from Greek  beryllos which referred to a precious blue-green color-of-sea-water stone( and originated from Prakrit veruliya () and Pali veuriya (); veiru () or, viar (), to become pale; ultimately from Sanskrit  vaidurya-, which is of Dravidian origin, maybe from the name of Belur.(Beryl, Online Etymology Dictionary. Retrieved on 2011-04-19.) The term was later adopted for the mineral beryl more exclusively.( The Late Latin word berillus was abbreviated as brill- which produced the Italian word brillare meaning shine, the French word brille meaning shine and the English word brilliance.(the oracle :: bssm encyclopaedia. Soul-hunter.com. Retrieved on 2011-04-19.)DepositsBeryl of various colors is found most commonly in granitic pegmatites, but also occurs in mica schists in the Ural Mountains, and limestone in Colombia. Beryl is often associated with tin and tungsten ore bodies. Beryl is found in Europe in Norway, Austria, Germany, Sweden (especially morganite), and Ireland, as well as Brazil, Colombia, Madagascar, Mozambique, Russia, Africa, the States, and Zambia. U.S. beryl locations are in California, Colorado, Connecticut, Idaho, Maine, Hampshire, Carolina, Dakota and Utah.Englands pegmatites have produced some of the largest beryls found, including one massive crystal from the Quarry in Maine with dimensions 5.5 m by 1.2 m (18 ft by 4 ft) with a mass of around 18 metric tons; it is New Hampshires state mineral. As of 1999, the largest known crystal of any mineral in the world is a crystal of beryl from Madagascar, 18 meters long and 3.5 meters in diameter.(G. Cressey and I. F. Mercer, Crystals, London, Natural History Museum, 1999)VarietiesAquamarine and maxixeAquamarine (from , water of the sea) is a blue or turquoise variety of beryl. It occurs at most localities which yield ordinary beryl, some of the finest coming from Russia. The gem-gravel placer deposits of Lanka contain aquamarine. Clear yellow beryl, such as that occurring in Brazil, is sometimes called aquamarine chrysolite. When corundum presents the bluish tint of typical aquamarine, it is often termed Oriental aquamarine. The deep blue version of aquamarine is called maxixe. Its color fades to white when exposed to sunlight or is subjected to heat treatment, though the color returns with irradiation. The pale blue color of aquamarine is attributed to Fe2+. The Fe3+ ions produce golden-yellow color, and when both Fe2+ and Fe3+ are present, the color is a darker blue as in maxixe. Decoloration of maxixe by light or heat thus may be due to the charge transfer Fe3+ and Fe2+.()()()() Dark-blue maxixe color can be produced in green, pink or yellow beryl by irradiating it with high-energy particles (rays, neutrons or even X-rays).() In the States, aquamarines can be found at the summit of Mt. Antero in the Range in central Colorado. In Wyoming, aquamarine has been discovered in the Horn Mountains, near River Pass. In Brazil, there are mines in the states of Gerais, Santo, and Bahia, and minorly in Grande do Norte. The Mines of Colombia, Zambia, Madagascar, Malawi, Tanzania and Kenya also produce aquamarine.The largest aquamarine of gemstone quality ever mined was found in Marambaia, Minas Gerais, Brazil, in 1910. It weighed over 110 kg, and its dimensions were  long and  in diameter.()EmeraldEmerald refers to green beryl, colored by trace amounts of chromium and sometimes vanadium.(() The word emerald comes (via English: Emeraude, imported from French: smeraude and Latin: Esmaraldus) from Latin smaragdus from Greek smaragdos   (green gem), its original source being a Semitic word izmargad () or the Sanskrit word, marakata (), meaning green.() Most emeralds are highly included, so their brittleness (resistance to breakage) is classified as generally poor. Emeralds in antiquity were mined by the Egyptians and in Austria, as well as Swat in northern Pakistan.() A rare type of emerald known as a trapiche emerald is occasionally found in the mines of Colombia. A trapiche emerald exhibits a star pattern; it has raylike spokes of dark carbon impurities that give the emerald a six-pointed radial pattern. It is named for the trapiche, a grinding wheel used to process sugarcane in the region. Colombian emeralds are generally the most prized due to their transparency and fire. Some of the most rare emeralds come from three main emerald mining areas in Colombia: Muzo, Coscuez, and Chivor. Fine emeralds are also found in other countries, such as Zambia, Brazil, Zimbabwe, Madagascar, Pakistan, India, Afghanistan and Russia. In the US, emeralds can be found in North Carolina. In 1998, emeralds were discovered in the Yukon.Emerald is a rare and valuable gemstone and, as such, it has provided the incentive for developing synthetic emeralds. Both hydrothermal() and flux-growth synthetics have been produced. The first commercially successful emerald synthesis process was that of Carroll Chatham.(Gemology Project) The other large producer of flux emeralds was Pierre Gilson Sr., which has been on the market since 1964. Gilsons emeralds are usually grown on natural colorless beryl seeds which become coated on both sides. Growth occurs at the rate of 1 mm per month, a typical seven-month growth run producing emerald crystals of 7 mm of thickness.(Nassau, K., 1980, Gems Made By Man, Gemological Institute of America, ISBN 0873110161) The green color of emeralds is attributed to presence of Cr3+ ions.(((Golden beryl and heliodorGolden beryl can range in colors from pale yellow to a brilliant gold. Unlike emerald, golden beryl has very few flaws. The term golden beryl is sometimes synonymous with heliodor (from Greek hlios   sun + dron   gift) but golden beryl refers to pure yellow or golden yellow shades, while heliodor refers to the greenish-yellow shades. The golden yellow color is attributed to Fe3+ ions.(( Both golden beryl and heliodor are used as gems. Probably the largest cut golden beryl is the flawless 2054 carat stone on display in the Hall of Gems, D.C.()GosheniteColorless beryl is called goshenite. The name originates from Massachusetts where it was originally discovered. Since all these color varieties are caused by impurities and pure beryl is colorless, it might be tempting to assume that goshenite is the purest variety of beryl. However, there are several elements that can act as inhibitors to color in beryl and so this assumption may not always be true. The name goshenite has been said to be on its way to extinction and yet it is still commonly used in the gemstone markets. Goshenite is found to some extent in almost all beryl localities. In the past, goshenite was used for manufacturing eyeglasses and lenses owing to its transparency. Nowadays, it is most commonly used for gemstone purposes and also considered as a source of beryllium.()()The gem value of goshenite is relatively low. However, goshenite can be colored yellow, green, pink, blue and in intermediate colors by irradiating it with high-energy particles. The resulting color depends on the content of Ca, Sc, Ti, V, Fe, and Co impurities.(MorganiteMorganite, also known as pink beryl, rose beryl, pink emerald, and cesian (or caesian) beryl, is a rare light pink to rose-colored gem-quality variety of beryl. Orange/yellow varieties of morganite can also be found, and color banding is common. It can be routinely heat treated to remove patches of yellow and is occasionally treated by irradiation to improve its color. The pink color of morganite is attributed to Mn2+ ions.( Pink beryl of fine color and good sizes was first discovered on an island on the coast of Madagascar in 1910.() It was also known, with other gemstone minerals, such as tourmaline and kunzite, at California. In December 1910, the New York Academy of Sciences named the pink variety of beryl morganite after financier P. Morgan.( On October 7, 1989, one of the largest gem morganite specimens ever uncovered, eventually called The Rose of Maine, was found at the Bennett Quarry in Buckfield, Maine, USA.() The crystal, originally somewhat orange in hue, was  long and about  across, and weighed (along with its matrix) just over 50 lbs (23 kg).(The Rose of Maine, image, The Rose of Maine at the site of its discovery)Red berylRed beryl (also known as red emerald or scarlet emerald) is a red variety of beryl. It was first described in 1904 for an occurrence, its type locality, at Maynards Claim (Pismire Knolls), Thomas Range, Juab County, Utah.(MinDat  Red beryl)(Carl Ege, Utah Geological Survey) The old synonym bixbite is deprecated from the CIBJO, because of the risk of confusion with the mineral bixbyite (also named after the mineralogist Bixby). The dark red color is attributed to Mn3+ ions.(Red beryl is very rare and has only been reported from a handful of locations including: Wah Mountains, County, Utah; Paramount Canyon, County, New Mexico; Round Mountain, County, New Mexico;(Mindat Red Beryl Page) and Juab County, Utah. The greatest concentration of gem-grade red beryl comes from the Violet Claim in the Wah Wah Mountains of mid-western Utah, discovered in 1958 by Lamar Hodges, of Utah, while he was prospecting for uranium.() Prices for top quality natural red beryl can be as high as $10,000 per carat for faceted stones. Red beryl has been known to be confused with pezzottaite, also known as raspberry beryl or raspberyl, a gemstone that has been found in Madagascar and now Afghanistan  although cut gems of the two varieties can be distinguished from their difference in index.(Bixbite  The Gemstone List) While gem beryls are ordinarily found in pegmatites and certain metamorphic rocks, red beryl occurs in topaz-bearing rhyolites. It formed by crystallizing under low pressure and high temperature from a pneumatolitic phase along fractures or within near-surface cavities of the rhyolite. Associated minerals include bixbyite, quartz, orthoclase, topaz, spessartine, pseudobrookite and hematite.()See also* of mineralsNotesReferences* Hurlbut, Cornelius S.; Klein, Cornelis, 1985, Manual of Mineralogy, 20th ed., John Wiley and Sons, New York ISBN 0-471-80580-7* Sinkankas, John, 1994, Emerald & Other Beryls, Geoscience Press, ISBN 0-8019-7114-4External links( )be:()bs:Berilbg:(mineral)cs:Berylda:Berylde:Beryllel:es:Beriloeu:Berilofa:fr:Brylgl:Berilohr:Berilio:Beriloit:Berillohe:la:Berylluslv:Berilslt:Berilashu:Berillml:my:nl:Berilja:no:Beryllnds:Beryll(minera)pt:Beriloro:Berilru:sah:simple:Berylsk:Berylsl:Berilsr:sh:Berilfi:Beryllisv:Beryllta:th:tr:Beriluk:wo:Berilzh:
5388
Cultural_anthropology
Cultural anthropology is a branch of anthropology focused on the study of  cultural variation among humans, collecting data about the impact of global economic and political processes on local cultural realities. Anthropologists use a variety of methods, including observation, interviews and surveys. Their research is often called fieldwork because it involves the anthropologist spending an extended period of time at the research location.OriginsOne of the earliest articulations of the anthropological meaning of the term culture came from Sir Edward Tylor who writes on the first page of his 1897 book: Culture, or civilization, taken in its broad, ethnographic sense, is that complex whole which includes knowledge, belief, art, morals, law, custom, and any other capabilities and habits acquired by man as a member of society.(Tylor,Edward. 1920 1871. Primitive Culture. New York: J.P. Putnams Sons.1.) The term civilization later gave way to definitions by Gordon Childe, with culture forming an umbrella term and civilization becoming a particular kind of culture.(Sherratt, Andrew V. Gordon Childe: Archaeology and Intellectual History, Past and Present, No. 125. (Nov., 1989), pp. 151185.)The anthropological concept of culture reflects in part a reaction against earlier Western discourses based on an opposition between culture and nature, according to which some human beings lived in a state of nature. Anthropologists have argued that culture is human nature, and that all people have a capacity to classify experiences, encode classifications symbolically (i.e. in language), and teach such abstractions to others.Since humans acquire culture through the learning processes of enculturation and socialization, people living in different places or different circumstances develop different cultures. Anthropologists have also pointed out that through culture people can adapt to their environment in non-genetic ways, so people living in different environments will often have different cultures. Much of anthropological theory has originated in an appreciation of and interest in the tension between the local (particular cultures) and the global (a universal human nature, or the web of connections between people in distinct places/circumstances).The rise of cultural anthropology occurred within the context of the late 19th century, when questions regarding which cultures were primitive and which were civilized occupied the minds of not only Marx and Freud, but many others. Colonialism and its processes increasingly brought European thinkers in contact, directly or indirectly with primitive others.(Rosaldo, Renato. Culture and Truth. 1993. Beach Press.) The relative status of various humans, some of whom had modern advanced technologies that included engines and telegraphs, while others lacked anything but face-to-face communication techniques and still lived a Paleolithic lifestyle, was of interest to the first generation of cultural anthropologists.Parallel with the rise of cultural anthropology in the United States, anthropology, in which sociality is the central concept and which focuses on the study of social statuses and roles, groups, institutions, and the relations among them, developed as an academic discipline in Britain. An umbrella term socio-cultural anthropology makes reference to both cultural and social anthropology traditions.(Campbell, D.T. (1983) The two distinct routes beyond kin selection to ultrasociality: Implicationsfor the Humanities and Social Sciences. In: The Nature of Prosocial Development: Theoriesand Strategies D. Bridgeman (ed.), pp. 11-39, Academic Press, New York)A brief historyModern cultural anthropology has its origins in, and developed in reaction to, 19th century ethnology, which involves the organized comparison of human societies. Scholars like E.B. Tylor and J.G. Frazer in England worked mostly with materials collected by others  usually missionaries, traders, explorers, or colonial officials  this earned them their current sobriquet of arm-chair anthropologists.Ethnologists had a special interest in why people living in different parts of the world often had similar beliefs and practices. In addressing this question, ethnologists in the 19th century divided into two schools of thought. Some, like Elliot Smith, argued that different groups must somehow have learned from one another, however indirectly; in other words, they argued that cultural traits spread from one place to another, or diffused.Other ethnologists argued that different groups had the capability of creating similar beliefs and practices independently. Some of those who advocated independent invention, like Henry Morgan, additionally supposed that similarities meant that different groups had passed through the same stages of evolution (See also social evolutionism). Morgan, in particular, acknowledged that certain forms of society and culture could not possibly have arisen before others. For example, industrial farming could not have been invented before simple farming, and metallurgy could not have developed without previous non-smelting processes involving metals (such as simple ground collection or mining). Morgan, like other 19th century social evolutionists, believed there was a more or less orderly progression from the primitive to the civilized.20th-century anthropologists largely reject the notion that all human societies must pass through the same stages in the same order, on the grounds that such a notion does not fit the empirical facts. Some 20th-century ethnologists, like Steward, have instead argued that such similarities reflected similar adaptations to similar environments (see evolution).Others, such as Lvi-Strauss (who was influenced both by American cultural anthropology and by French Durkheimian sociology), have argued that apparently similar patterns of development reflect fundamental similarities in the structure of human thought (see structuralism). By the mid-20th century, the number of examples of people skipping stages, such as going from hunter-gatherers to post-industrial service occupations in one generation, were so numerous that 19th-century evolutionism was effectively disproved.(Diamond, Jared. Guns, Germs and Steel.)In the 20th century, most cultural (and social) anthropologists turned to the crafting of ethnographies. An ethnography is a piece of writing about a people, at a particular place and time. Typically, the anthropologist lives among people in another society for a considerable period of time, simultaneously participating in and observing the social and cultural life of the group.Numerous other ethnographic techniques have resulted in ethnographic writing or details being preserved, as cultural anthropologists also curate materials, spend long hours in libraries, churches and schools poring over records, investigate graveyards, and decipher ancient scripts. A typical ethnography will also include information about physical geography, climate and habitat. It is meant to be a holistic piece of writing about the people in question, and today often includes the longest possible timeline of past events that the ethnographer can obtain through primary and secondary research.Malinowski (who conducted fieldwork in the Islands and taught in England) developed this method, and Boas (who conducted fieldwork in Island and taught in the States) promoted it. Boass students drew on his conception of culture and relativism to develop cultural anthropology in the United States. Simultaneously, Malinowski and A.R. Radcliffe Browns students were developing anthropology in the United Kingdom. Whereas cultural anthropology focused on symbols and values, social anthropology focused on social groups and institutions. Today socio-cultural anthropologists attend to all these elements.Although 19th-century ethnologists saw diffusion and independent invention as mutually exclusive and competing theories, most ethnographers quickly reached a consensus that both processes occur, and that both can plausibly account for cross-cultural similarities. But these ethnographers also pointed out the superficiality of many such similarities. They noted that even traits that spread through diffusion often were given different meanings and function from one society to another.Accordingly, these anthropologists showed less interest in comparing cultures, generalizing about human nature, or discovering universal laws of cultural development, than in understanding particular cultures in those cultures own terms. Such ethnographers and their students promoted the idea of relativism, the view that one can only understand another persons beliefs and behaviors in the context of the culture in which he or she lived or lives.In the early 20th century, socio-cultural anthropology developed in different forms in Europe and in the United States. European social anthropologists focused on observed social behaviors and on social structure, that is, on relationships among social roles (for example, husband and wife, or parent and child) and social institutions (for example, religion, economy, and politics).American cultural anthropologists focused on the ways people expressed their view of themselves and their world, especially in symbolic forms, such as art and myths. These two approaches frequently converged and generally complemented one another. For example, kinship and leadership function both as symbolic systems and as social institutions. Today almost all socio-cultural anthropologists refer to the work of both sets of predecessors, and have an equal interest in what people do and in what people say.Ethnography dominates socio-cultural anthropology. Nevertheless, many contemporary socio-cultural anthropologists have rejected earlier models of ethnography as treating local cultures as bounded and isolated. These anthropologists continue to concern themselves with the distinct ways people in different locales experience and understand their lives, but they often argue that one cannot understand these particular ways of life solely from a local perspective; they instead combine a focus on the local with an effort to grasp larger political, economic, and cultural frameworks that impact local lived realities. Notable proponents of this approach include Appadurai, Clifford, Marcus, Mintz, Taussig and Wolf.A growing trend in anthropological research and analysis is the use of multi-sited ethnography, discussed in George Marcuss article, Ethnography In/Of the World System: the Emergence of Multi-Sited Ethnography. Looking at culture as embedded in macro-constructions of a global social order, multi-sited ethnography uses traditional methodology in various locations both spatially and temporally. Through this methodology, greater insight can be gained when examining the impact of world-systems on local and global communities.Also emerging in multi-sited ethnography are greater interdisciplinary approaches to fieldwork, bringing in methods from cultural studies, media studies, science and technology studies, and others. In multi-sited ethnography, research tracks a subject across spatial and temporal boundaries. For example, a multi-sited ethnography may follow a thing, such as a particular commodity, as it is transported through the networks of global capitalism.Multi-sited ethnography may also follow ethnic groups in diaspora, stories or rumours that appear in multiple locations and in multiple time periods, metaphors that appear in multiple ethnographic locations, or the biographies of individual people or groups as they move through space and time. It may also follow conflicts that transcend boundaries. An example of multi-sited ethnography is Scheper-Hughess work on the international black market for the trade of human organs. In this research, she follows organs as they are transferred through various legal and illegal networks of capitalism, as well as the rumours and urban legends that circulate in impoverished communities about child kidnapping and organ theft.Sociocultural anthropologists have increasingly turned their investigative eye on to Western culture. For example, Bourgois won the Mead Award in 1997 for In Search of Respect, a study of the entrepreneurs in a Harlem crack-den. Also growing more popular are ethnographies of professional communities, such as laboratory researchers, Street investors, law firms, or technology (IT) computer employees.( Dissertation Abstract)Related topics* of art* of media* of religion* anthropology* Communitas* studies* anthropology* anthropology* inheritance theory* anthropology* anthropology* anthropology* Ethnobotany* Ethnography* Ethnomusicology* Ethnozoology* anthropology* anthropology* behavioral ecology* anthropology* anthropology* anthropology* anthropology* anthropology* psychology* psychology* anthropology* anthropology* anthropology* anthropologySee also* hypothesis* studies* inheritance theory* Gellner* behavioral ecology* Hunter-gatherers* Cultural Heritage* Neuroanthropology* Nomads* Sociology* anthropology* society vs societyReferencesExternal links* Webpage History of German Anthropology/Ethnology 1945/49-1990* The Moving Anthropology Student Network-website - The site offers tutorials, information on the subject, discussion-forums and a large link-collection for all interested scholars of cultural anthropology* Review of Nettls 2005 revised edition of The Study of Ethnomusicology tembiapoguiguaantropologijaculturala sociln antropologiede:Kulturanthropologieet:Kultuuriantropoloogiasocialantropologioculturellefy:Folkekundeculturlbudayais:Flagsmannfriculturaleantropologijaantropologieantropolgiaantropologieja:kulturowacultural  antropolgiafi:Kulttuuriantropologiath:antropolojifiu-vro:Kultuuriantropoloogiazh:
5500
Christmas_Island
footnotes The Territory of Christmas Island is a territory of Australia in the Ocean. It is located  northwest of the Australian city of Perth,  south of the Indonesian capital, Jakarta, and  ENE of the (Keeling) Islands.It has a population of 1,403 residents who live in a number of settlement areas on the northern tip of the island: Fish Cove (also known as Kampong), Silver City, Saan, and Drumsite.The islands geographic isolation and history of minimal human disturbance has led to a high level of endemism among its flora and fauna, which is of significant interest to scientists and naturalists.() 63% of its  is an Australian national park. There exist large areas of primary monsoonal forest.Phosphate, deposited originally as dead marine organisms (not guano as often thought), has been mined on the island for many years.HistoryDiscoveryCaptain Mynors of the Royal Mary, a East India Company vessel, named the island when he sailed past it on Christmas Day in 1643.() The island was included on British and Dutch navigation charts as early as the beginning of the seventeenth century, but it was not until 1666 when a map published by Dutch cartographer Goos included the island. Goos labelled the island Mony, the meaning of which is unclear.() British navigator Dampier, aboard the British ship Cygnet, made the earliest recorded visit to sea round the island in March 1688. He found it uninhabited.() Dampier gave an account of the visit which can be found in his Voyages() Dampier was trying to reach Cocos from New Holland. His ship was pulled off course in an easterly direction, arriving at Christmas Island 28 days later. Dampier landed at the Dales (on the west coast). Two of his crewmen were the first recorded humans to have set foot on Christmas Island.Beekman made the next recorded visit, chronicled in his 1718 book, A Voyage to and from the Island of Borneo, in the East Indies.Exploration and annexationFile:Poonsaan1v2.jpg|thumb|Saan in the eveningThe first attempt at exploring the island was in 1857 by the crew of the Amethyst. They tried to reach the summit of the island, but found the cliffs impassable.During the 187276 Challenger expedition to Indonesia, naturalist Dr John Murray carried out extensive surveys.()In 1887, Captain Maclear of HMS Flying Fish, having discovered an anchorage in a bay that he named Flying Fish Cove, landed a party and made a small but interesting collection of the flora and fauna. In the next year, Aldrich, on board HMS Egeria, visited it for ten days, accompanied by J. J. Lister, who gathered a larger biological and mineralogical collection.Among the rocks then obtained and submitted to Sir John Murray for examination were many of nearly pure phosphate of lime, a discovery which led to annexation of the island by the British Crown on 6 June 1888.(Settlement and exploitationSoon afterwards, a small settlement was established in Flying Fish Cove by G. Clunies Ross, the owner of the Cocos (Keeling) Islands (some  to the south west) to collect timber and supplies for the growing industry on Cocos.Phosphate mining began in the 1890s using indentured workers from Singapore, Malaya and China. Davis Murray, a mechanical engineer and recent graduate of University, was sent to supervise the operation on behalf of the Phosphate Mining and Shipping Company. Murray was known as the King of Christmas Island until 1910, when he married and settled in London.()The island was administered jointly by the British Phosphate Commissioners and District Officers from the Kingdom Office through the Settlements, and later the Crown Colony of Singapore.Japanese invasionFrom the outbreak of war in East Asia in December 1941, Christmas Island was a target for Japanese occupation because of its rich phosphate deposits.( A naval gun was installed under a British officer and four NCOs and 27 Indian soldiers.() The first attack was carried out on 20 January 1942 by the Japanese submarine I-59, which torpedoed a Norwegian freighter, the Eidsvold.() The vessel drifted and eventually sank off West White Beach. Most of the European and Asian staff and their families were evacuated to Perth. In late February and early March 1942, there were two aerial bombing raids. Shelling from a Japanese naval group on 7 March led the District Officer to hoist the white flag.( But after the Japanese naval group sailed away, the British officer raised the Flag once more.( During the night of 1011 March a mutiny of the Indian troops, abetted by the Sikh policemen, led to the murder of the five British soldiers and the imprisonment of the remaining 21 Europeans.( On 31 March, a Japanese fleet of nine vessels arrived and the island was surrendered. About 850 men of the 21st and 24th Special Base Forces and 102nd Construction Unit came ashore and occupied the island.( They rounded up the workforce, most of whom had fled to the jungle. Sabotaged equipment was repaired and preparations were made to resume the mining and export of phosphate. Only 20 men from 21st Special Base Force were left as a garrison.(Isolated acts of sabotage and the torpedoing of the Maru at the wharf on 17 November 1942() meant that only small amounts of phosphate were exported to Japan during the occupation. In November 1943, over 60% of the Islands population was evacuated to Surabayan prison camps, leaving a total population of just under 500 Chinese and Malays and 15 Japanese to survive as best they could. In October 1945  reoccupied Christmas Island.(Public Record Office, England War Office and Colonial Office Correspondence/Straits Settlements)()(Interviews conduced by J G Hunt with Island residents, 197377)(Correspondence J G Hunt with former Island residents, 197379) After the war seven mutineers were traced and prosecuted by the Military Court in Singapore.(Transfer to AustraliaAt Australias request, the United Kingdom transferred sovereignty to Australia; in 1957, the Australian government paid the of Singapore 2.9 million in compensation, a figure based mainly on an estimated value of the phosphate forgone by Singapore.Under Commonwealth Cabinet Decision 1573 of 9 September 1958, E. Nickels was appointed the first Official Representative of the new Territory. In a Media Statement on 5 August 1960, the Minister for Territories, Hasluck, said, among other things, that His extensive knowledge of the Malay language and the customs of the Asian people... has proved invaluable in the inauguration of Australian administration... During his two years on the Island he had faced unavoidable difficulties... and constantly sought to advance the Islands interests.  William Stokes succeeded him and served from 1 October 1960 to 12 June 1966.  On his departure he was lauded by all sectors of the Island community. In 1968 the Official Secretary was re-titled an Administrator in 1968 and, since 1997, Christmas Island and the (Keeling) Islands together are called the Indian Ocean Territories and share a single Administrator resident on Christmas Island. A list and timetable of the Islands leaders since its settlement is at the World Statesmen site(.) and in Neale (1988) and Bosman (1993).The 2004 earthquake and tsunami centered off the western shore of Sumatra, Indonesia, resulted in no reported casualties, but some swimmers were swept some  out to sea for a time before being swept back in.(Main article: affected by the 2004 Indian Ocean earthquake)Refugee and immigration detentionFrom the late 1980s and early 1990s, boats carrying asylum seekers and mainly departing from Indonesia landed on the island. In 2001, Christmas Island was the site of the Tampa controversy, in which the Australian government stopped a Norwegian ship, MV Tampa, from disembarking 438 rescued asylum seekers at Christmas Island.  The ensuing standoff and the associated political reactions in Australia were a major issue in the 2001 Australian federal election.()Another boatload of asylum seekers was taken from Christmas Island to New Guinea for processing, after it was claimed that many of the adult asylum seekers threw their children into the water, apparently in protest at being turned away. This was later found to be false by a Senate select committee. Many of the refugees were subsequently accepted by New Zealand.The former Government later secured the passage of legislation through the Parliament which excised Christmas Island from Australias migration zone, meaning that seekers arriving on Christmas Island could not automatically apply to the Australian government for refugee status.  This allowed the Australian Navy to relocate them to other countries (Papua New Guineas Island, and Nauru) as part of the so-called Solution. In 2006 an Immigration Detention Centre, containing approximately 800 beds, was constructed on the island for the Department of Immigration. Originally estimated to cost $210 million, the final cost was over $400 million.()In 2007, the Government announced plans to decommission the Manus Island and Nauru centres; processing would then occur on Christmas Island itself.()In 2010, around 50 asylum seekers died off the coast of the island as the boat they were travelling on crashed into the rocks off Flying Fish Cove.()(.)DemographicsAs of 2006, the estimated population is 1,493. (The Australian Bureau of Statistics reports a population of 1,508 as of the 2001 Census.)The ethnic composition is 70% Chinese (mainly Hokkien) 20% European and 10% Malay. Religions practised on Christmas Island include Buddhism 67%, Christianity 11%, Islam 10% and others 2%. English is the official language, but languages and Malay are also spoken.Postage stampsA postal agency was opened on the island in 1901 and sold stamps of the Strait Settlements.(Richard Breckon, Christmas Islands Stamps and Postal History: 50 Years of Australian Administration, Gibbons Stamp Monthly, October 2008, pp. 8185.)After the Japanese Occupation (194245), postage stamps of the Military Administration in Malaya were in use, then stamps of Singapore.(Commonwealth Stamp Catalogue Australia, Stanley Gibbons, 4th edition, 2007, pp. 104112.)In 1958, the island received its own postage stamps after being put under Australian custody. It had a large philatelic and postal independence, managed first by the Phosphate Commission (19581969) and then by the Islands Administration (196993).( This ended on 2 March 1993 when Post became the islands postal operator: stamps of Christmas Island can be used in Australia and Australian stamps in the island.(GovernmentChristmas Island is a non-self governing territory of Australia, currently administered by the of Regional Australia, Regional Development and Local Government. Administration was carried out by the Department() up until 14 September, 2010(), and prior to this by the Department of Transport and Regional Services before 29 November 2007.() The legal system is under the authority of the of Australia and Australian law. An Administrator  appointed by the Governor-General represents the monarch and Australia.The Australian Government provides Commonwealth-level government services through the Christmas Island Administration and the of Regional Australia, Regional Development and Local Government. As an administered Territory, there is no state government; instead, state government type services are provided by contractors, including departments of the Western Australian Government, with the costs met by the Australian (Commonwealth) Government. A unicameral of Christmas Island with nine seats provides local government services and is elected by popular vote to serve four-year terms. Elections are held every two years, with half the members standing for election.Christmas Island residents who are Australian citizens also vote in Commonwealth (federal) elections. Christmas Island residents are represented in the House of Representatives through the Territory of Lingiari and in the Senate by Northern Territory Senators.In early 1986, the Christmas Island Assembly held a design competition for an island flag; the winning design was adopted as the informal flag of the territory for over a decade, and in 2002 it was made the official of Christmas Island.EconomyPhosphate mining had been the only significant economic activity, but in December 1987 the Australian government closed the mine. In 1991, the mine was reopened by a consortium which included many of the former mine workers as shareholders. With the support of the government, the $34 million Christmas Island Casino and Resort opened in 1993, but was closed in 1998 and has not re-opened. The Australian Government in 2001 agreed to support the creation of a commercial spaceport on the island, however this has not yet been constructed, and appears that it will not proceed in the future.  The Howard Government built a temporary immigration detention centre on the island in 2001 and planned to replace it with a larger, modern facility located at North West Point until Howards defeat in the 2007 elections.GeographyLocated at , the island is a quadrilateral with hollowed sides, about  in greatest length and  in extreme breadth. The total land area is , with  of coastline. The island is the flat summit of a submarine mountain more than ,() the depth of the platform from which it rises being about  and its height above the sea being upwards of .() The mountain was originally a volcano, and some basalt is exposed in places such as Dales and Dolly Beach, but most of the surface rock is limestone accumulated from the growth of coral over millions of years.()  The summit of this mountain peak is formed of a succession of tertiary limestones ranging in age from the Eocene (or Oligocene) up to recent reef-deposits, with intercalations in the older beds of volcanic rocks.(http://journals.cambridge.org/action/displayFulltext?type1&fid5316016&jidGEO&volumeId7&issueId07&aid5316008 II.A MONOGRAPH OF CHRISTMAS ISLAND (INDIAN OCEAN:PHYSICAL FEATURES AND GEOLOGY). By C. W. ANDREWS.With descriptions of the Fauna and Flora by numerous contributors.  8vo ; pp. xiii, 337, 22 plates, 1 map, text illustrated.(London : printed by order of the Trustees of the British Museum, 1900.))Steep cliffs along much of the coast rise abruptly to a central plateau. Elevation ranges from sea level to  at Murray Hill. The island is mainly rainforest, of which 63% is National Park.The narrow fringing reef surrounding the island can be a maritime hazard.Christmas Island is  south of Indonesia and about  northwest of Perth.ClimateThe climate is tropical, with heat and humidity moderated by trade winds.sourceAustralian Bureau of Meteorology ()Flora and faunaFile:Cococrb2.jpg|thumb|crab|-File:Redcrab.JPG|thumb|right|Island red crab|-booby.jpg|thumb|right|Red-footed Boobies|-File:Anous stolidus nesting cropped.JPG|thumb|Noddy|-File:Brown booby.jpg|thumb|BoobyChristmas Island is of immense  value as it was uninhabited until the late 19th century, so many unique species of fauna and flora exist which have evolved independently of human interference.  Two-thirds of the island has been declared a Park which is managed by the Australian Department of Environment and Heritage through Parks Australia.FloraThe dense rainforest has  evolved in the deep soils of the plateau and on the terraces. The forests are dominated by 25 tree species. Ferns, orchids and vines grow on the branches in the humid atmosphere beneath the canopy. The 135 plant species include at least eighteen which are found nowhere else.Christmas Islands endemic plants include the trees listeri, elatus and peltata var. murrayana; the shrubs listeri, pedunculata, insularis and christmatensis; the vines aldrichii and alba; the herbs alba, maclearii and rossii; the grass nativitatis; the fern listeri; and the orchids archytas, nativitatis, listeri and exilis.(Christmas Island National Park: Flora.)FaunaTwo species of native rats, the Maclears and Rat, have become extinct since the island was settled. The endemic shrew has not been seen since the mid 1980s and may be already extinct, and the Island Pipistrelle, a small bat, is critically endangered and possibly also extinct.()The annual red crab mass migration (around 100 million animals) to the sea to spawn has been called one of the wonders of the natural world() and takes place each year around November; after the start of the season and in synchronisation with the cycle of the moon.The land crabs and sea birds are the most noticeable animals on the island. Twenty terrestrial and intertidal species of crab (of which thirteen are regarded as true land crabs, only dependent on the ocean for larval development) have been described. Robber crabs, known elsewhere as crabs, also exist in large numbers on the island.Christmas Island is a focal point for sea birds of various species. Eight species or subspecies of sea birds nest on the island. The most numerous is the Booby that nests in colonies, in trees, on many parts of the shore terrace. The widespread Booby nests on the ground near the edge of the seacliff and inland cliffs. Booby (listed as endangered) nests on tall emergent trees of the western, northern and southern plateau rainforest. The Christmas Island forest is the only nesting habitat of the Abbotts Booby left in the world. The endemic Island Frigatebird (listed as endangered) has nesting areas on the north-eastern shore terraces and the more widespread Frigatebirds nest in semi-deciduous trees on the shore terrace with the greatest concentrations being in the North West and South Point areas. The Noddy and two species of bosuns or tropicbirds, with their brilliant gold or silver plumage and distinctive streamer tail feathers, also nest on the island.Of the ten native land birds and shorebirds, seven are endemic species or subspecies. This includes the Island Thrush, and the Island Imperial-pigeon. Some 86 migrant bird species have been recorded as visitors to the Island.CommunicationsTelecommunicationsTelephone services are provided by Telstra and are a part of the Australian network with the same prefix as Western Australia (08). A GSM mobile telephone system replaced the old analogue network in February 2005. Phone reception is at its best on the roofs of the buildings. Four free-to-air television stations from Australia are broadcast (ABC, SBS, GWN and WIN) in the same time-zone as Perth. Radio broadcasts from Australia include ABC Radio National, Kimberley, J and Red FM. All services are provided by satellite links from the mainland. internet became available to subscribers in urban areas in mid 2005 through the local internet service provider, CIIA (formerly dotCX).Christmas Island, due to its close proximity to Australias northern neighbours, falls within many of the more interesting satellite footprints throughout the region. This results in ideal conditions for receiving various Asian broadcasts which locals sometimes prefer to the West Australian provided content. Additionally, ionospheric conditions usually bode well for many of the more terrestrial radio transmissions  HF right up through VHF and sometimes in to UHF. The island plays home to a small array of radio equipment that, evidently, spans a good chunk of the usable spectrum. A variety of government owned and operated antenna systems are employed on the island to take advantage of this. Transport Container portA container port exists at Flying Fish Cove with an alternative container unloading point to the south of the island at Norris Point for use during the December to March swell season of seasonal rough seas.RailwaysAn 18 km gauge railway from Flying Fish Cove to the phosphate mine was constructed in 1914. It was closed in December 1987, when the Australian Government closed the mine, but remains largely intact. Because of its very small population size, Christmas Island has the longest railway per capita in the world, more than 100 times of the average length.()Air travelThere are three weekly flights into Island Airport from Perth, Western Australia (via Learmonth) and a weekly charter flight from Malaysia by Airlines.Road transportThere is a new recreation centre at Phosphate Hill operated by the Shire of Christmas Island. There is also a taxi service. The road network covers most of the island and is generally good quality, although four wheel drive vehicles are needed to access some more distant parts of the rain forest or the more isolated beaches, which are only accessible by rough dirt roads.EducationThe island-operated crche is located in the Recreation Centre.() Island District High School, catering for students in grades P-10 is run by the Australian Education Department. Students wishing to complete the last two years of high school or university education must do so on mainland Australia.The island has one public library.()See alsoNotesReferences* ** Further reading*Jan Adams and Marg Neale, 1993, Christmas Island  The Early Years  18881958. Published by Bruce Neale. 96 pages including many b&w photographs. ISBN 0-646-14894-X*Dr Gerald R. Allen and Roger C. Steene, 1998, Fishes of Christmas Island. Published by the Christmas Island Natural History Association. 197 pages including many photographs and plates. ISBN 0-9591210-1-3. A second, revised, edition was published 2007 with a third author included, Max Orchard. ISBN 9780959121087*Anonymous, 1984, Christmas Island, Indian Ocean  a Unique Island. Published by a committee of present and former employees of the phosphate mining company. 60 pages including colour photographs.*D. Bosman (Editor), 1993, Christmas Island Police  19581983. Published by editor. 112 pages including many photographs.*Cyril Ayris, 1993, Tai Ko Seng  Gordon Bennett of Christmas Island. Published by the Gordon Bennett Educational Foundation. 263 pages including photographs. ISBN 0-646-15483-4*CIA World Factbook 2002*Charles. W. Andrews, A Description of Christmas Island (Indian Ocean). Geographical Journal, 13(1), 1735 (1899).*Charles W. Andrews, A Monograph of Christmas Island, London,1900.*H.S. Gray, 1981, Christmas Island Naturally. Published by author. 133 pages including many colour photographs. ISBN 0-9594105-0-3*John Hicks, Holger Rumpff and Hugh Yorkston, 1984, Christmas Crabs. Published by the Christmas Island Natural History Association. 76 pages including colour photographs. ISBN 0-9591210-0-5*National Library of Australia, The Indian Ocean: a select bibliography. 1979 ISBN 0-642-99150-2*Margaret Neale, 1988, We were the Christmas Islanders. Published by Bruce Neale. 207 pages including many b&w photographs. ISBN 0-7316-4158-2/0-7316-4157-4.*W. J. L. Wharton, Account of Christmas Island, Indian Ocean. Proceedings of the Royal Geographical Society and Monthly Record of Geography, 10 (10), 613624 (1888).*Les Waters, 1983, The Union of Christmas Island Workers. Published by Allen & Unwin (1992 edition), St Leonards, NSW. 170 pages including b&w photographs.External links* Christmas Island Shire  official government website* Christmas Island Tourism Association  official tourism website* Christmas Island National Park  official website Christmas Island National Park* Christmas Island Act 1958* * * * Christmas Island Travel Guide from Unearth Travel a creative commons travel wiki* Australia Puts Its Refugee Problem on a Remote Island, Behind Razor Wire  New York Times, 5 November 2009list  list  list  list  af:Kerseilandeg adaszh-min-nan:Christmas-tostrvo(, )Christmasostrovy NadoligIsland (Indiske Ocean)(Australien)et:Julusaar de Navidadeo:KristnaskinsulouharteaIslandChristmas (Australie)ny Nollickde NadalotokNatalis:Jlaeyjadel Natale ()Island ()Nadelikcya Nohelicha KrismasiChristi Natalis (Australia)Salalb:ChrschtdagsinselsalaChristmashu:Karcsony-szigetKrismas nl:Christmaseiland()no:Christmasyann:ChristmasyaBoego NarodzeniaChristmasCrciunului ()Islandostrov (Indick ocen)otokfi:Joulusaarisv:Julnng Paskoth:AdasChristmashan ChristmasChristmasKrsmeszh:
5702
Channel_Tunnel
 lowelevation The Channel Tunnel (; also referred to as the Chunnel)()() is a  undersea rail tunnel linking Folkestone, Kent in the Kingdom with Coquelles, Pas-de-Calais near Calais in northern France beneath the Channel at the of Dover. At its lowest point, it is  deep.()(() At , the Channel Tunnel possesses the longest undersea portion of any tunnel in the world, although the Tunnel in Japan is both longer overall at , and deeper at  below sea level.The tunnel carries high-speed Eurostar passenger trains, Shuttle roll-on/roll-off vehicle transportthe largest in the worldand international rail trains.( The tunnel connects end-to-end with the Nord and Speed 1 high-speed railway lines. In 1996 the Society of Civil Engineers identified the tunnel as one of the Seven Wonders of the Modern World.(Ideas for a cross-Channel fixed link appeared as early as 1802,(() but British political and press pressure over compromised national security stalled attempts to construct a tunnel.( However, the eventual successful project, organised by Eurotunnel, began construction in 1988 and opened in 1994. The project came in 80% over its predicted budget.( Since its construction, the tunnel has faced several problems. Fires have disrupted operation of the tunnel. Illegal immigrants and asylum seekers have attempted to use the tunnel to enter the UK,() causing a minor diplomatic disagreement over the siting of the Sangatte camp, which was eventually closed in 2002.( accessdate 19 July 2009} ) Origins  Proposals and attempts In 1802, French mining engineer Mathieu put forward a proposal to tunnel under the English Channel, with illumination from oil lamps, horse-drawn coaches, and an artificial island mid-Channel for changing horses.(Whiteside p. 17)In the 1830s, Frenchman Thom de Gamond performed the first geological and hydrographical surveys on the Channel, between Calais and Dover. Thom de Gamond explored several schemes and, in 1856, he presented a proposal to III for a mined railway tunnel from Cap Gris-Nez to Point with a port/airshaft on the sandbank(Whiteside pp. 1823) at a cost of 170 million francs, or less than 7 million.()File:Channel Tunnel 1856 idea from Gamond 1a.png|thumb|left|Thom de Gamonds 1856 plan for a cross-Channel link, with a port/airshaft on the sandbank mid-ChannelIn 1865, a deputation led by Ward Hunt proposed the idea of a tunnel to the of the Exchequer of the day, Ewart Gladstone.()After 1867, Low and Sir John Clarke Hawkshaw promoted ideas, but none were implemented. An official Anglo-French protocol was established in 1876 for a cross-Channel railway tunnel. In 1881, British railway entrepreneur Sir William Watkin and French Canal contractor Lavalley were in the Submarine Railway Company that conducted exploratory work on both sides of the Channel. On the English side a  diameter Beaumont-English boring machine dug a  pilot tunnel from Cliff. On the French side, a similar machine dug  from Sangatte. The project was abandoned in May 1882, owing to British political and press campaigns advocating that a tunnel would compromise Britains national defences.( These early works were encountered more than a century later during the TML project.In 1919, during the Paris Peace Conference, British Prime Minister Lloyd George repeatedly brought up the idea of a Channel tunnel as a way of reassuring France about British willingness to defend against another German attack. The French did not take the idea seriously and nothing came of Lloyd Georges proposal.(MacMillan, Margaret. Paris 1919. Random House, 2002, p. 174, 194)In 1929 there was another proposal for the building a channel tunnel, but nothing came of this discussion and the idea was shelved. Proponents estimated construction to be about US$150 million. The engineers addressed the concerns of both nations military leaders by designing two sumpsone near the coast of each countrythat could be flooded at will to block the tunnel. This design feature did not override the concerns of both nations military leaders, and other concerns for hordes of undesirable tourists who would disrupt English habits of living.(New Plan for Channel Tunnel Popular Mechanics, May 1929, pp. 767-768)In 1955, defence arguments were accepted to be irrelevant because of the dominance of air power; thus, both the British and French governments supported technical and geological surveys. A detailed geological survey was carried out in 196465.(  Online presentation of a 196465 film documentary of a geological survey of the Channel, with a brief summary.) Construction work commenced on both sides of the Channel in 1974, a government-funded project using twin tunnels on either side of a service tunnel, with capability for car shuttle wagons. In January 1975, to the dismay of the French partners, the British government cancelled the project. The government had changed to the Labour Party and there was uncertainty about EEC membership, cost estimates had ballooned to 200% and the national economy was troubled. By this time the British Priestly tunnel boring machine was ready and the Ministry of Transport was able to do a  experimental drive.( This short tunnel would however be reused as the starting and access point for tunnelling operations from the British side.In 1979, the Mouse-hole Project was suggested when the Conservatives came to power in Britain. The concept was a single-track rail tunnel with a service tunnel, but without shuttle terminals. The British government took no interest in funding the project, but Prime Minister Thatcher said she had no objection to a privately funded project. In 1981 British and French leaders Margaret Thatcher and Mitterrand agreed to set up a working group to look into a privately funded project, and in April 1985 promoters were formally invited to submit scheme proposals. Four submissions were shortlisted:* a rail proposal based on the 1975 scheme presented by Channel Tunnel Group/FranceManche (CTG/FM),* Eurobridge: a  span bridge with a roadway in an enclosed tube* Euroroute: a  tunnel between artificial islands approached by bridges, and* Channel Expressway: large diameter road tunnels with mid-channel ventilation towers.(The cross-Channel ferry industry protested under the name Flexilink. In 1975 there was no campaign protesting against a fixed link, with one of the largest ferry operators (Sealink) being state-owned. Flexilink continued rousing opposition throughout 1986 and 1987.( Public opinion strongly favoured a drive-through tunnel, but ventilation issues, concerns about accident management, and fear of driver mesmerisation led to the only shortlisted rail submission, CTG/F-M, being awarded the project.(Wilson pp. 1421) Arrangement The British Channel Tunnel Group consisted of two banks and five construction companies, while their French counterparts, FranceManche, consisted of three banks and five construction companies. The role of the banks was to advise on financing and secure loan commitments. On 2 July 1985, the groups formed Channel Tunnel Group/FranceManche (CTG/FM). Their submission to the British and French governments was drawn from the 1975 project, including 11 volumes and a substantial environmental impact statement.(The design and construction was done by the ten construction companies in the CTG/F-M group. The French terminal and boring from Sangatte was undertaken by the five French construction companies in the joint venture group GIE Transmanche Construction. The English Terminal and boring from Shakespeare Cliff was undertaken by the five British construction companies in the Trankslink Joint Venture. The two partnerships were linked by Link (TML), a bi-national project organisation.( The Matre dOeuvre was a supervisory engineering body employed by Eurotunnel under the terms of the concession that monitored project activity and reported back to the governments and banks.(Kirkland pp. 1011)In France, with its long tradition of infrastructure investment, the project garnered widespread approval and in April the French National Assembly gave unanimous support and, in June 1987, after a public inquiry, the Senate gave unanimous support. In Britain, select committees examined the proposal, making history by holding hearings outside of Westminster, in Kent. In February 1987, the third reading of the Channel Tunnel Bill took place in the House of Commons, and was carried by 94 votes to 22. The Channel Tunnel Act gained assent and passed into English law in July of that year.( Parliamentary support for the project came partly from provincial members of Parliament on the basis of promises of Eurostar through train services that have never materialised; the promises were repeated in 1996 when the contract for construction of the Tunnel Rail Link was awarded.( )The Channel Tunnel is a build-own-operate-transfer (BOOT) project with a concession.(Flyvbjerg et al. pp. 9697) TML would design and build the tunnel, but financing was through a separate legal entity: Eurotunnel. Eurotunnel absorbed CTG/F-M and signed a construction contract with TML; however, the British and French governments controlled final engineering and safety decisions, which are now in the hands of the Tunnel Safety Authority. The British and French governments gave Eurotunnel a 55- (later 65-) year operating concession to repay loans and pay dividends. A Railway Usage Agreement was signed between Eurotunnel, Rail and the Nationale des Chemins de fer Franais guaranteeing future revenue in exchange for the railways obtaining half of the tunnels capacity.Private funding for such a complex infrastructure project was of unprecedented scale. An initial equity of 45 million was raised by CTG/F-M, increased by 206 million private institutional placement, 770 million was raised in a public share offer that included press and television advertisements, a syndicated bank loan and of credit arranged 5 billion.( Privately financed, the total investment costs at 1985 prices were 2600 million. At the 1994 completion actual costs were, in 1985 prices, 4650 million: an 80% cost overrun.(Flyvbjerg et al. p. 12) The cost overrun was partly due to enhanced safety, security, and environmental demands.( Financing costs were 140% higher than forecast.(Flyvbjerg et al. p. 3) Construction Working from both the English side and the French side of the Channel, eleven boring machines cut through chalk marl to construct two rail tunnels and a service tunnel. The vehicle shuttle terminals are at Cheriton (part of Folkestone) and Coquelles, and are connected to the English and French motorways (M20 and A16 respectively).Tunnelling commenced in 1988, and the tunnel began operating in 1994.() In 1985 prices, the total construction cost was 4.650 billion (equivalent to  billion today), an 80% cost overrun. At the peak of construction 15,000 people were employed with daily expenditure over 3 million.(Anderson, pp. xvixvii) Ten workers, eight of them British, were killed during construction between 1987 and 1993, most in the first few months of boring.()()() Completion File:Channel Tunnel Opening Ceremony.jpg|thumb|The Channel Tunnel was opened in Calais on 6 May 1994 by British Queen Elizabeth II and French President MitterrandImage:319008 at Sandling.jpg|thumb|right|Class 319 EMUs ran excursions trips into the Channel Tunnel from railway station on 7 May 1994, the first passenger trains to do soA small, two-inch (50-mm) diameter pilot hole allowed the service tunnel to break through without ceremony on 30 October 1990.() On 1 December 1990, Englishman Graham Fagg and Frenchman Phillippe Cozette broke through the service tunnel with the media watching.() Eurotunnel completed the tunnel on time,( and the tunnel was officially opened one year later than originally planned by British Queen Elizabeth II and French President Mitterrand in a ceremony held in Calais on 6 May 1994. The Queen travelled through the tunnel to Calais on a Eurostar train, which stopped nose to nose with the train that carried President Mitterrand from Paris.() Following the ceremony President Mitterrand and the Queen travelled on Le Shuttle to a similar ceremony in Folkestone.( A full public service did not start for several months.The Channel Tunnel Rail Link (CTRL), now called Speed 1, runs  from Pancras railway station in London to the Channel Tunnel portal at Folkestone in Kent. It cost 5.8 billion. On 16 September 2003 UK Prime Minister Blair opened the first section of High Speed 1, from Folkestone to north Kent. On 6 November 2007 the Queen officially opened High Speed 1 and St Pancras International station,() replacing the original slower link to International railway station. On High Speed 1 trains travelling at speeds up to , the journey from London to Paris takes 2 hours 15 minutes and London to Brussels takes 1 hour 51 minutes.()In 1996, the American Society of Civil Engineers, with Mechanics, selected the tunnel as one of the Seven Wonders of the Modern World.() Engineering File:Channel Tunnel NRM.jpg|thumb|The Channel Tunnel exhibit at the Railway Museum in York, England, showing the circular cross section of the tunnel with the overhead line powering a Eurostar train. Also visible is the segmented tunnel liningSurveying undertaken in the twenty years before tunnel construction confirmed earlier speculations that a tunnel route could be bored through a chalk marl stratum. The chalk marl was conducive to tunnelling, with impermeability, ease of excavation and strength. While on the English side the chalk marl ran along the entire length of the tunnel, on the French side a length of  had variable and difficult geology. The Channel Tunnel consists of three bores: two  diameter rail tunnels,  apart,  in length with a  diameter service tunnel in between. There are also cross-passages and piston relief ducts. The service tunnel was used as a pilot tunnel, boring ahead of the main tunnels to determine the conditions. English access was provided at Shakespeare Cliff, while French access came from a shaft at Sangatte. The French side used five boring machines (TBMs); the English side used six. The service tunnel uses Service Tunnel Transport System (STTS) and Light Service Tunnel Vehicles (LADOGS). Fire safety was a critical design issue.Between the portals at Beussingue and Castle Hill the tunnel is  long, with  under land on the French side,  under land on the UK side and  under sea.(Institute of Civil Engineers p. 95) This makes the Channel Tunnel the second longest rail tunnel in the world, behind the Tunnel in Japan, but with the longest under-sea section.() The average depth is  below the seabed.(Kirkland p. 13) On the UK side, of the expected  of spoil approximately  was used for fill at the terminal site, and the remainder was deposited at Lower Shakespeare Cliff behind a seawall, reclaiming ( of land.(Institute of Civil Engineers p. 208) This land was then made into the Hoe Country Park. Environmental impact assessment did not identify any major risks for the project, and further studies into safety, noise, and air pollution were overall positive. However, environmental objections were raised over a high-speed link to London.(Flyvbjerg et al. p. 51) Geology Successful tunnelling under the channel required a sound understanding of the topography and geology and the selection of the best rock strata through which to tunnel. The geology generally consists of northeasterly dipping Cretaceous strata, part of the northern limb of the Wealden-Boulonnais dome. Characteristics include:* Continuous chalk on the cliffs on either side of the Channel containing no major faulting, as observed by Verstegan in 1698* Four geological strata, marine sediments laid down 90100 million years ago; pervious upper and middle chalk above slightly pervious lower chalk and finally impermeable Clay. A sandy stratum, glauconitic marl (tortia), is in between the chalk marl and gault clay* A  layer of chalk marl (French: craie bleue) in the lower third of the lower chalk appeared to present the best tunnelling medium. The chalk has a clay content of 3040% providing impermeability to groundwater yet relatively easy excavation with strength allowing minimal support. Ideally the tunnel would be bored in the bottom  of the chalk marl, allowing water inflow from fractures and joints to be minimised, but above the gault clay that would increase stress on the tunnel lining and swell and soften when wet.()On the English side of the channel, the strata dip less than 5, however, on the French side, this increases to 20. Jointing and faulting is present on both the English and French sides. On the English side, only minor faults of displacement less than  exist. On the French side, displacements of up to  are present owing to the Quenocs anticlinal fold. The faults are of limited width, filled with calcite, pyrite and remoulded clay. The increased dip and faulting restricted the selection of route on the French side. To avoid confusion, microfossil assemblages were used to classify the chalk marl. On the French side, particularly near the coast, the chalk was harder, and more brittle, and more fractured than on the English side. This led to the adoption of different tunnelling techniques on the French and English sides.(The Quaternary undersea valley Fosse Dangaered, and Castle Hill landslip, located at the English portal, caused concerns. Identified by the 196465 geophysical survey, the Fosse Dangaered is an infilled valley system extending  below the seabed,  south of the tunnel route, located mid-channel. A 1986 survey showed that a tributary crossed the path of the tunnel, and so the tunnel route was made as far north and deep as possible. The English terminal had to be located in the Castle Hill landslip, which consists of displaced and tipping blocks of lower chalk, glauconitic marl and gault debris. Thus the area was stabilised by buttressing and inserting drainage adits.( The service tunnels were pilot tunnels preceding the main tunnels, so that the geology, areas of crushed rock, and zones of high water inflow could be predicted. Exploratory probing took place in the service tunnels, in the form of extensive forward probing, vertical downward probes and sideways probing.(Kirkland pp. 2150) Surveying Marine soundings and samplings by Thom de Gamond were carried out during 18331867, establishing the seabed depth at a maximum of  and the continuity of geological strata (layers). Surveying continued over many years, with 166 marine and 70 land-deep boreholes being drilled and over 4,000-line-kilometres of marine geophysical survey completed.( Surveys were undertaken in 19581959, 19641965, 19721974 and 19861988.The surveying in 19581959 catered for tube and bridge designs as well as a bored tunnel, and thus a wide area was investigated. At this time marine geophysics surveying for engineering projects was in its infancy, with poor positioning and resolution from seismic profiling. The 19641965 surveys concentrated on a northerly route that left the English coast at Dover harbour; using 70 boreholes, an area of deeply weathered rock with high permeability was located just south of Dover harbour.(Given the previous survey results and access constraints, a more southerly route was investigated in the 19721973 survey and the route was confirmed to be feasible. Information for the tunnelling project also came from work before the 1975 cancellation. On the French side at Sangatte a deep shaft with adits was made. On the English side at Shakespeare Cliff, the government allowed  of  diameter tunnel to be driven. The actual tunnel alignment, method of excavation and support were essentially the same as the 1975 attempt. In the 19861997 survey, previous findings were reinforced and the nature of the gault clay and the tunnelling medium (chalk marl that made up 85% of the route) were investigated. Geophysical techniques from the oil industry were employed.(Kirkland pp. 2226) Tunnelling Tunnelling between England and France was a major engineering challenge, with the only precedent being the undersea Tunnel in Japan. A serious risk with underwater tunnels is major water inflow due to the water pressure from the sea above under weak ground conditions. The Channel Tunnel also had the challenge of timebeing privately funded, early financial return was paramount.The objective was to construct: two  diameter rail tunnels,  apart,  in length; a  diameter service tunnel between the two main tunnels; pairs of  diameter cross-passages linking the rail tunnels to the service tunnel at  spacing; piston relief ducts  diameter connecting the rail tunnels at  spacing; two undersea crossover caverns to connect the rail tunnels.(Kirkland pp. 63128) The service tunnel always preceded the main tunnels by at least  to ascertain the ground conditions. There was plenty of experience with tunnelling through chalk in the mining industry. The undersea crossover caverns were a complex engineering problem. The French cavern was based on the Mount Baker Ridge freeway tunnel in the US. The UK cavern was dug from the service tunnel ahead of the main tunnels to avoid delay.Precast segmental linings in the main TBM drives were used, but different solutions were used on the English and French sides. On the French side, neoprene and grout sealed bolted linings made of cast iron or high-strength reinforced concrete were used. On the English side, the main requirement was for speed and bolting of cast-iron lining segments was only carried out in areas of poor geology. In the UK rail tunnels, eight lining segments plus a key segment were used; on the French side, five segments plus a key segment.(Wilson p. 38) On the French side, a  diameter  deep grout-curtained shaft at Sangatte was used for access. On the English side, a marshalling area was  below the top of Shakespeare Cliff, and the Austrian Tunnelling method (NATM) was first applied in the chalk marl here. On the English side, the land tunnels were driven from Shakespeare Cliff, the same place as the marine tunnels, not from Folkestone. The platform at the base of the cliff was not large enough for all of the drives and, despite environmental objections, tunnel spoil was placed behind a reinforced concrete seawall, on condition of placing the chalk in an enclosed lagoon to avoid wide dispersal of chalk fines. Owing to limited space, the precast lining factory was on the Isle of Grain in the Thames estuary.(On the French side, owing to the greater permeability to water, earth pressure balance TBMs with open and closed modes were used. The TBMs were of a closed nature during the initial , but then operated as open, boring through the chalk marl stratum.( This minimised the impact to the ground and allowed high water pressures to be withstood, and it also alleviated the need to grout ahead of the tunnel. The French effort required five TBMs: two main marine machines, one main land machine (the short land drives of 3 km allowed one TBM to complete the first drive then reverse direction and complete the other), and two service tunnel machines. On the English side, the simpler geology allowed faster open-faced TBMs.(Kirkland p. 29) Six machines were used, all commenced digging from Shakespeare Cliff, three marine-bound and three for the land tunnels.( Towards the completion of the undersea drives, the UK TBMs were driven steeply downwards and buried clear of the tunnel. The French TBMs then completed the tunnel and were dismantled.(Wilson p. 44) A 900 mm gauge railway was used on the English side during construction.(Kirkland pp. 117128)In contrast to the English machines, which were simply given alphanumeric names, the French tunnelling machines were all named after women: Brigitte, Europa, Catherine, Virginie, Pascaline, Sverine.() Railway design File:ETunnelhoch.jpg|thumb|Interior of Shuttle, a vehicle shuttle train. The largest railway wagons in the world,( the shuttle trains transport vehicles between terminals on either side of the tunnel Communications There are three communication systems in the tunnel: concession radio (CR) for mobile vehicles and personnel within Eurotunnels Concession (terminals, tunnels, coastal shafts); track-to-train radio (TTR) for secure speech and data between trains and the railway control centre; Shuttle internal radio (SIR) for communication between shuttle crew and to passengers over car radios.(Kirkland pp. 129132) This service was discontinued within one year of opening because of drivers difficulty setting their radios to the correct frequency (88.8 MHz). Power supply All tunnel services run on electricity, shared equally from English and French sources. Power is delivered to the locomotives via an line (catenary)(Kirkland pp. 134148) at .(Article: Railway electric traction 9 August 2009)A large proportion of the railway south of London uses a 750 V DC rail to deliver electrical power; however since the opening of High Speed 1 there is no need to use the third rail system for any part of the Eurostar journey. High Speed 1, the tunnel itself and the route to Paris has power provided via overhead catenary at 25 kV 50 Hz. The railways on classic lines in Belgium are also electrified by overhead catenaries, but at 3000 V DC.( Signalling A cab signalling system is used that gives information directly to train drivers on a display. There is Train Protection (ATP) that stops the train if the speed differs from that indicated on the in-cab display. TVM430, as used on Nord, is used in the tunnel.(Kirkland pp. 149155) The maximum allowed speed is .(Article-de: Eurotunnel#Betrieb 9 August 2009) Track system The American Sonneville International Corporation track system consisting of UIC60 rails on 900A grade resting on microcellular EVA pads, bolted into concrete was chosen.(Kirkland pp. 157174) The larger European GB+ gauge was used rather than one of the smaller UK alternatives; this gauge is maintained on High Speed 1 as far as Barking in east London.() Ballasted track was ruled out owing to maintenance constraints and a need for geometric stability. Rolling stock  Eurotunnel Shuttle Initially 38 Le Shuttle locomotives were commissioned, working in pairs with one at each end of a shuttle train. The shuttles have two separate halves: single and double deck. Each half has two loading/unloading wagons and twelve carrier wagons. Eurotunnels original order was for nine tourist shuttles.HGV shuttles also have two halves, with each half containing one loading wagon, one unloading wagon and 14 carrier wagons. There is a club car behind the leading locomotive. Eurotunnel originally ordered six HGV shuttles rakes. Freight locomotives Forty-six Class 92 locomotives for hauling freight trains and overnight passenger trains (the Nightstar project, which was abandoned) were commissioned, which can run on both overhead AC and third-rail DC power. International passenger Thirty-one Eurostar trainsbased on the French TGVbuilt to UK gauge, and with many modifications for safety within the tunnel, were commissioned, with split ownership between British Rail, French National Railway Company and Railway Company of Belgium. Rail ordered seven more for services north of London.(Kirkland pp. 175211)At the end of 2009, extensive fire-proofing requirements were dropped and Bahn received permission to run German Intercity-Express (ICE) trains through the Channel Tunnel in the future. On 19 October 2010 Deutsche Bahn ran the first ICE train through the Channel Tunnel arriving in St. Pancras after evacuation tests in the tunnel were a success.()() Service locomotives locomotives for rescue and shunting work are Class 0001 and Class 0031. Operation  Usage and services File:Chunnel traffic.svg|thumb|A Channel Tunnel traffic graph showing the number of passengers and tonnes of freight. Freight vehicle shuttle numbers dropped in 1996/7 owing to closure of the service after the November 1996 fireFile:Channel Tunnel Terminal.jpg|thumb|The British terminal at Cheriton in west Folkestone. The terminal services shuttle trains that carry vehicles, and is linked to the motorwayFile:Folkestone White Horse cropped.jpg|thumb|The White Horse is the last view of England for most passengers embarking at the Cheriton terminalServices offered by the tunnel are:* Shuttle (formerly Le Shuttle) roll-on roll-off shuttle service for road vehicles,* Eurostar passenger trains,* through freight trains.()Both the freight and passenger traffic forecasts that led to the construction of the tunnel were largely and universally overestimated. Particularly, Eurotunnels commissioned forecasts were over-predictions.( Although the captured share of Channel crossings (competing with air and sea) was forecast correctly, high competition and reduced tariffs has led to low revenue. Overall cross-Channel traffic was overestimated.(However with the EUs liberalisation of international rail services, the tunnel and Speed 1 have been open to competition since 2010. There have been a number of operators interested in running services including Bahn, through the tunnel and along Speed 1 to London. Passenger traffic volumes Total cross-tunnel passenger traffic volumes peaked at 18.4 million in 1998, then dropped to 14.9 million in 2003, from then rising again to 17.0 million in 2010.At the time of the decision about building the tunnel, 15.9 million passengers were predicted for Eurostar trains in the opening year. In 1995, the first full year, actual numbers were a little over 2.9 million, growing to 7.1 million in 2000, then dropping again to 6.3 million in 2003. However, Eurostar was also limited by the lack of a high-speed connection on the British side. After the completion of Speed 1 (formerly CTRL) to London in two stages in 2003 and 2007, traffic increased. In 2008, Eurostar carried 9,113,371 passengers in cross-Channel-Tunnel traffic, a 10% increase over the previous year, despite traffic limitations due to the Channel Tunnel fire.() Eurostar passenger numbers continued to increase, reaching 9,528,558 in 2010.() Freight traffic volumes Cross-tunnel freight traffic volumes have been erratic, with a decrease during 1997 due to a closure caused by a fire in a freight shuttle. The total freight crossings increased over the period, indicating the substitutability of the tunnel by sea crossings. The tunnel has achieved a cross-Channel freight traffic market share close to or above Eurotunnels 1980s predictions but Eurotunnels 1990 and 1994 predictions were overestimates.For freight transported on through freight trains, the first year freight prediction was 7.2 million gross tonnes, however, the actual 1995 figure was 1.3 million gross tonnes.(Flyvbjerg et al. p. 22) Through freight volumes peaked in 1998 at 3.1 million tonnes. However, with continuing problems, this figure fell back to 1.21 million tonnes in 2007, increasing again slightly to 1.24 million tonnes in 2008.( Together with that carried on freight shuttles, freight traffic growth has occurred since opening, with 6.4 million tonnes carried in 1995, 18.4 million tonnes recorded in 2003( and 19.6 million tonnes in 2007.( Numbers fell back in the wake of the 2008 fire.Eurotunnels freight subsidiary is 2.() In September 2006 EWS, the UKs largest rail freight operator, announced that owing to cessation of UK-French government subsidies of 52 million per annum to cover the Channel Tunnel Minimum User Charge (a subsidy of around 13,000 per train, at a traffic level of 4,000 trains per annum), freight trains would stop running after 30 November.() Economic performance Shares in Eurotunnel were issued at 3.50 per share on 9 December 1987. By mid-1989 the price had risen to 11.00. Delays and cost overruns led to the share price dropping; during demonstration runs in October 1994 the share price reached an all-time low value. Eurotunnel suspended payment on its debt in September 1995 to avoid bankruptcy.() In December 1997 the British and French governments extended Eurotunnels operating concession by 34 years to 2086. Financial restructuring of Eurotunnel occurred in mid-1998, reducing debt and financial charges. Despite the restructuring Economist reported in 1998 that to break even Eurotunnel would have to increase fares, traffic and market share for sustainability.(Flyvbjerg et al. pp. 3234) A cost benefit analysis of the Channel Tunnel indicated that there were few impacts on the wider economy and few developments associated with the project, and that the British economy would have been better off if the tunnel had not been constructed.(()Under the terms of the Concession, Eurotunnel was obliged to investigate a cross-Channel road tunnel. In December 1999 road and rail tunnel proposals were presented to the British and French governments, but it was stressed that there was not enough demand for a second tunnel.() A three-way treaty between the United Kingdom, France and Belgium governs border controls, with the establishment of control zones wherein the officers of the other nation may exercise limited customs and law enforcement powers. For most purposes these are at either end of the tunnel, with the French border controls on the UK side of the tunnel and vice versa. For certain city-to-city trains, the train itself represents a control zone.() A binational emergency plan coordinates UK and French emergency activities.(Kirkland p. 331)In 1999 Eurostar posted its first ever net profits, having previously made a loss of 925m in 1995.( Terminals File:Chargement voiture Eurotunnel.jpg|thumb|A Peugeot 807 entering a shuttle wagon at the French terminal at Coquelles near Calais in northern FranceThe terminals sites are at Cheriton (Folkestone in the United Kingdom) and Coquelles (Calais in France). The terminals are unique facilities designed to transfer vehicles from the motorway onto trains at a rate of 700 cars and 113 heavy vehicles per hour. The UK site uses the motorway. The terminals are organised with the frontier controls juxtaposed with the entry to the system to allow travellers to go onto the motorway at the destination country immediately after leaving the shuttle. The area of the UK site was severely constrained and the design was challenging. The French layout was achieved more easily. To achieve design output, the shuttles accept cars on double-decks; for flexibility, ramps were placed inside the shuttles to provide access to the top decks.(Kirkland pp. 255270) At Folkestone there are  of mainline track and 45 turnouts with eight platforms. At Calais there are  of track with 44 turnouts. At the terminals the shuttle trains traverse a figure eight to reduce uneven wear on the wheels.( There is a freight marshalling yard west of Cheriton at Moor Freight Yard. Regional impact A 1996 report from the Commission predicted that Kent and de Calais had to face increased traffic volumes due to general growth of cross-Channel traffic and traffic attracted by the tunnel. In Kent, a high-speed rail line to London would transfer traffic from road to rail.(European Commission pp. 220222) Kents regional development would benefit from the tunnel, but being so close to London restricts the benefits. Gains are in the traditional industries and are largely dependent on the development of Ashford International passenger station, without which Kent would be totally dependent on Londons expansion. Nord-Pas-de-Calais enjoys a strong internal symbolic effect of the Tunnel which results in significant gains in manufacturing.(European Commission pp. 248252)The removal of a bottleneck by means like the Channel Tunnel does not necessarily induce economic gains in all adjacent regions, the image of a region being connected to the European high-speed transport and active political response are more important for regional economic development. However, some small-medium enterprises located in the immediate vicinity of the terminal have used the opportunity to re-brand the profile of their business with positive effect, such as The New Inn at Etchinghill which was able to commercially exploit its unique selling point as being the closest pub to the Channel Tunnel. Tunnel-induced regional development is small compared to general economic growth.() The South East of England is likely to benefit developmentally and socially from faster and cheaper transport to continental Europe, but the benefits are unlikely to be equally distributed throughout the region. The overall environmental impact is almost certainly negative.()Since the opening of the tunnel, small positive impacts on the wider economy have been felt, however, it is difficult to identify major economic successes directly attributed to the tunnel.(Flyvbjerg et al. p. 6869) The Eurotunnel does operate profitably, offering an alternative transportation mode unaffected by poor weather.() both Eurotunnel and Eurostar.  High costs of construction did delay profitability, however, and companies involved in the Channel Tunnels construction and operation early in operation relied on government aid to deal with debts amounted.()()() Eurotunnel has been described as being in a serious situation.() Incidents  Fires There have been three fires in the Channel Tunnel that were significant enough to close the tunnelall on the heavy goods vehicle (HGV) shuttlesand other more minor incidents.During an invitation only testing phase on 9 December 1994, a fire broke out in a Ford Escort car whilst its owner had been loading it on to the upper deck of a tourist shuttle. The fire started at approximately 10:00 with the shuttle train stationary in the Folkestone terminal and was extinguished around 40 minutes later with no passenger injuries.()On 18 November 1996, a fire broke out on a heavy goods vehicle shuttle wagon in the tunnel but nobody was seriously hurt. The exact cause is unknown,() although it was not a Eurotunnel equipment or rolling stock problem; it may have been due to arson of a heavy goods vehicle. It is estimated that the heart of the fire reached , with the tunnel severely damaged over , with some  affected to some extent. Full operation recommenced six months after the fire.()The tunnel was closed for several hours on 21 August 2006, when a truck on an HGV shuttle train caught fire.()() On 11 September 2008, a fire occurred in the Channel Tunnel at 13:57 GMT. The incident started on a freight-carrying vehicle train travelling towards France.() The event occurred  from the French entrance to the tunnel. No one was killed but several people were taken to hospitals suffering from smoke inhalation, and minor cuts and bruises. The tunnel was closed to all traffic, with the undamaged South Tunnel reopening for limited services two days later.() Full service resumed on 9 February 2009() after repairs costing 60 million. Train failures On the night of 19/20 February 1996, approximately 1,000 passengers became trapped in the Channel Tunnel when two Rail Class 373 trains on continent-bound Eurostar service broke down owing to failures of electronic circuits caused by snow and ice being deposited and then melting on the circuit boards.()On 3 August 2007, an electrical failure lasting six hours caused passengers to be trapped in the tunnel on a Eurotunnel shuttle crossing.()On the evening of 18 December 2009, during the 2009 European snowfall, five London-bound trains operating Eurostar services failed inside the tunnel, trapping 2,000 passengers in the tunnel overnight. Five Class 373 trains had departed from Brussels and Paris and encountered cold temperatures in Northern France, the coldest for eight years.() A Eurotunnel spokesperson explained that the problem had arisen because of fluffy snow in France,(Eurostar blames fluffy snow for weekend chaos Times 21 December 09) which had evaded the winterisation shields designed to stop snow getting into the electrics.(Eurostar cancels trains over snow  Association (21 December 09)) Electrical failure was then caused by the transition from the cold air in France to the warm atmosphere inside the tunnel.() One train from Brussels had been turned back before reaching the tunnel; two trains were hauled out of the tunnel using diesel-powered Class 0001. The blocking of the Channel Tunnel led to the implementation of Stack, the transformation of the motorway into a linear car park.()Snow that had built up on the trains then melted in the heat of the tunnel, the water causing electrical faults.()()()() The occasion was the first time during the fifteen years that a Eurostar train had to be evacuated inside the tunnel itself; the failing of four at once being described as unprecedented.() The Channel Tunnel reopened the following morning.() Deva, of the European Parliament for South East England, had called for Eurostar chief executive Richard Brown to resign over the incidents.() An independent report by Garnett (former CEO of North Eastern Railway) and Claude Gressier (a French transport expert) on the 18/19 December 2009 incidents was issued in February 2010, making 21 recommendations.()()A further Class 373 unit on BrusselsLondon service broke down in the tunnel on 7 January 2010. The train had 236 passengers on board and was towed to Ashford; other trains that had not yet reached the tunnel were turned back.()() Asylum and immigration Immigrants and would-be seekers have been known to use the tunnel to attempt to enter Britain. By 1997, the problem had already attracted international press attention, and the French Cross opened a refugee centre at Sangatte in 1999, using a warehouse once used for tunnel construction; by 2002 it housed up to 1500 persons at a time, most of them trying to get to the UK.() In 2001, most came from Afghanistan, Iraq and Iran, but African and Eastern European countries are also represented.()Most migrants who got into Britain found some way to ride a freight train, but others used Eurostar. Though the facilities were fenced, airtight security was deemed impossible; refugees would even jump from bridges onto moving trains. In several incidents people were injured during the crossing; others tampered with railway equipment, causing delays and requiring repairs.() Eurotunnel said it was losing 5m per month because of the problem.() A dozen refugees have died in crossing attempts.(In 2001 and 2002, several riots broke out at Sangatte and groups of refugees (up to 550 in a December 2001 incident) stormed the fences and attempted to enter en masse.() Immigrants have also arrived as legitimate Eurostar passengers without proper entry papers.()Local authorities in both France and the UK called for the closure of Sangatte, and Eurotunnel twice sought an injunction against the centre.( The United Kingdom blamed France for allowing Sangatte to open, and France blamed the UK for its lax asylum rules and the EU for not having a uniform immigration policy.( The clbre nature of the problem even included journalists detained as they followed refugees onto railway property.()In 2002, after the Commission told France that it was in breach of European Union rules on the free transfer of goods, because of the delays and closures as a result of its poor security, a double fence was built at a cost of 5 million, reducing the numbers of refugees detected each week reaching Britain on goods trains from 250 to almost none.() Other measures included CCTV cameras and increased police patrols.() At the end of 2002, the Sangatte centre was closed after the UK agreed to take some of its refugees.() Safety The Tunnel Safety Authority is responsible for some aspects of safety regulation in the tunnel; it reports to the IGC.()The service tunnel is used for access to technical equipment in cross-passages and equipment rooms, to provide fresh-air ventilation, and for emergency evacuation. The Service Tunnel Transport System (STTS) allows fast access to all areas of the tunnel. The service vehicles are rubber-tyred with a buried guidance wire system. Twenty-four STTS vehicles were made, and are used mainly for maintenance but also for firefighting and in emergencies. Pods with different purposes, up to a payload of , are inserted into the side of the vehicles. The STTS vehicles cannot turn around within the tunnel, and are driven from either end. The maximum speed is  when the steering is locked. A smaller fleet of fifteen Light Service Tunnel Vehicles (LADOGS) were introduced to supplement the STTSs. The LADOGS have a short wheelbase with a  turning circle allowing two-point turns within the service tunnel. Steering cannot be locked like the STTS vehicles, and maximum speed is . Pods up to 1 tonne can be loaded onto the rear of the vehicles. Drivers in the tunnel sit on the right, and the vehicles drive on the left. Owing to the risk of French personnel driving on their native right side of the road, sensors in the road vehicles alert the driver if the vehicle strays to the right side of the tunnel.(Kirkland pp. 247254)The three tunnels contain  of air that needs to be conditioned for comfort and safety. Air is supplied from ventilation buildings at Shakespeare Cliff and Sangatte, with each building capable of full duty providing 100% standby capacity. Supplementary ventilation also exists on either side of the tunnel. In the event of a fire, ventilation is used to keep smoke out of the service tunnel and move smoke in one direction in the main tunnel to give passengers clean air. The Channel Tunnel was the first mainline railway tunnel to have special cooling equipment. Heat is generated from traction equipment and drag. The design limit was set at , using a mechanical cooling system with refrigeration plants on both the English and French sides that run chilled water circulating in pipes within the tunnel.(Trains travelling at high speed create piston-effect pressure changes that can affect passenger comfort, ventilation systems, tunnel doors, fans and the structure of the trains, and drag on the trains.(Kirkland pp. 212230) Piston relief ducts of  diameter were chosen to solve the problem, with 4 ducts per kilometre to give close to optimum results. Unfortunately this design led to unacceptable lateral forces on the trains so a reduction in train speed was required and restrictors were installed in the ducts.(The Channel Tunnel Experience Lessons for the Future pp. 1923)The safety issue of a fire on a passenger-vehicle shuttle garnered much attention, with Eurotunnel itself noting that fire was the risk gathering the most attention in a 1994 Safety Case for three reasons: ferry companies opposed to passengers being allowed to remain with their cars; Office statistics indicating that car fires had doubled in ten years; and the long length of the tunnel. Eurotunnel commissioned the UK Fire Research Station to give reports of vehicle fires, as well as liaising with Kent Fire Brigade to gather vehicle fire statistics over one year. Fire tests took place at the French Mines Research Establishment with a mock wagon used to investigate how cars burned.(Kirkland pp. 231240) The wagon door systems are designed to withstand fire inside the wagon for 30 minutes, longer than the transit time of 27 minutes. Wagon air conditioning units help to purge dangerous fumes from inside the wagon before travel. Each wagon has a fire detection and extinguishing system, with sensing of ions or ultraviolet radiation, smoke and gases that can trigger halon gas to quench a fire. Since the Heavy Goods Vehicle (HGV) wagons are not covered, fire sensors are located on the loading wagon and in the tunnel itself. A  water main in the service tunnel provides water to the main tunnels at  intervals.() The ventilation system can control smoke movement. Special arrival sidings exist to accept a train that is on fire, as the train is not allowed to stop whilst on fire in the tunnel. Eurotunnel has banned a wide range of hazardous goods from travelling in the tunnel. Two STTS vehicles with firefighting pods are on duty at all times, with a maximum delay of 10 minutes before they reach a burning train.( See also * of Gibraltar crossing* Rail Class 373* Sea tunnel* Undersea Tunnel* List of Rail megaprojects* Hoe Notes  References * * * * * * *  External links * * New Plan For Channel Tunnel, May 1929, Popular Mechanics article on a post-WW1 plan for a tunnel that was scrapped by the great depression. A total cost figure of 150 million was given in 1929* autobiography of Sir John Stokes regarding 1882 deliberations http://members.fortunecity.com/78blencowest/ch14.htm#chunneltunelibe:  ca:Eurotnelcs:Eurotunelda:Eurotunnelende:Eurotunneles:EurotnelTunelotunelasous la Manchefy:Kanaaltunnelgl:Eurotnel (-)hr:Eurotunelsub la ManchoChannelis:Ermarsundsgngindella ManicaChanneltunelisnnert der Manchelt:Eurotunelishu:Csatorna-alagtSelatnl:Kanaaltunnelja:no:Kanaltunnelennn:Kanaltunnelenkm:pl:Eurotunelpt:EurotnelCanalului Mneciiru:Tunnelsq:EurotuneliTunnelsk:Eurotunelpod Rokavskim prelivomtunnelisv:Kanaltunnelnth:Tneliuk: hm eo bin Manchezh:
6197
Clanking_replicator
A clanking replicator is an artificial self-replicating system that relies on conventional large-scale technology and automation. The term evolved to distinguish such systems from the microscopic assemblers that nanotechnology may make possible. They are also sometimes called Auxons, from the Greek word auxein which means to grow, or Neumann machines after von Neumann, who first rigorously studied the idea. This last term (von Neumann machine) is less specific and also refers to a completely unrelated computer architecture proposed by von Neumann, so its use is discouraged where accuracy is important. Von Neumann himself used the term Constructor.The term clanking replicator was used by Drexler,() is informal and is rarely used by others in popular or technical discussions.Basic conceptA machine would need to have the capacity to gather energy and materials, process the raw materials into finished components, and then assemble them into a copy of itself. It is unlikely that this would all be contained within a single monolithic structure, but would rather be a group of cooperating machines or an automated factory that is capable of manufacturing all of the machines that make it up.The factory could produce mining robots to collect raw materials, construction robots to put new machines together, and repair robots to maintain itself against wear and tear, all without human intervention or direction. The advantage of such a system lies in its ability to expand its own capacity rapidly and without additional human effort; in essence, the initial investment required to construct the first clanking replicator would have an arbitrarily large payoff with no additional labor cost, with future returns discounted by their value.Such a machine violates no laws, and we already possess the basic technologies necessary for some of the more detailed proposed designs.Noting another proof that self-replicating machines are possible is the simple fact that all living organisms are self replicating by definition.History of the conceptThe idea of non-biological self-replicating systems was introduced in Samuel Butlers article Darwin Among the Machines published only a few years after The Origin of Species. As a serious proposal, it was first suggested by mathematician Von Neumann in the late 1940s when he proposed a kinematic self-reproducing automaton model as a experiment. See Von Neumann, J., 1966, The Theory of Self-reproducing Automata, A. Burks, ed., Univ. of Illinois Press, Urbana, IL.Advanced Automation for Space MissionsIn 1980, NASA conducted a summer study entitledAdvanced Automation for Space Missions, edited by Freitas, to produce a detailed proposal for self-replicating factories to develop lunar resources without requiring additional launches or human workers on-site. The proposed system would have been capable of exponentially increasing productive capacity. The design could be modified to build Neumann probes to explore the galaxy.The reference design specified small computer-controlled electric carts running on rails.  Each cart could have a simple hand or a small bull-dozer shovel, forming a basic robot.Power would be provided by a canopy of solar cells supported on pillars.  The other machinery could run under the canopy.The study identified four key manufacturing capabilities out of the hundreds commonly used in modern industry:# casting for molded parts# machining for etching and fine tuning# deposition for electronics, solar cells, and mirror surfaces# Extrusion of spun basalt fiber for electrical insulation and fiberglassA casting robot would use a robotic arm with a few sculpting tools to make plaster molds.  Plaster molds are easy to make, and can make precise parts with good surface finishes.  The robot would then cast most of the parts either from nonconductive molten rock (basalt) or purified metals.  An electric or solar oven would melt the materials. A carbon dioxide laser cutting and welding system was also included.A more speculative, more complex chip factory was specified to produce the computer and electronic systems, but the designers also said that it might prove practical to ship the chips from Earth as if they were vitamins.Much of the design study was concerned with a simple, flexible chemical system for processing the ores, and the differences between the ratio of elements needed by the replicator, and the ratios available in lunar regolith.  The element that most limited the growth rate was chlorine, needed to process regolith for aluminium.  Chlorine is very rare in lunar regolith, so the design recycled it.Other references* Dyson expanded upon Neumanns automata theories, and advanced a biotechnology-inspired theory. See Astrochicken.*The first technical design study of a self-replicating interstellar probe was published in a 1980 paper by Freitas*Clanking replicators are also mentioned briefly in the fourth chapter of K. Eric Drexlers 1986 book of Creation.*Article about a proposed clanking replicator system to be used for developing Earthly deserts in the October 1995 Magazine, featuring forests of solar panels that powered desalination equipment to irrigate the land.* In 1995, Nick Szabo proposed a challenge to build a macroscale replicator from Lego(tm) robot kits and similar basic parts.  Szabo wrote that this approach was easier than previous proposals for macroscale replicators, but successfully predicted that even this method would not lead to a macroscale replicator within ten years.*In 1998, Phoenix suggested a general idea for a macroscale replicator on the sci.nanotech newsgroup, operating in a pool of ultraviolet-cured liquid plastic, selectively solidifying the plastic to form solid parts. Computation could be done by logic. Power for the process could be supplied by a pressurized source of the liquid.*In 2001, Ward mentioned an escaped clanking replicator destroying the human race in his book Evolution.*In 2004, General Dynamics completed a study for NASAs Institute for Advanced Concepts.  It  concluded that complexity of the development was equal to that of a Pentium 4, and promoted a design based on cellular automata.*In 2004, Robert Freitas and Merkle published the first comprehensive review of the field of self-replication, in their book Kinematic Self-Replicating Machines, which includes 3000+ literature references.*In 2005, Bowyer of the of Bath started the RepRap project to develop a prototyping machine which would be able to replicate itself, making such machines cheap enough for people to buy and use in their homes.  The project is releasing material under the GPL. http://staff.bath.ac.uk/ensab/replicator/Clanking replicators in fictionIn fiction, the idea dates back at least as far as &#268;apeks 1921 play (Rossums Universal Robots).E. van Vogt used the idea as a plot device in his story M33 in Andromeda (1943), which was later combined with the three other Space Beagle stories to became the novel, Voyage of the Space Beagle. The story describes the creation of self-replicating weapons factories designed to destroy the Anabis, a galaxy-spanning malevolent life form bent on destruction of the human race.An early treatment was the short story Autofac by K. Dick, published in 1955, which precedes von Neumanns original paper about self-reproducing machines. Dick also touched on this theme in his earlier 1953 short story Variety. Another example can be found in the 1962 short story Epilogue by Anderson, in which self-replicating factory barges were proposed that used minerals extracted from ocean water as raw materials.In his short story Crabs on the Island (1958) Dneprov speculated on the idea that since the replication process is never 100% accurate, leading to slight differences in the descendants, over several generations of replication the machines would be subjected to evolution similar to that of living organisms. In the story, a machine is designed, the sole purpose of which is to find metal to produce copies of itself, intended to be used as a weapon against an enemys war machines. The machines are released on a deserted island, the idea being that once the available metal is all used and they start fighting each other, selection will enhance their design. However, the evolution has stopped by itself when the last descendant, an enormously large crab, was created, being unable to reproduce itself due to lack of energy and materials.Lem has also studied the same idea in his novel Invincible (1964), in which the crew of a spacecraft landing on a distant planet finds non-biological life-form, which is the product of long, possibly of millions of years of mechanical evolution. This phenomenon is also key to the aforementioned Anderson story.Sladek used the concept to humorous ends in his first novel The Reproductive System (1968, also titled Mechasm in some markets), where a U.S. military research project goes out of control.NASAs Advanced Automation for Space Missions study directly inspired the science fiction novel of the Lifemaker (1983) by author James P. Hogan.The movie Screamers, based on Dicks short story Second Variety, features a group of robot weapons created by mankind to act as Von Neumann devices / berserkers. The original robots are subterranean buzzsaws that make a screaming sound as they approach a potential victim beneath the soil. These machines are self-replicating and, as is found out through the course of the movie, they are quite intelligent and have managed to evolve into newer, more dangerous forms, most notably human forms which the real humans in the movie cannot tell apart from other real humans except by trial and error.Other notable fiction literature containing clanking replicators*Autofac by K. Dick*The Berserker series of books and short stories by Saberhagen*Forge of God by Bear*Odyssey Two by C. Clarke*World at the End of Time by Pohl*Recursion by Ballantyne ISBN 0330426990*Evolution by Baxter*Prey  by Crichton(The nanorobot swarm in Prey are not true replicators but are rather nonhuman nanorobot/gamma assembler/bacteria cyborgs which gain the ability to build structures to reproduce themselves and eventually become symbiotic with humans.)*The popular TV series SG-1 introduces Replicators as some of the deadliest enemies of life.Prospects for implementationAs the use of industrial automation has expanded over time, some factories have begun to approach a semblance of self-sufficiency that is suggestive of clanking replicators. However, such factories are unlikely to achieve full closure until the cost and flexibility of automated machinery comes close to that of human labour and the manufacture of spare parts and other components locally becomes more economical than transporting them from elsewhere. Fully capable machine replicators are most useful for developing resources in dangerous environments which are not easily reached by existing transportation systems (such as space).A clanking replicator can be considered to be a form of life. Depending on its design, it might be subject to evolution over long time periods. However, with robust correction, and the possibility of external intervention, the common fiction theme of robotic life run amok is unlikely in the near term.EtymologyIt should probably be noted that clanking is an example of onomatopoeia, understandable to some English speakers, but not to all. The term is meant to evoke the image of a nineteenth century factory, powered by steam, pushing gears and rods, noisy and clamorous.References(
6881
Cecilia_Beaux
 awards         Cecilia Beaux (May 1, 1855  September 7, 1942) was an American society portraitist, in the manner of Singer Sargent. She was a near contemporary of better-known American artist Cassatt and also received her training in Philadelphia and France. Her sympathetic renderings of American ruling class made her one of the most successful portrait painters of her era.BiographyEarly lifeCecilia Beaux was born in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, the youngest daughter of French silk manufacturer Jean Adolphe Beaux and teacher Cecilia Kent Leavitt, daughter of prominent businessman Wheeler Leavitt of York City and his wife Cecilia Kent of Connecticut.() Cecilia Kent Leavitt died from fever 12 days after giving birth at age 33.(Tappert, page 1.) Cecilia Leilie Beaux and her sister Etta were subsequently raised by their maternal grandmother and aunts, primarily in Philadelphia.()() Her father, unable to bear the grief of his loss, and feeling adrift in a foreign country, returned to his native France for 16 years, with only one visit back to Philadelphia.(Alice A. Carter, Cecilia Beaux, Rizzoli, New York, 2005, p. 11, ISBN 0-8478-2708-9) He returned when Cecilia was two, but left four years later after his business failed. As she confessed later, We didnt love Papa very much, he was so foreign.  We thought him peculiar. Her father did have a natural aptitude for drawing and the sisters were charmed by his whimsical sketches of animals. Later, Beaux would discover that her French heritage would serve her well during her pilgrimage and training in France.(Carter, p. 15)File:Cecilia Beaux self-portrait.jpg|thumb|left|200px|Self-portrait by Beaux, 1894In Philadelphia, Beauxs aunt Emily married mining engineer William Foster Biddle, whom Beaux would later describe as after my grandmother, the strongest and most beneficent influence in my life. For fifty years, he cared for his nieces-in-law with consistent attention and occasional financial support.(Carter, p. 18) Her grandmother, on the other hand, provided day-to-day supervision and kindly discipline. Whether with housework, handiwork, or academics, Grandma Leavitt offered a pragmatic framework, stressing that everything undertaken must be completed, conquered. The Civil War years were particularly challenging, but the extended family survived despite little emotional or financial support from Beauxs father.(Carter, p. 19)After the war, Beaux began to spend some time in the household of Willie and Emily, both proficient musicians. Beaux learned to play the piano but preferred singing. The musical atmosphere later proved an advantage for her artistic ambitions. Beaux recalled, They understood perfectly the spirit and necessities of an artists life.(Carter, p. 20) In her early teens, she had her first major exposure to art during visits with Willie to the nearby Academy of the Fine Arts, one of Americas foremost art schools and museums. Though fascinated by the narrative elements of some of the pictures, particularly the Biblical themes of the massive paintings of West, at this point Beaux had no aspirations of becoming an artist.(Carter, p. 25)Her childhood was a sheltered though generally happy one. As a teen she already manifested the traits, as she described, of both a realist and a perfectionist, pursued by an uncompromising passion for carrying through.(Carter, p. 29) She attended the Misses Lyman School and was just an average student, though she did well in French and Natural History. However, she was unable to afford the extra fee for art lessons.(Carter, p. 31) At age 16, Beaux began art lessons with a relative, Catharine Ann Drinker, an accomplished artist who had her own studio and a going clientele. Drinker became Beauxs role model, and she continued lessons with Drinker for a year. She then studied for two years with the painter Francis Adolf Van der Wielen, who offered lessons in perspective and drawing from casts during the time that the new Pennsylvania Academy of the Fine Arts was under construction. Given the bias of the Victorian age, female students were denied direct study in anatomy and could not attend drawing classes with live models (who were often prostitutes) until a decade later.(Carter, p. 37)File:New England Woman Cecilia Beaux.jpg|thumb|right|200px|New England Woman. Portrait of Mrs. Jedidiah H. Richards (Beauxs cousin Julia Leavitt), 1895. Academy of Fine ArtsAt 18, Beaux was appointed drawing teacher at Miss Sanfords School, taking over Drinkers post. She also gave private art lessons, and produced decorative art and small portraits. Her own studies were mostly self-directed. Beaux received her first introduction to lithography doing copy work for Philadelphia printer Thomas Sinclair and she published her first work in St. Nicholas magazine in December 1873.(Carter, p. 45) Beaux demonstrated accuracy and patience as a scientific illustrator, creating drawings of fossils for Drinker Cope, for a multi-volume report sponsored by the U.S. Geological Survey. However, she did not find technical illustration suitable for a career (the extreme exactitude required gave her pains in the solar plexus). At this stage, she did not yet consider herself an artist.(Beaux, pp. 77-80)(Carter, pp. 48-49)Beaux began attending the Pennsylvania Academy of the Fine Arts in 1876, then under the dynamic influence of Eakins, whose great work Gross Clinic had horrified Philadelphia Exhibition-goers as a gory spectacle at the Exhibition of 1876.(Carter, p. 54) She steered clear of the controversial Eakins, though she much admired his work. His progressive teaching philosophy, focused on anatomy and live study (and allowed the female students to partake in segregated studios), eventually led to his firing as director of the Academy. She did not ally herself with Eakins ardent student supporters, and later wrote, A curious instinct of self-preservation kept me outside the magic circle.(Carter, p. 59) Instead, she attended costume and portrait painting classes for three years taught by the ailing director Schussele.(Carter, p. 55)After leaving the Academy, the 24-year-old Beaux decided to try her hand at porcelain painting and she enrolled in a course at the National Art Training School. She was well suited to the precise work but later wrote, this was the lowest depth I ever reached in commercial art, and although it was a period when youth and romance were in their first attendance on me, I remember it with gloom and record it with shame.(Carter, p. 63) She studied privately with Sartain, a friend of Eakins and a New York artist invited to Philadelphia to teach a group of art students, starting in 1881. Though Beaux admired Eakins more and thought his painting skill superior to Sartains, she preferred the latters gentle teaching style which promoted no particular aesthetic approach.(Carter, p. 65) Unlike Eakins, however, Sartain believed in phrenology and Beaux adopted a lifelong belief that physical characteristics correlated with behaviors and traits.(Beaux attended Sartains classes for two years, then rented her own studio and shared it with a group of women artists who hired a live model and continued without an instructor. After the group disbanded, Beaux set in earnest to prove her artistic abilities. She painted a large canvas in 1884, Les Derniers Jours denfance, a portrait of her sister and nephew whose composition and style revealed a debt to McNeill Whistler and whose subject matter was akin to Cassatts mother-and-child paintings.(Carter, p. 67) It was awarded a prize for the best painting by a female artist at the Academy, and further exhibited in Philadelphia and New York.  Following that seminal painting, she painted over 50 portraits in the next three years with the zeal of a committed professional artist. Her invitation to serve as a juror on the hanging committee of the Academy confirmed her acceptance amongst her peers.(Carter, p. 69) In the mid-1880s, she was receiving commissions from notable Philadelphians and earning $500 per portrait, comparable to what Eakins commanded.(Carter, p. 70) When her friend Margaret Bush-Brown insisted that Les Derniers was good enough to be exhibited at the famed Salon, Beaux relented and sent the painting abroad in the care of her friend, who managed to get the painting into the exhibition.(File:Clemenceau Beaux 1920.jpg|thumb|left|200px|Clemenceau by Cecilia Beaux (1920)ParisAt 32, despite her clear success in Philadelphia, Beaux decided that she still needed to advance her skills. She left for Paris with cousin May Whitlock, forsaking several suitors and overcoming the objections of her family. There she trained at the Julian, the largest art school in Paris, and at the Colarossi, receiving weekly critiques from established masters like Robert-Fleury and Bouguereau.(Carter, p. 77) She wrote, Fleury is much less benign than Bouguereau and dont temper his severitieshe hinted of possibilities before me and as he rose said the nicest thing of all, we will do all we can to help youI want these mento know me and recognize that I can do something.(Carter, p. 82) Though advised regularly of Beauxs progress abroad and to not be worried about any indiscretions of ours, her Aunt Eliza repeatedly reminded her niece to avoid the temptations of Paris, Remember you are first of all a Christian  then a woman and last of all an Artist.(Carter, p. 84)When Beaux arrived in Paris, the Impressionists, a group of artists who had begun their own series of independent exhibitions from the official Salon in 1874, were beginning to lose their solidarity. Also known as the Independents or Intransigents, the group which at times included Degas, Monet, Sisley, Caillebotte, Pissarro, Renoir, and Morisot, had been receiving the wrath of the critics for several years. Their art, though varying in style and technique, was the antithesis of the type of Academic art that Beaux was trained in and of which her teacher William-Adolphe Bouguereau was a leading master. In the summer of 1888, with classes in summer recess, Beaux worked in the fishing village of Concarneau with the American painters Alexander Harrison and Charles Lasar. She tried applying the plein-air painting techniques used by the Impressionists to her own landscapes and portraiture, with little success.(Carter, p. 87) Unlike her predecessor Cassatt, who had arrived near the beginning of the Impressionist movement 15 years earlier and who had absorbed it, Beauxs artistic temperament, precise and true to observation, would not align with Impressionism and she remained a realist painter for the rest of her career, even as Czanne, Matisse, Gauguin, and Picasso were beginning to take art into new directions.(Carter, p. 91) Beaux mostly admired classic artists like Titian and Rembrandt. Her European training did influence her palette, however, and she adopted more white and paler coloration in her oil painting, particularly in depicting female subjects, an approach favored by Sargent as well.(.)Return to PhiladelphiaFile:SarahAlliboneLeavitt.jpg|thumb|230px|Sita and Sarita (Jeune Fille au Chat). Portrait of Sarah Allibone Leavitt, 1893&ndash;1894. Collection of the dOrsay, ParisBack in America in 1889, Beaux proceeded to paint portraits in the manner, taking as her subjects members of her sisters family as well as the elite of Philadelphia. In making her decision to devote herself to art, she also thought it was best not to marry, and in choosing male company she selected men who would not threaten to sidetrack her career.(Carter, p. 105) She resumed life with her family, and they supported her fully, acknowledging her chosen path and demanding of her little in the way of household responsibilities, I was never once asked to do an errand in town, some bit of shoppingso well did they understand.(Carter, p. 106) She developed a structured, professional routine, arriving promptly at her studio, and expected the same from her models.The five years that followed were highly productive, resulting in over forty portraits.(Carter, p. 107) In 1890 she exhibited at the Paris Exposition, obtained in 1893 the gold medal of the Art Club, and also the Dodge prize at the New York Academy of Design.(Carter, p. 108) Her portrait of The Reverend Matthew Blackburne Grier was particularly well-received, as was Sita and Sarita, a portrait of her cousin Charles W. Leavitts wife Sarah (Allibone) Leavitt in white, with a small black cat perched on her shoulder, both gazing out mysteriously. The mesmerizing effect prompted one critic to point out the witch-like weirdness of the black kitten and for many years, the painting solicited questions by the press. But the result was not pre-planned, as Beauxs sister later explained, Please make no mystery about itit was only an idea to put the black kitten on her cousins shoulder. Nothing deeper.(Carter, p. 114) Sita and Sarita eventually was donated by the artist to the collection of the dOrsay.(Tappert, p. 32) Another highly regarded portrait from that period is New England Woman (1895), a nearly all-white oil painting which was purchased by the Academy of the Fine Arts.In 1895 Beaux became the first woman to have a regular teaching position at the Pennsylvania Academy of the Fine Arts, where she instructed in portrait drawing and painting for the next twenty years.(Goodyear, p. 12) That rare type of achievement by a woman prompted one local newspaper to state, It is a legitimate source of pride to Philadelphia that one of its most cherished institutions has made this innovation. She was a popular instructor.( In 1896, Beaux returned to France to see a group of her paintings presented at the Salon. Influential French critic M. Henri Rochefort commented, I am compelled to admit, not without some chagrin, that not one of our female artistsis strong enough to compete with the lady who has given us this year the portrait of Dr. Grier.  Composition, flesh, texture, sound drawingeverything is there without affectation, and without seeking for effect.(Carter, p. 120)File:Lady George Darwin by Cecilia Beaux 1889.jpeg|thumb|right|220px|Lady George Darwin, Beauxs pastel portrait of the former Martha du Puy of Philadelphia, who married Sir Darwin. 1889New YorkBy 1900 the demand for Beauxs work brought clients from D.C. to Boston, prompting the artist to move to New York City; it was there she spent the winters, while summering at Green Alley, the home and studio she had built in Massachusetts.() Beauxs friendship with Richard Gilder, editor-in-chief of the literary magazine The Century, helped promote her career and he introduced her to the elite of society.(Carter, p. 123) Among her portraits which followed from that association are those of Clemenceau; First Lady Roosevelt and her daughter; and Admiral Sir David Beatty. She also sketched President Roosevelt during her House visits in 1902, during which He sat for two hours, talking most of the time, reciting Kipling, and reading scraps of Browning.(Carter, p. 134) Her portraits Fanny Travis Cochran, Dorothea and Francesca, and Ernesta and her Little Brother, are fine examples of her skill in painting children; Ernesta with Nurse, one of a series of essays in luminous white, was a highly original composition, seemingly without precedent.(Goodyear, p. 78) She won the Medal of the arts at the Institute of Chicago, and became a member of the National Academy in 1902.Green AlleyFile:Cecilia Beaux painting Cardinal Mercier.jpg|thumb|left|200px|Cecilia Beaux painting Mercier (ca. 1919)By 1906, Beaux began to live year-round at Green Alley, in a comfortable colony of cottages belonging to her wealthy friends and neighbors. All three aunts had died and she needed an emotional break from Philadelphia and New York. She managed to find new subjects for portraiture, working in the mornings and enjoying a leisurely life the rest of the time. She carefully regulated her energy and her activities to maintain a productive output, and considered that a key to her success. On why so few women succeeded in art as she did, she stated, Strength is the stumbling block. They (women) are sometimes unable to stand the hard work of it day in and day out.  They become tired and cannot reenergize themselves.(Carter, p. 149)While Beaux stuck to her portraits of the elite, American art was advancing into urban and social subject matter, led by artists such as Henri who espoused a totally different aesthetic, Work with great speed..Have your energies alert, up and active. Do it all in one sitting if you can.  In one minute if you can.  There is no use delayingStop studying water pitchers and bananas and paint everyday life. He advised his students, among them Hopper and Kent, to live with the common man and paint the common man, in total opposition to Cecilia Beauxs artistic methods and subjects.(Carter, p. 153) The clash of Henri and Merritt Chase (representing Beaux and the traditional art establishment) resulted in 1907 in the independent exhibition by the urban realists known as The Eight or the School. Beaux and her art friends defended the old order, and many thought (and hoped) the new movement to be a passing fad, but it turned out to be a revolutionary turn in American art.File:Howell.jpg|thumb|200px|Painting of Henry Howell (1919)In 1910, her beloved Uncle Willie died. Though devastated by the loss, at fifty-five years of age, Beaux remained highly productive. In the next five years she painted almost 25 percent of her lifetime output and received a steady stream of honors.(Carter, p. 162) She had a major exhibition of 35 paintings at the Gallery of Art in Washington, D.C. in 1912. Despite her continuing production and accolades, however, Beaux was working against the current of tastes and trends in art. The famed Armory Show of 1913 in New York City was a landmark presentation of 1,200 paintings showcasing Modernism. Beaux believed that the public, initially of mixed opinion about the new art, would ultimately reject it and return its favor to the Pre-Impressionists. But she was wrong; the art the traditionalists deemed not only incompetent, but grotesque came to dominate the 20th century.(Carter, p. 163)Beaux was crippled after breaking her hip while walking in Paris in 1924.  With her health impaired, her work output dwindled for the remainder of her life.( That same year Beaux was asked to produce a self-portrait for the Medici collection in the Uffizi Gallery in Florence.(Self Portrait, Cecilia Beaux, installation at the Uffizi Gallery, Florence, Italy, Smithsonian Archives of American Art) In 1930 she published an autobiography, Background with Figures.( Her later life was filled with honors. In 1930 she was elected a member of the Institute of Arts and Letters; in 1933 came membership in the Academy of Arts and Letters, which two years later organized the first major retrospective of her work. Also in 1933 Roosevelt honored Beaux as the American woman who had made the greatest contribution to the culture of the world.(Tappert, p. 5) In 1942 The National Institute of Arts and Letters awarded her a gold medal for lifetime achievement.Death and critical regardCecilia Beaux died at Green Alley at the age of eighty-seven, and was buried in Cynwyd, Pennsylvania. In her will she devised that a Phyfe rosewood secretaire made for her father go to her cherished nephew Cecil Kent Drinker, a Harvard physician, whom she had painted as a young boy.(Winter Antiques Show Bows in for 51st Year, R. Scudder Smith, Antiques and the Arts Online)(Cecilia Beaux at Pennsylvania Academy, Broad Street Review, April 26, 2008)Though Beaux was an individualist, comparisons to Sargent would prove inevitable, and often favorable. Her strong technique, her perceptive reading of her subjects, and her ability to flatter without falsifying, were traits similar to his. The critics are very enthusiastic. (Bernard) Berenson, Mrs. Coates tells me, stood in front of the portraits &ndash; Miss Beauxs three  and wagged his head. Ah, yes, I see! Some Sargents. The ordinary ones are signed John Sargent, the best are signed Cecilia Beaux, which is, of course, nonsense in more ways than one, but it is part of the generous chorus of praise.(Goodyear, p. 17) Though overshadowed by Cassatt and relatively unknown to museum-goers today, Beauxs craftsmanship and extraordinary output were highly regarded in her time. While presenting the Carnegie Institutes Gold Medal to Beaux in 1899, Merritt Chase stated Miss Beaux is not only the greatest living woman painter, but the best that has ever lived. Miss Beaux has done away entirely with sex gender in art.(Carter, p. 127)During her long productive life as an artist, she maintained her personal aesthetic and high standards against all distractions and countervailing forces. She constantly struggled for perfection, A perfect technique in anything, she stated in an interview, means that there has been no break in continuity between the conception and the act of performance. She summed up her driving work ethic, I can say this: When I attempt anything, I have a passionate determination to overcome every obstacleAnd I do my own work with a refusal to accept defeat that might almost be called painful.(Carter, p. 173)NotesReferences*Beaux, Cecilia. Background with Figures: Autobiography of Cecilia Beaux. Boston and New York: Houghton Mifflin, 1930.*Goodyear, Jr., Frank H., and others., Cecilia Beaux: Portrait of an Artist. Pennsylvania Academy of the Fine Arts, 1974. Library of Congress Catalog No. 74-84248*Tappert, Tara Leigh, Cecilia Beaux and the Art of Portraiture. Smithsonian Institution, 1995. ISBN 1-56098-658-1*External links*Cecilia Beaux from Online Encyclopedia*Cecilia Beaux from Smithsonian American Art Museum*Cecilia Beaux Papers from the Smithsonians Archives of American Art*Portrait of Mrs. John Wheeler Leavitt, 1885, grandmother of Cecilia Beaux, Westmoreland Museum of American Art, Greensburg, Pa., ExplorePAHistory.com*Aimee Ernesta and Eliza Cecilia: Two Sisters, Two Choices, Tara Leigh Tappert, The Pennsylvania Magazine of History and Biography, July 2000, pp. 249&ndash;291*Cecilia Beaux, American Figure Painter, Pennsylvania Academy of the Fine Arts, February 2 - April 13, 2008*Cecilia Beaux Letters, Special Collections, Boston Athenaeum*Cecilia Beauxs Contemporaries Judged Her to Be the Cats Meow; History Sees a Bit of a Chameleon, The Washington Post, March 9, 2008, washingtonpost.com*Cecilia Beaux, Americans in Paris: 1860&ndash;1900, Americans in Paris, The Metropolitan Museum*BeauxBeauxBeauxBeaux
7382
Maritimes
902The Maritime provinces, also called the Maritimes or the Canadian Maritimes, is a region of Canada consisting of the three original provinces, Brunswick, Scotia, and Edward Island which joined Confederation in 1873. On the Atlantic coast, the Maritimes are a subregion of Canada, which also includes the northeastern province of & Labrador.  The population of the Maritime provinces was 1,826,896 in 2008.()The Maritimes front the Atlantic Ocean and its various sub-basins such as the of Maine and of St. Lawrence systems.  The region is located northeast of England, southeast of Quebecs Peninsula, and southwest of the island of Newfoundland.There was talk of a Union of the three provinces to have greater political power; however, the first discussions on the subject in 1864 at the Conference led to the process of Confederation which formed the larger Dominion of Canada instead.Image:Peggys Cove Harbour 01.jpg|thumb|225px|right|Cove, Nova Scotia, an archetypal Maritime sceneright|thumb|250px|The MaritimesThe Maritimes are home to Mikmaq, Maliseet and Passamaquoddy people and have an extensive history of French and British settlement dating back to the seventeenth century, forming a unique culture that predates Canada.NameThe word maritime is an adjective that simply means of the sea, thus any land associated with the sea can be considered a maritime state or province (e.g. All the provinces of Canada except Alberta and Saskatchewan border water).  The term Maritimes has historically been collectively applied to New Brunswick, Nova Scotia and Prince Edward Island.HistoryFollowing the northerly retreat of glaciers at the end of the glaciation over ten thousand years ago, human settlement by Native Americans or Nations began in the Maritimes with Paleo-Indians during the Early Period, ending around six thousand years ago.The Middle Period, starting six thousand years ago, and ending three thousand years ago, was dominated by rising sea levels from the melting glaciers in polar regions. This is also when what is called the Laurentian tradition started among Indians, existing First Nations peoples of the time. Evidence of Archaic Indian burial mounds and other ceremonial sites existing in the St. John River valley has been uncovered.The Late Period extended from three thousand years ago until first contact with European settlers and was dominated by the organization of First Nations peoples into the Algonquian-influenced Abenaki Nation which existed largely in present-day interior Vermont, New Hampshire, and Maine, and the Mikmaq Nation which inhabited all of Nova Scotia, Prince Edward Island, eastern New Brunswick and the southern Gasp. The primarily agrarian Maliseet Nation settled throughout the St. John River and River valleys of present-day New Brunswick and Maine. The Passamaquoddy Nation inhabited the northwestern coastal regions of the present-day of Fundy. The Mikmaq Nation is also assumed to have crossed the present-day Strait at around this time to settle on the south coast of Newfoundland but were in a minority position compared to the Beothuk Nation.European contactThe Maritimes was the first area in Canada to be settled by Europeans. There is speculation that Viking explorers discovered and settled in the Vinland region around 1000 AD, which is when the aux Meadows settlement in and Labrador has been dated, and it is possible that further exploration was made into the present-day Maritimes and northeastern United States.Both Giovanni Caboto (John Cabot) and da Verrazzano are reported to have sailed in or near Maritime waters during their voyages of discovery for England and France respectively. Several Portuguese explorers/cartographers have also documented various parts of the Maritimes, namely Homem. However, it was French explorer Cartier who made the first detailed reconnaissance of the region for a European power, and in so doing, claimed the region for the King of France. Cartier was followed by nobleman Dugua, Sieur de Monts who was accompanied by explorer/cartographer de Champlain in a 1604 expedition where they established the second permanent European settlement in North America, following Spains settlement at St. Augustine. Champlains settlement at Saint Croix Island, later moved to Port-Royal, survived where the ill-fated English settlement at Roanoke did not, and pre-dated the more successful English settlement at Jamestown by three years. Champlain went on to greater fame as the founder of Frances province of Canada which comprises much of the present-day lower Lawrence River valley in the province of Quebec.AcadiaChamplains success in the region, which came to be called Acadie, led to the fertile tidal marshes surrounding the southeastern and northeastern reaches of the of Fundy being populated by French immigrants who called themselves Acadien. Acadians eventually built small settlements throughout what is today mainland Scotia and Brunswick, as well as le-Saint-Jean (Edward Island), le-Royale (Breton Island), and other shorelines of the Gulf of Lawrence in present-day Newfoundland and Labrador, and Quebec. Acadian settlements had primarily agrarian economies, although there were many early examples of Acadian fishing settlements in southwestern Nova Scotia and in le-Royale, as well as along the south and west coasts of Newfoundland, the Gasp Peninsula, and the present-day Cte-Nord region of Quebec. Most Acadian fishing activities were overshadowed by the comparatively enormous seasonal European fishing fleets based out of Newfoundland which took advantage of proximity to the Banks.The growing English colonies along the American seaboard to the south and various European wars between England and France during the 17th and 18th centuries brought Acadia to the centre of world-scale geopolitical forces. In 1613, Virginian raiders captured Royale, and in 1621 Acadia was ceded to Scotlands Sir William Alexander who renamed it Nova Scotia. By 1632, Acadia was returned from Scotland to France under the Treaty of Saint-Germain-en-Laye, and the Port Royale settlement was moved to the site of nearby present-day Annapolis Royal. More French settlers, primarily from the Vienne, Normandie, and Brittany regions of France, continued to populate the colony of Acadia during the latter part of the 17th and early part of the 18th centuries. Important settlements also began in the Beaubassin region of the present-day of Chignecto, and in the St. John River valley, and settlers began to establish communities on le-Saint-Jean and le-Royale as well.In 1654, England raiders attacked Acadian settlements on the Basin, starting a period of uncertainty for Acadians throughout the English constitutional crises under Cromwell, and only being properly resolved under the Treaty of Breda in 1667 when Frances claim to the region was reaffirmed. Colonial administration by France throughout the history of Acadia was contemptuous at best. Frances priorities were in settling and strengthening its claim on France and the exploration and settlement of interior America and the River valley.British and French controlFurther French-English conflict resulted in the Treaty of Utrecht in 1713 which saw France formally relinquish Acadia to Britain. Confusion over the boundaries between Acadia, New France, and the Commonwealth of Massachusetts left Britain in possession of what is the present-day Scotia peninsula. The early British capital of the Colony of Nova Scotia (sometimes referred to as the 14th Colony) was established at Annapolis Royal, where Anne was constructed.France still maintained control over much of present-day New Brunswick and northern Maine, le-Saint-Jean, and le-Royale. In 1719, to further protect strategic interests in the of St. Lawrence and Lawrence River, France began the 20-year construction of a large fortress at Louisbourg on le-Royale. Massachusetts was increasingly concerned over reports of the capabilities of this fortress, and of privateers staging out of its harbour to raid New England fishermen on the Grand Banks. The of the Austrian Succession saw Britain and France in conflict with each other, and in 1745 several warships and a small contingent of troops were sent from Boston, first to the Nova Scotian fishing port of Canso, and on to Louisbourg where they laid siege to the fortress until the French surrendered and were evacuated.The British returned control of le-Royale to France with the fortress virtually intact three years later under the Treaty of Aix-la-Chapelle and the French reestablished their forces there. In 1749, to counter the rising threat of Louisbourg, Halifax was founded and the Navy established a major naval base and citadel. The Seven Years War File:A View of the Plundering and Burning of the City of Grymross, by Thomas Davies, 1758.JPG|300px|thumb |right|John River Campaign: Raid on Grimrose (present day New Brunswick). This is the only contemporaneous image of the of the Acadians The forth and final colonial war was the Seven Years War. During the war, military conflicts in Nova Scotia included: of Fort Beausjour; of Fundy Campaign (1755); the of Petitcodiac; the Raid on Lunenburg (1756); the Expedition (1757); of Bloody Creek (1757); of Louisbourg (1758), River Campaign, of St. Lawrence Campaign (1758), John River Campaign, and of Restigouche.File:British burninng warship Prudent and capturing Bienfaisant. Siege of Louisbourg 1758. Maritime Museum of the Atlantic, M55.7.1.jpg|300px|thumb|left|of Louisbourg (1758)The British Conquest of Acadia happened in 1710. Over the next forty-five years the Acadians refused to sign an unconditional oath of allegiance to Britain. During this time period Acadians participated in various militia operations against the British and maintained vital supply lines to the French Fortress of Louisbourg and Fort Beausejour.(John Grenier, Far Reaches of Empire: War in Nova Scotia 1710-1760. Oklahoma Press. 2008) During the Seven Years War, the British sought to neutralize any military threat Acadians posed and to interrupt the vital supply lines Acadians provided to Louisbourg by deporting Acadians from Acadia.(Stephen E. Patterson. Indian-White Relations in Nova Scotia, 1749-61: A Study in Political Interaction. Buckner, P, Campbell, G. and Frank, D. (eds). The Acadiensis Reader Vol 1: Atlantic Canada Before Confederation. 1998. pp.105-106.; Also see Stephen Patterson, Colonial Wars and Aboriginal Peoples, p. 144.)The British began the of the Acadians with the of Fundy Campaign (1755).  Over the next nine years over 12,000 Acadians were removed from Nova Scotia.(Ronnie-Gilles LeBlanc (2005). Du Grand Drangement  la Dportation: Nouvelles Perspectives Historiques, Moncton: Universit de Moncton, 465 pages ISBN 1897214022 (book in French and English). The Acadians were scattered across the Atlantic, in the Thirteen Colonies, Louisiana, Quebec, Britain and France. (See Jean-Franois Mouhot (2009) Les Rfugis acadiens en France (1758-1785): LImpossible Rintgration?, Quebec, Septentrion, 456 p. ISBN 2894485131; Ernest Martin (1936) Les Exils Acadiens en France et leur tablissement dans le Poitou, Paris, Hachette, 1936). Very few eventually returned to Nova Scotia (See John Mack Faragher (2005). A Great and Noble Scheme: The Tragic Story of the Expulsion of the French Acadians from their American Homeland, New York: W.W. Norton, 562 pages ISBN 0-393-05135-8 online excerpt).)In 1758, the fortress of Louisbourg was laid siege for a second time within 15 years, this time by more than 27,000 British soldiers and sailors with over 150 warships. After the French surrender, Louisbourg was thoroughly destroyed by British engineers to ensure it would never be reclaimed. With the fall of Louisbourg, French resistance in the region crumbled. British forces seized remaining French control over Acadia in the coming months, with le-Saint-Jean falling in 1759 to British forces on their way to Quebec City for the Siege of Quebec and ensuing Battle of the Plains of Abraham.The war ended and Britain had gained control over the entire Maritime region.American RevolutionFollowing the Years War, empty Acadian lands were settled first by England Planters and then by immigrants brought from Yorkshire. le-Royale was renamed to Cape Breton Island and incorporated into the Colony of Nova Scotia.Both the colonies of Nova Scotia (present-day Nova Scotia and New Brunswick) and St. Johns Island (Prince Edward Island) were affected by the Revolutionary War, largely by privateering against American shipping, but several coastal communities were also the targets of American raiders. Charlottetown, the capital of the new colony of St. Johns Island, was ransacked in 1775 with the provincial secretary kidnapped and the Great Seal stolen. The largest military action in the Maritimes during the revolutionary war was the attack on Fort Cumberland (the renamed Beausejour) in 1776 by a force of American sympathizers led by Eddy. The fort was partially overrun after a month-long siege, but the attackers were ultimately repelled after the arrival of British reinforcements from Halifax.The most significant impact from this war was the settling of large numbers of Loyalist refugees in the region, especially in Shelburne and Parrtown (Saint John). Following the Treaty of Paris in 1783, Loyalist settlers in what would become New Brunswick persuaded British administrators to split the Colony of Nova Scotia to create the new colony of New Brunswick in 1784. At the same time, another part of the Colony of Nova Scotia, Cape Breton Island, was split off to become the Colony of Cape Breton Island.The Colony of St. Johns Island was renamed to Edward Island on November 29, 1798.The of 1812 had some affect on the shipping industry in the Maritime colonies of New Brunswick, Nova Scotia, Prince Edward Island, and Cape Breton Island; however, the significant Navy presence in Halifax and other ports in the region prevented any serious attempts by American raiders. Maritime and American privateers targeted unprotected shipping of both the United States and Britain respectively, further reducing trade. The American border with New Brunswick did not have any significant action during this conflict, although British forces did occupy a portion of coastal Maine at one point. The most significant incident from this war which occurred in the Maritimes was the British capture and detention of the American frigate USS Chesapeake in Halifax.19th centuryIn 1820, the Colony of Breton Island was merged back into the Colony of Nova Scotia for the second time by the British government.British settlement of the Maritimes, as the colonies of Nova Scotia, New Brunswick and Prince Edward Island came to be known, accelerated throughout the late 18th century and into the 19th century with significant immigration to the region as a result of Scottish migrants displaced by the Clearances and Irish escaping the Great Irish Famine (1845-1849). As a result, significant portions of the three provinces are influenced by Celtic heritages, with Scottish Gaelic having been widely spoken, particularly in Cape Breton, although it is less prevalent today.During the Civil War, some Maritimers emigrated to the United States to volunteer for the armies of the Union or the Confederacy. However, the majority of the conflicts impact was felt in the shipping industry since diplomatic tensions between Britain and the Unionist North had deteriorated after Britain expressed support for the secessionist Confederate South. The Union navy, although much smaller than the Royal Navy, did posture off Maritime coasts at times. Although an amphibious invasion was never in question, blockading by Union naval forces was common, particularly at Halifax, where Confederate navy ships sought refuge and reprovisioning.The immense size of the Union army (the largest on the planet toward the end of the Civil War), however, was viewed with increasing concern by Maritimers throughout the early 1860s. Another concern was the rising threat of Fenian raids on border communities in Brunswick by those seeking to end British rule of Ireland. This combination of events, coupled with an ongoing decline in British military and economic support to the region as the Home Office favoured newer colonial endeavours in Africa and elsewhere, led to a call among Maritime politicians for a conference on Union, to be held in early September, 1864 in Charlottetown - chosen in part because of Prince Edward Islands reluctance to give up its jurisdictional sovereignty in favour of uniting with New Brunswick and Nova Scotia into a single colony. New Brunswick and Nova Scotia felt that if the union conference were held in Charlottetown, they might be able to convince Island politicians to support the proposal.The Conference, as it came to be called, was also attended by a slew of visiting delegates from the neighbouring colony of Canada, who had largely arrived at their own invitation with their own agenda. This agenda saw the conference dominated by discussions of creating an even larger union of the entire territory of North America into a united colony. The Charlottetown Conference ended with an agreement to meet the following month in City, where more formal discussions ensued, culminating with meetings in London and the signing of the North America Act. Of the Maritime provinces, only Nova Scotia and New Brunswick were initially party to the BNA Act, Prince Edward Islands reluctance, combined with a booming agricultural and fishing export economy having led to that colony opting not to sign on.Major communitiesThe major communities of the region include Halifax and Sydney in Nova Scotia, Saint John, Fredericton and Moncton in New Brunswick, and Charlottetown in Prince Edward Island.Society and culturethumb|Map showing the mother tongue of people in the Maritimes. Red represents areas with a majority of Anglophones and less that 33% Francophones, Orange, a majority of Anglophones and more than 33% Francophones. Blue shows a Francophone majority with less than 33% Anglophones and green a Francophone majority with more than 33% Anglophones.thumb|250px||right|Halifax skyline from Dartmouth, Nova ScotiaMaritime society is based upon a mixture of traditions and class backgrounds. Predominantly rural until recent decades, the region traces many of its cultural activities to those rural resource-based economies of fishing, agriculture, forestry, and mining.While Maritimers are predominantly of west European heritage (Scottish, Irish, English, and Acadian), immigration to Cape Breton during the heyday of coal mining and steel manufacturing brought people from eastern Europe as well as from Newfoundland. The Maritimes also have a black population who are cultural descendants of The West Indies or are former American runaway slaves and loyalists, largely concentrated in Nova Scotia but also in various communities throughout southern New Brunswick, Cape Breton, and Prince Edward Island. The Mikmaq Nations reserves throughout Nova Scotia, Prince Edward Island and eastern New Brunswick dominate aboriginal culture in the region, compared to the much smaller population of the Maliseet Nation in western New Brunswick.thumb|300px|left|Skyline of Saint John, New Brunswick as of Summer 2002Cultural activities are fairly diverse throughout the region, with the music, dance, theatre, and literary art forms tending to follow the particular cultural heritage of specific locales. Notable Nova Scotian folklorist and cultural historian Creighton spent the majority of her lifetime recording the various musical and folk traditions of rural Nova Scotia during the mid-20th century, prior to this knowledge being wiped out by mass media assimilation with the rest of North America. A fragment of culture remains in Nova Scotia but primarily on Cape Breton Island.thumb|left|Skyline of Moncton, New Brunswick|300pxCanada has witnessed a Celtic revival in which many Maritime musicians and songs have risen to prominence in recent decades. Some companies, particularly breweries such as Keiths and Moosehead have played up a connection between folklore with alcohol consumption during their marketing campaigns. The Maritimes were among the strongest supporters of prohibition (Prince Edward Island lasting until 1949), and some predominantly rural communities maintain dry status, banning the retail sale of alcohol to this day as a vestige of the original temperance movement in the region.EconomyPresent statusthumb|250px|right|Fredericton City HallGiven the small population of the region (compared with the Central Canadian provinces or the New England states), the regional economy is a net exporter of natural resources, manufactured goods, and services. The regional economy has long been tied to natural resources such as fishing, logging, farming, and mining activities. Significant industrialisation in second half of the 19th century brought steel to Nova Scotia, and subsequent creation of a widespread industrial base to take advantage of the regions large underground coal deposits. After Confederation, however, this industrial base withered with technological change, and trading links to Europe and the U.S. were reduced in favour of those with Ontario and Quebec. In recent years, however, the Maritime regional economy has begun increased contributions from manufacturing again and the steady transition to a service economy.Important manufacturing centres in the region include Pictou County, Truro, the Valley and the South Shore, and the of Canso area in Nova Scotia, as well as Summerside in Prince Edward Island, and the Miramichi area, the North Shore and the upper Saint John River valley of New Brunswick.Some predominantly coastal areas have become major tourist centres, such as parts of Prince Edward Island, Cape Breton Island, the South Shore of Nova Scotia and the of St. Lawrence and of Fundy coasts of New Brunswick. Additional service-related industries in technology, pharmaceuticals, insurance and financial sectors&mdash;as well as research-related spin-offs from the regions numerous universities and colleges&mdash;are significant economic contributors.Another important contribution to Nova Scotias provincial economy is through spin-offs and royalties relating to off-shore petroleum exploration and development. Mostly concentrated on the continental shelf of the provinces Atlantic coast in the vicinity of Sable Island, exploration activities began in the 1960s and resulted in the first commercial production field for oil beginning in the 1980s. gas was also discovered in the 1980s during exploration work, and this is being commercially recovered, beginning in the late 1990s. Initial optimism in Nova Scotia about the potential of off-shore resources appears to have diminished with the lack of new discoveries, although exploration work continues and is moving farther off-shore into waters on the margin.Image:Charlottetown quay.JPG|thumb|250px|left|Peakes Quay on the Charlottetown waterfrontRegional transportation networks have also changed significantly in recent decades with port modernizations, with new expressways and ongoing arterial highway construction, the abandonment of various low-capacity railway branchlines (including the entire railway system of Prince Edward Island and southwestern Nova Scotia), and the construction of the Causeway and the Bridge. There have been airport improvements at various centres providing improved connections to markets and destinations in the rest of North America and overseas.Improvements in infrastructure and the regional economy notwithstanding, the three provinces remain one of the poorer regions of Canada. While urban areas are growing and thriving, economic adjustments have been harsh in rural and resource-dependent communities, and emigration has been an ongoing phenomenon for some parts of the region. Another problem is seen in the lower average wages and family incomes within the region. Property values are depressed, resulting in a smaller tax base for these three provinces, particularly when compared with the national average which benefits from central and western Canadian economic growth.This has been particularly problematic with the growth of the state in Canada since the 1950s, resulting in the need to draw upon payments to provide nationally-mandated social services. Since the 1990s the region has experienced an exceptionally tumultuous period in its regional economy with the collapse of large portions of the ground fishery throughout Atlantic Canada, the closing of coal mines and a steel mill on Breton Island, and the closure of military bases in all three provinces.HistoricalGrowthImage:CharlottetownConference1864.jpg|thumb|right|Delegates of the Conference on the steps of Government HouseWhile the economic underperformance of the Maritime economy has been long lasting, it has not always been present. The mid-19th century, especially the 1850s and 1860s, has long been seen as a Golden Age in the Maritimes. Growth was strong, and the region had one of North Americas most extensive manufacturing sectors. The question of why the Maritimes fell from being a centre of Canadian manufacturing to being an economic hinterland is thus a central one to the study of the regions pecuniary difficulties. The period in which the decline occurred had a great many potential culprits. In 1867 Nova Scotia and New Brunswick merged with the Canadas in Confederation, with Prince Edward Island joining them six years later in 1873. Canada was formed only a year after trade with the United States (in the form of the Reciprocity Agreement) had ended. In the 1870s A. Macdonalds Policy was implemented, creating a system of protective tariffs around the new nation. Throughout the period there was also significant technological change both in the production and transportation of goods.DeclineThe cause of economic malaise in the Maritimes is an issue of great debate and controversy among historians, economists, and geographers. The differing opinions can approximately be divided into the structuralists, who argue that poor policy decisions are to blame, and the others, who argue that unavoidable technological and geographical factors caused the decline.magnate Sir Samuel CunardThe exact date that the Maritimes began to fall behind the rest of Canada is difficult to determine. Historian Kris Inwood places the date very early, at least in Nova Scotia, finding clear signs that the Maritimes Golden Age of the mid-nineteenth century was over by 1870, before Confederation or the National Policy could have had any significant impact. Richard Caves places the date closer to 1885. T.W. Acheson takes a similar view and provides considerable evidence that the early 1880s were in fact a booming period in Nova Scotia and this growth was only undermined towards the end of that decade. David Alexander argues that any earlier declines were simply part of the global Depression, and that the Maritimes first fell behind the rest of Canada when the great boom period of the early twentieth century had little effect on the region. E.R. Forbes, however, emphasizes that the precipitous decline did not occur until after the First World War during the 1920s when new railway policies were implemented. Forbes also contends that significant Canadian defence spending during the Second World War favoured powerful political interests in Central Canada such as Howe, when major Maritime shipyards and factories, as well as Canadas largest steel mill, located in Cape Breton Island, fared poorly.N.S 1910.jpg|thumb|250px|right|Yarmouth in 1910One of the most important changes, and one that almost certainly had an effect, was the revolution in transportation that occurred at this time. The Maritimes were connected to central Canada by the Railway in the 1870s, removing a longstanding barrier to trade. For the first time this placed the Maritime manufacturers in direct competition with those of Central Canada. Maritime trading patterns shifted considerably from mainly trading with England, Britain, and the Caribbean, to being focused on commerce with the Canadian interior, enforced by the federal governments tariff policies.Simultaneous with the construction of railways in the region, the age of the wooden sailing ship began to come to an end, being replaced by larger and faster steel ships. The Maritimes had long been a centre for shipbuilding, and this industry was hurt by the change. The larger ships were also less likely to call on the smaller population centres such as Saint John and Halifax, preferring to travel to cities like New York and Montreal. Even the Line, founded by Haligonian Cunard, stopped making more than a single ceremonial voyage to Halifax each year.More controversial than the role of technology is the argument over the role of politics in the origins of the regions decline. Confederation and the tariff and railway freight policies that followed have often been blamed for having a deleterious effect on the Maritime economies. Arguments have been made that the Maritimes poverty was caused by control over policy by Central Canada which used the national structures for its own enrichment. This was the central view of the Rights Movement of the 1920s, which advocated greater local control over the regions finances. T.W. Acheson is one of the main proponents of this theory. He notes the growth that was occurring during the early years of the National Policy in Nova Scotia demonstrates how the effects of railway fares and the tariff structure helped undermine this growth. Capitalists from Central Canada purchased the factories and industries of the Maritimes from their bankrupt local owners and proceeded to close down many of them, consolidating the industry in Central Canada.thumb|250px|left|Princess and Water Street in Saint JohnThe policies in the early years of Confederation were designed by Central Canadian interests, and they reflected the needs of that region. The unified Canadian market and the introduction of railroads created a relative weakness in the Maritime economies. Central to this concept, according to Acheson, was the lack of metropolises in the Maritimes.Montreal and Toronto were well suited to benefit from the development of large-scale manufacturing and extensive railway systems in Quebec and Ontario, these being the goals of the Macdonald and Laurier governments. In the Maritimes the situation was very different. Today New Brunswick has several mid-sized centres in Saint John, Moncton, and Fredericton but no significant population centre. Nova Scotia has a growing metropolitan area surrounding Halifax, but a contracting population in industrial Cape Breton, and several smaller centres in Bridgewater, Kentville, Yarmouth, and Pictou County. Prince Edward Islands only significant population centres are in Charlottetown and Summerside. During the late 19th and early 20th centuries, just the opposite was the case with little to no population concentration in major industrial centres as the predominantly rural resource-dependent Maritime economy continued on the same path as it had since European settlement on the regions shores.Despite the regions absence of economic growth on the same scale as other parts of the nation, the Maritimes has changed markedly throughout the 20th century, partly as a result of global and national economic trends, and partly as a result of government intervention. Each sub-region within the Maritimes has developed over time to exploit different resources and expertise. Saint John became a centre of the timber trade and shipbuilding and is currently a centre for oil refining and some manufacturing. The northern New Brunswick communities of Edmundston, Campbellton, Dalhousie, Bathurst, and Miramichi are focused on the pulp and paper industry and some mining activity. Moncton was a centre for railways and has changed its focus to becoming a multi-modal transportation centre with associated manufacturing and retail interests. The Halifax metropolitan area has come to dominate peninsular Nova Scotia as a retail and service centre, but that provinces industries were spread out from the coal and steel industries of industrial Cape Breton and Pictou counties, the mixed farming of the North Shore and Annapolis Valley, and the fishing industry was primarily focused on the South Shore and Eastern Shore. Prince Edward Island is largely dominated by farming, fishing, and tourism.Given the geographic diversity of the various sub-regions within the Maritimes, policies to centralize the population and economy were not initially successful, thus Maritime factories closed while those in Ontario and Quebec prospered.The traditional thesis, advocated by scholars such as S.A. Saunders, looks at the resource endowments of the Maritimes and argues that it was the decline of the traditional industries of shipbuilding and fishing that led to Maritime poverty, since these processes were rooted in geography, and thus all but inevitable. Kris Inwood has revived the staples approach and looks at a number of geographic weaknesses relative to Central Canada. He repeats Achesons argument that the region lacks major urban centres, but adds that the Maritimes were also lacking the great rivers that led to the cheap and abundant power, key to Quebec and Ontarios urban and manufacturing development, that the extraction costs of Maritime resources were higher (particularly in the case of Cape Breton coal), and that the soils of the region were poorer and thus the agricultural sector weaker.The Maritimes are the only provinces in Canada which entered Confederation in the 19th century and have kept their original colonial boundaries. All three provinces have the smallest land base in the country and have been forced to make do with resources within. By comparison, the former colony of the Province of Canada (divided into the District of East, and the District of West) and the western provinces were dozens of times larger and in some cases were expanded to take in territory formerly held in British Crown grants to companies such as the Bay Company; in particular the November 19, 1869 sale of Land to the Government of Canada under the Land Act 1868 was facilitated in part by Maritime taxpayers.  The economic riches of energy and natural resources held within this larger land base were only realized by other provinces during the 20th century.One comparison made with the wealthier areas of Canada is that of the regions political and/or work culture. Today few academics make such a claim, but it still a common explanation in other circles. Some writers have also alleged that Maritime business people were unwilling to take risks or invest in manufacturing, a thesis Acheson devotes much attention to debunking.In recent years theory has been used to examine the situation of the Maritimes, and while it rejects most traditional economic models it does correspond with the evidence.PoliticsMaritime conservatism since the Second World War has been very much part of the Tory tradition, key influences being former of Nova Scotia and federal Progressive Conservative Party leader Stanfield and New Brunswick Tory strategist Camp.In recent years, the social democratic Democratic Party (NDP) has made significant inroads both federally and provincially in the region. The NDP has elected Members of Parliament (MPs) from New Brunswick, but most of the focus of the party at the federal and provincial levels is currently in the Halifax area of Nova Scotia. Industrial Cape Breton has historically been a region of labour activism, electing Commonwealth Federation (and later NDP) MPs, and even produced many early members of the Party of Canada in the pre-War II era. In the 2004 federal election, the NDP captured 28.45% of the vote in Nova Scotia, more than any other province.  In the 2009 provincial election the NDP formed a majority government, the first in the region.The Maritimes are generally socially conservative but unlike Alberta, they also have fiscally socialist tendencies. It is because of the lack of support for conservatism that federal parties such as the Alliance never had much success in the region, and the level of support for the new Party of Canada in the region is uncertain. In the 2004 federal election, the Conservatives had one of the worst showings in the region for a right-wing party, going back to Confederation, with the possible exception of the 1993 election.An area within the region where both fiscal and social conservatism do coincide and where the federal Reform Party and Canadian Alliance have met success is in the central-western part of New Brunswick, in the St. John River valley north of Saint John and south of Grand Falls. Contributing demographics include a predominantly Anglophone population residing in a largely rural agrarian setting. One influence might be proximity to the International Boundary and the state of Maine. The valley is also settled by descendants of Empire Loyalists, some of whom established fundamentalist Christian congregations in the area which continue to influence certain segments of society. There are also a large number of active and retired military personnel located in the Fredericton and Oromocto area as a result of the large military base at Gagetown. Another area in the region with smatterings of coinciding fiscal and social conservatism is the Valley of Nova Scotia.The Party of Canada has done well in the Maritimes in the past because of its interventionist policies. The Acadian Peninsula region of New Brunswick, long dependent upon seasonal employment in the of St. Lawrence fishery, tends to vote for the Liberals or NDP for this reason. In the 1997 federal election, Prime Minister Chrtiens Liberals endured a bitter defeat to the PCs and NDP in many ridings as a result of unpopular cuts to benefits for seasonal workers, as well as closures of several Forces Bases, the refusal to honour a promise to rescind the Goods and Services Tax, cutbacks to provincial payments, care, education and regional transportation infrastructure such as airports, fishing harbours, seaports, and railways. The Liberals held onto seats in Prince Edward Island and New Brunswick, while being shut out of Nova Scotia entirely, the second time in history (the only other time being the Diefenbaker sweep).The Maritimes is currently represented in the Canadian Parliament by 25 Members of the House of Commons (Nova Scotia - 11, New Brunswick - 10, Prince Edward Island - 4) and 24 Senators (Nova Scotia and New Brunswick - 10 each, Prince Edward Island - 4). This level of representation was established at the time of Confederation when the Maritimes had a much larger proportion of the national population. The comparatively large population growth of western and central Canada during the immigration boom of the 20th century has reduced the Maritimes proportion of the national population to less than 10%, resulting in an over-representation in Parliament, with some federal ridings having fewer than 35,000 people, compared to central and western Canada where ridings typically contain 100,000-120,000 people.The Senate is structured along regional lines, giving an equal number of seats (24) to the Maritimes, Ontario, Quebec, and western Canada, in addition to the later entry of Newfoundland and Labrador, as well as the three territories. Enshrined in the Constitution, this model was developed to ensure that no area of the country is able to exert undue influence in the Senate. The Maritimes, with its much smaller proportion of the national population (compared to the time of Confederation) also have an over-representation in the Senate, particularly compared to the population growth of Ontario and the western provinces. This has led to calls to reform the Senate; however, such a move would entail constitutional changes.Another factor related to the number of Senate seats is that a constitutional amendment in the early 20th century mandated that no province can have fewer Members of Parliament than it has senators. This court decision resulted from a complaint by the Government of Prince Edward Island after that provinces number of MPs was proposed to change from 4 to 3, accounting for its declining proportion of the national population at that time. When PEI entered Confederation in 1873, it was accorded 6 MPs and 4 Senators; however this was reduced to 4 MPs by the early twentieth century. Senators being appointed for life at this time, these coveted seats rarely went unfilled for a long period of time anywhere in Canada. As a result, PEIs challenge was accepted by the federal government, and its level of federal representation was secured. In the aftermath of the 1989 budget, which saw a fillibuster by Liberal Senators in attempt to kill legislation creating the Goods and Services Tax, Prime Minister Mulroney stacked the Senate by creating additional seats in several provinces across Canada, including New Brunswick; however, there was no attempt by these provinces to increase the number of MPs to reflect this change in Senate representation.See also*Canada*Canada*of regions of Canada*Film Classification Board*UnionReferencesExternal links*The Maritime Provinces, the Maritime Rights Movement and Canadian Federalism*Weather, travel, newspapers and radio links*Atlantic Provinces Economic Council*Atlantic Institute of Market Studies*Genuine Progress Indicator Atlantic*Atlantic Provinces Communities: Towns & Cities. Basic Information, Facts, Figures, Pictures*Atlantic Canada Portal/Portail du Canada Atlantique*Maritime Series - The State of the Regions.  From the Canadian Institute for Research on Public Policy and Public Administrationmartimes del Canadprovinciede:Seeprovinzenmartimas de CanadmaritimesMaritimesmarittimetartomnyokmartimas do Canadsv:Kustprovinserna
7955
DNA
File:DNA Structure+Key+Labelled.pn NoBB.png|thumb|right|340px|The structure of the DNA helix. The atoms in the structure are colour coded by element and the detailed structure of two base pairs is shown in the bottom right.File:ADN animation.gif|thumb|The structure of part of a DNA helixDeoxyribonucleic acid (; DNA) is a acid that contains the genetic instructions used in the development and functioning of all known living organisms (with the exception of viruses). The DNA segments that carry this genetic information are called genes, but other DNA sequences have structural purposes, or are involved in regulating the use of this genetic information. Along with RNA and proteins, DNA is one of the three major macromolecules that are essential for all known forms of life. DNA consists of two long polymers of simple units called nucleotides, with backbones made of sugars and phosphate groups joined by ester bonds. These two strands run in opposite directions to each other and are therefore anti-parallel. Attached to each sugar is one of four types of molecules called nucleobases (informally, bases). It is the sequence of these four nucleobases along the backbone that encodes information. This information is read using the code, which specifies the sequence of the acids within proteins. The code is read by copying stretches of DNA into the related nucleic acid RNA in a process called transcription.Within cells DNA is organized into long structures called chromosomes. During division these chromosomes are duplicated in the process of replication, providing each cell its own complete set of chromosomes. Eukaryotic organisms (animals, plants, fungi, and protists) store most of their DNA inside the nucleus and some of their DNA in organelles, such as mitochondria or chloroplasts.() In contrast, prokaryotes (bacteria and archaea) store their DNA only in the cytoplasm. Within the chromosomes, chromatin proteins such as histones compact and organize DNA. These compact structures guide the interactions between DNA and other proteins, helping control which parts of the DNA are transcribed.PropertiesFile:DNA chemical structure.svg|thumb|300px|Chemical structure of DNA. bonds shown as dotted lines.DNA is a long polymer made from repeating units called nucleotides.()()( pp. 1415.) As first discovered by D. Watson and Crick, the structure of DNA of all species comprises two helical chains each coiled round the same axis, and each with a pitch of 34 ngstrms (3.4 nanometres) and a radius of 10 ngstrms (1.0 nanometres).() According to another study, when measured in a particular solution, the DNA chain measured 22 to 26 ngstrms wide (2.2 to 2.6 nanometres), and one nucleotide unit measured 3.3  (0.33 nm) long.() Although each individual repeating unit is very small, DNA polymers can be very large molecules containing millions of nucleotides. For instance, the largest chromosome, chromosome number 1, is approximately 220 million pairs long.()In living organisms DNA does not usually exist as a single molecule, but instead as a pair of molecules that are held tightly together.()(Berg J., Tymoczko J. and Stryer L. (2002) Biochemistry. W. H. Freeman and Company ISBN 0-7167-4955-6) These two long strands entwine like vines, in the shape of a helix. The nucleotide repeats contain both the segment of the backbone of the molecule, which holds the chain together, and a nucleobase, which interacts with the other DNA strand in the helix. A nucleobase linked to a sugar is called a nucleoside and a base linked to a sugar and one or more phosphate groups is called a nucleotide. Polymers comprising multiple linked nucleotides (as in DNA) is called a polynucleotide.(Abbreviations and Symbols for Nucleic Acids, Polynucleotides and their Constituents IUPAC-IUB Commission on Biochemical Nomenclature (CBN). Retrieved 03 January 2006.)The backbone of the DNA strand is made from alternating phosphate and sugar residues.() The sugar in DNA is 2-deoxyribose, which is a pentose (five-carbon) sugar. The sugars are joined together by phosphate groups that form bonds between the third and fifth carbon atoms of adjacent sugar rings. These asymmetric bonds mean a strand of DNA has a direction. In a double helix the direction of the nucleotides in one strand is opposite to their direction in the other strand: the strands are antiparallel. The asymmetric ends of DNA strands are called the 5 (five prime) and 3 (three prime) ends, with the 5 end having a terminal phosphate group and the 3 end a terminal hydroxyl group. One major difference between DNA and RNA is the sugar, with the 2-deoxyribose in DNA being replaced by the alternative pentose sugar ribose in RNA.(File:DNA orbit animated static thumb.png|thumb|upright|A section of DNA. The bases lie horizontally between the two spiraling strands.(Created from PDB 1D65) Animated version at orbit animated.gif.The DNA double helix is stabilized primarily by two forces: bonds between nucleotides and base-stacking interactions among the aromatic nucleobases.() In the aqueous environment of the cell, the conjugated  bonds of nucleotide bases align perpendicular to the axis of the DNA molecule, minimizing their interaction with the shell and therefore, the free energy.  The four bases found in DNA are adenine (abbreviated A), cytosine (C), guanine (G) and thymine (T). These four bases are attached to the sugar/phosphate to form the complete nucleotide, as shown for monophosphate.The nucleobases are classified into two types: the purines, A and G, being fused five- and six-membered compounds, and the pyrimidines, the six-membered rings C and T.( A fifth pyrimidine nucleobase, uracil (U), usually takes the place of thymine in RNA and differs from thymine by lacking a group on its ring. Uracil is not usually found in DNA, occurring only as a breakdown product of cytosine. In addition to RNA and DNA a large number of artificial acid analogues have also been created to study the proprieties of nucleic acids, or for use in biotechnology.()and minor grooves of DNA. Minor groove is a binding site for the dye Hoechst 33258.GroovesTwin helical strands form the DNA backbone. Another double helix may be found by tracing the spaces, or grooves, between the strands. These voids are adjacent to the base pairs and may provide a site. As the strands are not directly opposite each other, the grooves are unequally sized. One groove, the major groove, is 22  wide and the other, the minor groove, is 12  wide.() The narrowness of the minor groove means that the edges of the bases are more accessible in the major groove. As a result, proteins like factors that can bind to specific sequences in double-stranded DNA usually make contacts to the sides of the bases exposed in the major groove.() This situation varies in unusual conformations of DNA within the cell (see below), but the major and minor grooves are always named to reflect the differences in size that would be seen if the DNA is twisted back into the ordinary B form.Base pairingIn a DNA double helix, each type of nucleobase on one strand normally interacts with just one type of nucleobase on the other strand. This is called complementary pairing. Here, purines form bonds to pyrimidines, with A bonding only to T, and C bonding only to G. This arrangement of two nucleotides binding together across the double helix is called a base pair. As hydrogen bonds are not covalent, they can be broken and rejoined relatively easily. The two strands of DNA in a double helix can therefore be pulled apart like a zipper, either by a mechanical force or high temperature.() As a result of this complementarity, all the information in the double-stranded sequence of a DNA helix is duplicated on each strand, which is vital in DNA replication. Indeed, this reversible and specific interaction between complementary base pairs is critical for all the functions of DNA in living organisms.(Top, a GC base pair with three bonds. Bottom, an AT base pair with two hydrogen bonds. Non-covalent hydrogen bonds between the pairs are shown as dashed lines.The two types of base pairs form different numbers of hydrogen bonds, AT forming two hydrogen bonds, and GC forming three hydrogen bonds (see figures, left).DNA with high GC-content is more stable than DNA with low GC-content. Although it is often stated that this is due to the added stability of an additional hydrogen bond, this is incorrect. DNA with high GC-content is more stable due to intra-strand base stacking interactions.As noted above, most DNA molecules are actually two polymer strands, bound together in a helical fashion by noncovalent bonds; this double stranded structure (dsDNA) is maintained largely by the intrastrand base stacking interactions, which are strongest for G,C stacks. The two strands can come apart - a process known as melting - to form two ss DNA molecules. Melting occurs when conditions favor ssDNA; such conditions are high temperature, low salt and high pH (low pH also melts DNA, but since DNA is unstable due to acid depurination, low pH is rarely used).The stability of the dsDNA form depends not only on the GC-content (% G,C basepairs) but also on sequence (since stacking is sequence specific) and also length (longer molecules are more stable). The stability can be measured in various ways; a common way is the melting temperature, which is the temperature at which 50% of the ds molecules are converted to ss molecules; melting temperature is dependent on ionic strength and the concentration of DNA.As a result, it is both the percentage of GC base pairs and the overall length of a DNA double helix that determine the strength of the association between the two strands of DNA. Long DNA helices with a high GC-content have stronger-interacting strands, while short helices with high AT content have weaker-interacting strands.() In biology, parts of the DNA double helix that need to separate easily, such as the TATAAT box in some promoters, tend to have a high AT content, making the strands easier to pull apart.()In the laboratory, the strength of this interaction can be measured by finding the temperature required to break the hydrogen bonds, their melting temperature (also called Tm value). When all the base pairs in a DNA double helix melt, the strands separate and exist in solution as two entirely independent molecules. These single-stranded DNA molecules (ssDNA) have no single common shape, but some conformations are more stable than others.()Sense and antisenseA DNA sequence is called sense if its sequence is the same as that of a RNA copy that is translated into protein.(Designation of the two strands of DNA JCBN/NC-IUB Newsletter 1989, Accessed 07 May 2008) The sequence on the opposite strand is called the antisense sequence. Both sense and antisense sequences can exist on different parts of the same strand of DNA (i.e. both strands contain both sense and antisense sequences). In both prokaryotes and eukaryotes, antisense RNA sequences are produced, but the functions of these RNAs are not entirely clear.() One proposal is that antisense RNAs are involved in regulating expression through RNA-RNA base pairing.()A few DNA sequences in prokaryotes and eukaryotes, and more in plasmids and viruses, blur the distinction between sense and antisense strands by having overlapping genes.() In these cases, some DNA sequences do double duty, encoding one protein when read along one strand, and a second protein when read in the opposite direction along the other strand. In bacteria, this overlap may be involved in the regulation of gene transcription,() while in viruses, overlapping genes increase the amount of information that can be encoded within the small viral genome.()SupercoilingDNA can be twisted like a rope in a process called supercoiling. With DNA in its relaxed state, a strand usually circles the axis of the double helix once every 10.4 base pairs, but if the DNA is twisted the strands become more tightly or more loosely wound.() If the DNA is twisted in the direction of the helix, this is positive supercoiling, and the bases are held more tightly together. If they are twisted in the opposite direction, this is negative supercoiling, and the bases come apart more easily. In nature, most DNA has slight negative supercoiling that is introduced by enzymes called topoisomerases.() These enzymes are also needed to relieve the twisting stresses introduced into DNA strands during processes such as transcription and replication.()Alternate DNA structuresDNA exists in many possible conformations that include A-DNA, B-DNA, and Z-DNA forms, although, only B-DNA and Z-DNA have been directly observed in functional organisms.( The conformation that DNA adopts depends on the hydration level, DNA sequence, the amount and direction of supercoiling, chemical modifications of the bases, the type and concentration of metal ions, as well as the presence of polyamines in solution.()The first published reports of A-DNA X-ray diffraction patterns and also B-DNA used analyses based on Patterson transforms that provided only a limited amount of structural information for oriented fibers of DNA.()() An alternate analysis was then proposed by Wilkins et al., in 1953, for the in vivo B-DNA X-ray diffraction/scattering patterns of highly hydrated DNA fibers in terms of squares of functions.() In the same journal, D. Watson and Crick presented their molecular modeling analysis of the DNA X-ray diffraction patterns to suggest that the structure was a double-helix.(Although the `B-DNA form is most common under the conditions found in cells,() it is not a well-defined conformation but a family of related DNA conformations( http://cogprints.org/3822/) that occur at the high hydration levels present in living cells. Their corresponding X-ray diffraction and scattering patterns are characteristic of molecular paracrystals with a significant degree of disorder.(Hosemann R., Bagchi R.N., Direct analysis of diffraction by matter, North-Holland Publs., Amsterdam  New York, 1962.)()Compared to B-DNA, the A-DNA form is a wider right-handed spiral, with a shallow, wide minor groove and a narrower, deeper major groove. The A form occurs under non-physiological conditions in partially dehydrated samples of DNA, while in the cell it may be produced in hybrid pairings of DNA and RNA strands, as well as in enzyme-DNA complexes.()() Segments of DNA where the bases have been chemically modified by methylation may undergo a larger change in conformation and adopt the Z form. Here, the strands turn about the helical axis in a left-handed spiral, the opposite of the more common B form.() These unusual structures can be recognized by specific Z-DNA binding proteins and may be involved in the regulation of transcription.()Alternate DNA chemistryFor a number of years exobiologists have proposed the existence of a biosphere, a postulated microbial biosphere of Earth that uses radically different biochemical and molecular processes than currently known life. One of the proposals was the existence of lifeforms that use arsenic instead of phosphorus in DNA.A December 2010 NASA press conference stated that the bacterium GFAJ-1, which has evolved in an arsenic-rich environment, is the first terrestrial lifeform found which may have this ability. The bacterium was found in Lake, east of National Park. GFAJ-1 is a rod-shaped extremophile bacterium in the family Halomonadaceae that, when starved of phosphorus, may be capable of incorporating the usually poisonous element arsenic in its DNA.() This discovery may lend weight to the long-standing idea that extraterrestrial life could have a different chemical makeup from life on Earth.(() The research was carried out by a team led by Wolfe-Simon, a geomicrobiologist and geobiochemist, a Postdoctoral Fellow of the Astrobiology Institute with State University. This finding has, however, faced strong criticism from the scientific community; scientists have argued that there is no evidence that arsenic is actually incorporated into biomolecules.(() Independent conformation of this finding has also not yet been possible.Quadruplex structuresAt the ends of the linear chromosomes are specialized regions of DNA called telomeres. The main function of these regions is to allow the cell to replicate chromosome ends using the enzyme telomerase, as the enzymes that normally replicate DNA cannot copy the extreme 3 ends of chromosomes.() These specialized chromosome caps also help protect the DNA ends, and stop the repair systems in the cell from treating them as damage to be corrected.() In human cells, telomeres are usually lengths of single-stranded DNA containing several thousand repeats of a simple TTAGGG sequence.()File:Parallel telomere quadruple.png|thumb|right|DNA quadruplex formed by telomere repeats. The looped conformation of the DNA backbone is very different from the typical DNA helix.(Created from NDB UD0017)These guanine-rich sequences may stabilize chromosome ends by forming structures of stacked sets of four-base units, rather than the usual base pairs found in other DNA molecules. Here, four guanine bases form a flat plate and these flat four-base units then stack on top of each other, to form a stable G-quadruplex structure.() These structures are stabilized by hydrogen bonding between the edges of the bases and chelation of a metal ion in the centre of each four-base unit.() Other structures can also be formed, with the central set of four bases coming from either a single strand folded around the bases, or several different parallel strands, each contributing one base to the central structure.In addition to these stacked structures, telomeres also form large loop structures called telomere loops, or T-loops. Here, the single-stranded DNA curls around in a long circle stabilized by telomere-binding proteins.() At the very end of the T-loop, the single-stranded telomere DNA is held onto a region of double-stranded DNA by the telomere strand disrupting the double-helical DNA and base pairing to one of the two strands. This triple-stranded structure is called a displacement loop or D-loop.(DNA can form networks containing multiple branches.Branched DNAIn DNA fraying occurs when non-complementary regions exist at the end of an otherwise complementary double-strand of DNA. However, branched DNA can occur if a third strand of DNA is introduced and contains adjoining regions able to hybridize with the frayed regions of the pre-existing double-strand. Although the simplest example of branched DNA involves only three strands of DNA, complexes involving additional strands and multiple branches are also possible.() Branched DNA can be used in nanotechnology to construct geometric shapes, see the section on uses in technology below.VibrationDNA may carry out low-frequency collective motion as observed by the spectroscopy()() and analyzed with a quasi-continuum model.()()Chemical modificationsStructure of cytosine with and without the 5-methyl group. Deamination converts 5-methylcytosine into thymine.Base modificationsThe expression of genes is influenced by how the DNA is packaged in chromosomes, in a structure called chromatin. Base modifications can be involved in packaging, with regions that have low or no gene expression usually containing high levels of methylation of cytosine bases. For example, cytosine methylation, produces 5-methylcytosine, which is important for X-chromosome inactivation.() The average level of methylation varies between organisms  the worm elegans lacks cytosine methylation, while vertebrates have higher levels, with up to 1% of their DNA containing 5-methylcytosine.() Despite the importance of 5-methylcytosine, it can deaminate to leave a thymine base, so methylated cytosines are particularly prone to mutations.() Other base modifications include adenine methylation in bacteria, the presence of 5-hydroxymethylcytosine in the brain,() and the glycosylation of uracil to produce the J-base in kinetoplastids.()()DamageFile:Benzopyrene DNA adduct 1JDG.png|thumb|right|A covalent adduct between a metabolically activated form of Benzo(a)pyrene|benzoapyrene, the major mutagen in tobacco smoke, and DNA(Created from PDB 1JDG)DNA can be damaged by many sorts of mutagens, which change the DNA sequence. Mutagens include agents, alkylating agents and also high-energy radiation such as ultraviolet light and X-rays. The type of DNA damage produced depends on the type of mutagen. For example, UV light can damage DNA by producing dimers, which are cross-links between pyrimidine bases.() On the other hand, oxidants such as free radicals or peroxide produce multiple forms of damage, including base modifications, particularly of guanosine, and double-strand breaks.() A typical human cell contains about 150,000 bases that have suffered oxidative damage.() Of these oxidative lesions, the most dangerous are double-strand breaks, as these are difficult to repair and can produce mutations, insertions and deletions from the DNA sequence, as well as translocations.()Many mutagens fit into the space between two adjacent base pairs, this is called intercalation. Most intercalators are aromatic and planar molecules; examples include bromide, daunomycin, and doxorubicin. In order for an intercalator to fit between base pairs, the bases must separate, distorting the DNA strands by unwinding of the double helix. This inhibits both transcription and DNA replication, causing toxicity and mutations. As a result, DNA intercalators are often carcinogens, and benzo(a)pyrene|benzoapyrene diol epoxide, acridines, aflatoxin and bromide are well-known examples.()()() Nevertheless, due to their ability to inhibit DNA transcription and replication, other similar toxins are also used in chemotherapy to inhibit rapidly growing cancer cells.()Biological functionsDNA usually occurs as linear chromosomes in eukaryotes, and circular chromosomes in prokaryotes. The set of chromosomes in a cell makes up its genome; the genome has approximately 3 billion base pairs of DNA arranged into 46 chromosomes.() The information carried by DNA is held in the sequence of pieces of DNA called genes. Transmission of genetic information in genes is achieved via complementary base pairing. For example, in transcription, when a cell uses the information in a gene, the DNA sequence is copied into a complementary RNA sequence through the attraction between the DNA and the correct RNA nucleotides. Usually, this RNA copy is then used to make a matching protein sequence in a process called translation, which depends on the same interaction between RNA nucleotides. In alternative fashion, a cell may simply copy its genetic information in a process called DNA replication. The details of these functions are covered in other articles; here we focus on the interactions between DNA and other molecules that mediate the function of the genome.Genes and genomesGenomic DNA is tightly and orderly packed in the process called condensation to fit the small available volumes of the cell. In eukaryotes, DNA is located in the nucleus, as well as small amounts in mitochondria and chloroplasts. In prokaryotes, the DNA is held within an irregularly shaped body in the cytoplasm called the nucleoid.() The genetic information in a genome is held within genes, and the complete set of this information in an organism is called its genotype. A gene is a unit of heredity and is a region of DNA that influences a particular characteristic in an organism. Genes contain an reading frame that can be transcribed, as well as sequences such as promoters and enhancers, which control the transcription of the open reading frame.In many species, only a small fraction of the total sequence of the genome encodes protein. For example, only about 1.5% of the human genome consists of protein-coding exons, with over 50% of human DNA consisting of non-coding repetitive sequences.() The reasons for the presence of so much DNA in eukaryotic genomes and the extraordinary differences in size, or C-value, among species represent a long-standing puzzle known as the enigma.() However, DNA sequences that do not code protein may still encode functional RNA molecules, which are involved in the of gene expression.()File:T7 RNA polymerase.jpg|thumb|left|RNA polymerase (blue) producing a mRNA (green) from a DNA template (orange).(Created from PDB 1MSW)Some noncoding DNA sequences play structural roles in chromosomes. Telomeres and centromeres typically contain few genes, but are important for the function and stability of chromosomes.(() An abundant form of noncoding DNA in humans are pseudogenes, which are copies of genes that have been disabled by mutation.() These sequences are usually just molecular fossils, although they can occasionally serve as raw genetic material for the creation of new genes through the process of duplication and divergence.()Transcription and translationA gene is a sequence of DNA that contains genetic information and can influence the phenotype of an organism. Within a gene, the sequence of bases along a DNA strand defines a RNA sequence, which then defines one or more protein sequences. The relationship between the nucleotide sequences of genes and the amino-acid sequences of proteins is determined by the rules of translation, known collectively as the code. The genetic code consists of three-letter words called codons formed from a sequence of three nucleotides (e.g. ACT, CAG, TTT).In transcription, the codons of a gene are copied into messenger RNA by polymerase. This RNA copy is then decoded by a ribosome that reads the RNA sequence by base-pairing the messenger RNA to RNA, which carries amino acids. Since there are 4 bases in 3-letter combinations, there are 64 possible codons (4^3 combinations). These encode the twenty standard amino acids, giving most amino acids more than one possible codon. There are also three stop or nonsense codons signifying the end of the coding region; these are the TAA, TGA and TAG codons.File:DNA replication en.svg|thumb|450px|right|DNA replication. The double helix is unwound by a helicase and topoisomerase. Next, one polymerase produces the leading strand copy. Another DNA polymerase binds to the lagging strand. This enzyme makes discontinuous segments (called fragments) before ligase joins them together.Replicationdivision is essential for an organism to grow, but, when a cell divides, it must replicate the DNA in its genome so that the two daughter cells have the same genetic information as their parent. The double-stranded structure of DNA provides a simple mechanism for replication. Here, the two strands are separated and then each strands DNA sequence is recreated by an enzyme called polymerase. This enzyme makes the complementary strand by finding the correct base through complementary base pairing, and bonding it onto the original strand. As DNA polymerases can only extend a DNA strand in a 5 to 3 direction, different mechanisms are used to copy the antiparallel strands of the double helix.() In this way, the base on the old strand dictates which base appears on the new strand, and the cell ends up with a perfect copy of its DNA.Interactions with proteinsAll the functions of DNA depend on interactions with proteins. These interactions can be non-specific, or the protein can bind specifically to a single DNA sequence. Enzymes can also bind to DNA and of these, the polymerases that copy the DNA base sequence in transcription and DNA replication are particularly important.DNA-binding proteinsInteraction of DNA (shown in orange) with histones (shown in blue). These proteins basic amino acids bind to the acidic phosphate groups on DNA.Structural proteins that bind DNA are well-understood examples of non-specific DNA-protein interactions. Within chromosomes, DNA is held in complexes with structural proteins. These proteins organize the DNA into a compact structure called chromatin. In eukaryotes this structure involves DNA binding to a complex of small basic proteins called histones, while in prokaryotes multiple types of proteins are involved.()() The histones form a disk-shaped complex called a nucleosome, which contains two complete turns of double-stranded DNA wrapped around its surface. These non-specific interactions are formed through basic residues in the histones making bonds to the acidic sugar-phosphate backbone of the DNA, and are therefore largely independent of the base sequence.() Chemical modifications of these basic amino acid residues include methylation, phosphorylation and acetylation.() These chemical changes alter the strength of the interaction between the DNA and the histones, making the DNA more or less accessible to factors and changing the rate of transcription.() Other non-specific DNA-binding proteins in chromatin include the high-mobility group proteins, which bind to bent or distorted DNA.() These proteins are important in bending arrays of nucleosomes and arranging them into the larger structures that make up chromosomes.()A distinct group of DNA-binding proteins are the DNA-binding proteins that specifically bind single-stranded DNA. In humans, replication A is the best-understood member of this family and is used in processes where the double helix is separated, including DNA replication, recombination and DNA repair.() These binding proteins seem to stabilize single-stranded DNA and protect it from forming stem-loops or being degraded by nucleases.File:Lambda repressor 1LMB.png|thumb|upright|The lambda repressor helix-turn-helix transcription factor bound to its DNA target(Created from PDB 1LMB)In contrast, other proteins have evolved to bind to particular DNA sequences. The most intensively studied of these are the various factors, which are proteins that regulate transcription. Each transcription factor binds to one particular set of DNA sequences and activates or inhibits the transcription of genes that have these sequences close to their promoters. The transcription factors do this in two ways. Firstly, they can bind the RNA polymerase responsible for transcription, either directly or through other mediator proteins; this locates the polymerase at the promoter and allows it to begin transcription.() Alternatively, transcription factors can bind enzymes that modify the histones at the promoter; this will change the accessibility of the DNA template to the polymerase.()As these DNA targets can occur throughout an organisms genome, changes in the activity of one type of transcription factor can affect thousands of genes.() Consequently, these proteins are often the targets of the transduction processes that control responses to environmental changes or differentiation and development. The specificity of these transcription factors interactions with DNA come from the proteins making multiple contacts to the edges of the DNA bases, allowing them to read the DNA sequence. Most of these base-interactions are made in the major groove, where the bases are most accessible.(File:EcoRV 1RVA.png|thumb|left|The enzyme EcoRV (green) in a complex with its substrate DNA(Created from PDB 1RVA)DNA-modifying enzymesNucleases and ligasesNucleases are enzymes that cut DNA strands by catalyzing the hydrolysis of the bonds. Nucleases that hydrolyse nucleotides from the ends of DNA strands are called exonucleases, while endonucleases cut within strands. The most frequently used nucleases in biology are the restriction endonucleases, which cut DNA at specific sequences. For instance, the EcoRV enzyme shown to the left recognizes the 6-base sequence 5-GAT|ATC-3 and makes a cut at the vertical line. In nature, these enzymes protect bacteria against phage infection by digesting the phage DNA when it enters the bacterial cell, acting as part of the modification system.() In technology, these sequence-specific nucleases are used in cloning and DNA fingerprinting.Enzymes called ligases can rejoin cut or broken DNA strands.() Ligases are particularly important in lagging strand DNA replication, as they join together the short segments of DNA produced at the fork into a complete copy of the DNA template. They are also used in repair and recombination.(Topoisomerases and helicasesTopoisomerases are enzymes with both nuclease and ligase activity. These proteins change the amount of supercoiling in DNA. Some of these enzymes work by cutting the DNA helix and allowing one section to rotate, thereby reducing its level of supercoiling; the enzyme then seals the DNA break.( Other types of these enzymes are capable of cutting one DNA helix and then passing a second strand of DNA through this break, before rejoining the helix.() Topoisomerases are required for many processes involving DNA, such as DNA replication and transcription.(Helicases are proteins that are a type of motor. They use the chemical energy in triphosphates, predominantly ATP, to break hydrogen bonds between bases and unwind the DNA double helix into single strands.() These enzymes are essential for most processes where enzymes need to access the DNA bases.PolymerasesPolymerases are enzymes that synthesize polynucleotide chains from triphosphates. The sequence of their products are copies of existing polynucleotide chains  which are called templates. These enzymes function by adding nucleotides onto the 3 hydroxyl group of the previous nucleotide in a DNA strand. As a consequence, all polymerases work in a 5 to 3 direction.() In the site of these enzymes, the incoming nucleoside triphosphate base-pairs to the template: this allows polymerases to accurately synthesize the complementary strand of their template. Polymerases are classified according to the type of template that they use.In DNA replication, a DNA-dependent polymerase makes a copy of a DNA sequence. Accuracy is vital in this process, so many of these polymerases have a proofreading activity. Here, the polymerase recognizes the occasional mistakes in the synthesis reaction by the lack of base pairing between the mismatched nucleotides. If a mismatch is detected, a 3 to 5 exonuclease activity is activated and the incorrect base removed.() In most organisms, DNA polymerases function in a large complex called the replisome that contains multiple accessory subunits, such as the clamp or helicases.()RNA-dependent DNA polymerases are a specialized class of polymerases that copy the sequence of an RNA strand into DNA. They include transcriptase, which is a viral enzyme involved in the infection of cells by retroviruses, and telomerase, which is required for the replication of telomeres.(() Telomerase is an unusual polymerase because it contains its own RNA template as part of its structure.(Transcription is carried out by a DNA-dependent polymerase that copies the sequence of a DNA strand into RNA. To begin transcribing a gene, the RNA polymerase binds to a sequence of DNA called a promoter and separates the DNA strands. It then copies the gene sequence into a RNA transcript until it reaches a region of DNA called the terminator, where it halts and detaches from the DNA. As with human DNA-dependent DNA polymerases, polymerase II, the enzyme that transcribes most of the genes in the human genome, operates as part of a large complex with multiple regulatory and accessory subunits.()Genetic recombinationStructure of the junction intermediate in recombination. The four separate DNA strands are coloured red, blue, green and yellow.(Created from PDB 1M6G)A DNA helix usually does not interact with other segments of DNA, and in human cells the different chromosomes even occupy separate areas in the nucleus called chromosome territories.() This physical separation of different chromosomes is important for the ability of DNA to function as a stable repository for information, as one of the few times chromosomes interact is during crossover when they recombine. Chromosomal crossover is when two DNA helices break, swap a section and then rejoin.Recombination allows chromosomes to exchange genetic information and produces new combinations of genes, which increases the efficiency of selection and can be important in the rapid evolution of new proteins.() Genetic recombination can also be involved in DNA repair, particularly in the cells response to double-strand breaks.()The most common form of chromosomal crossover is recombination, where the two chromosomes involved share very similar sequences. Non-homologous recombination can be damaging to cells, as it can produce translocations and genetic abnormalities. The recombination reaction is catalyzed by enzymes known as recombinases, such as RAD51.() The first step in recombination is a double-stranded break either caused by an endonuclease or damage to the DNA.() A series of steps catalyzed in part by the recombinase then leads to joining of the two helices by at least one junction, in which a segment of a single strand in each helix is annealed to the complementary strand in the other helix. The Holliday junction is a tetrahedral junction structure that can be moved along the pair of chromosomes, swapping one strand for another. The recombination reaction is then halted by cleavage of the junction and re-ligation of the released DNA.()EvolutionDNA contains the genetic information that allows all modern living things to function, grow and reproduce. However, it is unclear how long in the 4-billion-year history of life DNA has performed this function, as it has been proposed that the earliest forms of life may have used RNA as their genetic material.()() RNA may have acted as the central part of early metabolism as it can both transmit genetic information and carry out catalysis as part of ribozymes.() This ancient RNA world where nucleic acid would have been used for both catalysis and genetics may have influenced the evolution of the current genetic code based on four nucleotide bases. This would occur, since the number of different bases in such an organism is a trade-off between a small number of bases increasing replication accuracy and a large number of bases increasing the catalytic efficiency of ribozymes.()However, there is no direct evidence of ancient genetic systems, as recovery of DNA from most fossils is impossible. This is because DNA will survive in the environment for less than one million years and slowly degrades into short fragments in solution.() Claims for older DNA have been made, most notably a report of the isolation of a viable bacterium from a salt crystal 250 million years old,() but these claims are controversial.()()On August 8, 2011, a report, based on NASA studies with meteorites found on Earth, was published suggesting building blocks of DNA (adenine, guanine and related molecules) may have been formed extraterrestrially in space.()()()Uses in technologyGenetic engineeringMethods have been developed to purify DNA from organisms, such as extraction, and to manipulate it in the laboratory, such as digests and the chain reaction. Modern biology and biochemistry make intensive use of these techniques in recombinant DNA technology. DNA is a man-made DNA sequence that has been assembled from other DNA sequences. They can be transformed into organisms in the form of plasmids or in the appropriate format, by using a vector.() The genetically modified organisms produced can be used to produce products such as recombinant proteins, used in research,() or be grown in agriculture.()()ForensicsForensic scientists can use DNA in blood, semen, skin, saliva or hair found at a scene to identify a matching DNA of an individual, such as a perpetrator. This process is formally termed profiling, but may also be called fingerprinting. In DNA profiling, the lengths of variable sections of repetitive DNA, such as tandem repeats and minisatellites, are compared between people. This method is usually an extremely reliable technique for identifying a matching DNA.() However, identification can be complicated if the scene is contaminated with DNA from several people.() DNA profiling was developed in 1984 by British geneticist Sir Jeffreys,() and first used in forensic science to convict Colin Pitchfork in the 1988 Enderby murders case.(Colin Pitchfork  first murder conviction on DNA evidence also clears the prime suspect Forensic Science Service Accessed 23 December 2006)People convicted of certain types of crimes may be required to provide a sample of DNA for a database. This has helped investigators solve old cases where only a DNA sample was obtained from the scene. DNA profiling can also be used to identify victims of mass casualty incidents.() On the other hand, many convicted people have been released from prison on the basis of DNA techniques, which were not available when a crime had originally been committed.BioinformaticsBioinformatics involves the manipulation, searching, and mining of biological data, and this includes DNA sequence data. The development of techniques to store and search DNA sequences have led to widely applied advances in science, especially searching algorithms, learning and theory.() String searching or matching algorithms, which find an occurrence of a sequence of letters inside a larger sequence of letters, were developed to search for specific sequences of nucleotides.(Gusfield, Dan. Algorithms on Strings, Trees, and Sequences: Computer Science and Computational Biology. University Press, 15 January 1997. ISBN 978-0-521-58519-4.)  The DNA sequenced may be aligned with other DNA sequences to identify homologous sequences and locate the specific mutations that make them distinct. These techniques, especially sequence alignment, are used in studying phylogenetic relationships and protein function.() Data sets representing entire genomes worth of DNA sequences, such as those produced by the Genome Project, are difficult to use without the annotations that identify the locations of genes and regulatory elements on each chromosome. Regions of DNA sequence that have the characteristic patterns associated with protein- or RNA-coding genes can be identified by gene finding algorithms, which allow researchers to predict the presence of particular products and their possible functions in an organism even before they have been isolated experimentally.()  Entire genomes may also be compared which can shed light on the evolutionary history of particular organism and permit the examination of complex evolutionary events.DNA nanotechnologyFile:DNA nanostructures.png|thumb|400px|The DNA structure at left (schematic shown) will self-assemble into the structure visualized by atomic force microscopy at right. nanotechnology is the field that seeks to design nanoscale structures using the recognition properties of DNA molecules. Image from .DNA nanotechnology uses the unique recognition properties of DNA and other nucleic acids to create self-assembling branched DNA complexes with useful properties.() DNA is thus used as a structural material rather than as a carrier of biological information. This has led to the creation of two-dimensional periodic lattices (both tile-based as well as using the origami method) as well as three-dimensional structures in the shapes of polyhedra.() Nanomechanical devices and algorithmic self-assembly have also been demonstrated,() and these DNA structures have been used to template the arrangement of other molecules such as gold nanoparticles and streptavidin proteins.()History and anthropologyBecause DNA collects mutations over time, which are then inherited, it contains historical information, and, by comparing DNA sequences, geneticists can infer the evolutionary history of organisms, their phylogeny.() This field of phylogenetics is a powerful tool in biology. If DNA sequences within a species are compared, population geneticists can learn the history of particular populations. This can be used in studies ranging from genetics to anthropology; For example, DNA evidence is being used to try to identify the Ten Lost Tribes of Israel.(Lost Tribes of Israel, NOVA, PBS airdate: 22 February 2000. Transcript available from PBS.org, . Retrieved 4 March 2006.)(Kleiman, Yaakov. The Cohanim/DNA Connection: The fascinating story of how DNA studies confirm an ancient biblical tradition. aish.com (January 13, 2000). Retrieved 4 March 2006.)DNA has also been used to look at modern family relationships, such as establishing family relationships between the descendants of Hemings and Jefferson. This usage is closely related to the use of DNA in criminal investigations detailed above. Indeed, some criminal investigations have been solved when DNA from crime scenes has matched relatives of the guilty individual.(Bhattacharya, Shaoni. Killer convicted thanks to relatives DNA. newscientist.com (20 April 2004). Retrieved 22 December 06.)History of DNA researchFile:Maclyn McCarty with Francis Crick and James D Watson - 10.1371 journal.pbio.0030341.g001-O.jpg|thumb|D. Watson and Crick (right), co-originators of the double-helix model, with Maclyn McCarty (left).DNA was first isolated by the Swiss physician Miescher who, in 1869, discovered a microscopic substance in the pus of discarded surgical bandages. As it resided in the nuclei of cells, he called it nuclein.() In 1878, Kossel isolated the non-protein component of nuclein, acid, and later isolated its five primary nucleobases.() In 1919, Levene identified the base, sugar and phosphate nucleotide unit.() Levene suggested that DNA consisted of a string of nucleotide units linked together through the phosphate groups. However, Levene thought the chain was short and the bases repeated in a fixed order. In 1937 Astbury produced the first X-ray diffraction patterns that showed that DNA had a regular structure.()File: Rosalind Franklin.jpg|thumb|upright|left|Franklin used crystallography to help visualize the structure of DNA.In 1927 Koltsov  proposed that inherited traits would be inherited via a giant hereditary molecule which would be made up of two mirror strands that would replicate in a semi-conservative fashion using each strand as a template.( Valery N. Soyfer. The consequences of political dictatorship for Russian science. Nature Reviews Genetics 2: 723-729 (2001) ) In 1928, Griffith discovered that traits of the smooth form of the Pneumococcus could be transferred to the rough form of the same bacteria by mixing killed smooth bacteria with the live rough form.() This system provided the first clear suggestion that DNA carries genetic informationthe experimentwhen Avery, along with coworkers Colin MacLeod and McCarty, identified DNA as the transforming principle in 1943.() DNAs role in heredity was confirmed in 1952, when Hershey and Chase in the experiment showed that DNA is the material of the T2 phage.()In 1953, D. Watson and Crick suggested what is now accepted as the first correct double-helix model of DNA structure in the journal Nature.( Their double-helix, molecular model of DNA was then based on a single diffraction image (labeled as 51)(The B-DNA X-ray pattern on the right of this linked image was obtained by Franklin and Gosling in May 1952 at high hydration levels of DNA and it has been labeled as Photo 51) taken by Franklin and Gosling in May 1952, as well as the information that the DNA bases are paired  also obtained through private communications from Chargaff in the previous years. rules played a very important role in establishing double-helix configurations for B-DNA as well as A-DNA.Experimental evidence supporting the and Crick model were published in a series of five articles in the same issue of Nature.(Nature Archives Double Helix of DNA: 50 Years) Of these, Franklin and Goslings paper was the first publication of their own X-ray diffraction data and original analysis method that partially supported the Watson and Crick model;(() this issue also contained an article on DNA structure by Wilkins and two of his colleagues, whose analysis and in vivo B-DNA X-ray patterns also supported the presence in vivo of the double-helical DNA configurations as proposed by Crick and Watson for their double-helix molecular model of DNA in the previous two pages of Nature.( In 1962, after Franklins death, Watson, Crick, and Wilkins jointly received the Prize in Physiology or Medicine.(The Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine 1962 Nobelprize .org Accessed 22 December 06) However, Nobel rules of the time allowed only living recipients, but a vigorous debate continues on who should receive credit for the discovery.()In an influential presentation in 1957, Crick laid out the dogma of molecular biology, which foretold the relationship between DNA, RNA, and proteins, and articulated the adaptor hypothesis.(Crick, F.H.C. On degenerate templates and the adaptor hypothesis (PDF). genome.wellcome.ac.uk (Lecture, 1955). Retrieved 22 December 2006.) Final confirmation of the replication mechanism that was implied by the double-helical structure followed in 1958 through the experiment.() Further work by Crick and coworkers showed that the genetic code was based on non-overlapping triplets of bases, called codons, allowing Gobind Khorana, W. Holley and Warren Nirenberg to decipher the genetic code.(The Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine 1968 Nobelprize.org Accessed 22 December 06) These findings represent the birth of biology.See also* Crystallography* error* microarray* sequencing* disorder* Nucleic acid modeling* acid notation* Phosphoramidite* blot* DNA* scattering techniques* acid double helixReferencesFurther reading**** Judson, Horace F. 1979. The Eighth Day of Creation: Makers of the Revolution in Biology. Touchstone Books, ISBN 0-671-22540-5. 2nd edition: Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory Press, 1996 paperback: ISBN 0-87969-478-5.*, first published in October 1974 by MacMillan, with foreword by Francis Crick;the definitive DNA textbook,revised in 1994 with a 9 page postscript*Micklas, David. 2003. DNA Science: A First Course. Cold Spring Harbor Press: ISBN 978-0879696368*** Rosenfeld, Israel. 2010. DNA: A Graphic Guide to the Molecule that Shook the World. Columbia University Press: ISBN 978-0231142717* Schultz, Mark and Zander Cannon. 2009. The Stuff of Life: A Graphic Guide to Genetics and DNA. Hill and Wang: ISBN 0809089475** Watson, James D. 2004. DNA: The Secret of Life. Random House: ISBN 978-0099451846*External links* * DNA binding site prediction on protein* DNA coiling to form chromosomes* DNA the Double Helix Game From the official Nobel Prize web site* DNA under electron microscope* Dolan DNA Learning Center* Double Helix: 50 years of DNA, Nature* * Double Helix 19532003 National Centre for Biotechnology Education* Francis Crick and James Watson talking on the BBC in 1962, 1972, and 1974* Genetic Education Modules for TeachersDNA from the Beginning Study Guide* Guide to DNA cloning* * DNA from the Beginning Another DNA Learning Center site on DNA, genes, and heredity from Mendel to the human genome project.* DNA Lab, demonstrates how to extract DNA from wheat using readily available equipment and supplies.* * Rosalind Franklins contributions to the study of DNA* The Register of Francis Crick Personal Papers 1938  2007 at Mandeville Special Collections Library, of California, San Diego* U.S. National DNA Daywatch videos and participate in real-time chat with top scientists*Clue to chemistry of heredity found New York Times June 1953. First American newspaper coverage of the discovery of the DNA structure*An Introduction to DNA and Chromosomes from HOPES: Huntingtons Disease Outreach Project for Education at Stanfordaf:DNS ar:desoxirribonucleicodesoxirribonucleicuturusubn:zh-min-nan:DNAkiselinadezoksiribonukleekbg:desoxiribonucleiccs:DNAcy:DNAda:DNApdc:DNAde:Desoxyribonukleinsureet:Desoksribonukleiinhapeel:DNAdesoxirribonucleicoeo:DNAdesoxirribonukleikofa:hif:DNAfo:DNAdsoxyribonucliqued-ocsairibeaniclasachdesoxirribonucleicoFut-thng Fut-sonko:DNAhy:kiselinadeoksiribonukleatdeoxyribonucleicis:DNAit:DNAhe:DNAjv:DNApam:DNAkk:sw:DNAht:ADNku:DNAlo:DNAdesoxyribonucleicumlv:Dezoksiribonuklenskbelt:Deoksiribonukleorgtislmo:DNAhu:Dezoxiribonukleinsavmk:ml:...ms:DNAmn:my:nl:Desoxyribonuclenezuurja:frr:DNAno:DNAnn:DNAnov:DNAdesoxiribonuclecom:DNA( ) pap:ADN  (DNA)pms:DNAdeoksyrybonukleinowydesoxirribonucleicoro:ADNrue:sah:sq:ADNscn:DNAsi:..simple:DNAkyselinakislinaso:DNAsr:sh:DNKsu:DNAfi:DNAsv:DNAtl:DNAta:.. th:tr:DNA vi:ADNvls:DNAwar:DNAyi:DNAyo:DNAzh-yue:DNAbat-smg:DNRzh:
8088
Documentary_film
Image:BolexH16.jpg|right|thumb|This 16 mm spring-wound Bolex H16 Reflex camera is a popular entry level camera used in schools.Documentary films constitute a broad category of nonfictional pictures intended to document some aspect of reality, primarily for the purposes of instruction or maintaining a historical record.(oed.com) A documentary film was originally a movie shot on stockthe only medium availablebut now includes video and digital productions that can be either direct-to-video or made for a program. Documentary has been described as a filmmaking practice, a cinematic tradition, and mode of audience reception that is continually evolving and is without clear boundaries.(Nichols, Bill. Foreword, in Barry Keith Grant and Jeannette Sloniowski (eds.) Documenting The Documentary: Close Readings of Documentary Film and Video. Detroit: State University Press, 1997) Defining documentary In popular myth, the word documentary was coined by Scottish documentarian Grierson in his review of Flahertys film Moana (1926), published in the New York Sun on 8 February 1926, written by The Moviegoer (a pen name for Grierson).(Ann Curthoys, Marilyn Lake Connected worlds: history in transnational perspective, Volume 2004 p.151. Australian National University Press)Griersons principles of documentary were that cinemas potential for observing life could be exploited in a new art form; that the original actor and original scene are better guides than their fiction counterparts to interpreting the modern world; and that materials thus taken from the raw can be more real than the acted article. In this regard, Griersons views align with Vertovs contempt for dramatic fiction as bourgeois excess, though with considerably more subtlety. Griersons definition of documentary as creative treatment of actuality has gained some acceptance, though it presents philosophical questions about documentaries containing stagings and reenactments.In his essays, Vertov argued for presenting life as it is (that is, life filmed surreptitiously) and life caught unawares (life provoked or surprised by the camera).Lorentz defines a documentary film as a film which is dramatic.(Pare Lorentz Film Library  FDR and Film) Others further state that a documentary stands out from the other types of non-fiction films for providing an opinion, and a specific message, along with the facts it presents.()Practice is the complex process of creating documentary projects. It refers to what people do with media devices, content, form, and production strategies in order to address the creative, ethical, and conceptual problems and choices that arise as they make documentaries.There are clear connections in terms of practice with magazine and newspaper feature-writing and indeed to non-fiction literature. Many of the generic forms of documentary, for example the biopic or profile; or the observational piece. These generic forms are explored on the University of Winchester Journalism Department features web where long form journalism is classified by genre or content, rather than in terms of production as film, radio or print.(University of Winchester Journalism Department  Feature Writing and Documentary Making)HistoryPre-1900Early film (pre-1900) was dominated by the novelty of showing an event. They were single-shot moments captured on film: a train entering a station, a boat docking, or factory workers leaving work. These short films were called actuality films; the term documentary was not coined until 1926.  Many of the first films, such as those made by and Louis Lumire, were a minute or less in length, due to technological limitations.Films showing many people (for example,, leaving a factory) were often made for commercial reasons: the people being filmed were eager to see, for payment, the film showing them. One notable film clocked in at over an hour and a half, Corbett-Fitzsimmons Fight. Using pioneering film-looping technology, J. Rector presented the entirety of a famous 1897 prize-fight on cinema screens across the country.The French surgeon Doyen started a series of surgical films sometime before July 1898. Until 1906, the year of his last film, Doyen recorded more than 60 operations. As Doyen said that his first films taught him how to correct professional errors he had been unaware of. For scientific purposes, after 1906 Doyen combined 15 of his films into three compilations, two of which survive, the six-film series Extirpation des tumeurs encapsules (1906), and the four-film Les Oprations sur la cavit crnienne (1911). These and five other of Doyens films survive.(Journal of Film Preservation, nr. 70, november 2005.)Marinescu - Science films.jpg|thumb|right|Frame from one of Marinescus science films (1899).Between July 1898 and 1901 the Romanian professor Marinescu made several science films in his neurology clinic in Bucharest:(Dumitrescu, Mircea, O privire critic asupra filmului romnesc, Bucharest, 2005, ISBN 978-973-9153-93-5) The walking troubles of organic hemiplegy (1898), The walking troubles of organic paraplegies (1899), A case of hysteric hemiplegy healed through hypnosis (1899), The walking troubles of progressive locomotion ataxy (1900) and Illnesses of the muscles (1901). All these short films have been preserved. The professor called his works studies with the help of the cinematograph, and published the results, along with several consecutive frames, in issues of La Semaine Mdicale magazine from Paris, between 1899 and 1902.(Rpeanu, Bujor T. Filmul documentar 18971948, Bucharest, 2008, ISBN 978-973-7839-40-4) In 1924, Auguste Lumiere recognized the merits of Marinescus science films: Ive seen your scientific reports about the usage of the cinematograph in studies of nervous illnesses, when I was still receiving La Semaine Mdicale, but back then I had other concerns, which left me no spare time to begin biological studies. I must say I forgot those works and I am thankful to you that you reminded them to me. Unfortunately, not many scientists have followed your way.(uui, Marian, A short history of the Romanian films at the Romanian National Cinematographic Center. )(The Works of Gheorghe Marinescu, 1967 report.)(Excerpts of prof. dr. Marinescus science films.)19001920Travelogue films were very popular in the early part of the 20th century. They were infrequently known as scenics. Scenics were among the most popular sort of films at the time.(Hansen, Babel and Babylon: Spectatorship in American Silent Film, 2005.) An important early film to move beyond the concept of the scenic was the Land of the Head Hunters (1914), which embraced primitivism and exoticism in a staged story presented as truthful re-enactments of the life of Native Americans.Contemplation is a separate area. Path is best-known global manufacturer of such films of early 20th century. Vivid example is clad in snow (1909).Early color motion picture processes such as Kinemacolor and Prizmacolor used travelogues to promote the new color process. (In contrast, Technicolor concentrated primarily on getting their process adopted by Hollywood studios for fictional feature films.)Also during this period Hurleys documentary film, South (1919), about the Trans-Antarctic Expedition, was released. It documented the failed Antarctic expedition led by Shackleton in 1914.1920sRomanticismFile:Nanook of the north.jpg|thumb|of the North poster.With J. Flahertys of the North in 1922, documentary film embraced romanticism; Flaherty filmed a number of heavily staged romantic films during this time period, often showing how his subjects would have lived 100 years earlier and not how they lived right then. For instance, in Nanook of the North Flaherty did not allow his subjects to shoot a walrus with a nearby shotgun, but had them use a harpoon instead. Some of Flahertys staging, such as building a roofless igloo for interior shots, was done to accommodate the filming technology of the time.Pictures tried to repeat the success of Flahertys Nanook and Moana with two romanticized documentaries, Grass (1925) and Chang (1927), both directed by Cooper and Schoedsack.The city symphonyThe continental, or realist, tradition focused on humans within human-made environments, and included the so-called city symphony films such as Ruttmanns Symphony of a City (of which Grierson noted in an article(Grierson, John. First Principles of Documentary, in Kevin Macdonald & Mark Cousins (eds.) Imagining Reality: The Faber Book of Documentary. London: Faber and Faber, 1996) that Berlin represented what a documentary should not be), Cavalcantis que les heures, and Vertovs with the Movie Camera. These films tend to feature people as products of their environment, and lean towards the avant-garde.Kino-Pravda Vertov was central to the Soviet Kino-Pravda (literally, cinematic truth) newsreel series of the 1920s. Vertov believed the camera  with its varied lenses, shot-counter shot editing, time-lapse, ability to slow motion, stop motion and fast-motion  could render reality more accurately than the human eye, and made a film philosophy out of it.Newsreel tradition The newsreel tradition is important in documentary film; newsreels were also sometimes staged but were usually re-enactments of events that had already happened, not attempts to steer events as they were in the process of happening. For instance, much of the battle footage from the early 20th century was staged; the cameramen would usually arrive on site after a major battle and re-enact scenes to film them.1920s1940sThe propagandist tradition consists of films made with the explicit purpose of persuading an audience of a point. One of the most notorious films is Riefenstahls film of the Will (1935), which chronicled the 1934 Nazi Party Congress and was commissioned by Hitler. Leftist filmmakers Ivens and Storck directed Borinage (1931) about the Belgian coal mining region. Buuel directed a surrealist documentary Las Hurdes (1933).Lorentzs Plow That Broke the Plains (1936) and The River (1938) and Van Dykes The City (1939) are notable Deal productions, each presenting complex combinations of social and ecological awareness, government propaganda, and leftist viewpoints. Capras We Fight (19421944) series was a newsreel series in the United States, commissioned by the government to convince the U.S. public that it was time to go to war. Bennett and her husband de la Falaise produced two feature length documentaries, Dance of the Virgins (1935) filmed in Bali, and Kilou the Killer Tiger (1936) filmed in Indochina.In Canada the Film Board, set up by John Grierson, was created for the same propaganda reasons. It also created newsreels that were seen by their national governments as legitimate counter-propaganda to the psychological warfare of Nazi Germany (orchestrated by Goebbels).In Britain, a number of different filmmakers came together under John Grierson. They became known as the Film Movement. Grierson, Cavalcanti, Harry Watt, Wright, and Jennings amongst others succeeded in blending propaganda, information, and education with a more poetic aesthetic approach to documentary. Examples of their work include Drifters (Grierson), of Ceylon (Wright), Were Started and Diary for Timothy (Jennings). Their work involved poets such as H. Auden, composers such as Britten, and writers such as B. Priestley. Among the best known films of the movement are Mail and Face.1950s1970sCinma-vrit vrit (or the closely related direct cinema) was dependent on some technical advances in order to exist: light, quiet and reliable cameras, and portable sync sound.Cinma vrit and similar documentary traditions can thus be seen, in a broader perspective, as a reaction against studio-based film production constraints. Shooting on location, with smaller crews, would also happen in the New Wave, the filmmakers taking advantage of advances in technology allowing smaller, handheld cameras and synchronized sound to film events on location as they unfolded.Although the terms are sometimes used interchangeably, there are important differences between cinma vrit (Rouch) and the North American Cinema (or more accurately Cinma direct), pioneered by, among others, Canadians King, Michel Brault and Perrault, and Americans Drew, Leacock, Wiseman and and David Maysles.The directors of the movement take different viewpoints on their degree of involvement with their subjects. Kopple and Pennebaker, for instance, choose non-involvement (or at least no overt involvement), and Perrault, Rouch, Koenig, and Kroitor favor direct involvement or even provocation when they deem it necessary.The films Primary and Behind a Presidential Commitment (both produced by Drew), County, USA (directed by Kopple), Look Back (A. Pennebaker), Boy (Koenig and Kroitor) are all frequently deemed vrit films.The fundamentals of the style include following a person during a crisis with a moving, often handheld, camera to capture more personal reactions. There are no sit-down interviews, and the ratio (the amount of film shot to the finished product) is very high, often reaching 80 to one. From there, editors find and sculpt the work into a film. The editors of the movement  such as Werner Nold, Charlotte Zwerin, Muffie Myers, Susan Froemke, and Ellen Hovde  are often overlooked, but their input to the films was so vital that they were often given co-director credits.Famous cinma vrit/direct cinema films include Raquetteurs,(Les raquetteurs  NFB  Collection) Showman, Salesman, Near Death, The Children Were Watching, and Grey Gardens.Political weaponsIn the 1960s and 1970s, documentary film was often conceived as a political weapon against neocolonialism and capitalism in general, especially in America, but also in a changing Quebec society. La Hora de los hornos (Hour of the Furnaces, from 1968), directed by Getino and E. Solanas, influenced a whole generation of filmmakers. Among the many political documentaries early 1970s; Chile: A Special Report, a public televisions first in depth expository look of the September 1973 overthrow of the legitimate Salvador Allende, Chilean government by the Pinochet armed forces, who ruled by terror. With the support of the Nixon administration, produced by documentarians Ari Martinez and Jos Garcia.Modern documentariesFile:VoicesOfIraq.jpg|thumb|215px|One of 150 DV cameras used by Iraqis to film themselves and create the 2004  film of Iraq.office analysts have noted that this film genre has become increasingly successful in theatrical release with films such as 9/11, Size Me, Earth, of the Penguins, and Inconvenient Truth among the most prominent examples. Compared to dramatic narrative films, documentaries typically have far lower budgets which makes them attractive to film companies because even a limited theatrical release can be highly profitable.The nature of documentary films has expanded in the past 20 years from the cinema verit style introduced in the 1960s in which the use of portable camera and sound equipment allowed an intimate relationship between filmmaker and subject. The line blurs between documentary and narrative and some works are very personal, such as the late Riggss Tongues Untied (1989) and Black Is...Black Aint (1995), which mix expressive, poetic, and rhetorical elements and stresses subjectivities rather than historical materials.(Struggles for Representation African American Documentary Film and Video, edited by Phyllis R. Klotman and Janet K. Cutler,)Historical documentaries, such as the landmark 14-hour on the Prize: Americas Civil Rights Years (1986  Part 1 and 1989  Part 2) by Henry Hampton, Little Girls (1997) by Lee, and The Civil War by Burns, UNESCO awarded independent film on slavery Years Later, expressed not only a distinctive voice but also a perspective and point of views. Some films such as The Thin Blue Line by Morris incorporated stylized re-enactments, and Moores & Me placed far more interpretive control with the director. The commercial success of these documentaries may derive from this narrative shift in the documentary form, leading some critics to question whether such films can truly be called documentaries; critics sometimes refer to these works as films or docu-ganda.() However, directorial manipulation of documentary subjects has been noted since the work of Flaherty, and may be endemic to the form due to problematic ontological foundations.Although the increasing popularity of the documentary genre, and the advent of DVDs, has made documentaries financially more viable, funding for documentary film production remains elusive. Within the past decade the largest exhibition opportunities have emerged from within the broadcast market, making filmmakers beholden to the tastes and influences of the broadcasters who have become their largest funding source.(indiewire.com, Festivals: Post-Sundance 2001; Docs Still Face Financing and Distribution Challenges. February 8, 2001. )Modern documentaries have some overlap with television forms, with the development of television that occasionally verges on the documentary but more often veers to the fictional or staged. The making-of documentary shows how a movie or a computer game was produced. Usually made for promotional purposes, it is closer to an advertisement than a classic documentary.Modern lightweight digital video cameras and computer-based editing have greatly aided documentary makers, as has the dramatic drop in equipment prices. The first film to take full advantage of this change was Kunert and Manes of Iraq, where 150 DV cameras were sent to Iraq during the war and passed out to Iraqis to record themselves.Documentaries without wordsFilms in the documentary form without words have been made. From 1982, the trilogy and the similar Baraka could be described as visual tone poems, with music related to the images, but no spoken content. Koyaanisqatsi (part of the Qatsi trilogy) consists primarily of motion and time-lapse photography of cities and many natural landscapes across the States. Baraka tries to capture the great pulse of humanity as it flocks and swarms in daily activity and religious ceremonies.Bodysong was made in 2003 and won a British Independent Film Award for Best British Documentary.The 2004 film Genesis shows animal and plant life in states of expansion, decay, sex, and death, with some, but little, narration.Other documentary formsCompilation filmsCompilation films were pioneered in 1927 by Esfir Schub with The Fall of the Romanov Dynasty. More recent examples include Point of Order (1964), directed by de Antonio about the McCarthy hearings and Atomic Cafe which is made entirely out of found footage that various agencies of the U.S. government made about the safety of nuclear radiation (for example,, telling troops at one point that its safe to be irradiated as long as they keep their eyes and mouths shut). Similarly, Last Cigarette combines the testimony of various tobacco company executives before the Congress with archival propaganda extolling the virtues of smoking.See also * documentary* media* film* Docudrama* Docufiction* film festivals* mode* Practice* Ethnofiction* film* Filmmaking* of documentaries* List of motion picture-related topics* of directors and producers of documentaries* Mockumentary* film* documentary* video* Cinema* television* film* film* Rockumentary* documentary* anthropology* documentary* CinemaSome Documentary Film Awards* Award for Documentary Feature* Ivens Award, Documentary Film Festival Amsterdam (IDFA), (named after Ivens)* Grand Prize du RelNotes and referencesSources and bibliography* Aitken, Ian (ed.). Encyclopedia of the Documentary Film. New York: Routledge, 2005. ISBN 978-1-57958-445-0.* Barnouw, Erik. Documentary: A History of the Non-Fiction Film, 2nd rev. ed. New York: University Press, 1993. ISBN 978-0-19-507898-5. Still a useful introduction.* Burnett. Reflections on the Documentary Cinema* Burton, Julianne (ed.). The Social Documentary in Latin America. Pittsburgh, Penn.: of Pittsburgh Press, 1990. ISBN 978-0-8229-3621-3.* Dawson, Jonathan. Dziga Vertov.* Ellis, Jack C., and Betsy A. McLane. A New History of Documentary Film. New York: Continuum International, 2005. ISBN 978-0-8264-1750-3, ISBN 978-0-8264-1751-0.* Goldsmith, David A. The Documentary Makers: Interviews with 15 of the Best in the Business. Hove, East Sussex: RotoVision, 2003. ISBN 978-2-88046-730-2.* Klotman, Phyllis R. and Culter, Janet K.(eds.). Struggles for Representation  African American Documentary Film and Video Bloomington and Indianapolis, IN: Indiana University Press, 1999. ISBN 978-0-253-21347-1.* Leach, Jim, and Jeannette Sloniowski (eds.). Candid Eyes: Essays on Canadian Documentaries. Toronto; Buffalo: of Toronto Press, 2003. ISBN 978-0-8020-4732-8, ISBN 978-0-8020-8299-2.* Nichols, Bill. Introduction to Documentary, Bloomington, Ind.: University Press, 2001. ISBN 978-0-253-33954-6, ISBN 978-0-253-21469-0.* Nichols, Bill. Representing Reality: Issues and Concepts in Documentary. Bloomington, Ind.: Indiana University Press, 1991. ISBN 978-0-253-34060-3, ISBN 978-0-253-20681-7.* Nornes, Markus. Forest of Pressure: Ogawa Shinsuke and Postwar Japanese Documentary. Minneapolis: of Minnesota Press, 2007. ISBN 978-0-8166-4907-5, ISBN 978-0-8166-4908-2.* Nornes, Markus. Japanese Documentary Film: The Meiji Era through Hiroshima. Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 2003. ISBN 978-0-8166-4045-4, ISBN 978-0-8166-4046-1.* Rotha, Paul, Documentary diary; An Informal History of the British Documentary Film, 19281939. New York: Hill and Wang, 1973. ISBN 978-0-8090-3933-3.* Saunders, Dave. Direct Cinema: Observational Documentary and the Politics of the Sixties. London: Wallflower Press, 2007. ISBN 978-1-905674-16-9, ISBN 978-1-905674-15-2.* Saunders, Dave. Documentary: The Routledge Film Guidebook. London: Routledge, 2010.* Tobias, Michael. The Search for Reality  the Art of Documentary Filmmaking. Studio City, CA: Michael Wiese Productions 1997. ISBN 0-941188-62-0* Walker, Janet, and Diane Waldeman (eds.). Feminism and Documentary. Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 1999. ISBN 978-0-8166-3006-6, ISBN 978-0-8166-3007-3.* Wyver, John. The Moving Image: An International History of Film, Television & Radio. Oxford: Blackwell Ltd. in association with the Film Institute, 1989. ISBN 978-0-631-15529-4.* Murdoch.edu, Documentary  reading listEthnographic film* Emilie de Brigard, The History of Ethnographic Film, in Principles of Visual Anthropology, ed. Paul Hockings. Berlin and New York: Mouton de Gruyter, 1995, pp. 1343.* Leslie Devereaux, Cultures, Disciplines, Cinemas, in Fields of Vision. Essays in Film Studies, Visual Anthropology and Photography, ed. Leslie Devereaux & Roger Hillman. Berkeley: University of California Press, 1995, pp. 329339.* Faye Ginsburg, Lila Abu-Lughod and Brian Larkin (eds.), Media Worlds: Anthropology on New Terrain. Berkeley, CA: of California Press, 2002. ISBN 978-0-520-23231-0.* Anna Grimshaw, The Ethnographers Eye: Ways of Seeing in Modern Anthropology. Cambridge, UK: University Press, 2001. ISBN 978-0-521-77310-2.* G. Heider, Ethnographic Film. Austin: of Texas Press, 1994.* de Heusch, Cinma et Sciences Sociales, Paris: UNESCO, 1962. Published in English as The Cinema and Social Science. A Survey of Ethnographic and Sociological Films. UNESCO, 1962.* Jameson, Signatures of the Visible. New York & London: Routledge, 1990.* Pierre-L. Jordan, Premier Contact-Premier Regard, Marseille: Muses de Marseille. Images en Manoeuvres Editions, 1992.* Leroi-Gourhan, Cinma et Sciences Humaines. Le Film Ethnologique Existe-t-il?, Revue de Gographie Humaine et dEthnologie 3 (1948), pp. 4250.* MacDougall, Transcultural Cinema. Princeton, NJ: University Press, 1998. ISBN 978-0-691-01234-6.* David MacDougall, Whose Story Is It?, in Ethnographic Film Aesthetics and Narrative Traditions, ed. Peter I. Crawford and Jan K. Simonsen. Aarhus, Intervention Press, 1992, pp. 2542.* Tobing Rony, The Third Eye: Race, Cinema and Ethnographic Spectacle. Durham, NC: University Press, 1996. ISBN 978-0-8223-1840-8.* Sadoul, Histoire Gnrale du Cinma. Vol. 1, LInvention du Cinma 18321897. Paris: Denel, 1977, pp. 73110.* Sorlin, Sociologie du Cinma, Paris: Aubier Montaigne, 1977, pp. 774.* Charles Warren, Introduction, with a Brief History of Nonfiction Film, in Beyond Document. Essays on Nonfiction Film, ed. Charles Warren. Hanover and London: University Press, 1996, pp. 122.* Ismail Xavier, Cinema: Revelao e Engano, in O Olhar, ed. Adauto Novaes. So Paulo: Companhia das Letras, 1993, pp. 367384.External links* Berkeley.edu, Documentary Classics  Videography of essential documentary films via UC Berkeley Media Resources Center* Documentary.org, International Documentary Associationfilmbn:filmca:Documentalfilmda:Dokumentarfilmde:Dokumentarfilmet:Dokumentaalfilmel:es:Documentalfilmoeu:Dokumentalfr:Documentairegl:Documentalgan:filmdokumenteris:Heimildarmyndit:Documentarioht:Documentariesdokumentalohu:Dokumentumfilmnl:Documentaireja:no:Dokumentarfilmdokumentalnypt:Documentriodocumentarscn:Ducumintariusimple:Documentaryfilmfi:Dokumenttielokuvasv:Dokumentrfilmth:filmti liuzh:
8408
Darwin,_Northern_Territory
 rainfall            1716.1Darwin ()(Macquarie Dictionary, Fourth Edition (2005). Melbourne, The Macquarie Library Pty Ltd. ISBN 1-876429-14-3)is the capital city of the Territory, Australia. Situated on the Sea, Darwin has a population of 127,500, making it by far the largest and most populated city in the sparsely populated Northern Territory, but the least populous of all Australias capital cities. It is the smallest and most northerly of the Australian capital cities, and acts as the Ends regional centre.Darwin has grown from a pioneer outpost and small port into one of Australias most modern and multicultural cities. Its proximity to Asia makes it an important Australian gateway to countries such as Indonesia and East Timor. The Highway begins in Darwin, ending at Port Augusta in South Australia.The city itself is built on a low bluff overlooking the harbour. Its suburbs spread out over some area, beginning at Lee Point in the north and stretching to Berrimah in the eastpast Berrimah, the Stuart Highway goes on to Darwins city, Palmerston, and its suburbs.The region, like the rest of the End, has a tropical climate, with a wet and a season. It receives heavy rainfall during the Wet, and is well known for its spectacular lightning.()The original inhabitants of the greater Darwin area are the Larrakia people. On 9 September 1839, HMS Beagle sailed into Darwin harbour during its surveying of the area. Clements Wickham named the region Port Darwin in honour of their former shipmate Darwin, who had sailed with them on the ships previous voyage which had ended in October 1836. The settlement there became the town of Palmerston in 1869, and was renamed Darwin in 1911.()Having been almost entirely rebuilt twice, once due to Japanese air raids during World War II, and again after being devastated by Tracy in 1974, the city is one of Australias most modern capitals.()() History The Aboriginal people of the Larrakia language group are the first inhabitants of the greater Darwin area.() They had routes with Southeast Asia (see contact with Australia), and imported goods from as far afield as South and Western Australia. Established songlines penetrated throughout the country, allowing stories and histories to be told and retold along the routes.The Dutch visited Australias northern coastline in the 1600s, and created the first European maps of the area. This accounts for the Dutch names in the area, such as Land and Eylandt.The first British person to see Darwin harbour appears to have been Lieutenant Lort Stokes of HMS Beagle on 9 September 1839. The ships captain, Commander Clements Wickham, named the port after Darwin, the British naturalist who had sailed with them both on the earlier second expedition of the Beagle.In the early 1870s Darwin felt the effects of a gold rush at Pine Creek after employees of the Overland Telegraph Line found gold while digging holes for telegraph poles.In early 1875 Darwins European population had grown to approximately 300 because of the gold rush. On 17 February 1875 the SS Gothenburg left Darwin en route for Adelaide. The approximately 88 passengers and 34 crew (surviving records vary) included government officials, circuit-court judges, Darwin residents taking their first furlough and miners. While travelling south along the north Queensland coast, the Gothenburg encountered a cyclone-strength storm and was wrecked on a section of the Barrier Reef. Only 22 men survived, while between 98 and 112 people perished. Many passengers who perished were Darwin residents and news of the tragedy severely affected the small community, which reportedly took several years to recover.() 1900 to present File:Darwin 2089.jpg|thumb|right|240px|Remains of Palmerston Town Hall, destroyed by TracyThe Northern Territory was initially settled and administered by South Australia until its transfer to federal jurisdiction in 1911. On 5 February 1869, Goyder, the Surveyor-General of South Australia, established a small settlement of 135 people at Port Darwin. Goyder named the settlement Palmerston, after the British Prime Minister Lord Palmerston. In 1870, the first poles for the Overland Telegraph were erected in Darwin, connecting Australia to the rest of the world. The discovery of gold at Pine Creek in the 1880s further boosted the young colonys development. On transfer to federal administration in 1911, Darwin became the citys official name.The period between 1911 and 1919 was filled with political turmoil, particularly with trade union unrest, which culminated on 17 December 1918. Led by Harold Nelson, some 1000 demonstrators marched to Government House at Liberty Square in Darwin where they burnt an effigy of the of the Northern Territory John Gilruth and demanded his resignation. The incident became known as the Rebellion. Their grievances were against the two main Northern Territory employers: Vesteys Meatworks and the federal government. Both Gilruth and the Vestey company left Darwin soon afterwards.Around 10,000 Allied troops arrived in Darwin in the early 1940s at the outset of World War II, in order to defend Australias northern coastline. On 19 February 1942 at 0957, 188 Japanese warplanes attacked Darwin in two waves. It was the same fleet that had bombed Harbor, though a considerably larger number of bombs were dropped on Darwin than on Pearl Harbor. The attack killed at least 243 people and caused immense damage to the town. These were by far the most serious attacks on Australia in time of war, in terms of fatalities and damage. They were the first of many raids on Darwin.Despite this major attack, Darwins development was furthered considerably during the war, with sealed roads constructed connecting the region to Alice Springs in the south and Mount Isa in the south-east, and Manton Dam built in the south to provide the city with water. On Day (26 January) 1959, Darwin was granted city status.(Australia Day (Darwin))On 25 December 1974 Darwin was struck by Tracy, which killed 71 people and destroyed over 70% of the towns buildings, including many old stone buildings such as the Palmerston Town Hall, which could not withstand the lateral forces generated by the strong winds. After the disaster, 30,000 people of a then population of 43,000 were evacuated, in what turned out to be the biggest airlift in Australias history.( The town was subsequently rebuilt with newer materials and techniques during the late 1970s by the Darwin Reconstruction Commission, led by former Brisbane Lord Mayor Jones. A satellite city of Palmerston was built  south of Darwin in the early 1980s.On 17 September 2003 the railway was completed. Geography Darwin is situated in the Northern Territory, on the Sea. The town proper is built on a low bluff overlooking Darwin harbour, flanked by Frances Bay to the east and Cullen Bay to the west. The remainder of the city is flat and low-lying, and coastal areas are home to recreational reserves, extensive beaches, and excellent fishing.Darwin is closer to the capitals of five other countries than to the capital of Australia: Darwin is  away from Canberra. Dili (East Timor) is , Moresby (Papua New Guinea) is , Jakarta (Indonesia) is , Seri Begawan (Brunei) is , and Melekeok (Palau) is  from Darwin.Even Singapore is only slightly farther away at , as is Manila (Philippines) at , and Honiara (Solomon Islands) at .( ) Ambon, Indonesia, is only  away from Darwin.Along with its importance as a gateway to Asia, Darwin also acts as an access point for the National Park, Land, and northerly islands such as Eylandt and the Islands. The city is the largest in the area, and provides services for these remote settlements. City and suburbs 280px|thumb|Map of Darwin with suburbsthumb|left|upright|Mitchell Street in Darwin CBDDarwin and its suburbs spread in an approximately triangular shape, with the older south-western suburbsand the city itselfforming one corner, the newer northern suburbs in another, and the eastern suburbs, progressing towards Palmerston, forming the third.The older part of Darwin is separated from the newer northern suburbs by International Airport and Royal Australian Air Force Base. Palmerston is a satellite city  south of Darwin that was established in the 1980s and is one of the fastest growing municipalities in Australia.() The rural areas of Darwin including Howard Springs, Humpty Doo and Berry Springs are experiencing strong growth.()Darwins central business district is bounded by Daly Street in the north-west, McMinn Street in the north-east, Mitchell Street on the south-west and Bennett Street on the south-east. The CBD has been the focus of a number of major projects, including the billion dollar redevelopment of the Stokes Hill wharf waterfront area including a convention centre with seating for 1500 people and approximately  of exhibition space. The development will also include hotels, residential apartments and public space.()The citys main industrial areas are along the Stuart Highway going towards Palmerston, centred on Winnellie. The largest shopping precinct in the area is Square.The most expensive residential areas are located along the coast in suburbs such as Larrakeyah and Brinkin,() despite the slight risk these low-lying regions face during cyclones and higher tides.() The inner northern suburbs of Millner and Coconut Grove and the eastern suburb of Karama are home to lower-income households, although low-income Territory Housing units are scattered throughout the metropolitan area.() Climate thumb|left|240px|Wet Season storm at nightDarwin has a tropical savannah climate (Kppen Awgi)()() with distinct wet and dry seasons and the average maximum temperature is similar all year round. The season runs from April/May to October (the southern hemisphere winter), during which nearly every day is warm and sunny, and afternoon humidity averages around 30%.()There is very little rainfall between May and September. In the coolest months of June and July, the daily minimum temperature may dip as low as , but very rarely lower, and frost has never been recorded.The wet season is associated with cyclones and monsoon rains.() The majority of rainfall occurs between December and March (the southern hemisphere summer), when thunderstorms are common and afternoon relative humidity averages over 70 per cent during the wettest months.( It does not rain every day during the wet season, but most days are warm to hot with plentiful cloud cover; January averages under 6 hours of bright sunshine daily. Darwins highest Bureau of Meteorology verified daily rainfall total is 367.6 mm, which fell when Cyclone Carlos bore down on the Darwin area on 16 February 2011()The hottest month is November, just before the onset of the main rainy season. Because of its long dry season, Darwin has the most daily average sunshine hours (8.4) of any Australian capital with the most sunshine from April to November. The sun passes directly overhead in mid October and mid February.()Climatically Darwin has more in common with Singapore than Sydney because it sits well inside the tropical zone.Darwin is located in one of the most lightning-prone areas in the world. On 31 January 2002, an early morning line produced over 5,000 cloud to ground lightning strikes within a  radius of Darwin alone which is about 3 times the amount of lightning that Western Australia, experiences on average in an entire year.(()dateSeptember 2010 Demographics 127500In 2006, the largest ancestry groups in Darwin were, Australian (42,221 or 36.9 per cent), English (29,766 or 26 per cent), Irish (9,561 or 8.3 per cent), Scottish (7,815 or 6.8 per cent), Chinese (3,502 or 3 per cent), Greek (2,828 or 2.4 per cent) and Italian (2,367 or 2 per cent)()Darwins population is notable for the highest proportional population of Aborigines of any Australian capital city.() In the 2006 census 10,259 (9.7 per cent) of Darwins population was Aboriginal.Darwins population changed after the Second World War. Darwin, like many other Australian cities, experienced influxes from Europe, with significant numbers of Italians and Greeks during the 1960s and 1970s. Darwin also started to experience an influx from other European countries, which included the Dutch, Germans and many others.() A significant percentage of Darwins residents are recent immigrants from South East Asia (Australians were 9.3% of Darwins population in 2001).Darwins population comprises people from many ethnic backgrounds. The 2006 Census revealed that the most common places of birth for overseas migrants were the United Kingdom (3.4 per cent), New Zealand (2.1 per cent), the Philippines (1.4 per cent) and East Timor (0.9 per cent). 18.3 percent of the citys population was born overseas, which is less than the Australian average of 22%(Darwin has a youthful population with an average age of 32 years (compared to the national average of around 35 years)( assisted to a large extent by the military presence and the fact that many people opt to retire elsewhere.()The most common languages spoken in Darwin after English are Greek, Italian, Indonesian, Vietnamese and Cantonese.( Religion Christianity is the most professed faith in Darwin with 56,613 followers accounting for 49.5 per cent of the population of the city.() The largest denominations of Christianity are Roman Catholicism (24,538 or 21.5 per cent), Anglicanism (14,028 or 12.3 per cent) and Orthodox (2,964 or 2.6 per cent).() Buddhists, Muslims, Hindus and Jews account for 3.2 per cent of Darwins population. There were 26,695 or 23.3 per cent of people professing no religion. Population growth Darwin is one of the fastest growing capital cities in Australia, with an annual growth rate of 2.6 per cent since the 2006 census. In recent years, the Palmerston and Litchfield parts of the Darwin statistical division have recorded the highest growth in population of any Territory Government Area and by 2016 Litchfield could overtake Palmerston as the second largest municipality in metropolitan Darwin.() It is predicted by 2021 that the combined population of both Palmerston and Litchfield would be 101,546 people.() Law and government The Darwin City Council (Incorporated under the Northern Territory Local Government Act 1993) governs the of Darwin which takes in the CBD and the suburbs. The Darwin City Council has governed the City of Darwin since 1957. The Darwin City Council consists of 13 elected members, the Mayor and 12 aldermen.The City of Darwin electorate is organised into four electoral units or wards. The names of the wards are Chan, Lyons, Richardson, and Waters. The constituents of each ward are directly responsible for electing three aldermen. Constituents of all wards are directly responsible for electing the Lord Mayor of Darwin.() The current mayor is Sawyer after council elections in March 2008() replacing Lambert, who took over from previous mayor Peter Adamson.()The rest of the Darwin area is divided into 2 local government areas. One of these is designated as a City, and the second, which is on the citys outer fringe, has the title of Shire. These areas have elected councils which are responsible for functions delegated to them by the Territory Government, such as planning and garbage collection.The Legislative Assembly of the Northern Territory convenes in Darwin in the Northern Territory Parliament House. Government House, the official residence of the of the Northern Territory, is located on The Esplanade.Also located on the Esplanade is the Supreme Court of the Northern Territory. Darwin has a Magistrates Court also which is located on the corner of Cavenagh and Bennett Streets quite close to the Darwin City Council Chambers.Darwins police force are members of the Territory Police Force. Darwins Mitchell Street, with its numerous pubs, clubs and other entertainment venues, is policed by the CitySafe Unit. The CitySafe unit was recently credited with reducing violent crime in and around Darwin City.(Jane Bardon (Thu 23 Jul 2009) Crime statistics show fall in sex assaults ABC News) Darwin has a long record of alcohol abuse and violent crime with 6000 assaults in 2009,(Australian city of Darwin named broken jaw capital of the world, Daily Telegraph, 7 January 2010) of which 350 resulted in broken jaws and noses  more than anywhere else in the world, according to the Royal Darwin Hospital.( Economy 240px|thumb|Darwin CBD (Central Business District), circa 2005The two largest economic sectors are mining and tourism. Mining and energy industry production exceeds $2.5 billion per annum.() The most important mineral resources are gold, zinc and bauxite, along with manganese and many others. The energy production is mostly off shore with oil and natural gas from the Timor Sea, although there are significant uranium deposits near Darwin. Tourism employs 8% of Darwin residents, and is expected to grow as domestic and international tourists are now spending time in Darwin during the Wet and Dry seasons. Federal spending is a major contributor to the local economy as well.The military presence that is maintained both within Darwin, and the wider Northern Territory, is a substantial source of employment. The continued involvement of the Army in the stabilisation of East Timor has swelled the military population of Darwin to over 11,000 individuals as of 2001. There is also a substantial United Nations presence in Darwin, since Darwin serves as the staging center for UN workers and contractors en route to nearby East Timor.Darwins importance as a port is expected to grow, due to the increased exploitation of petroleum in the nearby Timor Sea, and to the completion of the railway link and continued expansion in trade with Asia.During 2005, a number of major construction projects started in Darwin. One is the redevelopment of the Wharf Precinct, which includes a large convention and exhibition centre, apartment housing including Pandanas and on Gardiner, retail and entertainment outlets including a large wave pool and safe swimming lagoon. The Chinatown project has also started with plans to construct multi-level carparks, Chinese-themed retail and dining outlets.() Education |240px|thumb|Charles Darwin University LibraryEducation is overseen territory-wide by the Department of Education and Training (DET), whose role is to continually improve education outcomes for all students, with a focus on Indigenous students.(Department of Education and Training  About the Department) Preschool, primary and secondary Darwin is served by a number of public and private schools that cater to local and overseas students. Over 16,500 primary and secondary students are enrolled in schools in Darwin, with 10,524 students attending primary education, and 5,932 students attending secondary education.(ABS Education Census Table) There are over 12,089 students enrolled in government schools and 2,124 students enrolled in independent schools.(There were 9,764 students attending schools in the of Darwin area. 6,045 students attended primary schools and 3,719 students attended secondary schools. There are over 7,161 students enrolled in government schools and 1,108 students enrolled in independent schools.(City of Darwin Community Profile Education institute attending)  There are over 35 primary and pre  schools, and 12 secondary schools including both government and non-government. Most schools in the city are secular, but there are a small number of Christian, Catholic and Lutheran institutions. Students intending to complete their secondary education work towards the Territory Certificate of Education, which is recognised in all states and territories. Many of the schools are undergoing renovations and reconstruction. Schools have been restructured into Primary, Middle and High schools since the beginning of 2007. Tertiary and vocational Darwins largest University is the Darwin University which is the central provider of tertiary education in the Northern Territory, it covers both vocational and academic courses, acting as both a university and an Institute of TAFE. There are over 5,500 students enrolled in tertiary and further education courses.( Recreation and culture 240px|thumb|right|Mindil Beach markets Events and festivals On 1 July, Territorians celebrate Territory Day. This is the only day of the year, apart from the Chinese New Year, when fireworks are permitted. In Darwin, the main celebrations occur at Mindil Beach, where a large firework display is commissioned by the government.Weekly markets include Mindil Beach Sunset Markets(Mindil Beach Sunset Markets) (Thursdays and Sundays during the dry season), Parap Market, Nightcliff Market and Rapid Creek market.() Mindil Beach Sunset Markets are very popular with locals and tourists alike and feature food, souvenirs, clothes and local performing artists. The Darwin Festival(Darwin Festival) held annually, includes comedy, dance, theatre, music, film and visual art and the Indigenous Music Awards. Other festivals include the Glenti, which showcases Darwins large Greek community, and India@Mindil, a similar festival held by the smaller Indian community. The New Year is also celebrated with great festivity, highlighting the Asian influence in Darwin.The Seabreeze festival, which first started in 2005, is held on the second week of May in the suburb of Nightcliff. It offers the opportunity for local talent to be showcased and a popular event is Saturday family festivities along the Nightcliff foreshore which is one of Darwins most popular fitness tracks.The Speargrass Festival is held annually the week prior to Julys first full moon and celebrates the alternative End lifestyle. The festival activities include music, screening of locally produced films, screen printing, basket weaving, sweat lodge, water slides, human pyramid, hot tub, frisbee golf, spear throwing, Kubb competition, bingo, communal organic cooking, morning yoga, meditation, greasy pig and healing circles. The festival occurs at the Speargrass property,  northeast of Pine Creek.The beer-can regatta, held in August, celebrates Darwins love affair with beer and contestants race boats made exclusively of beer cans. Also in Darwin during the month of August, are the Darwin Cup horse race, and the Rodeo and Mud Crab Tying Competition.The Solar Challenge race attracts teams from around the world, most of which are fielded by universities or corporations although some are fielded by high schools. The race has a 20-year history spanning nine races, with the inaugural event taking place in 1987. Arts and entertainment 240px|thumb|Darwin FestivalThe Symphony Orchestra was first assembled in 1989,() and has performed throughout the Territory. The Darwin Theatre Company is a locally produced professional theatre production company, performing locally and nationally.()The Entertainment Centre is the citys main concert venue and hosts theatre and orchestral performances.() Other theatres include the Convention Centre, opened in July 2008. The Darwin Convention Centre is part of the $1.1 billion Darwin Waterfront project.()Darwins only casino opened in 1981 as the Diamond Beach Casino, it later became the Grand Darwin, before it changed to Darwin after Entertainment Group purchased the hotel in 2004.()Darwin is home to the Indo-Pacific Marine & Australian Pearling Exhibition, which houses an aquarium with living coral and complementary sea life. The Northern Territory Museum and Art Gallery() in Darwin gives an overview of the history of the area, including exhibits on Cyclone Tracy and the boats of the Pacific Islands. The Point Military museum tells the story of the Japanese air raids on Darwin during WWII.The Darwin Festival and the Fringe festival are annual events. A range of art galleries including specialised Aboriginal art galleries are a feature of Darwin.Local and visiting musical bands can be heard at venues including the Entertainment Centre, The Vic Hotel, Happy Yess, and Browns Mart. An yearly music festival, in the Grass, is very popular with youth from the surrounding area. Artists such as Mauboy and Groovesmiths call Darwin home.There have been no major films set in Darwin; however, some scenes for Australia by Luhrmann()() and Black Water() were both shot in Darwin in 2007Mitchell Street in the central business district is lined with nightclubs, takeaways, and restaurants. This is the citys entertainment hub. There are several smaller theatres, three cinema complexes (CBD, Casuarina, and Palmerston), and the Deckchair Cinema.(Darwin Deckchair Cinema) This is an open-air cinema which operates through the dry season, from April to October, and screens independent and arthouse films. Recreation right|thumb|240px|A walk at Casuarina BeachThe city has many kilometres of wide, unpolluted beaches, including the Casuarina Beach and well renowned Mindil Beach, home of the Mindil Beach markets. Darwin City Council has designated an area of Casuarina Beach as a free beach which offers a designated nudist beach area since 1976.(Free Beaches Australia)Swimming in the sea during the months of OctoberMay should be avoided due to the presence of deadly jellyfish, known locally as sea wasps.crocodiles are very common in all waterways surrounding Darwin and are even occasionally found swimming in Darwin Harbour and on local beaches.Fishing is one of the recreations of Darwin locals. Visitors from around the world flock to Darwin aiming to catch the prized barramundi, an iconic fish for the region. The Mary River, River, South and Alligator River are just a few of the water bodies where the barramundi thrive.Blue-water fishing is also available off the coast of Darwin; mackerel, Black Jewfish, queenfish, snapper and other varieties are all found in the area and accessible in a day trip from Darwin. Alexander is a man-made lake which is generally considered safe, bar a freak jellyfish outbreak in 2003,() and is located at East Point Reserve.The Darwin Surf Lifesaving Club(Darwin Surf Lifesaving Club) operates long boats and surf skis and provides events and lifesaving accreditations. Parks and gardens Darwin has extensive parks and gardens. These include the Brown Darwin Botanic Gardens, East Point Reserve, Casuarina Coastal Reserve, Darwin National Park, Lagoons Conservation Reserve, Leanyer Recreation Park, the Nightcliff Foreshore, Bicentennial Park and the Jingili Water Gardens. Sports The Marrara Sports Complex near the airport has stadiums for Aussie Rules (Stadium), cricket, union, basketball (and indoor court sports), soccer, athletics and hockey. Every two years since 1991 (excluding 2003 due to the SARS outbreak), Darwin has played host to the Games,(Arafura Games) a major regional sporting event. In July 2003, the city hosted its first international cricket match between Australia and Bangladesh, followed by Australia and Sri Lanka in 2004.Australian-rules football and league are played all year round. Melbournes Bulldogs Football League side plays one home game at Marrara Oval each year. The ATSIC Aboriginal All-Stars also participate in the AFL pre-season competition. In 2003, a record crowd of 17,500() attended a pre-season game between the All-Stars and Football Club at Marrara.Darwin hosts a round of the Supercars every year bringing thousands of motorsports fans to the Valley Raceway.The Darwin Cup culminating on the first Monday of August is a very popular horse race event for Darwin and draws large crowds every year to Fannie Bay Racecourse. While it is not as popular as the Cup, it does draw a crowd and, in 2003, Racing began televising most of the races. The Darwin Cup day is a public holiday for the Northern Territory (Picnic Day public holiday). Media Nine Darwin headquarters which is located in the inner city suburb of The GardensDarwins major newspapers are the Territory News (Monday  Saturday), Sunday Territorian (Sunday), and the national daily, Australian (Monday  Friday) and Weekend Australian (Saturday), all published by Limited. Free weekly community newspapers include the Sun, the Litchfield Sun, and Palmerston Sun; all published by a News Limited subsidiary.Five free-to-air channels service Darwin. Commercial television channels are provided by Southern Cross Darwin (Network affiliate), Channel Nine Darwin (formerly branded as Channel 8) and Digital Television (Ten relay), which launched on 28 April 2008. The two Government owned national broadcast services in Darwin are the ABC and SBS. Subscription Television (Pay TV) service Austar is available via cable in the Darwin region.Darwin has radio stations on both AM and FM frequencies. ABC stations include News Radio (102.5FM), ABC Local Radio (105.7FM), ABC Radio National (657AM), Classic FM (107.3FM) and J (103.3FM). SBS (102.5FM) also broadcasts its national radio network to Darwin.Darwin has two commercial radio stations Hot 100 and 104.9. Other stations in Darwin include university-based station Territory FM, dance music station FM 91.5, Italian language channel Italia 1611AM, community based stations includes Larrakia 94.5 and Radio 1530AM and FM 97.7. Infrastructure thumb|right|240px|Royal Darwin Hospital Health The of the Northern Territory Department of Health and Families oversees one public hospital in the Darwin metropolitan region. The Darwin Hospital, located in Tiwi, is the citys major teaching and referral hospital, and the largest in the Northern Territory.()There is one major private hospital Darwin Private Hospital located at Tiwi, opposite the Royal Darwin Hospital. Transport The Territorys public transport services are managed by the Department of Lands and Planning, Public Transport Division. Darwin has an efficient and affordable bus network serviced by a range of contracted bus operators, which provides transport to the main suburbs of Darwin.Darwin has no commuter rail system, however long distance passenger rail services do operate out of the city. The Alice Springs to Darwin rail line was completed in 2003 linking Darwin to Adelaide. The first service ran in 2004. Ghan passenger train service from Adelaide via Springs and Katherine runs two to three times per week depending on the season.International Airport, located in the suburb of Marrara, is Darwins only airport, which shares its runways with the Australian Air Forces Base Darwin.Darwin can be reached via the Highway which runs the length of the Northern Territory from Darwin through Katherine, Tennant Creek, Alice Springs and on to Adelaide. Other major roads in Darwin include, Brennan Drive, Johnson Avenue, Dick Ward Drive, Bagot Road, Trower Road and McMillans Road. Bus service in the greater Darwin area is served by Darwinbus.Ferries leave from Port Darwin to island locations, mainly for tourists. A ferry service to the Islands, the Arafura Pearl operates from Cullen Bay.Darwin has a new deepwater port at Darwin East Arm, which is capable of handling Panamax sized ships. Utilities Water storage, supply and Power for Darwin is managed by and Water Corporation, which is owned by the of the Northern Territory. The corporation is also responsible for management of sewage and the major water catchments in the region. Water is mainly stored in the largest dam, The Darwin River Dam which holds up to 90% of Darwins water supply. For many years, Darwins principal water supply came from Manton Dam.Darwin, its suburbs, Palmerston and Katherine are powered by the Channel Island Power Station, The largest power plant in the Territory.A new power plant, the Weddell Power Station, is currently near completion. The first two generators came on line in 20082009. The third generator is due to be completed in 201112. When the power station is fully operational, it will add 30% capacity to Darwins power supply.() Tourism File:Charles Darwin National Park.jpg|right|thumb|240px|Picnic area located Darwin National ParkTourism is one of Darwins largest industries. Tourism is a major industry and employment sector for the Northern Territory.In 2005/06, 1.38 million people visited the Northern Territory. They stayed for 9.2 million nights and spent over $1.5 billion.(Tourism NT)The tourism industry directly employed 8,391 Territorians in June 2006 and when indirect employment is included, tourism typically accounts for more than 14,000 jobs across the Territory.Darwin is a hub for tours to National Park,(Kakadu National Park) National Park(Litchfield National Park) and Gorge.The Territory is traditionally divided into the wet and dry, but there are up to six traditional seasons in Darwin.It is warm and sunny from May to September. Humidity rises during the green season, from October to April bringing thunderstorms and monsoonal rains which rejuvenates the landscape. Tourism is largely seasonal with most tourists visiting during the cooler dry season which runs from April to September. Aviation history thumb|240px|Darwin Aviation Heritage Centre  1st Ultralight  Hover BirdDarwin has played host to many of aviations early pioneers. On 10 December 1919 Captain Ross Smith and his crew landed in Darwin and won a 10,000 Prize from the Australian Government for completing the first flight from London to Australia in under thirty days. Smith and his Crew flew a Vimy, G-EAOU and landed on an airstrip that has now become Ross Smith Avenue.Other aviation pioneers include Johnson, Earhart, Sir Kingsford Smith and Hinkler. The original QANTAS Empire Airways Ltd Hangar, part of the original Darwin Civil Aerodrome in Parap, is now a museum and still bears scars from the bombing of Darwin during World War II.(QANTAS hangar)Darwin was home to Australian and US pilots during the war, with air strips being built in and around Darwin. Today Darwin provides a staging ground for exercises.Darwin was a compulsory stop over/check point in the London to Melbourne Centenary Air Race in 1934. The official name of the race was the Air Race. Winners of the great race were Campbell Black and W. A. Scott.The following is an excerpt from Time magazine, 29 October 1934, Volume XXIV, Number 18.The Australian Aviation Heritage Centre is located approximately  from the City centre on the Stuart Highway and is one of only two places outside the United States where a B52 bomber (on permanent loan from the United States Air Force) is on public display.()()Sister Cities See also * of Darwin suburbs* of films shot in Darwin* of Mayors and Lord Mayors of Darwin* of people from Darwin* Government Areas of the Northern Territory References  External links  * Darwin at the Bureau of Statistics (2001 Census).* Darwin City Council* Darwin City Council Library Service* Northern Territory Government Portal* Tourism Information* Future projects in Darwin* Aboriginal Art* Hospitals in Darwin* Power and Water in Darwin* Darwin Travel and Visitors Guide* Historyaf:Darwin (hr) zh-min-nan:Darwin()bg:(Austrlia)(Austrlie)Tiriogaeth y Gogledd(Northern Territory)(Northern Territory)(Austraalia)(Australia)(Astralio)(Australia)()fo:Darwin(Australie)(Austraalje)Croch an Tuaiscirt(Australia)( )(grad)Wilayah Utara()(strala)(Australia)( )jv:Darwin()(Territorium Septentrionale)lv:Drvina(Australien)(Australija)li:Darwin(Ausztrlia)Wilayah Utarana:Darwin(Australi)()pih:Daarwin(Australia)(Austrlia)pnb:pl:Darwin(Austrlia)(Teritoriul de Nord)()sah:()Northren TerritoryNorthern Territory(Austrlia)(mesto)( )(Australia)Northern Territory()Kuzey Blgesi()(c)Amihanan nga Teritoryo()
9351
Economy_of_Egypt
spelling In north eastern Egypt, the Delta is where most Egyptian economic activity takes place. In the last 30 years, the government has reformed the highly centralized economy it inherited from President Abdel Nasser.During the 1990s, a series of Monetary Fund arrangements, coupled with massive external debt relief resulting from Egypts participation in the War coalition, helped Egypt improve its macroeconomic performance. Since the turn of the new millennium,  the pace of structural reforms, including fiscal,  monetary policies, privatization and new business legislations, helped Egypt to move towards a more market-oriented economy and prompted increased foreign investment. The reforms and policies have strengthened macroeconomic annual growth results which averaged 5% annually but the government largely failed to equitably share the wealth and the benefits of growth have failed to trickle down to improve economic conditions for the broader population, especially with the growing problem of unemployment and underemployment among youth under the age of 30 years. A youth protest demanding more political freedoms, fighting corruption and delivering improved living standards forced President Mubarak to step down on February 11, 2011. In the Post-Mubarak Era the Egyptian economy faces a rocky road to stabilize the economy after 18 days of protests which may cut economic growth in the Fiscal Year ending June 2011 to about 2%.Macroeconomic trendEgypt has a stable economy in the Middle East and North Africa enjoying continuous growth, averaging 4%5% in the past quarter-century.  The economy embarked on various stages of development during which the public and private sectors played roles varying in relative importance:*Import substitution and nationalization, 19521966, during which the first program of industrialization in 1957 was established and led by the public sector in heavy industries such as iron and steel and chemical industries.  Nationalization reduced the relative importance of the private sector.*Inter-War, 19671973, adversely affected the performance of the economy and public sector role in import substitution.*Openness Euphoria, 19741982 during which policies were introduced to encourage Arab and foreign investment through a series of incentives and liberalizing trade and payment; the economy expanded but this proved unsustainable and growth consequently scaled back.*External Debt Crisis, 19821990, the external debt crisis and Club re-scheduling and debt reduction.*Economic Reform,  19912007, reform policies were introduced to meet the terms of international institutions, lenders and donors, including wider incentives to the role of the private sector in all economic activities.* The World Food Crisis, 2008, soaring food prices, especially for grains, led to calls for the government  to provide more immediate assistance to the population of more than 40% in the poverty tunnel and to strike a new deal on agriculture policy and reform.* The World Global Financial Crisis, 2008present, Egypt to face the repercussions of the global financial crisis on the national economy.* Economic Boom, Egypt now has a GDP of $500.9 Billion, and the growth rate has been rising exponentially ever sinceReform erathumb|left|225px|  Under comprehensive economic reforms initiated in 1991, Egypt has relaxed many controls, reduced subsidies, reduced inflation, cut taxes, and partially liberalized trade and investment. Manufacturing had become less dominated by the sector, especially in heavy industries. A process of public sector reform and privatization has begun to enhance opportunities for the sector. Agriculture, mainly in private hands, has been largely deregulated, with the exception of cotton and sugar production. Construction, non-financial services, and domestic wholesale and retail trades are largely private. This has promoted a steady increase of GDP and the annual growth rate.  The Government of Egypt tamed inflation bringing it down from double-digit to a single digit.  Currently, GDP is rising smartly by 7% per annum due to successful diversification.Gross domestic product (GDP) per capita based on purchasing-power-parity (PPP) increased fourfold between 1981 and 2006, from US$ 1355 in 1981, to US$ 2525 in 1991, to US$ 3686 in 2001 and to an estimated US$ 4535 in 2006.  Based on national currency, GDP per capita at constant 1999 prices increased from EGP 411 in 1981, to EGP 2098 in 1991, to EGP  5493 in 2001 and to EGP 8708 in 2006. Based on the  current US$ prices, GDP per capita increased from US$ 587 in 1981, to US$ 869 in 1991, to US$ 1461 in 2001 and to an estimated US$ 1518 (which translates to less than US$ 130 per month) in 2006. According to the Bank Country Classification, Egypt has been promoted from the low income category to lower middle income category.Mean wages were $2.45 per manhour in 2009.The reform programme is a work in progress. Noteworthy that the reform record has substantially improved since Nazif government came to power. Egypt has made substantial progress in developing its legal, tax and investment infrastructure. (See Nawar 2006) Indeed, over the past five years, Egypt has passed, amended and admitted over 15 legislative pieces. The economy is expected to grow by about 4% to 6% in 2009/2010.Surging domestic inflationary pressures from both economic growth and elevated international food prices led the Bank of Egypt to increase the overnight lending and deposit rates in sequential moves since February 2008. The rates stood at 11.5% and 13.5%, respectively, since 18 September 2008.The rise of the World Global Financial Crisis led to a set of fiscal-monetary policy measures to face its repercussions on the national economy, including reducing the overnight lending and deposit rates by 1% on 12 February 2009. The rates currently stand at 10.5% and 12.5%, respectively.(Central Bank of Egypt, MPC Press Releases)Reform of energy and food subsidies, privatization of the state-owned Bank of Cairo, and targeting are perhaps the most controversial economic issues in 2007/2008 and 2008/2009.External trade and remittancesthumb|left|Egyptian exports in 2006Egypts trade balance marked US$10.36 billion in FY2005 compared to US$7.5 billion.Egypts main exports consist of  natural gas, and non-petroleum products such as ready-made clothes, cotton textiles, medical and petrochemical products, citrus fruits, rice and dried onion, and more recently cement, steel, and ceramics.  Egypts main imports consist of  pharmaceuticals and non-petroleum products such as wheat, maize, cars and car spare parts. The current account grew from 0.7% of GDP in FY2002 to 3.3% at FY2005. Egypts Current Account made a surplus of US$4478 million in FY2005 compared to a deficit of US$158 million in FY2004.Italy and the USA are the top export markets for Egyptian goods and services. In the world, Egypt has the largest non-oil GDP as of 2005.According to the Organization for Migration, an estimated 2.7 million Egyptians abroad contribute actively to the development of their country through remittance inflows, circulation of human and social capital, as well as investment. In 2009 Egypt was the biggest recipient of remittances in the East; an estimated US$ 7.8 bn was received in 2009, representing approximately 5 % of national GDP, with a decline of 10% from 2008, due mostly to the effect of the financial crisis. According to data from Egypts Central Bank, the States was the top sending country of remittances (23%), followed by Kuwait (15%), the Arab Emirates (14%) and Arabia (9%).(http://www.egypt.iom.int/Doc/IOM%20Migration%20and%20Development%20in%20Egypt%20Facts%20and%20Figures%20(English).pdf)Public financesOn the revenues side, total revenues of the government were EGP 89.1 billion in FY2002 and are  projected to reach EGP184.7 bn in FY2008. Much of the increase came from  a rise in tax revenues, particularly personal income and corporate taxes which constituted the bulk of total domestic taxes,  due to recent tax reforms. This trend is likely to gradually widen the tax base in the forthcoming years.  Revenues, however, have remained more or less constant (about 21% ) as a percentage of the GDP over the past few years.On the expenditures side, strong expenditure growth has remained a main feature of the budget. This is mainly a result of continued strong expansion of (1) the public-sector wages driven by government pledges. Wages and Compensations increased from EGP30.5 bn in FY2002 to EGP59.6 bn in FY2008; (2) high interest payments on the public debt stock. Interest payments rose from EGP21.8 bn in FY2002 to EGP52.0 bn in FY2008.   Importantly,  dramatic increase in domestic debt which is projected to be roughly 62% of GDP in FY2008 up from 58.4% in FY2002; and (3) the costs of food and energy subsidies, which rose from EGP18.0 bn in FY2002 to EGP64.5 bn in FY2008.The overall deficit, after adjusting for net acquisition of financial assets, remains almost unchanged from the cash deficit. The budgets overall deficit of  EGP 43.8 bn or -10.2% of GDP for FY2002 has become 49.2 bn in FY2007, so that is narrowed to -6.7% of GDP. Deficit is financed largely by domestic borrowing and revenue from privatization sales, which became a standard accounting practice in budget Egypt.  The government aims at more sales of assets in FY2008.Recently, the fiscal conduct of the government was under strong criticism and heated debate and discussions in the Egyptian Parliament. In particular, reference was made to weak governance and management, loose implementation of tax collection procedures and penalties for offenders, and improper accounting of the overall system of basic subsidies and domestic debt, leading to domestic market disruptions,high inflation, increased inefficiencies and waste in the domestic economy.(These remarks on fiscal conduct and corruption were made in a recent report presented by the head of the Central Agency of Auditing, Gawdat El-Malat, and discussed by the Egyptian Parliament on January 1415, 2008.)Treasury bonds and notes issued to the Bank of Egypt constitute the bulk of the government domestic debt. Since FY2001, net government domestic  debt (i.e. after excluding budget sector deposits) has been rising  at a fluctuating but decreasing rate. In 2007, it  reached 65.4% up from 54.3% of GDP in 2001.External debtThe gross debt of Egypt, including the total public and private debt owed to non-residents repayable in foreign currency, goods, or servicesbased on the Ministry of Finance, the Central Bank of Egypt and World Factbookis estimated at US$29,898 million at the end of FY 2007.Opportunity cost of conflictA report(http://www.strategicforesight.com/Cost%20of%20Conflict%20-%206%20pager.pdf) by Foresight Group has calculated the opportunity of conflict for Egypt since 1991 is almost $800 billion. In other words, had there been peace since 1991, an average Egyptian citizen would be earning over $3000 instead of $1700 he or she may earn next year.The financial sectorMonetary and exchange rate policyMonetary policyThere have been several favorable conditions that allowed the Bank of Egypt to accumulate net international reserves, which increased from US$ 20 billion in FY2005, to US$23 billion in FY2006, and to US$30 billion FY2007 contributing to growth in both reserve money and in broad money (M2).Credit extended to the private sector  in Egypt  declined significantly reaching about EGP 5 billion in FY2005. This crunch is due to the non-performing loans extended by the banks to business tycoons and top government officials.Lending criteria have been tightened following the passing of Money Laundry Law 80 in 2002 and Banking Law 88 in 2003. Interest rates are no longer the dominant factor in banks lending decisions. In fact, both the inefficiency and absence of the role of the Bank of Egypt in qualitative and quantitative control as well as implementing banking procedures and standards was almost entirely responsible  for the non-performing loans crisis. Banks steadily reduced credit from its peak of about EGP 30 billion in FY1999 and alternatively invested in more liquid no-risk securities such as treasury bills and government bonds. Improving private sector access to credit will critically depend on resolving the problem of non-performing loans with businesses and top government officials.The era of targetingi.e. maintaining inflation within a bandhas perhaps begun in Egypt more recently. Country experiences show that inflation targeting is a best-practice strategy for monetary policy. While the monetary policy appears more responsive to inflationary pressures recently in Egypt, it is noted that there is no inflation measure and the Central Bank of Egypt takes targeting decisions based on the inflation rate released by the CAPMAS price index off-the-shelf.(Nawar, Abdel-Hameed (2008) PPI and Measuring Inflation in Business Transactions in Egypt, Cairo University, manuscript, March. Available at SSRN: http://ssrn.com/abstract)Surging domestic inflationary pressures from both economic growth and elevated international food prices led the Bank of Egypt (CBE) to increase the overnight lending and deposit rates in sequential moves since 2008: it was raised by 0.25% on 10 February 2008, by 0.5% on 25 March 2008, by 0.5% on 8 May 2008, by 0.5% on 26 June 2008, by 0.5% on 7 August 2008 and most recently on 18 September 2008 for the sixth time in a year by 0.5% when it stood at 11.5% and 13.5%, respectively. However, the rise of the World Global Financial Crisis led to a set of fiscal-monetary policy measures to face its repercussions  on the national economy, including reducing the overnight lending and deposit rates by 1% on 12 February 2009. The rates currently stand at 10.5% and 12.5%, respectively. The CBE is expected to further cut on interest rates over 2009, with seemingly little fear on Egyptian Pound depreciation resulting from decreased interest rates.Exchange rate policyThe exchange rate has been linked to the US dollar since the 1950s. Several regimes were adopted including initially the conventional peg in the sixties, regular crawling peg in the seventies and the eighties and crawling bands in the nineties. Over that time period, there were several exchange rate markets including black market, parallel market and the official market. With the turn of the new millennium, Egypt introduced a managed float regime and successfully unified the Pound exchange rate vis--vis foreign currencies.thumb|left|225px| The transition to the unified exchange rate regime was completed in December 2004. Shortly later, Egypt has notified the International Monetary Fund (IMF) that it has accepted the obligations of Article VIII, Section 2, 3, and 4 of the IMF Articles of Agreement, with effect from 2 January 2005. IMF members accepting the obligations of Article VIII undertake to refrain from imposing restrictions on the making of payments and transfers for current international transactions, or from engaging in discriminatory currency arrangements or multiple currency practices, except with IMF approval. By accepting the obligations of Article VIII, Egypt gives assurance to the international community that it will pursue economic policies that will not impose restrictions on the making of payments and transfers for current international transactions unnecessary, and will contribute to a multilateral payments system free of restrictions.In the fiscal year 2004 and over most of the fiscal year 2005, the pound depreciated against the US Dollar. Since the second half of the fiscal year 2006 until the end of the fiscal year 2007, the pound gradually appreciated to EGP 5.69 per USD. While it was likely to continue appreciating in the short-term, given the skyrocketing oil prices and the weakening US economy, the advent of the global crisis of 2008, and resulting behavior  of foreign investors exiting from the stock market in Egypt increased the dollar exchange rate against the Egyptian pound, which rose by more than 4% since Brothers declared Bankruptcy. As the demand pressure from exiting foreign investors eases, the dollar exchange rate against the Egyptian pound is expected to decline. It stands at EGP 5.55 per USD as of 4 November 2008.Natural resourcesLand, agriculture and cropsWarm weather and plentiful water permit several crops a year. Land is worked intensively and yields are high. Cotton, rice, wheat, corn, sugarcane, beets, onions, and beans are the principal crops. Increasingly, a few modern techniques are applied to producing fruits, vegetables and flowers, in addition to cotton, for export. Further improvement is possible. The most common traditional farms occupy one acre (4,000 m) each, typically in a canal-irrigated area along the banks of the Nile. Many small farmers also own cows, water buffalos, and chickens.Several researchers questioned the domestic (and import) policies for dealing with the so-called the wheat game since the former Minister of Agriculture Wali was in office.In 2006, areas planted with wheat in Egypt exceeded  producing approximately 6 million tons.(Sowing the right seedsAl-Ahram Weekly, August 6, 2009) The domestic supply price farmers receive in Egypt is EGP 1200 ( \approx  US$ 211) per ton compared to approximately EGP 1940 ( \approx  US$ 340) per ton for import from the USA, Egypts main supplier of wheat and corn. Egypt is, in fact, the U.S.s largest market for wheat and corn sales, accounting for US$1 billion annually and about 46% of Egypts needs from imported wheat. Other sources of imported wheat, include Kazakhstan, Canada, France, Syria, Argentina and Australia. There are plans to increase the areas planted with wheat up to nearly 3 million acres (12,000 km) by 2017 to narrow the gap between domestic food supply and demand.(EGYPT CLONES A NILEEGYPT CLONES A NILE, Source: U.S. News & World Report, 05/19/97, Vol. 122 Issue 19, p33, 3p.)The Western Desert accounts for about two-thirds of the countrys land area. For the most part, it is a massive sandy plateau marked by seven major depressions. One of these, Fayoum, was connected about 3,600 years ago to the Nile by canals. Today, it is an important irrigated agricultural area.Practically all Egyptian agriculture takes place in some 25,000 km (6 million acres) of fertile soil in the Nile Valley and Delta.Some desert lands are being developed for agriculture, including the controversial but ambitious Toshka project in Egypt, but some other fertile lands in the Valley and Delta are being lost to urbanization and erosion.Larger modern farms are becoming more important in the desert.The agriculture objectives on the desert lands are often questioned; the  desert farm lands which were offered regularly at different levels and prices were restricted to a limited group of elites selected very carefully, who  later profiteered retailing the granted large desert farm land by pieces. This allegedly transforms the desert farms to tourist resorts, hits all government plans to develop and improve the conditions of the poor, and causes serious negative  impact on agriculture and the overall national economy over time. One company, for example, bought over 70 hectare of large desert farm for a price as low as EGP 0.05 per square meter and now sells for EGP 300 per square meter. In numbers, 70 hectares bought for about US$6,000 in 2000 sells for over US$3.7 million in 2007. Currently, no clear solution exists to deal with these activities.Agriculture biomass, including agricultural wastes and animal manure, produce approximately 30 million metric tons of dry material per year that could be massively and decisively used, inter alia, for generating bioenergy and improve the quality of life in rural Egypt. Unfortunately, this resource remain terribly underutilized.(It is noteworthy that this point is emphasized in the context of  the production of natural gas from biogas in  Nawar, Abdel-Hameed (2005). The Emerging Landscape of the Natural Gas in Egypt. Cairo University, manuscript. Natural gas can be mainly produced with crude oil from the same reservoir, i.e. associated, or from a natural gas reservoir, i.e. non-associated.)Since early 2008, with the world food prices soaring, especially for grains, calls for striking a new deal on agriculture  increased. Indeed 2008 arguably marks the birth of a new national agriculture policy and reform.(Using what we haveAl-Ahram Weekly,29 October 2008)The Devils GardensAs mentioned above, the Western Desert accounts for about two-thirds of the countrys land area. This sizable part of Egypt has been facing severe unresolved challenge to agriculture reclamation and development posed by landmines planted by Germans during World War II. In particular, the so-called gardens, where landmines were laid during World War II by the troops led by Rommel, the German Field Marshal, to cover up his withdrawal from  Egypts Alamain, when Egypt was then occupied by Britain, so as to prevent pursuit by the British troops.  Egypt has 23 million landmines, accounting for 20% of the total number of landmines in the world.The Devils Gardens have stuck out like a sore thumb; unfortunately everyone in the government noticed but neglected them and failed to make a case for an international solution. Little or nothing has been done, a failure that ensured massive development loss and human tragedies for over half a century.(In addition to constraining agriculture development, over the past 25 years, about 8000 people were victimized by landmines, including 3,200 dead and 5,000 injured, according to local and international statistics.)Water resourcesEgypt, wrote the Greek historian Herodotus 25 centuries ago, is the gift of the Nile. The lands seemingly inexhaustible resources of water and soil carried by this mighty river created in the Nile Valley and Delta the worlds most extensive oasis. Without the Nile, Egypt would be little more than a desert wasteland.Image:Nile aswan.jpg|thumb|right|250px|Nile river at AswanThe river carves a narrow, cultivated floodplain, never more than 20 kilometers wide, as it travels northward toward Cairo from Nasser on the Sudanese border, behind the High Dam. Just north of Cairo, the Nile spreads out over what was once a broad estuary that has been filled by riverine deposits to form a fertile delta about  wide at the seaward base and about  from south to north.Before the construction of dams on the Nile, particularly the Aswan High Dam (started in 1960, completed in 1970), the fertility of the Nile Valley was sustained by the water flow and the silt deposited by the annual flood. Sediment is now obstructed by the Aswan High Dam and retained in Lake Nasser. The interruption of yearly, natural fertilization and the increasing salinity of the soil has been a manageable problem resulting from the dam. The benefits remain impressive: more intensive farming on thousands of square kilometers of land made possible by improved irrigation, prevention of flood damage, and the generation of millions of gigajoules of electricity at low cost.Mineral and energy resourcesEgypts mineral and energy resources include petroleum, gas, phosphates, gold and ore. Crude oil is found primarily in the of Suez and in the Western Desert. Natural gas is found mainly in the Delta, off the Mediterranean shore, and in the Western Desert. Oil and gas accounted for approximately 7% of GDP in fiscal year 2000/01.Export of petroleum and related products amounted to $2.6 billion in the year 2000. In late 2001, Egypts benchmark Suez Blend was about $16.73 per barrel ($105/m), the lowest price since 1999.thumb|left|225px|  oil production has been in decline for several years since its peak level in 1993, from  in 1993 to   in 1997 and to  in 2005. (See Figure). At the same time, the domestic consumption of oil increased steadily ( and  in 1997 and 2005 respectively), but in 2008, oil consumption reached to . It is easy to see from the graph that a trend projects that domestic demand outpaced supply in (20082009), turning Egypt to a net importer of oil. To minimize this potential, the government of Egypt has been encouraging the exploration, production and domestic consumption of gas. Oil Production was  in 2008, and natural gas output continued to increase and reached 48.3 billion cubic meters in 2008.(CIA Factbook, Egyptian Economy)Over the last 15 years, more than 180 petroleum exploration agreements have been signed and multinational oil companies spent more than $27 billion in exploration companions. These activities led to the findings of about 18 crude oil fields and 16 natural gas fields in FY 2001. The total number of findings  rose to 49 in FY 2005. As a result of these findings, crude reserves as of 2009 are estimated at , and proven natural gas reserves are 1.656 trillion cubic meters with a likely additional discoveries with more exploration campaigns.  In August 2007, it was announced that signs of oil reserves in  Ombo basin, about  north of Aswan, was found and a concession agreement was signed with Centorion Energy International for drilling.  The main natural gas producer in Egypt is the International Egyptian Oilfield Company (IEOC), a branch of Italian Eni. Other companies like BP, BG, Texas-based Corp. and Shell carry out activities of exploration and production by means of concessions granted for a period of generally ample time (often 20 years) and in different geographic zones of oil and gas deposits  in the country.Gold mining is more recently a fast growing industry with vast untapped gold reserves in the Eastern Desert.  There is already a gold rush and gold production facilities are now reality from the Sukari Hills, located close to Marsa Alam in the Eastern Desert.  The concession of the mine was granted to Egypt, an Australian joint stock company, with a gold exploitation lease for a 160-square-kilometer area. Sami El-Raghy, Centamin Chairman, has repeatedly stated that he believes Egypts yearly revenues from gold in the future will exceed the total revenues from the Suez Canal, tourism and the petroleum industry combined.(See http://www.businesstodayegypt.com/article.aspx?ArticleID7689)Egypts excess of gas will more than meet its domestic demand for many years to come. The of Petroleum and Mineral Resources has established expanding the Egyptian petrochemical industry and increasing exports of natural gas as its most significant strategic objectives and in 2009 about 38% of local gas production was exported.As of 2009, most Egyptian gas exports (approximately 70%) are delivered in the form of natural gas (LNG) by ship to Europe and the United States. Egypt and Jordan agreed to construct the Gas Pipeline from Arish to Aqaba to export natural gas to Jordan; with its completion in July 2003, Egypt began to  export  of gas per year via pipeline as well. Total investment in this project is about $220 million. In 2003, Egypt, Jordan and Syria reached an agreement to extend this pipeline to Syria, which paves the way for a future connection with Turkey, Lebanon and Cyprus by 2010. As of 2009, Egypt began to  export to Syria  of gas per year, accounting for 20% of total consumption in Syria.(See http://www.eia.doe.gov/emeu/cabs/Syria/NaturalGas.html) In addition, the East Mediterranean Gas (EMG), a joint company established in 2000  and owned by General Petroleum Corporation (EGPC) (68.4%), the private Israeli company Merhav (25%) as well as Ampal-American Israel Corp. (6.6%), has been granted the rights to export natural gas from Egypt to Israel and other locations in the region via underwater pipelines from Arish to Ashkelon which will provide Electric Corporation (IEC)   of gas per day. Gas supply started experimentally in the second half of 2007. As of 2008, Egypt produces about , from which Israel imports of   account for about 2.7 % of Egypts total production of natural gas. According to a statement released on 24 March 2008, Merhav and Ampals director, Nimrod Novik, said that the natural gas pipeline from Egypt to Israel can carry up to 9 billion cubic meters annually which sufficiently meet rising demand in Israel in the coming years.(BRIEF: Merhav exec insists gas pipeline is sufficient: The pipeline was designed, built, and tested by the top companies in their fields. Lior Baron. McClatchy - Tribune Business News. Washington: 24 March 2008.) According to a memorandum of understanding, the commitment of Egypt is  contracted  for 15 years at a price below $3 per million of thermal unit, though this was renegotiated at a higher price in 2009 (to between $4 and $5 per million BTU), while the amounts of gas supplied were increased.  Exporting natural gas to Israel faces broad popular opposition in Egypt.(Nawar, Abdel-Hameed (2005). The Emerging Landscape of the Natural Gas in Egypt. Cairo University, manuscript.) Nevertheless, agreements between Egypt and Israel allow for Israeli entities to purchase up to 7 billion cubic meters of Egyptian gas annually, making Israel one of Egypts largest natural gas export markets. The decision to export of natural gas to Israel was passed in 1993 at the time when Dr. Hamdy Al-Bambi was Minister of Petroleum and when Mr. Moussa was Minister of Foreign Affairs. The mandate to sign of the Memorandum of Understanding (MoU) to delegate to the Ministry of Petroleum represented by the Egyptian General Petroleum Company (EGPC) to contract with EMG Company was approved by the former Prime Minister Dr. Ebeid in the Cabinets meeting No. 68 on 5 July 2004 when he served as the acting President of the Republic when President Mubarak was receiving medical treatment in Germany.A new report by Foresight Group on the Cost of Conflict in the Middle East ( also details how in the event of peace an oil and gas pipeline from Port Said to Gaza to Lebanon would result in a transaction value for Egypt to the tune of $12 billion per year.With respect to nuclear energy, Egypts President Hosni Mubarak on 29 October 2007,  a few days before the Egyptian ruling partys annual conference, proudly gave the go-ahead for building several power plants. Egypts nuclear route is purely peaceful and fully transparent, but faces technical and financing obstacles. Egypt is a member of the IAEA and has both signed and ratified the Nuclear Nonproliferation Treaty (NPT).  Currently, a draft Law on Nuclear Energy is being reviewed by the IAEA and expected to be passed by the Egyptian Parliament. Many other countries in the region, including Libya, Jordan, UAE, Morocco, and Arabia aspire to build nuclear power plants.As of June 2009 it was reported that Cairo sources said Israelis will dig for oil in Sinai.(Cairo sources said Israelis will dig for oil in Sinai) This report comes in the time in which the government is heavily criticized for exporting natural gas to Israel at an extremely low rate.(The gas conundrumAl-Ahram Weekly, 26 November 2008)Main economic sectorsAgricultural sectorDuring the 1970s, despite significant investment in land reclamation, agriculture lost its position as the rife economic sector. Agricultural exports, which was 87% of all merchandise export value in 1960, fell to 35% in 1974 and to 11% by 2001. In 2000, agriculture accounted for 17% of Gross Domestic Production and 34% of total employment.Cotton has been the staple crop, but it is no longer vital as an export. Production in 1999 was 243,000 tons. Egypt is also a substantial producer of wheat, corn, sugarcane, fruit and vegetables, fodder, and rice; substantial quantities of wheat are also imported, especially from States of America and Russia, despite increases in yield since 1970, and significant quantities of rice are exported. Citrus, dates, and grapes are the main fruits by acreage. Agricultural output in tons in 1999 included corn, 9,350,000; wheat, 6,347,000; rice, 5,816,000; potatoes, 1,900,000; and oranges, 1,525,000. The government exercises a strong degree of control over agriculture, not only to ensure the best use of irrigation water but also to confine the planting of cotton in favor of food grains. However, the governments ability to achieve this objective is limited by crop rotational constraints.of Strawberries.jpg|thumb|200px|Egyptian Strawberry exports stood for 52 million dollars in 2009Egypts fertile area totals about 3.3 million hectares (8.1 million acres), about one-quarter of which is land reclaimed from the desert. However, the reclaimed lands only add 7 percent to the total value of agricultural production. Even though only 3 percent of the land is arable, it is extremely productive and can be cropped two or even three times annually. Most land is cropped at least twice a year, but agricultural productivity is limited by salinity, which afflicts an estimation of 35% of cultivated land, and drainage issues.Irrigation plays a major role in a country the very livelihood of which depends upon a single river, the Nile. Most ambitious of all the irrigation projects is that of the High Dam, completed in 1971. A report published in March 1975 by the National Council for Production and Economic Affairs indicated that the dam had proved successful in controlling floodwaters and ensuring recurring water supply, but that water consumption had been more than needed and shall be controlled. Some precious land was lost below the dam because the flow of Nile silt was stopped, and increased salinity remains a major problem. Furthermore, five years of drought in the Ethiopia highlandsthe source of the Nile Rivers watercaused the water level of Nasser, the Aswan High Dams reservoir, to drop to the lowest level in 1987. In 1996, however, the level of water behind the High Dam and in Lake Nasser reached the maximum level since the completion of the dam. Despite this unusual abundance of water supply, Egypt can only utilize 55.5 billion cu m (1.96 trillion cu ft) every year, according to the Nile Basin Agreement signed in 1959 between Egypt and Sudan. Another magnificent project designed to address the water scarcity problem is the Valley (the second Nile), aimed at development of the large artesian water supplies underlying the oases of the Western Desert.The agrarian reform law of 1952 provided that no one might hold more than 190 feddans for farming and that each landholder must either farm the land himself or rent it under specified conditions. Up to 95 additional feddans might be held if the owner had children, and additional land had to be sold to the government. In 1961, the upper limit of landholding was reduced to 100 feddans, and no person was allowed to lease more than 50 feddans (1 feddan  0.42 hectares). Compensation to the former owners was in bonds bearing a low rate of interest, redeemable within 40 years. A law enacted in 1969 reduced landholdings by one person to 50 feddans. By the mid-1980s, 90% of all land titles were for holdings of less than five feddans, and about 300,000 families, or 8% of the rural population, had received land under the agrarian reform program. According to a 1990 agricultural census, there were some three million small land holdings, almost 96% of which were under five feddans (2.1 hectares/5.2 acres). Since the late 1980s, many reforms attempting to deregulate agriculture by liberalizing input and output prices and by eliminating crop area controls have been initiated. As a result, the gap between world and domestic prices for Egyptian agricultural commodities has been closed.Industrial sectorAutomobiles manufacturingNasr Automotive Manufacturing Company is Egypts state owned automobile company, founded in 1960 in Helwan, Egypt. Established in 1977, the company manufactures various vehicles under license from AG, Kia, LLC, and Peugeot. Their current lineup consists of the Jeep Cherokee; the open-top, Wrangler-based AAV TJL; the Spectra; the 405; and the 406.Other manufacturers such as AAV - Arab American Vehicles, the Ghabbour Group, WAMCO - the Watania Automotive Manufacturing Company, and MCV Egypt - Manufacturing Commercial Vehicles, produce automobiles in Egypt. MCV Egypt was established in 1994 to represent Mercedes-Benz in the commercial vehicle sector in Egypt, producing a range of buses and trucks for domestic sale and for export throughout the World, Africa, and Europe. The manufacturing plant at Salheya employs over 1000 people. Also there is Russian AutoVAZ manufacturing LadaChemicalsQir Fertilizers Company (AFC) is one of the largest producers of nitrogen fertilizers in Egypt and the Middle East. It produces about 50% of the Egyptian Nitrogen Fertilizers. The company and the 1st Ammonia Urea plant was established at 1976. It is located at Abu Qir bay, 20 kilometers East Of Alexandria, and there is Egypt Basic Industries Corporation (EBIC), one of the largest producers of greenfield ammonia plant.Consumer electronics and home appliancesGroup is the largest Egyptian group of companies operating mainly in the field of domestic appliances. The main products it manufactures are washing machines, refrigerators, electric water heaters and gas cookers. It also operates in the fields of IT and real estate.Group is a leading company in the fields of electronics and electrical home appliances, industries, constructions, internet service providing, and T.V stations. The group is composed of the following companies : Egy Aircon, International Electronics Products, Electrical Home appliances, General Electronics and Trading, Goldi Trading, Goldi Servicing, Egy Medical, Egyptian Plastic Industry, Egy House, Egy Speakers, Egy Marble, Dreamland and Dream TV.Steel industriesEZDK is the largest steel company in Egypt and the Middle East. Now a part of Ezz Industries, which consists of four steel plants in Alexandria, Sadat City, Suez and 10th of Ramadan City. In addition, it includes also Al-Jawhara (Gemma) Company for Ceramic and Porcelain tiles.EZDK is the largest independent producer of steel in the Middle East and North Africa (MENA) region and is the market leader in Egypt. It is ranked at the 65th place in the world biggest steel producers as per the World Steel Institute with total production of 4.5 Million Tons per year representing about three quarters of Egypt total annual production (6 Million Tons).Textiles and clothingTextiles and clothing is one of the largest manufacturing and exporting processes in the country and a huge employment absorber. Egypt poses a high comparative advantage for a variety of TC products, which it has developed into a competitive advantage in major foreign markets. This industry contributes with one quarter of Egypts non-oil export proceeds, with Cotton textiles comprising the bulk of Egypts TC export basket.The public sector accounts for 90% of cotton spinning, 60% of fabric production and 30% of apparel production in Egypt.Misr Fine Spinning and Weaving is the largest enterprise of its kind in Africa and the Middle East. The private sector apparel industry is one of the most dynamic manufacturing processes in Egypt.Construction and contracting sectorview of the Nile City Towers.Orascom Construction Industries headquarters is at the south tower (on the right). The Fairmont Hotel lies in-between the two towersConstruction Industries is a leading Egyptian EPC (engineering, procurement and construction) contractor, based in Cairo, Egypt and active in more than 20 countries. OCI was established in Egypt in 1950 and owned by Onsi Sawiris. The company is the first multinational Egyptian corporation, and is one of the core Group companies.As a cement producer, OCI owned and operated cement plants in Egypt, Algeria, Turkey, Pakistan, northern Iraq and Spain, which had a combined annual production capacity of 21 million tonnes.The Moustafa Group (TMG), one of the largest conglomerates in Egypt, was founded by the former Talaat Moustafa and is headed by his son, Tarek Talaat Moustafa.Services sectorBanking & insuranceThe banking sector has gone through many stages since the establishment of the first bank in 1856, followed by the emergence of private sector and joint venture banks during the period of the Open Door Policy in the 1970s. Moreover, the Egyptian banking sector has been undergoing reforms, privatization, and mergers and acquisitions from 1991 up to today.The banking system comprises 57 state owned commercial banks. This includes 28 commercial banks, four of which are state-owned, 26 investment banks (11 joint venture banks and 15 branches of foreign banks), and three specialized banks. Although private and joint venture banks are growing, many remain relatively small with few branch networks.Egypts banking system has undergone major reforms since the 1990s and today consumers are faced with a liberalized and modernized system which is supervised and regulated according to internationally accepted standards.Although the mortgage market is underdeveloped in Egypt and as yet foreigners cannot yet obtain a mortgage for a property in Egypt. In the near future, a new mortgage law will enable purchasers to take out property loans. This will open up the market considerably and create a storm of development and real estate activity in the near future.CommunicationsEgypt has long been the cultural and informational centre of the Arab world, and Cairo is the regions largest publishing and broadcasting centre.The telecommunications liberalisation process started in 1998 and is still ongoing, but at a slow pace. Private sector companies operate in mobile telephony, and Internet access. There were 10 million fixed phone lines, 31 million mobile phones, and 8.1 million Internet users by the August, 2007.TransportImage:Metro-1-l.jpg|right|thumb|250px|Metro in Egypt, the subway of CairoTransport in Egypt are centered in Cairo and largely follow the pattern of settlement along the Nile. The main line of the nations  railway network runs from Alexandria to Aswan and is operated by Egyptian National Railways. The badly maintained road network has expanded rapidly to over , covering the Nile Valley and Nile Delta, Mediterranean and Red Sea coasts, the Sinai, and the Western oases.In addition to overseas routes, Egypt Air provides reliable domestic air service to major tourist destinations from its Cairo hub. The Nile River system (about 1,600 km. or 1,000 mi.) and the principal canals (1,600 km.) are important locally for transportation.The Suez Canal is a major waterway of international commerce and navigation, linking the Mediterranean and Red Sea. The ministry of transportation, along with other governmental bodies are responsible for transportation in Egypt. Major ports are Alexandria, Port Said, and Damietta on the Mediterranean, and Suez and Safaga on the Red Sea.Tourism sectorThe Egyptian tourism industry is one of the most important sectors in the economy, in terms of high employment and incoming foreign currency. Egypt is one of the best known touristic countries in the world. It has many constituents of tourism, mainly historical attractions especially in Cairo, Luxor and Aswan, but also beach and other sea activities. The government is always trying to promote foreign tourism since it is a major source of currency and investment. There are plans to get to 14 million visitors by 2011, by means of the improvement of touristic facilities and advertising of Egyptian tourism in international media, in order to maintain a steady demand for visiting Egypt.Emerging sectorsICT sectorThe Egyptian and communications technology sector has been growing significantly since it was separated from the transportation sector.  The market for telecommunications market was officially deregulated since the beginning of 2006 according to the WTO agreement.The government established ITIDA through Law 15 of the year 2004 as governmental entity. This agency aims at paving the way for the diffusion of the e-business services in Egypt capitalizing on different mandates of the authority as activating the Egyptian e-signature law and supporting an export-oriented IT sector in Egypt.While the move could open the market for new entrants, add and improve the infrastructure for its network. and  in general create a competitive market, the fixed line market is de facto monopolized by Egypt.The cellular phone market was a duopoly with prices artificially high but witnessed in the past couple of years the traditional price war between the incumbents Mobinil and Vodafone. A 500 minutes outbound local and long distance calling plan currently costs approximately US$30 as compared to approximately US$ 90 in 2005. While the current price is not so expensive, it is still above the international price as plans never allow unlimited night & weekend minutes.A third 3.5G license was awarded in April 2006 for US$3 billion to a consortium led by the UAE company Eitesalat (66%), Post (20%), the Bank of Egypt (NBE) (10%), and the NBEs Commercial International Bank (4%), thus moving the market from duopoly to oligopoly.On 24 September 2006, the Telecommunication Regulatory Authority (NTRA) announced a license award to Egyptian-Arab private sector consortium of companies to extend a maritime cable for international traffic. The US$120 million cable project will serve the Gulf region and south Europe. The construction of the cable should decrease the currently high international call costs and increase domestic demand on internet broadband services, in importantly increase exports of international telecommunication services of Egyptian companies, mostly in the Village.It is expected that NTRA will award two licenses for international gateways using open technology and deploy WiMax technology enabling the delivery of wireless broadband access as an alternative to ADSL.The main barrier to growth for Egypts ICT sector remains its image of instability and very demanding employees. Quality people remain heavily overpaid, compared to the rest of the Middle East.Largest companiesImage:Naguib Sawiris.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Sawiris, the founder and largest share holder of Orascom TelecomIn 2009, 3 Egyptian companies were listed in the Forbes Global 2000 list - an annual ranking of the top 2000 public companies in the world by Forbes magazine. These companies were:InvestmentThe stock capitalisation of listed companies in Egypt was valued at $79.672 billions in 2005 by the Bank.(Data - Finance)Investment climateThe Egyptian equity market is one of the most developed in the region with more than 633 listed companies.  Market capitalization on the exchange doubled in 2005 from USD 47.2 billion to USD 93.5 billion, with turnover surging from USD 1.16 billion in January 2005 to USD 6 billion in January 2006.(http://www.thomaswhite.com/explore-the-world/postcard/2010/privatization-in-egypt.aspx)equity has not been widely used in Egypt in the past as a source of funding for businesses. The government, however, has instituted a number of policy changes and reforms specifically intended to develop internal private equity funds and to attract private equity funding from international sources.The major industries include textiles, hydrocarbon and production, and generic pharmaceutical production. Unemployment is high at about 10.5%.(Private Equity in Pakistan, Israel, and Egypt, by Sethi, Arjun Nov 2007.)Until 2003, the Egyptian economy suffered from shortages in foreign currency and excessively elevated interest rates. A series of budget reforms were conducted in order to redress weaknesses in Egypts economic environment and to boost private sector involvement and confidence in the economy.Major fiscal reforms were introduced in 2005 in order to tackle the sector which according to estimates  represents somewhere between 30% to 60% of GDP. Significant tax cuts for corporations were introduced for the first time in Egyptian history. The new Income tax Law No 91 for 2005 reduced the tax rate from 40% to 20%. According to government figures, tax filing by individuals and corporations increased by 100%.Many changes were made to cut trade tariffs.  Among the legislators goals were tackling the black market, reducing bureaucracy and pushing through trade liberalization measures. Amendments to Investment and Company law were introduced in order to attract foreign investors.  For example, the number of days required for establishing a company was dramatically reduced.Significant improvement to the domestic economic environment increased investors confidence in Egypt. The & Alexandria Stock Exchange is considered among the best ten emerging markets in the world. The changes to the policy also attracted increased levels of foreign direct investment in Egypt.  According to the UN Conference on Trade and Developments World Investment Report, Egypt was ranked the second largest country in attracting foreign investment in Africa.Given the large number of amendments to laws and regulations, Egypt has succeeded to a certain extent in conforming to international standards. Very recently the & Alexandria Stock Exchange (CASE) was welcomed with full membership into the World Federation of Exchanges (WFE)the first Arab country to be invited.Enforcement of these newly adopted regulatory frameworks remain, sometime problematic. Problems like corruption hamper economic development in Egypt.  Many scandals involving bribery were reported during the past years. In 2002 alone, as many as 48 high-ranking officialsincluding former cabinet ministers, provincial governors and MPs were convicted of influence peddling, profiteering and embezzlement. Maintaining good relations with politicians is sometimes a key to business success in Egypt. Based on the 2006 Corruption Perception Index developed by Transparency International (where the higher the ranking the greater the level of corruption), Egypt ranked 70 out of 163. On a scale from 0 to 10 (with 0 being highly corrupt), Egypt scored a 3.3 .According to a study by the Organization for Migration, 20% of Egyptian remittance-receiving households interviewed channelled the remittances towards various forms of investment, while the large majority (80%) was more concerned about utilizing remittances for meeting the daily needs of their families including spending on health care and education. Among the 20% of households that decided to invest, 39% invested in real estate, 22 % invested in small businesses employing fewer than five people and the smallest proportions of investors (6%) invested in medium private business employing no more than 20 people. According to Egypts Human Development Report 2008, despite representing approximately 5 % of GDP, remittances provided the initial capital for only 1.4% of newly established small and medium enterprises in Egypt in 2003-2004.(Response to the global financial crisisThe challenges of the global food crisis followed by challenges of the global financial crisis made room for more integrated policy reforms. Considering the massive economic measures that have been taken over the past 12 months or so, Egyptian economic policymakers score high based on the inside lag, i.e. the lapse of time between the moment that the shock began to affect the economy and the moment that economic (monetary and fiscal) policy as well as the regulatory policy are altered and put into effect in response to the shock to various markets: goods market (real GDP), the labor market (unemployment rate), money market (interest rate and inflation), and the financial (stock and bond) market. Indeed, moderate financial panic occurred drivenat least partiallyby the fear that other investors are about to panic and sell. There were falls in stock and bond market prices, and rises in nominal interest rates.Egypt has a population of about 83 million, with the population concentrated within a region  on either side of the River. The majority of the population is employed in the services sector, followed by agriculture and industrial production. Approximately one-third of Egyptian labour is engaged directly in farming, and many others work in the processing or trading of agricultural products.Unemployment rate  increased from 10.3% in FY2004 to 11.2% in 2005. The average rate of growth of employment in the publicly owned enterprises sector was -2% per year between FY1998 and FY2005 as a result of aggressive privatization program. On the other hand, private sector employment grew at an average rate of 3% over that period. In addition, the government sector employment grew by almost double the rate of the private sector over the same period.In general, the average weekly wage in the private sector is, in many instances, higher than that of the public sector. In some other instances, e.g. whole sale and retail trades, the weekly wage is lower by half of that in the public sector.As a result of the weakness role of the Ministry of Manpower and Trade Unions to create a balance between the rights of workers and the interests of owners of companies in the private sector, privatization has led to worsening employment problems and deterioration in their working environment and health, and many workers have recently resorted to strike and picketing.In an effort to quell discontent over rising food prices, Egypt offered government and public sector workers a pay rise of up to 30%, and urged the private sector to keep up with the pay rise.  The offer came on the May day speech delivered by President Mubarak to the Egyptian General Federation of Trade Unions.We must go in dealing with the current global (food) crisis, on two basic tracks (1) we must strengthen the food security of our low-income people, (2) we must achieve a balance between wages and prices. President Mubarak said.The pay rise originally proposed in the government budget ranged between 15%20%, but the decision to double it was given  on heightened worries  that widespread anger over prices could lead to a social explosion. The pay rise is initiated immediately, rather than waiting for the start of the new fiscal year on 1 July 2008 and is to be financed from real resources.While the headline CPI inflation rate was 15.8% (17.6% in rural areas, 14.4% in urban areas) in March 2008, the overall food price inflation rate was 23.7% (26.9% in rural areas, 20.5% in urban areas). Moreover, in April 2008 in urban areas, the headline CPI inflation rate reached 16.4% while food price inflation rate was 22.0%. This underlines the statement in Nawar (2008) that the inflation rate as measured by the headline CPI does not concern the poor and low-income people, who are the majority of people in rural and urban Egypt, since they spend most of their income on food. Approximately 55 million poor and low-income citizens, representing about 75% of the population, are currently enrolled in food ration cards.In April 2009 it was reported that Egypt feared the return of 500,000 Egyptian laborers working in the Gulf states.(Egypt fears return of 500,000 workers from Gulf )Poverty and income distributionAccording to the 2005 Household Income, Expenditure and Consumption Survey (HIECS), estimated  per capita poverty lines vary across the regions. Data from a World Bank and Ministry of Economic Development poverty assessment based on comparisons between actual expenditures (and the cost of a consumption basket securing 2470 calories per day per person), shows that individual Egyptians who spent less than EGP 995 per year in 2005 are considered extreme poor, those who spent less than EGP 1423 per year are poor and those who spent less than EGP 1853 per year are near poor.Overall about 44.4% of the Egyptian population are in the range of extreme poor to near poor:(Nawar, Abdel-Hameed (2007) From Marina to Kom-Ombo: A Note on Poverty in Egypt, Cairo University, manuscript, August)* 21% of the Egyptian population was near poor, meaning that about 14.6 million Egyptians can obtain their basic food requirements in addition to some basic services.* 19.6% of the Egyptian population was poor, meaning that about 13.6 million Egyptians (one out of every five) had consumption expenditure below the poverty line and could not therefore obtain their basic food and non-food needs.* 3.8% of the Egyptian population was extreme poor, meaning that about 2.6 million of the Egyptian poor could not obtain their basic food requirements even if they spent all their expenditure on food.Poverty has a strong regional dimension in Egypt and concentrates in Upper Egypt region, both urban (18.6%) and rural( 39.1), while metropolitan areas are the least poor (5.7%). The government is currently employing recently completed map as tool for targeting of public resources.StatisticsTo be completed soon:NotesSee also* Egypt* markets* of Egyptian companies* Eleven* Industrial ZoneReferences******External links*Egypt: Reforms Trigger Economic Growth**Transparency International websitedEgipteEgyptade Egiptode lgyptede Exiptodi EgiptiadEgiptedo Egitot Ai Cp
9730
Electron_microscope
File:Siemens-electron-microscope.jpg|thumb|A 1973 Siemens electron microscope, des Arts et Mtiers, ParisAn electron microscope is a type of microscope that uses a beam of electrons to illuminate the specimen and produce a magnified image. Electron microscopes (EM) have a greater resolving power than a light-powered microscope, because electrons have wavelengths about 100,000 times shorter than visible light (photons), and can  achieve better than 50 pm resolution() and magnifications of up to about 10,000,000x, whereas ordinary, non-confocal light microscopes are limited by diffraction to about 200 nm resolution and useful magnifications below 2000x.The electron microscope uses electrostatic and electromagnetic lenses to control the electron beam and focus it to form an image. These lenses are analogous to, but  different from the glass lenses of an optical microscope that form a magnified image by focusing light on or through the specimen.In transmission, the electron beam is first diffracted by the specimen, and then, the electron microscope lenses re-focus the beam into a Fourier-transformed image of the diffraction pattern for the selected area of investigation. The real image thus formed is magnified by a factor ranging from a few hundred to many hundred thousand times, and can be viewed on a detecting screen or recorded using photographic film or plates or with a digital camera.Electron microscopes are used to observe a wide range of biological and inorganic specimens including microorganisms, cells, large molecules, biopsy samples, metals, and crystals. Industrially, the electron microscope is primarily used for quality control and failure analysis in device fabrication.The advantages of electron microscopy over crystallography are that the specimen need not be a single crystal or even a polycrystalline powder, and also that the Fourier transform reconstruction of the objects magnified structure occurs physically and thus avoids the need for solving the phase problem faced by the X-ray crystallographers after obtaining their X-ray diffraction patterns of a single crystal or polycrystalline powder. The major disadvantage of the transmission electron microscope is the need for extremely thin sections of the specimens, typically about 100 nanometers. Biological specimens typically require to be chemically fixed, dehydrated and embedded in a polymer resin to stabilize them sufficiently to allow ultrathin sectioning. Sections of biological specimens, organic polymers and similar materials may require special `staining with heavy atom labels in order to achieve the required image contrast.HistoryFile:Ernst Ruska Electron Microscope - Deutsches Museum - Munich-edit.jpg|thumb|right|Electron microscope constructed by Ruska in 1933The electron microscope was invented and patented by Hungarian physicist Szilrd but declined to construct it.(Gene Dannen: Leo Szilard the Inventor: A Slideshow (1998, Budapest, conference talk) http://www.dannen.com/budatalk.html) Instead, German physicist Ruska and electrical engineer Knoll constructed the prototype electron microscope in 1931, capable of four-hundred-power magnification; the apparatus was a practical application of the principles of electron microscopy.() Two years later, in 1933, Ruska built an electron microscope that exceeded the resolution attainable with an optical (lens) microscope.( Moreover, Rudenberg, the scientific director of Siemens-Schuckertwerke, obtained the patent for the electron microscope in May 1931. Family illness compelled the electrical engineer to devise an electrostatic microscope, because he wanted to make visible the poliomyelitis virus.In 1932, Ernst Lubcke of & Halske built and obtained images from a prototype electron microscope, applying concepts described in the Rudenberg patent applications.() Five years later (1937), the firm financed the work of Ernst Ruska and von Borries, and employed Ruska (Ernsts brother) to develop applications for the microscope, especially with biologic specimens.(() Also in 1937, von Ardenne pioneered the electron microscope.() The first practical electron microscope was constructed in 1938, at the of Toronto, by Franklin Burton and students Cecil Hall, Hillier, and Albert Prebus; and Siemens produced the first commercial transmission electron microscope (TEM) in 1939.() Although contemporary electron microscopes are capable of two million-power magnification, as scientific instruments, they remain based upon Ruskas prototype.TypesTransmission electron microscope (TEM)The original form of electron microscope, the electron microscope (TEM) uses a voltage beam to create an image. The electrons are emitted by an gun, commonly fitted with a tungsten filament cathode as the electron source. The electron beam is accelerated by an anode typically at +100 keV (40 to 400 keV) with respect to the cathode, focused by electrostatic and electromagnetic lenses, and transmitted through the specimen that is in part transparent to electrons and in part scatters them out of the beam. When it emerges from the specimen, the electron beam carries information about the structure of the specimen that is magnified by the lens system of the microscope. The spatial variation in this information (the image) is viewed by projecting the magnified electron image onto a fluorescent viewing screen coated with a phosphor or scintillator material such as zinc sulfide. The image can be photographically recorded by exposing a film or plate directly to the electron beam, or a high-resolution phosphor may be coupled by means of a lens optical system or a optic light-guide to the sensor of a CCD (device) camera. The image detected by the CCD may be displayed on a monitor or computer.Resolution of the TEM is limited primarily by aberration, but a new generation of aberration correctors have been able to partially overcome spherical aberration to increase resolution. Hardware correction of spherical aberration for the transmission electron microscopy (HRTEM) has allowed the production of images with resolution below 0.5 angstrom (50 picometres)( at magnifications above 50 million times.() The ability to determine the positions of atoms within materials has made the HRTEM an important tool for nano-technologies research and development.()Scanning electron microscopeFile:Ant SEM.jpg|thumb|right|An image of an ant in a scanning electron microscopeUnlike the TEM, where electrons of the high voltage beam carry the image of the specimen, the electron beam of the electron microscope (SEM)() does not at any time carry a complete image of the specimen. The SEM produces images by probing the specimen with a focused electron beam that is scanned across a rectangular area of the specimen (scanning). At each point on the specimen the incident electron beam loses some energy, and that lost energy is converted into other forms, such as heat, emission of low-energy secondary electrons, light emission (cathodoluminescence) or X-ray emission. The display of the SEM maps the varying intensity of any of these signals into the image in a position corresponding to the position of the beam on the specimen when the signal was generated. In the SEM image of an ant shown at right, the image was constructed from signals produced by a secondary electron detector, the normal or conventional imaging mode in most SEMs.Generally, the image resolution of an SEM is about an order of magnitude poorer than that of a TEM. However, because the SEM image relies on surface processes rather than transmission, it is able to image bulk samples up to many centimetres in size and (depending on instrument design and settings) has a great depth of field, and so can produce images that are good representations of the three-dimensional shape of the sample. Another advantage of SEM is its variety called scanning electron microscope (ESEM) can produce images of sufficient quality and resolution with the samples being wet or contained in low vacuum or gas. This greatly facilitates imaging biological samples that are unstable in the high vacuum of conventional electron microscopes.Reflection electron microscopeIn the reflection electron microscope (REM) as in the TEM, an electron beam is incident on a surface, but instead of using the transmission (TEM) or secondary electrons (SEM), the reflected beam of elastically scattered electrons is detected. This technique is typically coupled with reflection high energy electron diffraction (RHEED) and reflection high-energy loss spectroscopy (RHELS). Another variation is spin-polarized low-energy electron microscopy (SPLEEM), which is used for looking at the microstructure of domains.()Scanning transmission electron microscopeThe STEM rasters a focused incident probe across a specimen that (as with the TEM) has been thinned to facilitate detection of electrons scattered through the specimen. The high resolution of the TEM is thus possible in STEM. The focusing action (and aberrations) occur before the electrons hit the specimen in the STEM, but afterward in the TEM. The STEMs use of SEM-like beam rastering simplifies dark-field imaging, and other analytical techniques, but also means that image data is acquired in serial rather than in parallel fashion.Low-voltage electron microscopeThe electron microscope (LVEM) is a combination of SEM, TEM and STEM in one instrument, which operates at relatively low electron accelerating voltage of 5 kV. Low voltage reduces the specimen damage by the incident electrons and increases image contrast that is especially important for biological specimens. This increase in contrast significantly reduces, or even eliminates the need to stain. Sectioned samples generally need to be thinner than they would be for conventional TEM (2065 nm). Resolutions of a few nm are possible in TEM, SEM and STEM modes.()()Sample preparationinsect 01 Pengo.jpg|thumb|An insect coated in gold for viewing with a scanning electron microscopeMaterials to be viewed under an electron microscope may require processing to produce a suitable sample. The technique required varies depending on the specimen and the analysis required:*Chemical fixation  for biological specimens aims to stabilize the specimens mobile macromolecular structure by chemical crosslinking of proteins with aldehydes such as formaldehyde and glutaraldehyde, and lipids with tetroxide.*stain  suspensions containing fine biological material (such as viruses and bacteria) are briefly mixed with a dilute solution of an electron-opaque solution such as ammonium molybdate, uranyl acetate (or formate), or phosphotungstic acid. This mixture is applied to a suitably coated EM grid, blotted, then allowed to dry. Viewing of this preparation in the TEM should be carried out without delay for best results. The method is important in microbiology for fast but crude morphological identification, but can also be used as the basis for high resolution 3D reconstruction using EM tomography methodology when carbon films are used for support.*Cryofixation  freezing a specimen so rapidly, to nitrogen or even helium temperatures, that the water forms vitreous (non-crystalline) ice. This preserves the specimen in a snapshot of its solution state. An entire field called microscopy has branched from this technique. With the development of cryo-electron microscopy of vitreous sections (CEMOVIS), it is now possible to observe samples from virtually any biological specimen close to its native state.*Dehydration  drying, or replacement of water with organic solvents such as ethanol or acetone, followed by point drying or infiltration with embedding resins.*Embedding, biological specimens  after dehydration, tissue for observation in the transmission electron microscope is embedded so it can be sectioned ready for viewing. To do this the tissue is passed through a transition solvent such as epoxy propane and then infiltrated with a resin such as Araldite epoxy resin; tissues may also be embedded directly in water-miscible resin. After the resin has been polymerised (hardened) the sample is thin sectioned (ultrathin sections) and stained  it is then ready for viewing.*Embedding, materials  after embedding in resin, the specimen is usually ground and polished to a mirror-like finish using ultra-fine abrasives. The polishing process must be performed carefully to minimize scratches and other polishing artifacts that reduce image quality.*Sectioning  produces thin slices of specimen, semitransparent to electrons. These can be cut on an ultramicrotome with a diamond knife to produce ultra-thin slices about 6090 nm thick. Disposable knives are also used because they can be made in the lab and are much cheaper.*Staining  uses heavy metals such as lead, uranium or tungsten to scatter imaging electrons and thus give contrast between different structures, since many (especially biological) materials are nearly transparent to electrons (weak phase objects). In biology, specimens can be stained en bloc before embedding and also later after sectioning. Typically thin sections are stained for several minutes with an aqueous or alcoholic solution of uranyl acetate followed by aqueous lead citrate.*Freeze-fracture or freeze-etch  a preparation method particularly useful for examining lipid membranes and their incorporated proteins in face on view. The fresh tissue or cell suspension is frozen rapidly (cryofixation), then fractured by simply breaking or by using a microtome while maintained at liquid nitrogen temperature. The cold fractured surface (sometimes etched by increasing the temperature to about 100 C for several minutes to let some ice sublime) is then shadowed with evaporated platinum or gold at an average angle of 45 in a high vacuum evaporator. A second coat of carbon, evaporated perpendicular to the average surface plane is often performed to improve stability of the replica coating. The specimen is returned to room temperature and pressure, then the extremely fragile pre-shadowed metal replica of the fracture surface is released from the underlying biological material by careful chemical digestion with acids, hypochlorite solution or SDS detergent. The still-floating replica is thoroughly washed free from residual chemicals, carefully fished up on fine grids, dried then viewed in the TEM.*Ion beam milling  thins samples until they are transparent to electrons by firing ions (typically argon) at the surface from an angle and sputtering material from the surface. A subclass of this is ion beam milling, where gallium ions are used to produce an electron transparent membrane in a specific region of the sample, for example through a device within a microprocessor. Ion beam milling may also be used for cross-section polishing prior to SEM analysis of materials that are difficult to prepare using mechanical polishing.*Conductive coating  an ultrathin coating of electrically conducting material, deposited either by high vacuum evaporation or by low vacuum sputter coating of the sample. This is done to prevent the accumulation of static electric fields at the specimen due to the electron irradiation required during imaging. The coating materials include gold, gold/palladium, platinum, tungsten, graphite, etc. Coating is especially important for the study of specimens with the scanning electron microscope where electrons are accelerated by a relatively low voltage and therefore are affected more by the sample charging. Another reason for coating, even when there is more than enough conductivity, is to improve contrast, a situation more common with the operation of an FESEM (field emission SEM).DisadvantagesFile:Krillfilter2kils.jpg|thumb|False-color SEM image of the filter setae of an krill. (Raw electron microscope images carry no color information.)Pictured: First degree filter setae with V-shaped second degree setae pointing towards the inside of the feeding basket. The purple ball is 1 m in diameter.Electron microscopes are expensive to build and maintain, but the capital and running costs of confocal light microscope systems now overlaps with those of basic electron microscopes. They are dynamic rather than static in their operation, requiring extremely stable high-voltage supplies, extremely stable currents to each electromagnetic coil/lens, continuously pumped high- or ultra-high-vacuum systems, and a cooling water supply circulation through the lenses and pumps. As they are very sensitive to vibration and external magnetic fields, microscopes designed to achieve high resolutions must be housed in stable buildings (sometimes underground) with special services such as magnetic field cancelling systems. Some desktop electron microscopes have TEM capabilities at relatively low voltages (around 5 kV) without stringent voltage supply, lens coil current, cooling water or vibration isolation requirements and as such are much less expensive to buy and far easier to install and maintain, but do not have the same ultra-high (atomic scale) resolution capabilities as the larger instruments.The samples largely have to be viewed in vacuum, as the molecules that make up air would scatter the electrons. One exception is the environmental scanning electron microscope, which allows hydrated samples to be viewed in a low-pressure (up to ), wet environment.Scanning electron microscopes usually image conductive or semi-conductive materials best. Non-conductive materials can be imaged by an environmental scanning electron microscope. A common preparation technique is to coat the sample with a several-nanometer layer of conductive material, such as gold, from a sputtering machine; however, this process has the potential to disturb delicate samples.Small, stable specimens such as nanotubes, diatom frustules and small mineral crystals (asbestos fibres, for example) require no special treatment before being examined in the electron microscope. Samples of hydrated materials, including almost all biological specimens have to be prepared in various ways to stabilize them, reduce their thickness (ultrathin sectioning) and increase their electron optical contrast (staining). These processes may result in artifacts, but these can usually be identified by comparing the results obtained by using radically different specimen preparation methods. It is generally believed by scientists working in the field that as results from various preparation techniques have been compared and that there is no reason that they should all produce similar artifacts, it is reasonable to believe that electron microscopy features correspond with those of living cells. In addition, higher-resolution work has been directly compared to results from crystallography, providing independent confirmation of the validity of this technique. Since the 1980s, analysis of cryofixed, vitrified specimens has also become increasingly used by scientists, further confirming the validity of this technique.()()()Applications;Semiconductor and data storage*Circuit edit*Defect analysis*analysisBiology and life sciences*electron microscopy*Cryobiology*Protein localization*tomography*tomography*microscopy*Toxicology*production and load monitoring*Particle analysis*Pharmaceutical QC*biology*3D tissue imaging*Virology*Vitrification;Research*beam-induced deposition*Materials qualification*Materials and sample preparation*Nanoprototyping*Nanometrology*Device testing and characterization;Industry*High-resolution imaging*2D & 3D micro-characterization*Macro sample to nanometer metrology*Particle detection and characterization*Direct beam-writing fabrication*Dynamic materials experiments*Sample preparation*Forensics*Mining (mineral liberation analysis)*Chemical/PetrochemicalSee also*Electron microscope images*energy loss spectroscopy (EELS)*filtered transmission electron microscopy (EFTEM)*emission microscope*HiRISE*tunneling microscope*confocal electron microscopy*electron microscope (SEM)*Electron Aberration-corrected Microscope*diffraction*diffraction*microscope*photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS)*image processing*Microscopy*in microscopy*Nanoscience*Nanotechnology*science*Ultramicroscopy (journal)ReferencesExternal links*Science Aid: Electron Microscopy High School (GCSE, A Level) resource*Cell Centered Database  Electron microscopy dataGeneral*Nanohedron.com|Nano image gallery beautiful images generated with electron microscopes.*electron microscopy Website of the ETH Zurich: Very good graphics and images, which illustrate various procedures.*Environmental Scanning Electron Microscope (ESEM)*X-ray element analysis in electron microscope  Information portal with X-ray microanalysis and EDX contentsHistory*John H.L. Watson: Very early Electron Microscopy in the Department of Physics, the University of Toronto  A personal recollection*Rubin Borasky Electron Microscopy Collection, 19301988 Archives Center, National Museum of American History, Smithsonian Institution.Other*The Royal Microscopical Society, Electron Microscopy Section (UK)*Albert Lleal. Natural history subjects at Scanning Electron Microscope SEMaf:Elektronmikroskopiemikroskopmikroskopijaelectrnicmikroskopda:Elektronmikroskopde:Elektronenmikroskopelectrnicomikroskopolectroniqueelectrnicomikroskopelektronelettronico ( )elektwoniklv:Elektronmikroskopsmikroskopashu:Elektronmikroszkpelektronnl:Elektronenmicroscopieja:no:Elektronmikroskopelektronowyeletrnicoelectronicstq:Elektronemikroskopalittrnicumicroscopemikroskopmikroskopfi:Elektronimikroskooppisv:Elektronmikroskopth:hin vi in tzh:
10633
Fredericton
footnotes              Fredericton ( or ) is the capital of the province of Brunswick, by virtue of the provincial parliament which sits there. An important cultural, artistic, and educational centre for the province, Fredericton is home to two universities and cultural institutions such as the Art Gallery, the Sunbury Museum, and The Playhousea performing arts venue.The city hosts the annual Jazz & Blues Festival, attracting regional and international jazz, blues, rock, and world artists. Fredericton is also known for its rock scene, featuring jamband-reminiscent artists like Theft Bus, and the label Music Group.As a provincial capital, its economy is inextricably tied to the fortunes of the public sector; however, the city also contains a growing IT and commercial sector. The city has the highest percentage of residents with a post-secondary education in the province and one of the highest per capita incomes.In the 2006 census, the population of the city of Fredericton was 50,535,(2006 Community Profiles - Census Metropolitan Area/Census Agglomeration) and the population of the agglomeration (termed Greater Fredericton) was 85,688.(  Fredericton is the third largest city in the province after Saint John and Moncton, making it the only provincial capital in the country to not be at least its provinces second largest city.The first major expansion of the city occurred on July 1, 1945 when it amalgamated with the town of Devon. Today the city of Fredericton comprises Fredericton proper, and the boroughs of Silverwood, Nashwaaksis, Barkers Point and Marysville, which were incorporated into the city in 1973.The city is situated in the west-central portion of the province and, along with Moncton and Saint John, is one of the main urban centres in southern New Brunswick. The St. John River flows in a west-east direction, bisecting the city and providing the dominant natural feature for the municipality.HistoryImage:Christ_Church_Cathedral,_Fredericton,_New_Brunswick_(2005).jpg|thumb|right|220px|Christ Church Cathedral, construction began in 1845 (officially opened 1853). The cathedral is modelled after St. Marys Church, Snettisham, Norfolk.The area of the present-day City of Fredericton was first used for seasonal farming by the Mikmaq and Maliseet peoples.  Corn was the primary crop grown in the area. Interestingly, the site of Fredericton served as a sort of capital for Aboriginals in the area. Aucpaque, the principal village of the Aboriginals in the area, was located a few kilometres upriver from the site of present-day Fredericton. French Colony The first European contact was by the French in the late 17th century, who granted the land to Joshua J Mahoney. In 1692, he built a fort (Fort Nashwaak) on the north side of the Saint John River, at the mouth of the River. For a period, Fort Nashwaak served as the capital of the French colony of Acadia. Siege of Fort Nashwaak (1696)Acadian Governor Villebon, and the location of the Capital of Acadia at Fort Nashwaak on the St. John River, became a source of torment for the settlers of New England. Within weeks of an attack launched from Fort Nashwaak on Pemaquid, Maine (present day Maine), the New Englanders struck back. In 1696, an expedition under command of Major Church (military officer) set out to destroy Fort Nashwaak (present day Fredericton; See Fort Nashwaak). Villebon had been alerted and prepared his defences. On October 18, the British troops arrived opposite the fort, landed three canons, and assembled earthworks on the south bank of the Nashwaak River.(For details on the Siege see Beamish Murdoch, pp. 228-231) There was a fierce exchange of fire for two days, with the advantage going to the better-sited Acadian guns. The New Englanders were defeated, with 8 soldiers killed and 17 wounded. The Acadians sustained losses of one killed and two wounded.((Roger Marsters. 2004.p.34))After Mahoneys death in 1700 and a devastating flood, the fort was abandoned.The Fredericton area was first permanently settled and named Pointe-Sainte-Anne (often anglicized to Ste. Annes Point) in 1732 by Acadians fleeing Scotia after the British took over the territory (1710). Their townsite was on the south side of the river, approximately a mile upriver from Fort Nashwaak. Raid on Ste. Annes Point (1759) The British captured Ste. Annes Point during the of the Acadians, burning the settlement to the ground in the John River Campaign (1759).A 1762 settlement attempt by the British was unsuccessful due to the hostility of local Acadian and Aboriginal populations. These settlers ended up building a community downriver at what is today the town of Maugerville (pronounced majorville). However, three fur traders managed to permanently settle there in 1768.thumb|left|The flag of Fredericton.British ColonyIn 1783, Empire Loyalists settled in Ste. Annes Point after the Revolution, although many died during the harsh and long first winter in Fredericton. Those who perished during that winter were buried in what became the Loyalist cemetery, which is still found on the south bank of the Saint John River. When spring came, more Loyalists left the new settlement to take up land grants in other areas of the countryside.When New Brunswick became a separate colony from Nova Scotia in 1784, Ste. Annes Point became the provincial capital, winning out over Parrtown (present-day Saint John) due to its central inland location meaning it was less prone to American attack from the sea. A street plan was laid out to the west of the original townsite, Kings College (now the of New Brunswick) was founded, and the locale was renamed Fredericks Town, in honour of the second son of King III of the United Kingdom, Prince Frederick Augustus, Duke of York. The name was shortened to Fredericton shortly after the city became the official provincial capital of New Brunswick on April 25, 1785.  Thus, in a period of less than three years, the area of Fredericton went from being a sparsely populated region to being the capital of the new colony of New Brunswick.The same attributes that made Fredericton the capital city also made it an ideal spot for a military installation. Many of the original military buildings downtown still stand, and are now tourist attractions.A building was constructed to house the provincial legislative assembly in 1788, but it was destroyed by a fire in 1880. Two years later, the present Legislature Building was constructed.Historic MarysvilleOne of the communities annexed to Fredericton in 1973, Marysville, has a unique and distinctive history of its own.  Marysville is located on the River - a tributary of the Saint John River - just north of pre-1973 Fredericton.  The community is distinguished by its 19th-century mill and historic buildings, which include nineteenth century company houses and buildings patterned after those of British industrial towns.Marysville can be described as a prime example of a nineteenth century mill town. In the 1830s, a saw mill was built on the site of Marysville by two local entrepreneurs. However, the saw mill frequently changed ownership and never showed a profit.  It was Alexander Gibson (popularly referred to as Boss Gibson) who turned this situation around and built a prosperous industrial town. In 1883, under the direction of Gibson, construction began of a cotton mill which was state of the art for its time. Boss Gibson named the company town that grew up around the mill Marysville in honour of his wife.In 1908, having faced financial problems, Gibson sold the mill to a Montreal-based company which, in turn, sold it to Canadian Cottons Ltd. After WWII, foreign competition devastated the mills business and it ceased operations in 1954. There were numerous attempts to re-open the mill however, in 1980, it closed its doors permanently.The mill was renovated and re-opened in 1985 as provincial government offices. The mill still remains the dominant feature in the Marysville skyline.Central to Marysville is Alexander Gibson Memorial School, or AGMS. It was constructed in 1926. Additions to the school occurred in 1957 and in 1977 following a fire. It holds over 300 children from kindergarten to grade 5.NeighbourhoodsThe City of Fredericton is bisected by the Saint John River. This has created two distinctive regions of the city characterized as the Northside and the Southside.thumb|200px|The Beaverbrook Art Gallery.The Southside is characterized by a downtown core consisting of provincial government departments, historical buildings, and numerous business establishments, banks, and law firms.  Downtown also hosts many of the citys cultural attractions such as The Playhouse, the York-Sunbury Museum, and the Art Gallery.  Many notable historical buildings are also located in or near downtown, including many grand Victorian-era residences, the Brunswick Legislative Building, and Christ Church Cathedral. South of downtown, the citys elevation rises along a sloping hill (part of the river valley feature of the city).The Hill, as it is called, includes an area known as College Hill, where the adjoining campuses of the of New Brunswick and St. Thomas University are located, slightly southeast of the downtown area. South-west of the universities is the Doctor Everett Chalmers Hospital, the main hospital serving central/western New Brunswick.East of the universities is the Skyline Acres/Southwood Park area, consisting of a core of older established suburbs, and newer more affluent areas such as Poets Hill.Southwest of downtown, on the Hill, is Odell Park, a large preserved forest area. Its trails and wooded areas are a favourite for hiking, jogging, dog walking, and cross-country skiing for city residents. Odell Park borders on the Fredericton Botanic Garden. West of the park and garden is Hanwell Road, Golf Club Road, and Silverwood neighbourhoods consisting largely of suburban residences.South of the Hill Area, where it plateaus, is a sizeable shopping district consisting of two mallsThe Fredericton Uptown Centre (formerly the Fredericton Mall) and The Regent Mallas well as numerous other retail outlets. The Uptown Centre decided to follow the American trend of eliminating indoor passageways between retail outlets; this has also resulted in the closure of many of its smaller independent outlets.The Citys Northside consists of several boroughs which were at one time separate communities. These include Devon, Nashwaaksis, Marysville and Barkers Point. These communities are largely suburban neighbourhoods and retail outlets. Union Street, which runs just north of the St. John River includes numerous retail outlets as well as an eclectic array of businesses including IT firms, law firms, and real estate agents.  Also located on the Northside is the Brookside Mall, a retail mall anchored by Sobeys, Zellers, NB Liquor and a Lawton Drugs store as well as government offices. A new retail power centre development including Canadian Tire/Marks Work Warehouse, Kent Building Supplies and a Wal-Mart, is located at Two-Nations Crossing. Willie ORee Place - a new multi-million dollar hockey complex - opened in the same area in 2007.The Northside is also home to the Marys First Nation Aboriginal reserve, which includes a community centre and a shopping centre. During the Christmas season, the neighbourhood sports some of the most spectacular and creative decorations in the city.Geography and climateFredericton is located at the bottom of the Saint John River, with most of the citys post-war suburban development occurring on the gently sloping hills on either side of the river (although the downtown core is flat and lies low to the river).At an altitude of about 17 metres above sea level, Fredericton is nestled in the Pennsylvanian Basin. It contrasts markedly from the older parts of the province. There are prominently two distinct areas in the region that are divided around the area of Wilsey Road, in the east end of the city. In the west side, the bedrock underneath the earth is topographically dominant, whereas the other is controlled by Pleistocene and recent deposits leading to the rivers (resulting in the area being shallow and wide). Fredericton and its surroundings are rich in water resources, which, coupled with highly arable soil, make the Fredericton region ideal for agriculture. The Saint John River and one of its major tributaries, the River, come together in Fredericton.  The uninhabited parts of the city are heavily forested.Fredericton has a continental climate (climate classification Dfb) and enjoys a mild climate compared to most of Canada, although its location away from the coast means it is more prone to extreme temperatures than most other major cities in Canada. The average January low temperature is -16 C; while the average high in July high is 26 C.(Canadas National Climate Archive - Archives climatiques nationales du Canada | Meteorological Service of Canada - Service mtorologique du Canada)The city gets a fair amount of precipitation, although major paralyzing snow and rain storms such as blizzards and hurricanes are uncommon compared to more coastal cities like Moncton or Halifax (but do happen on occasion). On average, Fredericton receives approximately 1100 mm of precipitation per year. Snowfall is common between late November and early April, and snow usually stays on the ground beginning in December. Flooding occurs during the spring of most years on area rivers and affects the citys low-lying neighbourhoods.Education and researchUniversities and collegesthumb|right|260px|Looking down the hill from UNB towards downtown and the Saint John River.Frederictons status as an educational centre is evident in the citys two degree granting universities: the of New Brunswick (UNB), and St. Thomas University (STU).The University of New Brunswick was founded in 1785, making it the oldest public university in America. Built in 1826, UNBs Old Arts Building is the oldest university building still in use in Canada. UNB also houses Renaissance College, which is a leading leadership training institution in New Brunswick. UNB houses a Faculty of Law which is one of two Anglophone common-law schools in Atlantic Canada.St. Thomas University (STU) is the provinces only university and has been located in Fredericton since 1964, when it moved from its New Brunswick campus. It is a liberal arts university with programs in gerontology, criminology, journalism, work, native studies, and education. STU offers an excellent program in Human Rights and is the home of the Atlantic Human Rights Research and Development Centre.It is also home to one of the leading 3D and 2D Animation schools The Gaming and Animation Institute of FrederictonAdding to Frederictons cultural and artistic life is the Brunswick College of Craft and Design which houses the provinces leading programs in photography and visual arts. The Brunswick Community College maintains a small campus in Fredericton providing two-year degree programs oriented to quick entry into the job market; however, NBCCs major campuses are located in other communities. That will change in the spring of 2011 when a larger campus is completed on the grounds of UNB. The College of Forest Technology maintains its English-language campus in the city; MCFT is a small post-secondary school training students from across the Maritime provinces.Fredericton is also home to a small Pentecostal College, the Northeast Christian College, located on the citys northside.  This college trains and certifies Pentecostal ministers.School systemFrederictons schools are located in District 18 (formerly known as District 26). Fredericton is home to three public schools, two operating in the English language and one in the French language. High School, which was once the largest school in the of Nations, primarily serves students living on Frederictons south side. It is also one of the oldest public high schools in Canada tracing its beginnings to 1785 - having celebrated its bicentennial in 1985. The District 18 office is located here. Fredericton High School is home to several sports teams - including basketball, hockey, soccer, and football - which dominated New Brunswick provincial high school sports championships during much of the 1980s and 1990s.Hayes High School, which opened in 1999, primarily serves students living on Frederictons north side. The high school is a Public Private Partnership, known as a P3. Leo Hayes current principal is Kevin Pottle. The motto of the school is Somnia Sunt Circuli Veritatis, Latin for Dreams are the seedlings of reality. Leo Hayes High School places priority on both Arts and Athletics, in addition to Academia. In addition, there are four schools, fourteen schools and three schools in the city. A recent issue with middle schools in the city has been the location of George Street Middle School and Albert Street Middle School close to the city centre. This fails to account for the citys changing demographic which has seen the growth of suburban neighbourhoods. In 2009 Albert Street Middle School was replaced by Bliss Carman Middle School, located in the Kimble Road Park area of Skyline Acres. Albert Street Middle School has since been demolished, with a new YMCA being erected in its place.Fredericton is also serviced by the French language Sainte-Anne and cole des Btisseurs, which provides K-5 (DB) and 6-12 (ESA) French language education.  cole Sainte-Anne is in the same building as that used by the French community centre - the Centre communautaire Sainte-Anne, which also houses the French public library, the Dr. Marguerite Michaud Library, and an amphitheatre.  Both schools are administered by a school district system (District 1) separate from that which governs the English language schools in the city. Fredericton is also home to a private Christian school. Devon Park Christian School is located on the Northside and is a part of District 99. Its current principal is Jonathan McAloon.ResearchFredericton hosts several major research centres - dealing with policy development, agriculture, forestry, and engineering. These research institutions are connected to the citys two universities as well as the provincial and federal governments.The John Flemming Forestry Centre (including Provincial and Federal Departments) is the leading forestry research centre in Atlantic Canada. This Centre carries out major research endeavours in forestry management and scientific research. The Centre closely collaborates with the Forestry Department at the of New Brunswick which is one of the top Forestry Departments in Canada.  As well, research and development in agriculture and crop development is carried out at the Agricultural Research Station in Lincoln.The University of New Brunswick is the site of several major research centres in social science, forestry, geomatics and biomedical engineering, and policy development. These include the Centre for Conflict Studies, which carries out research on military and strategic issues and the Muriel McQueen Fergusson Centre for Family Violence Research, which carries out multi-disciplinary research on family violence issues. Furthermore, the Institute of Biomedical Engineering has completed groundbreaking work on prosthetic limbs to aid war amputees in developing countries.As well, the citys growing IT sector has been the basis for new research on IT and computer programming development, including the October 2002 opening of the Research Council of Canada Institute for Information Technology  e-Business facility, located on the of New Brunswick campus.Fredericton is also the home of New Brunswicks Provincial Research Organization (PRO), RPC. RPC specializes in applied research and technical services in support of New Brunswick industry.  Specializations include capabilities in aquaculture, mining, manufacturing, energy and the environment.(RPC)EconomyThe 19th and early 20th centuries, the lumber industry - with its corresponding mills - was a primary sector of Frederictons economy. Over the course of the 20th century, this industry declined and gave way to the provincial government and the universities becoming the primary employers in the city.The policies of centralizing provincial government functions during the 1960s under New Brunswick Premier Robichaud - along with the expanded role of the public sector characteristic of the 1960s/70s - led to a sizeable expansion of the citys population. It was during these decades that the Hill area on the citys Southside was largely developed and bedroom communities such as New Maryland emerged.thumb|200px|Downtown Fredericton.The 1960s also saw an expansion of the of New Brunswick - due to increased post-war university enrollment - as well as the construction of the Fredericton campus of Thomas University. Also contributing to this expansion was the move of the Law School to the Fredericton area. This expansion of the post-secondary sector also contributed to Frederictons population growth during the 1960s and 1970s. Since then, the citys population has continued to grow though at a slower rate due to slower growth of the government sector - along with hiring freezes and in some cases layoffs - during the McKenna and Lord governments.In recent years, increased student enrollment at the citys universities has led to greater demand for rental property. This has led to the construction of new university residences and apartment buildings in the city, and increased rates of rent - making them the highest rental rates in the province.The predominance of the universities and government provide Fredericton with a measure of economic stability. The city has not been subject to the uncertainty and hardships faced by Atlantic Canadian cities dealing with mill shutdowns and the decline of the mining and fishing industries. For this reason, Fredericton is one of the few Atlantic Canadian cities, along with Moncton and Halifax, Scotia that has actually reported a population increase in recent years.The city has been investing actively in IT infrastructure.  The City of Fredericton was recently the winner of the Judges Innovation Award at the 2004 C.I.P.A. (Canadian Information Productivity Awards) due to their Fred-eZone free municipality wide WiFi network initiative. This and other innovations by the citys utelco, e-Novations, led Intel to do a case study on their successes.  Fred-eZone spans much of the citys downtown and parts of surrounding residential areas, as well as peripheral commercial areas such as Frederictons Regent Mall.The Community Forum (a New York City based tank) selected Fredericton as a 2008  and a 2009 Top 7 Intelligent Community based partly on the Citys work in the IT sector.(http://www.intelligentcommunity.org/index.php?srcgendocs&refTop7_2008_Fredericton_NB_Canada&categoryCommunity. Retrieved July 11, 2008.)Recently, the New Brunswick government has been seeking to attract more immigrants to the province (and consequently the Fredericton area) to increase the labour force and compensate for an aging population.The Greater Fredericton Region has also established an investment attraction program called Invest Greater Fredericton. The purpose is to provide investors and site selectors with one central source for economic information such as real estate, demographics, key industries and more.Culturethumb|right|260px|The Beaverbrook Art Gallery.Due to the presence of the universities, Fredericton is more cosmopolitan than many cities its size.  This is reflected in cuisine offered by local ethnic restaurants (which include Caribbean, Chinese, Greek, Indian, Korean, Italian, Japanese, Lebanese, Mexican, Pakistani and Vietnamese foods). There are also several retail outlets that sell ethnic products and artifacts.Fredericton is an important cultural centre of the region featuring art galleries, the New Brunswick College of Craft and Design, museums and theatres which promote local artistic and literary talent.  The federal government named Fredericton the Cultural Capital of Canada for the year 2009.  Canada Officers Square is an outdoor public space located at the centre of the city. It serves as a venue for outdoor concerts during the summer, featuring a variety of local and national talent. During the winter, Officers Square is transformed into an outdoor skating rink.Architecturally, Fredericton spans more than two centuries. The city features an eclectic mix of buildings and residences ranging from classical Victorian style to modern office buildings and architecture. Frederictons skyline is also distinguished by many historic churches.Artsthumb|200px|left|Statue of Lord Beaverbrook.The Art Gallery, a prestigious art gallery on the south bank of the Saint John River, is New Brunswicks provincial art gallery and maintains a collection of considerable quality, including several paintings by Dal. The gallery was established and built in 1958 by British press baron Beaverbrook as a gift to his native province. Fredericton is home to several commercial galleries such as Gallery 78, Ingrid Mueller Arts + Concepts.The Playhouse hosts plays and musicals throughout the year, as well as presenting visiting comedians and musical performances by both Canadian and international artists. The Playhouse is the main venue for Theatre New Brunswick (TNB). TNB was founded by prominent Canadian director Learning in 1969, and is the provinces largest professional theatre company.Every fall Fredericton hosts the Jazz & Blues Festival. The week-long festival draws artists from all over North America. Since its inception in 1991, the event has grown into a large, diverse festival which has attracted artists from around the world including Guy, Warren Haynes, Peterson, and Parliament. The festival also provides a stage for local, provincial, and Maritime talent, and has been pivotal in the development of many New Brunswick groups and performers, including Hot Toddy, Abstract Operation, Grand Theft Bus, David Myles, and Ross Neilson.Fredericton is home to the Brunswick Summer Music Festival, which, each August, features professional chamber music by top local players and nationally renowned performers. Ensemble, NBs contemporary music organization, is also based here. In addition, New Brunswick performs most of its season in Fredericton.Every November Fredericton hosts the Silver Wave Film Festival. Originally called the Tidal Wave Film Festival, it has been running since 2001. Each year attendance and interest in the festival has risen. Because of the its relationship with the Film Festival, the Silver Wave Festival offers Frederictonians the opportunity to see films that would otherwise be overlooked in their smaller market. Films created by New Brunswickers are also screened at the festival. Many of the local films come from shorts created through the of New Brunswick and the New Brunswick Filmmakers Co-operative.Historically, Fredericton has been referred to as the Poets Corner of Canada, because it was the birthplace of Carman, G. D. Roberts and Joseph Sherman. For many years, it was the home of the acclaimed poet, playwright, and journalist Nowlan.Prominent writers and poets currently living in Fredericton include Fraser, Robert Gibbs, M.T. Dohaney, Curtis, Wayne Curtis, David Adams Richards, Robert Hawkes, Shari Andrews, Anthony Jarman and Joe Blades.Sports and recreationThere are no professional sports teams in Fredericton, although both universities have extensive athletic programs. The UNB Varsity Reds and St. Thomas Tommies are rivals in most sports, and their hockey games are called the Battle of the Hill. The UNB Varsity Reds have experienced recent success in national competition, winning the CIS (Canadian Interuniversity Sport) championships in the 20062007 and 20082009 seasons.  They also finished in second place to the University of Alberta at the end of the 20072008 season.St. Thomas Universitys other sports teams include; mens and womens soccer, rugby, golf, cross country, basketball, and volleyball.  These sports teams play in the ACAA league, which mens and womens hockey play in the AUS leaague.The Hockey League was once represented in Fredericton, with the Express playing between 1981 and 1988, and the Canadiens between 1990 and 1999. The AAA hockey system in Fredericton still uses the name Canadiens as their team names in Pee Wee, Bantam, and Midget levels.Fredericton has several large parks, including Odell Park, Reading Park, and Wilmot Park. Killarney Lake and nearby Mactaquac Provincial Park have small beaches which are popular in the summer. Skiing (and snowboarding in recent years) at nearby Crabbe Mountain is also a common winter activity among city residents. There are also several cross-country skiing trails that cross the city.Hockey pioneer ORee was born in Fredericton. He is the first black hockey player to be drafted into the Hockey League. The citys largest hockey arena is named Willie ORee Place, and is known to local residents as the OReena.Located on the citys north side, the complex houses two hockey rinks, as well as meeting facilities and an indoor track. A second sports complex for Frederictons south side is in the planning stage, and is set for construction in 2010 to 2011. The  site is located on Knowledge Park Drive. Plans include an arena with two ice surfaces, an artificial turf soccer pitch, a baseball diamond, a six-court indoor tennis facility, and a  dog park.Fredericton has a strong Rugby history with the Fredericton Loyalists RFC. Fredericton Loyalists. Each summer the Loyalists host the Brunswick Black Spruce team which competes in the Canada Super League.Government and politicsAssembly of New Brunswick.jpg|thumb|right|260px|NB Legislative Building, seat of New Brunswick Government since 1882.thumb|240px|Fredericton City Hall in 2005.Administrative structureFredericton has a mayor-council and non-partisan form of government, with the mayor and council serving fixed four-year terms (three years until 2004), and elections held in May. The current mayor is Woodside, who first served from 1986 until 1999 but was re-elected in 2004. He was re-elected in May 2008 for his seventh term.The city is divided into twelve wards (six on each side of the Saint John River), with each ward electing one councillor.The Boyce Farmers Market, open on Saturday mornings, is a place where municipal, provincial and federal politicians frequently visit to mingle with their electorate - something which has evolved into a political tradition.Some current councillors include second term councillor Bruce Grandy of Ward 2 (Nashwaaksis) and third term councillor Mike OBrien of Ward 3 (Fulton Heights/North Devon), and first term councillor Jordan Graham of Ward 11 (UNB/East End Area). Graham is a University of New Brunswick student and the youngest councillor ever elected to city council.Fredericton and provincial/federal politicsProvincially, Fredericton elected Progressive Conservatives from 1952 until electoral sweep of the Liberal Party in 1987 when they won every seat in New Brunswick under McKenna. Since then there has been greater political alteration in the provincial electoral landscape in Fredericton.In 1991, the right-wing Confederation of Regions Party won the riding of Fredericton North (along with several other nearby ridings). In 1999 Progressive Conservatives swept all three Fredericton area seats; however, in 2003, Fredericton-North and Fredericton-Fort Nashwaak returned to the Liberals.(Elections New Brunswick)Federally, the city forms most of the riding of Fredericton. This riding was formerly known as Fredericton-York-Sunbury but was redistributed prior to the 1997 general election.  From 1957 until 1993 Fredericton returned Progressive Conservatives. The 2008 Federal Election saw the Conservative Party of Canada take the seat with former New Maryland MLA Ashfield taking this seat with 42% of the popular vote.DemographicsThe population of City of Fredericton is 50,535 (greater Fredericton 85,688, both per 2006 census), although unofficial reports indicate a number nearer 59,500 due to the student population which is often not counted in official censuses.  Along with Moncton and Halifax, Fredericton is one of three Maritime cities to register a population growth in recent years.EthnicityFrederictons population is predominantly white.  However, a black minority has had a long presence in the city, primarily in the Barkers Point borough. ORee, the first black player in the NHL, was from Fredericton. The largest non-white segment of Frederictons population is made up of First Nations people, who live primarily on the Saint Marys Reserve located in the citys north side.The 1960s and 1970s saw the beginning of an influx of immigrants from Asia and the East. However, their numbers remain small. Since 2000, the citys universities - Saint Thomas University and the University of New Brunswick - have seen a growing number of students from overseas attending.ReligionThe residents of Fredericton are predominantly Christian, with Protestants forming the largest denomination. The city is notable for its many churches - a high number per capita in comparison to most other Canadian cities. The small Pentecostal Northeast Christian College is located on the citys north side. While the Roman Catholic population is not as large, the city does boast the provinces only Roman Catholic university - Saint Thomas University.  Recent discussions at Saint Thomas University have concerned whether the university should adopt a more Catholic character.Fredericton has a synagogue, a mosque, and a Hindu temple as well. The importance of these institutions has been growing in recent years warranting visits by prominent politicians in the area seeking election. A Unitarian fellowship has been serving Fredericton since 1960 as a place for people to find a liberal religious home.  Fredericton also hosts a Shambhala Buddhist meditation centre. http://www.fredericton.shambhala.org/index.phpThe religious breakdown of Fredericton is as follows:*52.0% Protestant*29.6% Catholic*2.1% other Christian*1.6% non-Christian*17.4% non-religiousLanguageWhile a predominantly Anglophone city, the civil service has seen an increase in the Citys Francophone population.  This population is serviced by the Centre Communautaire Sainte-Anne (which includes K-12 schooling, a radio station, a public library, and cultural centre).  As well, Fredericton is serviced by the Francophone church located on Regent Street.The linguistic breakdown of Fredericton is as follows:*75.6% English only*23.6% Bilingual (French and English)*0.5% French only*0.3% OtherMediaTransportationAirAir service is provided out of the International Airport, located approximately 15 kilometres east of downtown in Lincoln. It is served by Canada, which operates direct flights to Toronto, Ottawa, Montreal and Halifax. Seasonal direct flights are also offered to Cuba and the Caribbean during the late winter and early spring months.Roads and highwaysFredericton is located on the Highway, which passes along the southern municipal boundary. Routes 7 and 8 (the latter being a former alignment of the Trans-Canada) also pass through the city. Two highway bridges, the Street Bridge and the Margaret Bridge, cross the Saint John River. Those bridges both feed into controlled-access roads (Routes 8 and 105 serving the citys north side.) The citys highway system is mostly complete, and traffic jams rarely occur.Streets in downtown follow a grid pattern. In residential areas of downtown, some neighbourhoods are traffic-calmed and include traffic circles at intersections to slow the speed of cars and discourage thoroughfare traffic. Northumberland Street and Odell Avenue have adopted speedbumps to slow fast moving traffic. The pattern of streets in the rest of the city varies including straight thoroughfares (such as Smythe Street, Prospect Street and Regent Street), to curved streets and cul-de-sacs in primarily residential areas.Rail and Public transit, rail services, waterthumb|left|300px|Fredericton Transit provides public transportation six days a week in the city.There is no rail service into Fredericton. Passenger service was cancelled in the early 1960s and was restored between 1981 and 1985 before being cut again. Freight service stopped in 1996 and all railway tracks have been abandoned and removed, with the city joining St. Johns and Charlottetown as provincial capitals without rail service.  Fredericton is served by Acadian intercity bus lines which provides bus transit services to cities in Eastern Canada and the Northeastern United States.Fredericton Transit provides bus transit service to most areas of the city.  All city buses feature bike racks so that cyclists can take advantage of bus services as well.  Furthermore, during the last budget the Federal Government pledged more money towards urban infrastructure - some of this money will go towards upgrading Frederictons bus transit system.Fredericton is also serviced by several taxi companies. The major companies in alphabetical order are: ABC Car Services, Checker Cab, Georges Skycab, Loyal Taxi, Standard Taxi and Trius Taxi.As of 2009, Fredericton water is not fluoridated; however, it is treated to remove excess manganese, and the water is chlorinated.Fredericton currently has 45 kilometres of bicycle lanes.Fredericton trail systemImage:Reading Trail.jpg|thumb|right|300px|Reading Trail runs through the last remaining forest in Frederictons Skyline Acres neighbourhood.Fredericton has a network of 25 trails totalling more than 85 km on both sides of the St. John and Nashwaak Rivers. Many of the city trails are trails that follow old railway lines. These include the Old Train Bridge that spans 0.6 km across the St. John River, providing a panoramic view of downtown Fredericton. The rail trail system in Fredericton is part of the Sentier NB Trail system and some of these trails are also part of the larger Trail network.Railway service through Fredericton was discontinued by CP Rail in fall 1993 and CN Rail in spring 1996. Following abandonment, both companies sold their right-of-ways to the provincial government which developed the trail network in partnership with the city and volunteer trail organizations. The trails are used by residents for walking, biking, and jogging and boast several scenic vistas along the Saint John and Nashwaak rivers as well as a mix of urban and wooded/natural scenery.On the south side of the city, CP Rails Fredericton Subdivision enters the city from Rusagonis to the south, following the Wilsey Road and Beaverbrook Street to the former railway yard where a Sobeys supermarket has been built along Regent Street. The former CP passenger station (Street Railway Station) is located at the end of the Fredericton Subdivision and, after sitting abandoned for decades, was renovated into a winery and liquor store in 2011.On the north side of the city, CP Rails Gibson Subdivision enters the city from Douglas in the west, following the Saint John River through Nashwaaksis to South Devon. CP Rails Minto Subdivision enters the city from Barkers Point in the east and follows the Saint John River to South Devon and crossing the Nashwaak River. CP Rails Marysville Spur runs from Barkers Point to Marysville along the east bank of the Nashwaak River.On the south side, CN Rails Oromocto Subdivision enters the city from Lincoln in the east and parallels the former CP line to the downtown rail yard and York Street Station. CNs former Centreville Subdivision continues beyond the station to Silverwood in the west; this rail line was abandoned west of the Hanwell Road after the Dam opened in 1968 and flooded the right-of-way through to Woodstock. CN Rails Nashwaak Subdivision joined the Oromocto Subdivision at Una Junction, immediately north of Beaverbrook Street opposite the University of New Brunswick campus. The line proceeds north, crossing the Saint John River on the Railway Bridge, to the former railway yard in South Devon where CP Rails Gibson and Minto subdivisions join. The Nashwaak Subdivision continues up the Nashwaak River valley to McGivney.Reading Park Trail, (pronounced Redding) is a 1.1 km forested trail going through Reading Park in Skyline Acres on the Citys south side. Protected by trees, and constructed in a loop, Reading Park Trail is very popular with city residents for walking their dogs. Its also a destination for bird watchers, as the parks forest is one of the citys last remaining habitats for the woodpecker.AttractionsMuseums and historic buildingsthumb|right|300px|Robert Burns statue, across from the Provincial Legislature in downtown Fredericton* Art Gallery* Brunswick Legislative Building* Old Government House* Historic Garrison District* Sunbury Museum* Boyce Farmers Market* Christ Church Cathedral* Brunswick Sports Hall of Fame* Gallery 78* East* Loyalist Cemetery* Old Burial Ground* Sir Howard Douglas Hall (Old Arts Building)Parks and public spacesFredericton contains numerous public parks featuring preserved forest lands - such as Odell Park and Reading Park. Odell Park is adjacent to the Fredericton Botanic Garden. Furthermore, Fredericton features tree lined streets and elm trees in particular which have earned the city its nickname The City of Stately Elms.  Frederictons parks and public spaces include:* The Green - along the north and south banks of the Saint John River featuring biking/walking trails, two football/soccer fields, picnic areas, a baseball field and the Lighthouse which is a restaurant/tourist attraction.* Odell Park - features preserved forested areas and trails, as well as recreational spaces for picnics and outdoor gatherings, adjacent to the Botanic Garden.* Reading Park - a  passive use park incorporating an open meadow, and a 1.1 kilometre walking trail through one of the citys last swaths of old-growth forest.* Killarney Lake Park - beaches and picnic spots as well as nature trails* Wilmot Park - recreational park in downtown featuring wading pool, playground, and family oriented activities.* Queen Square Park - this popular park, located in the heart of downtown Fredericton, features a new pool (a hybrid of a kids wading pool with fun water toys and a lap pool), playground, tennis courts and 2 baseball fields. Tennis courts are flooded in winter to create a skating rink.* Officers Square - Venue for outdoor concerts and skating rink in the winter.Partner Cities* Gangnam-gu, KoreaSee also*of cities in Canada*of people from FrederictonReferences* Dallison, Robert L. A Tour of Boss Gibsons Marysville: A Nineteenth Century Mill Town.  Fredericton Heritage Trust, 1991.* Hachey, Philip Osmond The geology and ground water of the Fredericton district. UNB Thesis, 1955.* McIntyre, Glen, Bruce Oliver and Bob Watson, A Valuable and Important Place - Frederictons Loyalist Origins 1783.  A Fredericton Historical Research Project, 1983.* History of Christchurch Cathedral* Harvest Jazz and Blues Festival http://www.harvestjazzandblues.com/about.htmlExternal links* City of Fredericton* Fredericton Trail Systemzh-min-nan:Frederictonbg:ca:Frederictoncs:Frederictonda:Frederictonde:Frederictonel:es:Fredericton(Nov-Brunsviko)eu:Frederictonfa:fo:Frederictonfr:Frederictonfy:Frederiktongd:Frederictonko:id:Frederictonos:it:Frederictonkl:Frederictonka:la:Fredericopolislt:Frederiktonashu:Frederictonmr:nl:Frederictonja:no:Frederictonpnb:pl:Frederictonpt:FrederictonNoul Brunswickru:New Brunswicksr:fi:Frederictonsv:Frederictonta:New Brunswickuk:( )vo:Frederictonwar:Frederictonzh:
11466
Francisco_Franco
 (19471975)|branch        Army|serviceyears  19071975|rank          Chief of the General Staff|unit         |commands     |battles       Rif WarCivil War|awards       |military_blank1 |military_data1  |military_blank2 |military_data2  |military_blank3 |military_data3  |military_blank4 |military_data4  |military_blank5 |military_data5  }}Francisco Franco y Bahamonde (; 4 December 1892 20 November 1975) was a Spanish general and head of state of Spain from October 1936 (as a unified nation from 1939 onwards), and facto regent of the nominally restored of Spain from 1947 until his death in November 1975. He came to power as a prominent member of the far-right Falange movement. As head of state, Franco used the title Caudillo de Espaa, por la gracia de Dios, meaning Leader of Spain, the grace of God, but also was called formally as His Excellency, The Head Of State. Franco was from a military family, and although originally intent on entering the Navy, he instead became a soldier. He participated in the Rif War in Morocco, becoming the youngest general in Europe by 1926.() After returning to the Spanish mainland, he saw service suppressing an anarchist-led strike in 1934, defending the stability of Alcal-Zamoras conservative government. Following the formation of a Popular Front government, made up of various left-wing factions, instability heightened. Violence between militant groups rose sharply with assassination of conservative parliamentary leader Calvo Sotelo in retaliation for the killing of Jos Castillo.(Beevor, Anthony. The Spanish Civil War. London: Penguin, 1982. p 49.) Franco and his co-conspirators used Calvos death as their pretext for war, even though they had already initiated the plan for their rebellion.(Beevor, Anthony. The Spanish Civil War. London: Penguin, 1982. p 51.)Franco and the military participated in a coup dtat against the Popular Front government. The coup failed and devolved into the Civil War during which Franco emerged as the leader of the Nationalists against the Popular Front government. After winning the civil war with military aid from Italy and Germanywhile the Soviet Union and various Internationalists aided the Republicans,he dissolved the Spanish Parliament. He then established a right-wing authoritarian regime that lasted until 1978, when a new constitution was drafted. During World War II, Franco officially maintained a policy of non-belligerency and later of neutrality, in part because Spain had not recovered from the considerable damage of the civil war. However, he supported the volunteer Division who fought with the Axis on the Eastern Front. He was initially disliked by Cuban Batista, who, during World War II, had suggested a joint U.S.-American assault on Spain in order to overthrow Francos regime.(Batistas Boost, Time, , 1943. Retrieved , 2010.)After the end of World War II, Franco maintained his control in Spain through the implementation of austere measures: the systematic suppression of dissident views through censorship and coercion,(Sinova, J. La censura de prensa durante el franquismo/ The Media Censorship During Franco Regime. Random House Mondadori. ISBN 84-8346-134-X.)(Lzaro, A. James Joyces encounters with Spanish censorship, 19391966. Joyce Studies Annual, 1 Jan 2001.) the imprisonment of ideologically opposed enemies in concentration camps throughout the country (such as Los Merinales in Seville, San Marcos in Len, Castuera in Extremadura, and Miranda de Ebro),(Rodrigo, J. Cautivos: Campos de concentracin en la Espaa franquista, 19361947, Editorial Crtica.) the implementation of forced labor in prisons,(Gastn Aguas, J. M. & Mendiola Gonzalo, F. (eds.) Los trabajos forzados en la dictadura franquista: Bortxazko lanak diktadura frankistan. ISBN 978-84-611-8354-8) and the use of the death penalty and heavy prison sentences as deterrents for his ideological enemies.(Duva, J. Octavio Alberola, jefe de los libertarios ajusticiados en 1963, regresa a Espaa para defender su inocencia Diario El Pas, 9 November 1998) During the War, the United States established a diplomatic and trade alliance with Spain, due to Francos strong anti-Communist policy. American President Nixon toasted Franco,(John T. Woolley and Gerhard Peters, Toasts of the President and General Francisco Franco of Spain at a State Dinner in Madrid, The American Presidency Project. Santa Barbara, California: University of California (hosted), Gerhard Peters (database). Accessed online 24 May 2008.) and, after Francos death, stated: General Franco was a loyal friend and ally of the United States.(New York Times. Nixon Asserts Franco Won Respect for Spain. 21 November 1975, Friday, page 16.) After his death, Spain gradually began its transition to democracy. Today, pre-constitutional symbols from the Franco regimesuch as the national Coat of arms or flag with the Imperial Eagleare banned by law in Spain.Early lifeFrancisco Franco delgabo del la mancha was born at 123:30 on December 4, 1892,900 at number 108 Calle Frutos Saavedra, Ferrol (currently known as Calle Mara), in the citys town. He was baptised on December 17 at the military church of San Francisco with the baptismal names Francisco Paulino Hermenegildo Tedulo: Francisco for his paternal grandfather, Paulino for his godfather, Hermenegildo for his maternal grandmother and godmother and Tedulo for the saint day of his birth.The Franco family was originally from Andalucia.groupnote Since relocating to Galicia they were strongly involved in the Navy and over two centuries produced naval officers for six generations uninterrupted, right down to Francos father Nicols Franco y Salgado-Arajo (22 November 1855  22 February 1942).Francos mother was Mara del Pilar Bahamonde y Pardo de Andrade (1865  28 February 1934), and his parents married in 1890. The young Franco spent much of his childhood with his two brothers, Nicols (Ferrol, 18911977), a naval officer and diplomat who in time was married to Mara Isabel Pascual del Pobil y Ravello, and Ramn (a pioneering aviator and a member of Esquerra Republicana), and his two sisters, Mara del Pilar (Ferrol, 1894  Madrid, 1989), later wife of Alonso Jariz y Jerz, and Mara de la Paz (Ferrol, 1899  Ferrol, 1900).Military careerRif War and rise through the ranksFrancisco was to follow his father into the Navy but as a result of the War the country lost much of its navy as well as most of its colonies. Not needing more officers, entry into the Naval Academy was closed from 1906 to 1913. To his fathers chagrin, he decided to join the Army. In 1907, he entered the Infantry Academy in Toledo, from which he graduated in 1910. He was commissioned as a lieutenant. Two years later, he obtained a commission to Morocco. Spanish efforts to physically occupy their new African protectorate provoked the protracted Rif War (from 1909 to 1927) with native Moroccans. Tactics at the time resulted in heavy losses among Spanish military officers, but also gave the chance of earning promotion through merit. It was said that officers would get either la caja o la faja (a box or a girdles sash). Franco soon gained a reputation as a good officer. He joined the newly formed regulares, colonial native troops with Spanish officers, who acted as troops.In 1916, at the age of 23 and already a captain, he was badly wounded in a skirmish at El Biutz and possibly lost a testicle.() His survival marked him permanently in the eyes of the native troops as a man of baraka (good luck). He was also recommended unsuccessfully for Spains highest honor for gallantry, the coveted Cruz Laureada de San Fernando. Instead, he was promoted to major (comandante), becoming the youngest grade officer in the Spanish Army. From 1917 to 1920, he was posted on the Spanish mainland. That last year, Lieutenant Colonel Milln Astray, a histrionic but charismatic officer, founded the Foreign Legion, along similar lines to the Foreign Legion. Franco became the Legions second-in-command and returned to Africa. On 24 July 1921, the poorly commanded and overextended Spanish Army suffered a crushing defeat at Annual at the hands of the Rif tribes led by the Abd el-Krim brothers. The Legion symbolically, if not materially, saved the Spanish enclave of Melilla after a three-day forced march led by Franco. In 1923, already a colonel, he was made commander of the Legion.The same year, he married Mara del Carmen Polo y Martnez-Valds; they had one child, a daughter, Mara del Carmen, born in 1926.(Carmen Franco y Polo, 1st Duquesa de Franco on thePeerage.com. Retrieved 8 August 2006.) As a special mark of honor, his man (padrino) at the wedding was King Alfonso XIII, a fact that would mark him during the Republic as a monarchical officer. Promoted to colonel, Franco led the first wave of troops ashore at Hoceima in 1925. This landing in the heartland of Abd el-Krims tribe, combined with the French invasion from the south, spelled the beginning of the end for the short-lived of the Rif. Becoming the youngest general in Spain in 1926, Franco was appointed in 1928 director of the newly created General Military Academy of Zaragoza, a new college for all Army cadets, replacing the former separate institutions for young men seeking to become officers in infantry, cavalry, artillery, and other branches of the army.During the Second Spanish RepublicWith the fall of the monarchy in 1932, in keeping with his long-standing apolitical record, Franco did not take any notable stand. But the closing of the Academy, in June, by War Minister Azaa, provoked his first clash with the Republic. Azaa found Francos farewell speech to the cadets() insulting. For six months, Franco was without a post and under surveillance.On 5 February 1932, he was given a command in Corua. Franco avoided involvement in Sanjurjos attempted coup that year, and even wrote a hostile letter to Sanjurjo expressing his anger over the attempt. As a side result of Azaas military reform, in January 1933, Franco was relegated from the first to the 24th in the list of Brigadiers; conversely, the same year (17 February), he was given the military command of the Islands: a post above his rank.New elections held in October 1933 resulted in a center-right majority. In opposition to this government, a revolutionary movement broke out 5 October 1934. This uprising was rapidly quelled in most of the country, but gained a stronghold in Asturias, with the support of the miners unions. Franco, already general of a Division and aide to the war minister, Diego Hidalgo, was put in command of the operations directed to suppress the insurgency. The forces of the Army in Africa were to carry the brunt of this, with General Lpez Ochoa as commander in the field. After two weeks of heavy fighting (and a death toll estimated between 1,200 and 2,000), the rebellion was suppressed.The insurgency in Asturias sharpened the antagonism between Left and Right. Franco and Lpez Ochoawho, prior to the campaign in Asturias, was seen as a left-leaning officerwere marked by the left as enemies. At the start of the Civil War, Lpez Ochoa was assassinated. Some time after these events, Franco was briefly commander-in-chief of the Army of Africa (from 15 February onwards), and from 19 May 1935 on, Chief of the General Staff.General election of 1936After the ruling centre-right coalition collapsed amid the Straperlo corruption scandal, new elections were scheduled. Two wide coalitions formed: the Popular Front on the left, ranging from Union Party to Communists, and the Frente Nacional on the right, ranging from the center radicals to the conservative Carlists. On 16 February 1936, the left won by a narrow margin.(Riots Sweep Spain on Lefts Victory; Jails Are Stormed, The New York Times, 18 February 1936.) Growing political bitterness surfaced again. The government and its supporters, the Popular Front, had launched a campaign against the Opposition whom they accused of plotting against the Republic. According to the right wing opposition, the real enemies of the Republic were not on the Right but on the Left; Spain was in imminent danger of falling under a Communist dictatorship, and therefore by fighting the Popular Front they, the opposition, were merely doing their duty in defence of law and order and of the freedom and the fundamental rights of the Spanish people.(Muggeridge, Malcolm, editor, Cianos Diplomatic Papers, Odhams, London, 1948: 1718)The days after the election were marked by near-chaotic circumstances.On 23 February, Franco was sent to the distant Islands to serve as the islands military commander, a position in which he had few troops under his command. Meanwhile, a conspiracy led by Mola was taking shape. In June, Franco was contacted and a secret meeting was held in Tenerifes Esperanza Forest to discuss a military coup. (An obelisk commemorating this historic meeting can be found in a clearing at Races.)Outwardly, Franco maintained an ambiguous attitude almost up until July. On 23 June 1936, he wrote to the head of the government, Quiroga, offering to quell the discontent in the army, but was not answered. The other rebels were determined to go ahead, con Paquito o sin Paquito (with Franco or without him), as it was put by Sanjurjo, the honorary leader of the military uprising. After various postponements, 18 July was fixed as the date of the uprising. The situation reached a point of no return and, as presented to Franco by Mola, the coup was unavoidable and he had to choose a side. He decided to join the rebels and was given the task of commanding the Army of Africa. A privately owned DH 89 Havilland Dragon Rapide, flown by two British MI6 agents, Bebb and Hugh Pollard,() was chartered in England 11 July to take Franco to Africa.The assassination of the right-wing opposition leader Calvo Sotelo by government police troops, possibly acting on their own in retaliation for the murder of Jos Castillo, precipitated the uprising. On 17 July one day earlier than planned, the African Army rebelled, detaining their commanders. On 18 July, Franco published a manifesto() and left for Africa, where he arrived the next day to take command.A week later, the rebels, who soon called themselves the Nationalists, controlled a third of Spain, but most navy units remained under control of the Republican loyalist forces, which left Franco isolated. The coup had failed, but the Civil War had begun.From the Spanish Civil War to World War IIThe Spanish Civil War began in July 1936 and officially ended with Francos victory in April 1939, leaving 190,000(Juli, coord. Vctimas de la guerra civil, Madrid, 1999, ISBN 84-8460-333-4) to 500,000() dead. Despite the Agreement of August 1936, the war was marked by foreign intervention on behalf of both sides, leading to international repercussions. The nationalist side was supported by Fascist Italy, which sent the Truppe Volontarie, and later by Germany, which assisted with the Legion infamous for their of Guernica in April 1937. Britain and France strictly adhered to the arms embargo, provoking dissensions within the French Popular Front coalition led by Blum, but the Republican side was nonetheless supported by volunteers fighting in the Brigades and the Soviet Union. (See for example Loachs and Freedom.)Because Hitler and Stalin used the war as a testing ground for modern warfare, some historians, such as Nolte, have considered the Spanish Civil War, along with the Second World War, part of a Civil War lasting from 1936 to 1945 and characterized mainly as a Left/Right ideological conflict. However, this interpretation has not found acceptance among most historians, who consider the Second World War and the Spanish Civil War two distinct conflicts. Among other things, they point to the political heterogeneity on both sides (See Spanish Civil War: other factions) and criticize a monolithic interpretation which overlooks the local nuances of Spanish history.The first monthsDespite Francos having no money, while the state treasury was in Madrid with the government, there was an organized economic lobby in London looking after his financial needs with Lisbon as their operational base. Eventually, he was to receive important help from his economic and diplomatic boosters abroad.Following the 18 July 1936, pronunciamiento, Franco assumed the leadership of the 30,000 soldiers of the Army of Africa. The first days of the insurgency were marked with a serious need to secure control over the Spanish Moroccan Protectorate. On one side, Franco managed to win the support of the natives and their (nominal) authorities, and, on the other, to ensure his control over the army. This led to the summary execution of some 200 senior officers loyal to the Republic (one of them his own first cousin). Also his loyal bodyguard was shot by a man known as Manuel Blanco.()  Francos first problem was how to move his troops to the Peninsula, since most units of the Navy had remained in control of the Republic and were blocking the of Gibraltar. He requested help from Mussolini, who responded with an unconditional offer of arms and planes; Canaris, the head of the Abwehr military intelligence, persuaded Hitler, as well, to support the Nationalists. From 20 July onward he was able, with a small group of 22 mainly German Ju 52 airplanes, to initiate an air bridge to Seville, where his troops helped to ensure the rebel control of the city. Through representatives, Franco started to negotiate with the United Kingdom, Nazi Germany and Italy for more military support, and above all for more airplanes. Negotiations were successful with the last two on 25 July and airplanes began to arrive in Tetouan on 2 August. On 5 August Franco was able to break the blockade with the newly arrived air support, successfully deploying a ship convoy with some 2,000 soldiers.In early August, the situation in western Andalusia was stable enough to allow him to organize a column (some 15,000 men at its height), under the command of then Lieutenant-Colonel Yage, which would march through Extremadura towards Madrid. On 11 August Mrida was taken, and on 15 August Badajoz, thus joining both nationalist-controlled areas. Additionally, Mussolini ordered a voluntary army, the Truppe Volontarie (CTV) of some 12,000 Italians of fully motorized units to Seville and Hitler added to them a professional squadron from the Luftwaffe (2JG/88) with about 24 planes. All these planes had the Nationalist Spanish insignia painted on them, but were flown by Italian and German troops. The backbone of Francos aviation in those days were the Italian SM.79 and SM.81 bombers, the biplane Fiat CR.32 fighter and the German Ju 52 cargo-bomber and the He 51 biplane fighter.On 21 September, with the head of the column at the town of Maqueda (some 80 km away from Madrid), Franco ordered a detour to free the besieged garrison at the Alczar of Toledo, which was achieved 27 September. This controversial decision gave the Popular Front time to strengthen its defenses in Madrid and hold the city that year but was an important morale and propaganda success.Rise to powerThe designated leader of the uprising, Gen. Sanjurjo died on 20 July 1936 in an airplane crash. Therefore, in the nationalist zone, Political life ceased.(Hugh Thomas, The Spanish Civil War, revised and enlarged edition (1977), New York: Harper & Row. ISBN 0-06-014278-2. p. 258) Initially, only military command mattered; this was divided into regional commands (Mola in the North, Queipo de Llano in Seville commanding Andalusia, Franco with an independent command and Cabanellas in Zaragoza commanding Aragon). The Spanish Army of Morocco itself was split into two columns, one commanded by General Yage and the other commanded by Colonel Jos Varela.From 24 July, a coordinating junta was established, based at Burgos. Nominally led by Cabanellas, as the most senior general,(Thomas writes, to pacify, rather than to dignify, him. op. cit., p. 282.) it initially included Mola, three other generals, and two colonels; Franco was later added in early August.(Thomas, op. cit., p. 282.) On 21 September it was decided that Franco was to be commander-in-chief (this unified command was opposed only by Cabanellas),(Thomas, op. cit., p. 421.) and, after some discussion, with no more than a lukewarm agreement from Queipo de Llano and from Mola, also head of government.(Thomas, op. cit., pp 423424.) He was, doubtlessly, helped to this primacy by the fact that, in late July, Hitler had decided that all of Germanys aid to the nationalists would go to Franco.(Thomas, op. cit., p. 356.)Mola considered Franco as unfit and not part of the initial rebel group. But Mola himself had been somewhat discredited as the main planner of the attempted coup that had now degenerated into a civil war, and was strongly identified with the Carlists monarchists and not at all with the Falange, a party with Fascist leanings and connections (phalanx, a far-right Spanish political party founded by Jos Antonio Primo de Rivera), nor did he have good relations with Germany; Queipo de Llano and Cabanellas had both previously rebelled against the dictatorship of Primo de Rivera and were therefore discredited in some nationalist circles; and Falangist leader Antonio Primo de Rivera was in prison in Alicante (he would be executed a few months later) and the desire to keep a place open for him prevented any other falangist leader from emerging as a possible head of state. Francos previous aloofness from politics meant that he had few active enemies in any of the factions that needed to be placated, and had cooperated in recent months with both Germany and Italy.(Thomas, op. cit., pp 420422.)On 1 October 1936, in Burgos, Franco was publicly proclaimed as Generalsimo of the National army and Jefe del Estado (of State).(Thomas, op. cit., p. 424.) When Mola was killed in another air accident a year later (which some believe was an assassination) (2 June 1937), no military leader was left from those who organized the conspiracy against the Republic between 1933 and 1935.(Thomas, op. cit., pp 689690.)Military commandFrom that time until the end of the war, Franco personally guided military operations. After the failed assault on Madrid in November 1936, Franco settled to a piecemeal approach to winning the war, rather than bold maneuvering. As with his decision to relieve the garrison at Toledo, this approach has been subject of some debate; some of his decisions, such as, in June 1938, when he preferred to head for Valencia instead of Catalonia, remain particularly controversial from a military viewpoint. It was however, in Valencia, Castellon and Alicante where the last troops were defeated by Franco.Francos army was supported by Germany in the form of the Condor Legion, infamous for the of Guernica on 26 April 1937. These German forces also provided maintenance personnel and trainers, and some Germans and Italians served over the entire war period in Spain. Principal assistance was received from Italy (Truppe Volontarie), but the degree of influence of both powers on Francos direction of the war seems to have been very limited. Nevertheless, the Italian troops, despite not being always effective, were present in most of the large operations in big numbers, while the CTV helped the Nationalist airforce dominate the skies for most of the war. de Oliveira Salazars Portugal also openly assisted the Nationalists from the start, contributing some 20,000 troops.It is said that Francos direction of the German and Italian forces was limited, particularly in the direction of the Legion, however, he was officially, by default, their supreme commander and they rarely made decisions on their own. For reasons of prestige, it was decided to continue assisting Franco until the end of the war, and Italian and German troops paraded on the day of the final victory in Madrid.(The Spanish Republic and the civil war 193139, by Gabriel Jackson, New Jersey, 1967)Political commandIn April 1938, Franco managed to fuse the ideologically incompatible national-syndicalist Falange (phalanx, a far-right Spanish party founded by Antonio Primo de Rivera) and the Carlist monarchist parties under a single-party under his rule, dubbed Espaola Tradicionalista y de las Juntas de Ofensiva Nacional-Sindicalista (FET y de las JONS), which became the only legal party in 1939. The Falangists hymn, al Sol, became the semi-national anthem of Francos not yet established regime.This new political formation appeased the pro-Nazi Falangists while tempering them with the anti-German Carlists. Francos brother-in-law Serrano Ser, who was his main political advisor, was able to turn the various parties under Franco against each other to absorb a series of political confrontations against Franco himself. At a certain moment he even expelled the original leading members of both the Carlists (Fal Conde) and the Falangists (Hedilla) to secure Francos political future. Franco also appeased the Carlists by exploiting the Republicans anti-clericalism in his propaganda, in particular concerning the Martyrs of the war. While the loyalist forces presented the war as a struggle to defend the Republic against Fascism, Franco depicted himself as the defender of Catholic Spain against atheist Communism.The end of the Civil WarBefore the fall of Catalonia in February 1939, the Prime Minister of Spain Negrn unsuccessfully proposed, in the meeting of the Cortes in Figueres, capitulation with the sole condition of respecting the lives of the vanquished. Negrn was ultimately deposed by Colonel Casado, later joined by Miaja.Thereafter, only Madrid (see of Madrid) and a few other areas remained under control of the government forces. On 27 February Chamberlain and Daladiers governments recognized the Franco regime, before the official end of the war. The PCE (the Spanish Communist Party) attempted a mutiny in Madrid with the aim of re-establishing Negrns leadership, but Jos Miaja retained control. Finally, on 28 March 1939, with the help of pro-Franco forces inside the city (the column General Mola had mentioned in propaganda broadcasts in 1936), Madrid fell to the Nationalists. The next day, Valencia, which had held out under the guns of the Nationalists for close to two years, also surrendered. Victory was proclaimed on 1 April 1939, when the last of the Republican forces surrendered. On this very date, Franco placed his sword upon the altar in a church and in a vow, promised that he would never again take up his sword unless Spain itself was threatened with invasion.At least 50,000 people were executed during the civil war.(()() Francos victory was followed by thousands of executions (from 15,000 to 25,000 people(Recent searches conducted with parallel excavations of mass graves in Spain (in particular by the for the Recovery of Historical Memory, ARMH) estimate that the total of people executed after the war may arrive at a number between 15,000 to 35,000. See for example Fosas Comunes  Los desaparecidos de Franco. La Guerra Civil no ha terminado, El Mundo, 7 July 2002 )) and imprisonments, while many were put to labour, building railways, drying out swamps, digging canals (La Corchuela, the Canal of the Bajo Guadalquivir), construction of the de los Cados monument, etc. The 1940 shooting of the president of the Catalan government, Companys, was one of the most notable cases of this early suppression of opponents and dissenters. According to Gabriel Jackson, the number of victims of the White Terror (executions and hunger or illness in prisons) only between 1939 and 1943 was 200,000.(Jackson, Gabriel. The Spanish Republic and the Civil War, 1931-1939. Princenton University Press. 1967. Princenton. p.539)Although leftists suffered from an important death-toll, the Spanish intelligentsia, atheists and military and government figures who had remained loyal to the Madrid government during the war were also targeted for oppression.In his recent, updated history of the Spanish Civil War, Beevor reckons Francos ensuing white terror claimed 200,000 lives. The red terror had already killed 38,000.(Men of La Mancha. Rev. of Antony Beevor, The Battle for Spain. The Economist (22 June 2006).) Julius Ruiz concludes that although the figures remain disputed, a minimum of 37,843 executions were carried out in the Republican zone with a maximum of 150,000 executions (including 50,000 after the war) in Nationalist Spain.(Julius Ruiz, Defending the Republic: The Garca Atadell Brigade in Madrid, 1936. Journal of Contemporary History 42.1 (2007):97.) In Checas de Madrid, Csar Vidal comes to a nationwide total of 110,965 victims of Republican violence; 11,705 people being killed in Madrid alone.(International justice begins at home by Alberto Montaner, Herald, 4 August 2003)Despite the official end of the war, guerrilla resistance to Franco (known as the maquis) was widespread in many mountainous regions, and continued well into the 1950s. In 1944, a group of republican veterans, which also fought in the resistance against the Nazis, invaded the dAran in northwest Catalonia, but they were quickly defeated.The end of the war led to hundreds of thousands of exilees, mostly to France (but also Mexico, Chile, Cuba, the USA and so on.).() On the other side of the Pyrenees, refugees were confined in internment camps of the Third Republic, such as Gurs or Vernet, where 12,000 Republicans were housed in squalid conditions (mostly soldiers from the Division(accessdate2 March 2010)). The 17,000 refugees housed in Gurs were divided into four categories (Brigadists, pilots, Gudaris and ordinary Spaniards). The Gudaris (Basques) and the pilots easily found local backers and jobs, and were allowed to quit the camp, but the farmers and ordinary people, who could not find relations in France, were encouraged by the Third Republic, in agreement with the Francoist government, to return to Spain. The great majority did so and were turned over to the Francoist authorities in Irn. From there they were transferred to the de Ebro camp for purification according to the of Political Responsibilities.After the proclamation by Marshal Ptain of the France regime, the refugees became political prisoners, and the police attempted to round-up those who had been liberated from the camp. Along with other undesirables, they were sent to the internment camp before being deported to Nazi Germany. 5,000 Spaniards thus died in concentration camp.(Film documentary on the website of the nationale de lhistoire de limmigration ) The Chilean poet Neruda, who had been named by the Chilean President Aguirre Cerda special consul for immigration in Paris, was given responsibility for what he called the noblest mission I have ever undertaken: shipping more than 2,000 Spanish refugees, who had been housed by the French in squalid camps, to Chile on an old cargo ship, the Winnipeg.()World War IIFile:Bundesarchiv Bild 183-L15327, Spanien, Heinrich Himmler bei Franco.jpg|right|thumb|300px|Front row in order from left to right: Wolff, Himmler, Franco and Spains Foreign Minister Serrano Ser in Madrid, October 1940In September 1939, World War II broke out in Europe, and although Hitler met Franco once in Hendaye, France (23 October 1940), to discuss Spanish entry on the side of the Axis, Francos demands (food, military equipment, Gibraltar, North Africa etc.) proved too much and no agreement was reached. (An oft-cited remark attributed to Hitler is that the German leader would rather have some teeth extracted than to have to deal further with Franco).(The Goebbels Diaries, ed. Louis P. Lochner (London: Hamish Hamilton, 1948), 25 Oct. 1940, 153.)  Francos tactics received important support from Hitler and Mussolini during the civil war. He remained emphatically neutral in the Second World War, but nonetheless offered various kinds of support to Italy and Germany. He allowed Spanish soldiers to volunteer to fight in the German Army against the USSR (the Division), but forbade Spaniards to fight in the West against the democracies. Francos common ground with Hitler was particularly weakened by Hitlers propagation of mysticism and his attempts to manipulate Christianity,  which went against Francos fervent commitment to defending Christianity and Catholicism.() Contributing to the disagreement was an ongoing dispute over German mining rights in Spain. Some historians argue that Franco made demands that he knew Hitler would not accede to in order to stay out of the war. Other historians argue that he, as leader of a destroyed country in chaos, simply had nothing to offer the Germans and their military. Yet, after the collapse of France in June 1940, Spain did adopt a pro-Axis non-belligerency stance (for example, he offered Spanish naval facilities to German ships) until returning to complete neutrality in 1943 when the tide of the war had turned decisively against Germany and its allies.  Franco did also consider blocking allied access to the Mediterrean Sea by invading the British-controlled Gilbraltar,( but abandoned the idea after learning that the plan would have likely failed and would have given the British an excellent opportunity to take both the Islands and Morocco.(() Some volunteer Spanish troops (the Divisin Azul, or Blue Division)not given official state sanction by Francowent to fight on the Eastern Front under German command from 19411943. Some historians have argued that not all of the Blue Division were true volunteers and that Franco expended relatively small but significant resources to aid the Axis powers battle against the Soviet Union.  According to the recent discovery of a World War II Document, Franco ordered his provincial governors to compile a list of Jews while he negotiated an alliance with the Axis powers. Franco supplied Heinrich Himmler with a list of 6,000 Jews in Spain, for the Nazis Final Solution. It is true that Franco built no concentration camps on Spanish territory, nor did he voluntarily hand Jews over to Germany.(Aderet, Ofer. World War II document reveals: General Franco handed Nazis list of Spanish Jews.   Haaretz News Agency. 22 June 2010) Plans for alliance fell through and Spain never carried out the Nazis plans. During the entire war, especially after 1942, the Spanish borders were more or less kept open for Jewish refugees from France and Nazi-occupied territories in Europe. Spanish diplomats, acting outside of Francos authority,( extended their diplomatic protection over Jews in Hungary, Czechoslovakia and the Balkans. Spain was a safe haven for all Jewish refugees and antisemitism was not official policy under the Franco regime. In 1940 alone, roughly 40,000 Jewish refugees found safe haven in Spain.  Overall, per some estimates, during World War II, Francos policies saved the lives of almost 200,000 European Jews.On 14 June 1940, the Spanish forces in Morocco occupied Tangier (a city under the rule of the of Nations) and did not leave it until 1945.Spain under FrancoFile:Flag of Spain under Franco 1938 1945.svg|right|thumb|Flag of the State (19381945)Franco was recognized as the Spanish head of state by Britain and France in February 1945, two months before the war officially ended. Already proclaimed Generalsimo of the Nationalists and Jefe del Estado (of State) in October 1936,( he thereafter assumed the official title of Su Excelencia el Jefe de Estado (His Excellency the Head of State). However, he was also referred to in state and official documents as Caudillo de Espaa (the Leader of Spain), and sometimes called el Caudillo de la ltima Cruzada y de la Hispanidad (the Leader of the Last Crusade and of the Hispanic heritage) and el Caudillo de la Guerra de Liberacin contra el Comunismo y sus Cmplices (the Leader of the War of Liberation Against Communism and Its Accomplices).In 1947, Franco proclaimed Spain a monarchy, but did not designate a monarch. This gesture was largely done to appease the Nacional (Carlists and Alfonsists). Although a self-proclaimed monarchist himself, Franco had no particular desire to proclaim himself King of Spain, nor have a King to rule the country yet, and as such, he left the throne vacant, with himself as a de facto Regent. He wore the uniform of a General (a rank traditionally reserved for the King) and resided in the El Pardo Palace. In addition, he appropriated the royal privilege of walking beneath a canopy, and his portrait appeared on most coins and postage stamps. He also added the grace of God, a phrase usually part of the styles of monarchs, to his style.Franco initially sought support from various groups. He initially garnered support from the fascist elements of the Falange, but distanced himself from fascist ideology after the defeat of the Axis in World War II. Francos administration marginalized fascist ideologues in favor of technocrats, many of whom were linked with Dei, who promoted the economic modernization under Franco.()Although Franco and Spain under his rule adopted some trappings of fascism, he, and Spain under his rule, are not generally considered to be fascist; among the distinctions, fascism entails a revolutionary aim to transform society, where Franco and Francos Spain did not seek to do so, and, to the contrary, although authoritarian, were conservative and traditional.(Laqueur, Walter Fascism: Past, Present, Future p. 13 1996 Oxford University Press)(De Menses, Filipe Ribeiro Franco and the Spanish Civil War, p. 87, Routledge)(Gilmour, David, The Transformation of Spain: From Franco to the Constitutional Monarchy, p. 7 1985 Quartet Books)(Payne, Stanley Fascism in Spain, 19231977, p. 476 1999 of Wisconsin Press)(Payne, Stanley Fascism in Spain, 19231977, p. 347, 476 1999 Univ. of Wisconsin Press) Payne notes: scarcely any of the serious historians and analysts of Franco consider the generalissimo to be a core fascist.((Laqueur, Walter Fascism: Past, Present, Future, p. 13, 1997 Oxford University Press US) The consistent points in Francos long rule, along with the Moroccan Moorish Guard, included above all authoritarianism, nationalism, ethnic cleansing of Jews,(Ailsby, Christopher, The Third Reich Day By Day, p.73, Zenith Press)(Keene, Judith, Fighting for Franco, p.vii, Continuum International) the defense of Catholicism and the family, anti-Freemasonry, and anti-Communism.The aftermath of the Civil War was socially bleak: many of those who had supported the Republic fled into exile. Spain lost thousands of doctors, nurses, teachers, lawyers, judges, professors, businessmen, artists, etc. Many of those who had to stay lost their jobs or lost their rank. Sometimes those jobs were given to unskilled and even untrained personnel. This deprived the country of many of its brightest minds, and also of a very capable workforce. However, this was done to keep Spains citizens consistent with the ideals sought by the Nationalists and Franco.thumb|right|250px|Franco and U.S. President Eisenhower in Madrid, Spain. 1959With the end of World War II, Spain suffered from the economic consequences of its isolation from the international community. This situation ended in part when, due to Spains strategic location in light of War tensions, the United States entered into a trade and military alliance with Spain. This historic alliance commenced with United States President Eisenhowers visit in 1953 which resulted in the of Madrid. Spain was then admitted to the UN in 1955.In 1952, a syndicate from Texas, including Jack Crichton, Lee DeGolyer, and Murchison sought drilling rights to petroleum in Spain. The operation was handled by Delta Drilling Company.()Political oppressionThe first decade of Francos rule in the 1940s following the end of the Civil War in 1939 saw continued oppression and the killing of an undetermined number of political opponents. Estimation is difficult and controversial, but the number of people killed probably lies somewhere between 15,000 and 50,000 (see above, The end of the Civil War).Subsequently, Francos state became less violent, but during his rule non-government unions and all political opponents across the spectrum, from communist and anarchist organizations to liberal democrats and Catalan or Basque separatists, were either suppressed or tightly controlled by all means, up to and including violent police repression. The Nacional del Trabajo (CNT) and the General de Trabajadores (UGT) trade-unions were outlawed, and replaced in 1940 by the corporatist Vertical. The Socialist Workers Party and the Republicana de Catalunya (ERC) were banned in 1939, while the Communist Party of Spain (PCE) went underground. The Nationalist Party (PNV) went into exile, and in 1959, the ETA armed group was created to wage a low-intensity war against Franco.Francos Spanish nationalism promoted a unitary national identity by repressing Spains cultural diversity. Bullfighting and flamenco(Roman, Mar. Spain frets over future of flamenco. 27 October 2007. Associated Press.) were promoted as national traditions while those traditions not considered Spanish were suppressed. Francos view of Spanish tradition was somewhat artificial and arbitrary: while some regional traditions were suppressed, Flamenco, an Andalusian tradition, was considered part of a larger, national identity. All cultural activities were subject to censorship, and many, such as the Sardana, the national dance of Catalunya,were plainly forbidden (often in an erratic manner). This cultural policy relaxed with time, most notably in the late 1960s and early 1970s.Franco also used language politics in an attempt to establish national homogeneity. He promoted the use of Castilian Spanish and suppressed other languages such as Catalan, Galician, and Basque. The legal usage of languages other than Castilian was forbidden. All government, notarial, legal and commercial documents were to be drawn up exclusively in Castilian and any written in other languages were deemed null and void. The usage of any other language was forbidden in schools, in advertising, and on road and shop signs. Publications in other languages were generally forbidden. Citizens continued to speak these languages in private. This was the situation throughout the 1940s and, to a lesser extent, during the 1950s, but after 1960 the non-Castilian Spanish languages were freely spoken and written and reached bookshops and stages, although they never received official status.On the other hand, the Catholic Church was upheld as the church of the Spanish State, and regained many of the traditional privileges it had lost under the Republic. Civil servants had to be Catholic, and some official jobs even required a good behavior statement by a priest. Civil marriages which had taken place under Republican Spain were declared null and void unless confirmed by the Catholic Church, a difficult if not impossible requirement considering civil marriages were only possible after the couple made a public renunciation of the Catholic faith. Divorce was forbidden, and also contraceptives and abortion.Francoism professed a devotion to the traditional role of women in society, that is: loving child to her parents and brothers, faithful to her husband, residing with her family. Official propaganda confined her role to family care and motherhood. Immediately after the war, most progressive laws passed by the Republic aimed at equality between the sexes were made void. Women could not become judges, or testify in trial. They could not become university professors. Their affairs and economy had to be managed by their father or by their husbands. Even in the 1970s a woman fleeing from an abusive husband could be arrested and imprisoned for abandoning the home (abandono del hogar). Until the 1970s a woman could not have a bank account without a co-sign by her father or husband. In the 1960s and 1970s the situation was somewhat relieved, but it was not until after Francos death that a more egalitarian view of the sexes was adopted.The enforcement by public authorities of traditional values was a stated intent of the regime, mainly by using a law (the Ley de Vagos y Maleantes, Vagrancy Act) enacted by Azaa.() The remaining nomads of Spain (Gitanos and Mercheros like El Lute) were especially affected. In 1954, homosexuality, pedophilia, and prostitution were, through this law, made criminal offenses,() although its application was seldom consistent.Most country towns, and rural areas, were patrolled by pairs of Guardia Civil, a military police for civilians, which functioned as his chief means of social control. Larger cities, and capitals, were mostly under the Armada, or grises (greys) as they were called. Franco, like others at the time, evidenced a concern about a possible Masonic conspiracy against his regime. Some non-Spanish authors have described it as being an obsession.Student revolts, at universities in the late 1960s and early 1970s, were violently repressed by the heavily armed Polica Armada (Armed Police). Plainclothes secret police worked inside Spanish universities. In May 1972, an American student was arrested by university secret police in Barcelona and charged and imprisoned under martial law for the crime of wearing an old Spanish Army jacket. Although the US State Department, through its consulate in Barcelona, was notified, it elected not to intervene.Franco continued to personally sign all death warrants until just a few months before he died, despite international campaigns requesting him to desist.Spanish colonial empire and decolonisationSpain attempted to retain control of its colonial empire throughout Francos rule. During the War (195462), Madrid became the base of the de larme secrte (OAS) right-wing French Army group which sought to preserve French Algeria. Despite this, Franco was forced to make some concessions. When Morocco became independent in 1956, he surrendered Morocco to Mohammed V, retaining only a few enclaves (the de soberana). The year after, Mohammed V invaded Sahara during the War (known as the Forgotten War in Spain). Only in 1975, with the March, did Morocco take control of all of the former Spanish territories in the Sahara.In 1968, under United Nations pressure, Franco granted Spains colony of Guinea its independence, and the next year, ceded the exclave of Ifni to Morocco. Under Franco, Spain also pursued a campaign to force a negotiation on the overseas territory of Gibraltar, and closed its border with that territory in 1969. The border would not be fully reopened until 1985.Economic policyFile:Spanish peseta coin with Franco 1963.gif|thumb|left|1963 peseta coin with the image of Franco saying: Francisco Franco, Leader of Spain, by the grace of GodThe Civil War had ravaged the Spanish economy. Infrastructure had been damaged, workers killed, and daily business severely hampered. For more than a decade after Francos victory, the economy improved little. Franco initially pursued a policy of autarky, cutting off almost all international trade. The policy had devastating effects, and the economy stagnated. Only black marketeers could enjoy an evident affluence.According to Francos detractor Nicols Sartorius, a Czech engineer and con-man managed to convince the general that with the waters of the River Jarama, certain herbs and secret powders, Spain could get all the petroleum it needed. On another, he was convinced of a plan to solve the countrys terrible hunger of the 1940s by feeding the population of 30 million with dolphin sandwiches. Some 200,000 people died of hunger in the early years of Francoism, a period known as Los Aos de Hambre (The Years of Hunger, or the Hungry Years).On the brink of bankruptcy, a combination of pressure from the USA, the IMF and technocrats from the Dei managed to convince the regime to adopt a free market economy in 1959 in what amounted to a mini coup dtat which removed the old guard in charge of the economy, despite the opposition of Franco. This economic liberalisation was not, however, accompanied by political reforms and repression continued unabated.Economic growth picked up after 1959 after Franco took authority away from these ideologues and gave more power to the apolitical technocrats. The country implemented several development policies and growth took off creating an economic boom that became known as the Miracle. Concurrent with the absence of social reforms, and the economic power shift, a tide of mass emigration commenced to European countries, and to lesser extent, to South America. Emigration helped the regime in two ways. The country got rid of populations it would not have been able to keep in employment, and the emigrants supplied the country with much needed monetary remittances.During the 1960s, the wealthy classes of Francoist Spains population experienced further increases in wealth, particularly those who remained politically faithful. International firms established their factories in Spain where salaries were low, taxes nearly non-existent, strikes forbidden and workers health or real state regulations were unheard of. Furthermore, Spain was virtually a new market. Spain became the second-fastest growing economy in the world, just behind Japan. By the time of Francos death in 1975, Spain still lagged behind most of Western Europe, but the gap between its GDP per capita and that of the leading Western European countries had narrowed greatly and the country had developed a large industrialised economy.RegionsFranco was reluctant to enact any form of administrative and legislative decentralisation and kept a fully centralised government with a similar administrative structure to that established by the of Bourbon and General Primo de Rivera y Orbaneja. Such structures were both based on the model of the French centralised State.The main drawback of this kind of management is that government attention and initiatives were irregular, and often depended more on the goodwill of regional Government representatives than on regional needs. Thus, inequalities in schooling, health care or transport facilities among regions were patent: classically affluent regions like Madrid, Catalonia, or the Basque Country fared much better than Extremadura, Galicia or Andalusia. Some regions, like Extremadura or La Mancha did not have a university.The Basque Country and Catalonia were among the regions that offered the strongest resistance to Franco in the Civil War. Franco dissolved the autonomy granted by the Spanish Republic to these two regions and to Galicia. Franco abolished the centuries-old fiscal privileges and autonomy (the fueros) in two of the three Basque provinces: Guipuzcoa and Biscay, but kept them for Alava which had sided with the nationalists in the civil war.Among Francos greatest area of support during the civil war was Navarre, also a Basque speaking region in its north half. Navarre remained a separate region from the Basque Country and Franco decided to preserve its also centuries old fiscal privileges and autonomy, the so-called of Navarre. The regional privileges for Alava and Navarre were kept because Alava and Navarre had participated in the initial coup dtat against the Republican government on 18 July 1936.Franco abolished the official statute and recognition for the Basque, Galician, and languages that the Spanish Republic had granted for the first time in the history of Spain. He returned to Castilian as the only official language of the State and education. The Franco era corresponded with the popularisation of the compulsory national educational system and the development of modern mass media, both controlled by the State and in the Castilian language, and heavily reduced the number of speakers of Basque, Catalan and Galician, as happened during the second half of the twentieth century with other European minority languages which were not officially protected such as Gaelic or French Breton. By the 1970s the majority of the population in the urban areas could not speak the language or, as in some Catalan towns, their use had been abandoned. The most endangered case was the Basque language. By the 1970s Basque had reached the point where the language was close to extinction and it is now recognised that the language would have disappeared in a few decades. This was the main reason that drove the Francoist provincial government of Alava to create a network of Basque medium schools (Ikastola) in 1973 which were State-financed.Francos death and funeralFile:Santa Cruz del Valle de los Cados.jpg|thumb|Franco is entombed in the monument of Santa Cruz del de los CadosIn 1969, Franco designated Prince Juan Carlos de Borbn, who had been educated by him in Spain, with the new title of King of Spain, as his successor. This designation came as a surprise for the Carlist pretender to the throne, as well as for Juan Carloss father, Don Juan, the Count of Barcelona, who technically had a superior right to the throne. By 1973, Franco had surrendered the function of prime minister (Presidente del Gobierno), remaining only as head of state and commander in chief of the military.As his final years progressed, tension within the various factions of the Movimiento would consume Spanish political life, as varying groups jockeyed for position to control the countrys future. On 19 July 1974, the aged Franco fell ill from various health problems, and Juan Carlos took over as Head of State. Franco soon recovered on 2 September and resumed his duties as Head of State, but one year later he fell ill once again from more health problems including a long battle with Disease. On 30 October 1975, he fell into a coma and was put on life support. Franco died just after midnight on 20 November 1975, at the age of 82, just two weeks before his 83rd birthday  the same date as the death of Antonio Primo de Rivera, founder of the Falange. However, the historian Ricardo de la Cierva claims that on 19 November around 6 pm, he was told that Franco had already died. After Francos death, Prince Juan Carlos decided to bury him at de los Cados, a colossal memorial that nominally honors all the casualties of the Spanish Civil War, but designed by Franco and with a distinctly nationalist tone. Chilean dictator and self-proclaimed president General Pinochet, who revered Franco and modeled himself in his image, attended his funeral, as did Bolivias dictator General Banzer.Francos legacyIn Spain and abroad, the legacy of Franco remains controversial. The length of his rule, the suppression of opposition, and the effective propaganda sustained through the years has made a detached evaluation impossible. For 40 years, Spaniards, and particularly children at school were told that Providence had sent him to save Spain from chaos and poverty. With time, the regime had evolved somewhat, and the ferocious oppression of the early 40s was decreased to some degree in later years. The relative economic success of this period created a considerable group of grateful citizens, who found the increase in everyday standard of living more significant than most of his and his partys human rights abuses during this period.In 2006, the BBC reported that Giertych, an MEP of the of Polish Families, had expressed admiration for Franco, stating that he guaranteed the maintenance of traditional values in Europe.(Europe diary: Franco and Finland, News, 6 July 2006 )Many Spaniards, particularly those who suffered under Francos rule, have sought to remove official recognition of his regime. Most government buildings and street names that were named after him during his long rule, have been renamed to their original names. Several statues of Franco and other public Francoist symbols have been removed, with reportedly the last statue in Santander having been removed in 2008.(retira la estatua de Franco, Pas, 18 December 2008) Curiously, the city of Melilla, an autonomous city of Spain located in North Africa, has the distinction of being the only place in Spain where a statue of Franco is still visible on a public street.(Melilla no retirar la estatua de Franco si Defensa no le da otra ubicacin 14 April 2009) In 2002, Maria Aznars conservative government had voted against proposals to remove street names, statues and other symbols of the Franco era.(In March 2006, the Permanent Commission of the Parliament unanimously adopted a resolution firmly condemning the multiple and serious violations of rights committed in Spain under the Francoist regime from 1939 to 1975.(Primera condena al rgimen de Franco en un recinto internacional, EFE, El Mundo, 17 March 2006 )(Von Martyna Czarnowska, Almunia, Joaquin: EU-Kommission (4): Ein halbes Jahr Vorsprung, Weiner Zeitung, 17 February 2005 (article in German language). Retrieved 26 August 2006.) The resolution was at the initiative of the MEP Brincat and of the historian Mara de Puig, and is the first international official condemnation of the repression enacted by Francos regime.( The resolution also urged to provide public access to historians (professional and amateurs) to the various archives of the Francoist regime, including those of the private Francisco Franco which, as well as other Francoist archives, remain as of 2006 inaccessible to the public.( The Fundacin Francisco Franco received various archives from the Pardo Palace, and is alleged to have sold some of them to private individuals.( Furthermore, it urged the Spanish authorities to set up an underground exhibition in the Valle de los Caidos monument, in order to explain the terrible conditions in which it was built.( Finally, it proposes the construction of monuments to commemorate Francos victims in Madrid and other important cities.(In Spain, a commission to repair the dignity and restore the memory of the victims of Francoism (Comisin para reparar la dignidad y restituir la memoria de las vctimas del franquismo) was approved in the summer of 2004, and is directed by the socialist vice-president Teresa Fernndez de la Vega.(Recently the for the Recovery of Historical Memory (ARHM) initiated a systematic search for mass graves of people executed during Francos regime, which has been supported since the Socialist Workers Party`s (PSOE) victory during the 2004 elections by Luis Rodrguez Zapateros government. A Ley de la memoria histrica de Espaa (Law on the Historical Memory of Spain) was approved on 28 July 2006 by the Council of Ministers,(Spain OKs Reparations to Civil War Victims, Associated Press, 28 July 2006) but it took until 31 October 2007 for the Congress of Deputies to approve an amended version as The Bill to recognise and extend rights and to establish measures in favour of those who suffered persecution or violence during the Civil War and the Dictatorship (in common parlance still known as Law of Historical Memory).(Politics As Usual? The Trials and Tribulations of The Law of Historical Memory in Spain, Georgina Blakeley (The Open University), 7 September 2008) The Senate approved the bill on 10 December 2007.(Proyecto de Ley por la que se reconocen y amplan derechos y se establecen medidas en favor de quienes padecieron persecucin o violencia durante la Guerra Civil y la Dictadura ) Among other things, the law is supposed to enforce an official recognition of the crimes committed against civilians during the Francoist rule and organize under state supervision the search for mass graves.The accumulated wealth of Francos family (including much real estate inherited from Franco, such as the de Meirs, the del Pico in Torrelodones or the Palace in the Corua() has also been discussed. Estimates of the familys wealth have ranged from 350 million to 600 million euros.( When Franco was sick, the Cortes voted a pension for his wife, Polo. At the time of her death in 1988, Carmen Polo was receiving more than 12.5 million pesetas (four million more than Gonzlez, then head of the government).(Luis Gomez and Mabel Galaz, La cosecha del dictador, Pais, 9 September 2007 )Owing to Francos human rights record, in 2007, the Spanish government banned all public references to the Franco regime and removed any statues, street names, memorials and symbols associated with the regime. Churches which retain plaques commemorating Franco and the victims of his Republican opponents may lose state aid.() The national anthem of Spain, the Real, is no longer accompanied by the lyrics introduced by Franco.AncestorsFranco in popular mediaSeries and documentary portrayals* Raza  or de una Raza (Spirit of a Race) (1941), based on a script by Jaime de Andrade (Franco himself), is the semi-autobiographical story of a military officer played by Mayo.*ese hombre (That man, Franco) (1964) is a pro-Franco documentary film directed by Luis Senz de Heredia*The film version of Evita (1996) includes archive footage of Franco.*Argentine actor Pepe Soriano played both Franco and his double in en el cielo (Wait for Me in Heaven) (1988).*Fontser played him in Viaje, Excelencia! (Bon Voyage, Your Excellency!) (2003).*The movie Rapide (1986) deal about the events previous to the Spanish Civil War, with the actor Diego performing Franco in the almost one of the two non-comical performances of Franco.*Alexandre played the ultimate Franco in the TV Movie Los ultimos dias de Franco (20-N: The Last Days of Franco) (2008), the other realistic performance of Franco.*The Goya Winner Echanove played the dictator in the surrealistic movie MadreGilda (MotherGilda) (1993).*The comic actor Deltell played Franco in the movie Gonada (Operation Gonad) (2000)*Various biopics from the Spanish TV, show the character of Franco in cameo appearances (the biopic about the Spanish president Suarez, the biopic about the Spanish Queen de Grecia, the biopic about the Spanish Kings cousin de Borbon y Dampierre...)*al tercer ao resucit (...And On the Third Year He Rose Again) (1980) deal what would happen if Franco rose from the dead.*Viadas played Franco in the de La Iglesias movie Triste de Trompeta (The Last Circus) (2010)Other appearances*The Swedish film Together depicts a celebration triggered by the radio announcement of Francos death.*Franco was a running gag during the first two seasons of Night Live, where Update anchor Chase would frequently report that Generalissimo Francisco Franco is Still Dead.*Franco is featured in the novel Triage by Scott Anderson.*Franco is revealed to be Birdies former lover in Got MailSee also* of Spain* under Franco* Serrano Ser* Carrero Blanco* Mola* Legion* politics in Francoist Spain* Nacional* Francisco Franco is still deadNotesReferencesFurther reading****External links*National Foundation Francisco Franco.* FrancoFrancoFrancoFrankoFrancoFranco BahamondeFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFranco ht:FrancoFrancoFrankoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoja:FrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancoFrancozh-yue:zh:
12061
Politics_of_Georgia_(country)
The Politics of Georgia is structured as a presidential representative democratic republic (system), with a  system, and the President as the of state and the Prime Minister as the head of the Georgian Government.(Constitution of Georgia) power is exercised by the government. power is vested in both the government and parliament. Since the Revolution, the party system has been dominated by the Movement - Democrats.Georgia has been a republic since the first multiparty, democratic parliamentary elections of October 28, 1990.The Georgian state is highly centralized, except for the autonomous regions of Abkhazia, Adjara and Ossetia.  Abkhazia and South Ossetia have seceded unilaterally from Georgia and would be given autonomous status if Georgias territorial integrity were restored. These regions had an autonomous status within the SSR during Soviet rule. Consideration of replacing Georgias republic with some form of constitutional monarchy has become part of the Georgian political debate since the Georgian Orthodox primate and other leading Georgians suggested the idea in 2007.(Zaza Jgharkava (October 18, 2007).  Will a Constitutional Monarchy Be Restored in Georgia?. Georgia Today, Issue #379.)(Giorgi Lomsadze (December 18, 2007). Time for a King for Georgia?. EurasiaNet Civil Society.)Recent developmentsFollowing a crisis involving allegations of ballot fraud in the 2003 parliamentary elections, Shevardnadze resigned as president on November 23, 2003, in the bloodless Revolution. The interim president was the speaker of the outgoing parliament (whose replacement was annulled), Burjanadze. On January 4, 2004 Saakashvili, leader of the National Movement won the countrys presidential election and was inaugurated on January 25.Fresh parliamentary elections were held on March 28, 2004, where the United National Movements parliamentary faction, the NMD, secured the vast majority of the seats (with ca. 75% of the votes).  Only one other party reached the 7% threshold: the Opposition with ca. 7.5%. The vote is believed to have been one of the freest ever held in independent Georgia although an upsurge of tension between the central government and the Ajarian leader Abashidze affected the elections in this region. Despite recognizing progress the OSCE noted the tendency to misuse state administration resources in favor of the ruling party.http://www.state.gov/g/drl/rls/hrrpt/2006/78813.htmTensions between Georgia and separatist authorities in Ajaria increased after the elections, climaxing on May 1, 2004 when Abashidze responded to military maneuvers held by Georgia near the region by having the three bridges connecting Ajaria and the rest of Georgia over the River blown up. On May 5, Abashidze was forced to flee Georgia as mass demonstrations in Batumi called for his resignation and Russia increased their pressure by deploying Security Council secretary Ivanov.On February 3, 2005, Prime Minister Zhvania died of monoxide poisoning in an apparent gas leak at the home of Usupov, deputy governor of Kartli region. Later, Zhvanias close friend and a long-time ally, Finance Minister Nogaideli was appointed for the post by President Saakashvili.The Georgian government claims to have restored constitutional order in the Upper Gorge - The sole Georgia-controlled part of breakaway region Abkhazia.(Tbilisi prepares to send Abkhaz government-in-exile to Kodori, Zaal Anjaparidze)Image:Mosque in Tbilisi.jpg|250px|thumb|Tbilisi showing a mosque and minaret in the backgroundUnder the Saakasvili administration Georgia has achieved considerable progress in eradicating corruption. In 2008 International ranked Georgia 67th in its Perceptions Index, with a score of 3.9 points out of 10 possible.(Corruption Perceptions Index 2008. International. Accessed on September 23, 2008) This represents the best result among the CIS countries and a dramatic improvement on Georgias score in 2004, when the country was ranked 133rd with 2.0 points.(Corruption Perceptions Index 2004. International. Accessed on September 23, 2008)In January 2006 a new party, Way, was created. The movement is led by former Foreign Minister Zourabichvili, and appears to be relatively popular. An opinion poll conducted by the Georgian weekly Kviris Palitra and published on April 10, 2006 suggested that Salome Zourabichvili would garner 23.1% of votes if a presidential election were held today. President Saakashvili ranked first with 33% - an all-time low for the Georgian President - whilst no other individual managed to surpass double-digit levels of support. Georgias Way has said it intends to have candidates for all the seats in Georgias upcoming local elections, with Zourabichvili hoping to become Tbilisi Mayor.On November 7, 2007, during a period of mass protests, President Saakashvili declared Tbilisi to be in a of emergency. There were massive demonstrations and protests by the civil opposition, demanding the resignation of President Saakashvili. The Georgian police used teargas, batons, water cannons and high tech weapons in the streets of Tbilisi. Later that day, the President declared a state of emergency in the whole country of Georgia. The Russian government denied accusations of being involved or of interfering in the situation. President Saakashvili rejected all demands that he resign his position, but announced early presidential elections to be held in January 2008, effectively cutting his term in office by a year.On November 16, 2007, Minister of Georgia Noghaideli announced his resignation due to poor health conditions. Noghaideli underwent heart operation in April 2007 at Lukes Episcopal Hospital in Texas, which was led by the leading U.S. surgeon Dr. Charles Frazier.President Saakashvili invited Vladimer (Lado) Gurgenidze, MBA holder from University, States and former executive, to succeed Noghaideli on the position of the PM on the same day. Gurgenidze was formally approved on the position and granted the trust of the of Georgia on November 22, 2007. Gurgenidze implemented only two changes in the of Georgia so far, replacing Lomaia, the former Minister for Education and Science and new Secretary of National Security Council with Maia Miminoshvili, former Head of the National Assessment and Examination Centre (NAEC).  Prime Minister also invited Subeliani, former Head of Municipal Accomplishment Service to succeed Giorgi Kheviashvili, former Minister for Refugees and Accommodation. New Prime Minister and two Ministers Koba Subeliani and Maia Miminoshvili were approved on their positions on November 22, 2007 by a vote of the of Georgia.Saakashvili resigned from the position of the President on November 25, 2007 as the Constitution of Georgia requires the president stands down at least 45 days before the next election to be eligible for retaking part him/herself. The of the Parliament of Georgia Mrs. Burjanadze took over the position until the results were announced on January 5, 2008.The registration for presidential elections was officially closed on November 27. 22 people, including the most recent president Saakashvili, approved candidate of the united opposition Gachechiladze, influential businessman Patarkatsishvili, Leader of the New Right Party Gamkrelidze, the Leader of the Labour Party Natelashvili, the Leader of Party Sarishvili-Chanturia and Giorgi Maisashvili put forward themselves for forthcoming elections.On November 27 it was announced that a NATO membership referendum and election date referendum will also be held on the election day together with presidential elections. http://www.president.gov.ge/?lE&m0&sm1&st0&id2421 The November 7 elections determined that more than 77% of the population voted in favor to NATO membership.Saakashvili on May 22, 2008 announced his confident victory for his ruling party in parliamentary polls amid fears of political unrest, and rising tensions between Georgia and Russia. Early official results indicated his National Movement had 63% of the votes against the oppositions 13%, with about a quarter of the 3,664 precincts.(news.bbc.co.uk, Georgian leader set for poll win)Monarchist optionDebate on the possible installation of a constitutional monarchy in Georgia was revitalized following the 7 October 2007 sermon of Catholicos-Patriarch II, the popular head of the Orthodox Church. The patriarch said, during his Sunday service at the Cathedral of the Holy Trinity, that restoration of the Bragrationi royal family was a desirable dream of the Georgian people. He also emphasized that if the people of Georgia chose this model of governance, a candidate to the crown should be selected among representatives of the royal dynasty, and he should be suitably raised to be king from childhood.((Competition arose among the old dynastys princes and supporters, as historians and jurists debated which Bagrationi has the strongest hereditary right to a throne that has been vacant for two centuries.() Although some Georgian monarchists support the Gruzinsky branchs claim, others support that of the re-patriated Mukhrani branch. Both branches descend in unbroken, legitimate male line from the medieval kings of Georgia down to II of Georgia who died in 1505.Bagration of Mukhrani, married Ana Bagrationi-Gruzinsky on 8 February 2009 at the Sameba Cathedral.(http://pages.prodigy.net/ptheroff/2009_3.htm) The marriage united the Gruzinsky and Mukhrani branches of the former Georgian family, and drew a crowd of 3,000 spectators, officials, and foreign diplomats, as well as extensive coverage by the media.(Euro-Atlantic Integrationthumb|right|334px|   After the Revolution Georgia started looking westwards. The government  with public support  aims at EU  and NATO membership, and has created a Ministry for European and Euro-Atlantic Integration.(Minister on European and Euro-Atlantic Integration) Within NATO, Georgia is currently in Dialogue; membership in the EU is a more distant project. These moves are supported by the most popular of the opposition parties - Way and the Opposition.Political conditionsThe Abkhaz separatist dispute absorbs much of the governments attention. While a cease-fire is in effect about 250,000 displaced persons (IDPs) who were driven from their homes during the conflict, constitute a vocal lobby. The government has offered the region considerable autonomy to encourage a settlement that would allow the IDPs (mainly ethnic Georgians from the Gali district) to return home, however the Abkhaz side refused to accept it.Currently, Russian peacekeepershttps://unp.un.org/details.aspx?entryE03020&titleRegional+Peacekeepers%3a+The+Paradox+of+Russian+Peacekeeping  are stationed in Abkhazia under the authority of the of Independent States, along with UN observers but both groups have recently had to restrict their activities due to increased mining and guerrilla . So far (by 2007) the negotiations have not resulted in any settlement. France, Kingdom, Germany, Russia and the States (who act as the members of the United Nations and the OSCE) continue to encourage a comprehensive settlement consistent with Georgian independence, sovereignty, and territorial integrity. The UN observer force and other organizations are quietly encouraging grassroots cooperative and confidence-building measures in the region.The parliament has instituted wideranging political reforms supportive of higher rights standards, because between 1992 and 2003 (before the Revolution of November 23, 2003) the Georgian human rights situation had been complicated. Despite the reforms by the new government, there are still numerous problems concerning respect for human rights in the country. Prisoners are frequently maltreated, journalists are intimidated by the authorities and much of the mainstream media is owned by government supporters. The police are often accused of planting evidence, beatings and the unnecessary killing of suspects.Executive branchThe head of state is the President, who is elected for a term of five years. His constitutional successor is the Chairman of the Parliament. The president appoints a Minister, who serves as the head of government.|President|Saakashvili|NM-D|20 January 2008|-|Prime Minister|Gilauri|None|6 February 2009|}Legislative branchThe Parliament of Georgia (Sakartvelos Parlamenti), also known as the Umaghlesi Sabcho (Supreme Council), has 235 members, elected for a four year term - 150 seats by representation, 75 in single-seat constituencies and 10 given to the representatives of the displaced persons from the separatist region of Abkhazia. However, this situation will change when the next elections are held (likely to be 2008). According to the constitutional amendments passed in 2003 the parliament will consist of only 150 members elected with the proportional representation system and will be fully refurbished.The of Parliament is Burjanadze.Political parties and electionsJudicial branchGeorgia has a Supreme Court, with judges elected by the Parliament on the presidents recommendation, and a Constitutional Court.Administrative divisionsGeorgia is divided into 53 districts (raions), 11 cities*, and 2 autonomous republics** (avtonomiuri respublika).*Autonomous republics: Abkhazia, Ajaria.*Cities: Batumi, Chiatura, Gori, Kutaisi, Poti, Rustavi, Sukhumi, Tbilisi, Tkibuli, Tskhinvali, Tskaltubo.*Districts: Abasha, Adigeni, Akhalgori, Akhalkalaki, Akhaltsikhe, Akhmeta, Ambrolauri, Aspindza, Baghdati, Bolnisi, Borjomi, Chkhorotsku, Chokhatauri, Dedoplistskaro, Dmanisi, Dusheti, Gardabani, Gurjaani, Java, Kareli, Kaspi, Kharagauli, Khashuri, Khobi, Khoni, Lagodekhi, Lanchkhuti, Lentekhi, Marneuli, Martvili, Mestia, Mtskheta, Ninotsminda, Oni, Ozurgeti, Kazbegi, Kvareli, Sachkhere, Sagarejo, Samtredia, Senaki, Sighnaghi, Telavi, Terjola, Tetritskaro, Tianeti, Tsageri, Tsalenjikha, Tsalka, Vani, Zestaponi, Zugdidi*;note: administrative divisions have the same names as their administrative centers (exceptions have the administrative center name following in parentheses)International organization participationBSEC, of Europe, CIS, EAPC, EBRD, ECE, FAO, GUAM, IAEA, IBRD, ICAO, Chamber of Commerce, Criminal Court (ICC), ITUC, IDA, IFAD, IFC, IFRCS, ILO, IMF, Maritime Organization, Inmarsat, Interpol, IOC, IOM, ISO (correspondent), ITU, OAS (observer), OPCW, OSCE, PFP, UN, UNCTAD, UNESCO, UNIDO, UPU, WCO, WHO, WIPO, WMO, WTOSee also*rights in Georgia (country)*Revolution*in Georgia*www.royalhouseofgeorgia.geReferencesExternal links* Erik Herrons Guide to Politics of East Central Europe and Eurasia  System GeorgiensGeorgieipolitik
12123
Economy_of_Greenland
The Economy of Greenland can be characterized as small, mixed and vulnerable.( The present economy consists of a big sector and comprehensive foreign trade, which has resulted in an economy with periods of strong growth, considerable inflation, unemployment problems and extreme dependence on capital inflow from Denmark and use of outside, mainly Danish, skilled labour.()The economy is critically dependent on exports of fish,() whaling and textiles and substantial support from the Danish Government, which supplies about half of government revenues. Unemployment remains very high and GDP per capita is similar to the average European economies.Historical developmentThe effective starting point of the modern economy of Greenland was the mercantile expedition led by missionary Egede, sent by the of Denmark in 1721. This established the settlement of Godthb and re-established Danish sovereignty in Greenland. The Danish government was initially very protective of what it considered a fragile Greenlandic culture, effectively sealing it off from international commerce and maintaining a strict monopoly on Greenlandic trade, allowing only small scale barter (troaking) with Scottish whalers.Recent historyAfter War II, reforms of the Greenlandic economy were proposed. The G-50 Report was presented in 1950 by the Danish grand commission. The commission comprised Landsrdene (the highest Greenlandic council) and Danish economists. The report outlined a program to transform Greenland from a economy to a modern state. The state would be based on the Danish model, and would be sponsored by Denmark. Following this report, Greenland was made an equal part of the Danish Kingdom in 1953, and Home Rule was granted in 1979.Greenland left the Economic Community in February 1985,( mostly due to EEC fishery policy and partly due to the EEC-wide ban on sealskin products. Effectively the only ties Greenland now has with the EU are via Denmark; most EU laws do not apply to Greenland. However Greenland enjoys preferential access to EU markets.()During the 1950s and 1960s the Danish government introduced an urbanization and modernization program, aimed at creating an urban economic environment in Greenland, by expanding the coastal towns. People from the surrounding small settlements were rehoused in hastily built houses, such as the infamous P, and modern fishing practices were introduced. The program was intended to reduce costs by improving access to education and health care, and by providing employees for the cod fisheries, which grew rapidly during the early 1960s but have since effectively collapsed. This urbanization has resulted in continuing social problems, such as unemployment and alcoholism.The Greenland economy shrank in the early 1990s, but since 1993 has grown again. The Greenland Home Rule Government (GHRG) has pursued a tight fiscal policy since the late 1980s which has helped the public budget and lowered inflation. From 1990, Greenland registered a foreign trade deficit following the closure of the Maarmorilik lead and zinc mine.Sectors of the economyThe Greenland economy is extremely dependent on exports of fish and on support from the Danish Government, which supplies about half of government revenues. The public sector, including publicly-owned enterprises and the municipalities, plays the dominant role in the economy.Oil and natural resourcesDeposits of many metals are known to exist. These include gold, nickel, platinum group elements, copper, lead, zinc, molybdenum, iron, niobium, tantalum, uranium, and specialty metals including rare earth elements; as well as coal and diamonds.( Prospectors are currently seeking commercially viable deposits. The BMP (Bureau of Minerals and Petroleum) is promoting Greenland as an attractive destination for prospectors.()Greenland was formerly the worlds premier source of natural cryolite, but by the late 1980s the reserves at Ivittuut had been depleted. However, with advances in mining technology and increases in mineral prices, previously closed mines are being reopened, such as the lead and zinc mine at Maarmorilik, and the gold mine at Nalunaq.()Companies are exploring hydrocarbon and mineral deposits. There have been several offshore licensing rounds since 2002, with a number of successful bids by multinational oil companies in partnership with NUNAOIL the state oil company for blocks. Press reports in early 2007 indicated that two international aluminum companies were considering building smelters in Greenland using local hydroelectric power.While the GHRG (Greenland Home Rule Government) has primary sovereignty over mineral deposits on the mainland, as laid down in the 2008 treaty, oil resources are within the domain of the Danish exclusive economic zone. Exploring for oil has been ongoing since the 1970s, when a series of five dry wells were drilled, and there was a further dry well in the early 2000s. In 2010 British petrochemical company Cairns Oil reported the first firm indications of commercially viable oil deposits.()TourismTourism has some near-term potential, but this is limited by the short summers and high costs. Greenland and Airlines had direct flights from the U.S. east coast from May 2007 to April 2008, but these are now discontinued.Agriculture, horticulture and forestryAgriculture is presently of little importance in the economy, but change has enabled its expansion, by obtaining higher production of existing crops, introducing new ones, and extending the cultivated areas.() Roughly 1% of the total land area can be used for growing crops.() Presently 10% of all potatoes consumed in Greenland are produced locally, with a projection of 15% by 2020. Due to the lengthening of the productive season new crops have been introduced, such as apples, strawberries,() broccoli, cauliflower, cabbage and carrots.() In southern Greenland the growing season is mid-May through to mid-September, on average three weeks longer than a decade ago.(Animal husbandryReindeer herding has been introduced to Greenland in various thrusts since 1952. Concerted attempts were made in mid-west Greenland in the 1980s and the 1990s,() but these failed due to the immobility of the herds, resulting in trampled lichens and the subsequent destruction of the winter range. In 1998 mid-west reindeer husbandry came to an end, when the remaining herd was sold to the Nuuk municipality whereupon the reindeer population was removed through hunting. By then only a handful of Greenlanders had received training in reindeer husbandry, for only one of whom it was his primary occupation. The rest of the herders, roughly 20 people, were hired Norwegian Sami. When Sami supervision ended in 1978, the results were dismal; reports were sporadic and inconclusive, and herd maintenance effectively ceased with the thereby following range destruction as a result. The conclusion of the experiment was that reindeer herding and husbandry is incompatible with the Inuit hunting culture. However, in stark contrast to the mid-west, the southern herds were successful. In 2008 there was still a strong herd in the Isortoq area,() centered around the Isortoq Reindeer Station.() The station is maintained by Iceland native Stefn Hrafn Magnsson and Norway native Ole Kristiansen.Today animal husbandry consists mainly of sheep farming, with free grazing flocks. Modern sheep farming methods were introduced in the early 20th century, with the first farm built in 1906.() The farms provide meat for local consumption and wool mainly for export. Some 20.000 lambs are slaughtered annually in Narsaq. The lack of private land ownership rights on Greenland forces farmers to jointly agree to terms of land usage. In the south there is also a small cattle farm.Statistics GDP():*official exchange rate - $1 700 million (2005)Agriculture - products:*forage crops, garden vegetables; sheep, reindeer; fishElectricity - production:*295 GWh (2004)Electricity - consumption:*274.4 GWh (2004)Electricity - production by source::fossil fuel:*100% (1998)Electricity - exports:*Nil (2004)Electricity - imports:*Nil (2004)Oil - production:*Nil (2004 est.)Oil - consumption:* (2004 est.)Exchange rates:*Danish kroner (DKr) per US$1  4.707 (2008),5.9468 (2006), 5.669 (2005), 5.9911 (2004), 6.5877 (2003), 7.8947 (2002), 8.3228 (2001), 7.336 (January 2000), 6.976 (1999), 6.701 (1998), 6.604 (1997), 5.799 (1996), 5.602 (1995)See also* krone* of GreenlandReferencesde Groenlandiade Groenlandiadu Groenlanddella Groenlandiaekonomikada Gronelndia
12243
Gadolinium
Gadolinium ( ) is a element with the symbol Gd and number 64. It is a silvery-white, malleable and ductile rare-earth metal. It is found in nature only in combined (salt) form. Gadolinium was first detected spectroscopically in 1880 by de Marignac who separated its oxide and is credited with its discovery. It is named for gadolinite, one of the minerals in which it was found, in turn named for geologist Gadolin. The metal was isolated by Lecoq de Boisbaudran in 1886.Gadolinium metal possesses unusual metallurgic properties, with as little as 1% of gadolinium improving the workability and resistance of iron, chromium, and related alloys to high temperatures and oxidation. Gadolinium as a metal or salt has exceptionally high absorption of neutrons and therefore is used for shielding in neutron radiography and in reactors. Like most rare earths, gadolinium forms trivalent ions which have fluorescent properties. Gd (III) salts have therefore been used as green phosphors in various applications.The Gd(III) ion occurring in water-soluble salts is quite toxic to mammals. However, chelated Gd(III) compounds are far less toxic because they carry Gd(III) through the kidneys and out of the body before the free ion can be released into tissue. Because of its paramagnetic properties, solutions of chelated organic gadolinium complexes are used as intravenously administered MRI contrast agents in medical resonance imaging. However, in a small minority of patients with renal failure, at least four such agents have been associated with development of the rare nodular inflammatory disease systemic fibrosis. This is thought to be due to gadolinium ion itself, since Gd(III) carrier molecules associated with the disease differ.CharacteristicsPhysical propertiesGadolinium is a silvery-white malleable and ductile rare-earth metal. It crystallizes in hexagonal, close-packed - form at room temperature, but, when heated to temperatures above 1235 C, it transforms into its - form, which has a cubic structure.(Gadolinium-157 has the highest neutron capture cross-section among any stable nuclides: 259,000 barns. Only xenon-135 has a higher cross section, 2 million barns, but that isotope is unstable.()Gadolinium is ferromagnetic at temperatures below ( and is strongly paramagnetic above this temperature. Gadolinium demonstrates a magnetocaloric effect whereby its temperature increases when it enters a magnetic field and decreases when it leaves the magnetic field. The effect is considerably stronger for the gadolinium alloy Gd5(Si2Ge2).()Individual gadolinium atoms have been isolated by encapsulating them into fullerene molecules and visualized with electron microscope.() Individual Gd atoms and small Gd clusters have also been incorporated into nanotubes.()Chemical propertiesGadolinium combines with most elements to form Gd(III) derivatives. nitrogen, carbon, sulfur, phosphorus, boron, selenium, silicon and arsenic at elevated temperatures, forming binary compounds.()Unlike other rare earth elements, metallic gadolinium is relatively stable in dry air. However, it tarnishes quickly in moist air, forming a loosely adhering oxide (Gd2O3), which spalls off, exposing more surface to oxidation. :4 Gd + 3 O2  2 Gd2O3Gadolinium is a strong agent, which reduces oxides of several metals into their elements. Gadolinium is quite electropositive and reacts slowly with cold water and quite quickly with hot water to form gadolinium hydroxide::2 Gd  + 6 H2O      2 Gd(OH)3 + 3 H2Gadolinium metal is attacked readily by dilute acid to form solutions containing the colorless Gd(III) ions, which exist as a Gd(OH2)93+ complexes:():2 Gd + 3 H2SO4 + 18 H2O   2 Gd(H2O)93+ + 3 SO42-  +  3 H2Gadolinium metal reacts with the halogens (X2) at temperature about 200 C::2 Gd + 3 X2  2 GdX3Chemical compoundsIn the great majority of its compounds, Gd adopts the state +3.  All four trihalides are known.  All are white except for the iodide, which is yellow.  Most commonly encountered of the halides is chloride (GdCl3).  The oxide dissolves in acids to give the salts, such as nitrate.Gadolinium(III), like most lanthanide ions, forms complexes with high numbers. This tendency is illustrated by the use of DOTA chelating agent, an octadentate ligand.  Salts of Gd(DOTA)- are useful in resonance imaging. A variety of related chelate complexes have been developed, including gadodiamide.Reduced gadolinium compounds are known, especially in the solid state.  Gadolinium(II) halides are obtained by heating Gd(III) halides in presence of metallic Gd in tantalum containers. Gadolinium also form sesquichloride Gd2Cl3, which can be further reduced to GdCl by annealing at 800 C. This gadolinium(I) chloride forms platelets with layered graphite-like structure.()IsotopesNaturally occurring gadolinium is composed of 6 stable isotopes, 154Gd, 155Gd, 156Gd, 157Gd, 158Gd and 160Gd, and 1 radioisotope, 152Gd, with 158Gd being the most abundant (24.84% abundance). The predicted double beta decay of 160Gd has never been observed (the only lower limit on its half-life of more than 1.31021 years has been set experimentally ()).Twenty-nine radioisotopes have been characterized, with the most stable being alpha-decaying 152Gd (naturally occurring) with a half-life of 1.081014 years, and 150Gd with a half-life of 1.79106 years. All of the remaining radioactive isotopes have half-lives of less than 74.7 years. The majority of these have half-lives of less than 24.6 seconds. Gadolinium isotopes have 4 metastable isomers, with the most stable being 143mGd (T110 seconds), 145mGd (T85 seconds) and 141mGd (T24.5 seconds).Isotopes with masses lower than the most abundant stable isotope, 158Gd, primarily decay via capture to Eu (europium) isotopes. At higher atomic masses, the primary mode is decay, and the primary products are Tb (terbium) isotopes.HistoryGadolinium is named from the mineral gadolinite, in turn named for Finnish chemist and geologist Gadolin.()In 1880, Swiss chemist Charles Galissard de Marignac observed spectroscopic lines due to gadolinium in samples of didymium and gadolinite, and separated from them gadolinia, gadolinium oxide. Because he realized that gadolinia was the oxide of a new element, he is credited with discovery of gadolinium. French chemist mile Lecoq de Boisbaudran carried out the separation of  gadolinium metal from the oxide in 1886.OccurrenceGadolinium is a constituent in many minerals such as monazite and bastnsite, which are oxides.  The metal is too reactive to exist naturally.  Ironically, the mineral gadolinite contains only traces of Gd. The abundance in the earth crust is about 6.2 mg/kg.( The main mining areas are China, USA, Brazil, Sri Lanka, India and Australia with reserves expected to exceed one million tonnes. World production of pure gadolinium is about 400 tonnes per year.ProductionGadolinium is produced both from monazite and bastnsite. #Crushed minerals are extracted with hydrochloric or acids, which converts the insoluble oxides into soluble chlorides or sulfates.#The acidic filtrates are partially neutralized with caustic soda to pH 34. Thorium precipitates as its hydroxide and is removed.#The remaining solution is treated with oxalate to convert rare earths in to their insoluble oxalates. The oxalates are converted to oxides by heating.#The oxides are dissolved in acid that excludes one of the main components, cerium, whose oxide is insoluble in HNO3.#The solution is treated with nitrate to produce a crystallized mixture of double salts of gadolinium, samarium and europium.#The salts are separated by exchange chromatography.#The rare earth ions are then selectively washed out by suitable complexing agent.(Gadolinium metal is obtained from its oxide or salts by heating with calcium at 1450 C under argon atmosphere. Sponge gadolinium can be produced by reducing molten GdCl3 with an appropriate metal at temperatures below 1312 C (melting point of Gd) in a reduced pressure.(ApplicationsGadolinium has no large-scale applications but has a variety of specialized uses. Gadolinium has the highest neutron cross-section among any stable nuclides: 61,000 barns for 155Gd and  259,000 barns for 157Gd. 157Gd has been used to target tumors in neutron therapy. This element is very effective for use with radiography and in shielding of reactors. It is used as a secondary, emergency shut-down measure in some nuclear reactors, particularly of the CANDU type.( Gadolinium is also used in marine propulsion systems as a burnable poison.Gadolinium also possesses unusual metallurgic properties, with as little as 1% of gadolinium improving the workability and resistance of iron, chromium, and related alloys to high temperatures and oxidation.Gadolinium is paramagnetic at room temperature, with a ferromagnetic Curie point of 20 C.() Paramagnetic ions, such as gadolinium, move differently within a magnetic field. This trait makes gadolinium useful for magnetic resonance imaging (MRI).  Solutions of organic gadolinium complexes and gadolinium compounds are used as intravenous contrast agent to enhance images in medical magnetic resonance imaging and resonance angiography (MRA) procedures. Magnevist is the most widespread example.()() Nanotubes packed with gadolinium, dubbed gadonanotubes, are 40 times more effective than this traditional gadolinium contrast agent.(Magnets Guide Stem Cells to Damaged Hearts Dec, 2009) Once injected, gadolinium-based contrast agents accumulate in abnormal tissues of the brain and body. This accumulation provides a greater contrast between normal and abnormal tissues, allowing doctors to better locate uncommon cell growths and tumors. Gadolinium as a phosphor is also used in other imaging. In X-ray systems, gadolinium is contained in the phosphor layer, suspended in a polymer matrix at the detector. Terbium-doped oxysulfide (Gd2O2S: Tb) at the phosphor layer converts the X-rays released from the source into light. This material emits green light at 540 nm due to the presence of Tb3+, which is very useful for enhancing the imaging quality. The energy conversion of Gd is up to 20%, which means that one-fifth of the X-rays striking the phosphor layer can be converted into light photons. Gadolinium oxyorthosilicate (Gd2SiO5, GSO; usually doped by 0.11% of Ce) is a single crystal that is used as a scintillator in medical imaging such as emission tomography or for detecting neutrons.()Gadolinium compounds are also used for making green phosphors for colour TV tubes and discs.Gadolinium-153 is produced in a nuclear reactor from elemental europium or enriched gadolinium targets. It has a half-life of 24010 days and emits radiation with strong peaks at 41 keV and 102 keV. It is used in many quality assurance applications, such as line sources and calibration phantoms, to ensure that nuclear medicine imaging systems operate correctly and produce useful images of radioisotope distribution inside the patient.( It is also used as a gamma ray source in X-ray absorption measurements or in density gauges for osteoporosis screening, as well as in the Lixiscope portable X-ray imaging system.()Gadolinium is used for making yttrium garnet (Gd:Y3Al5O12); it has microwave applications and is used in fabrication of various optical components and as substrate material for magnetooptical films. Gallium Garnet (GGG, Gd3Ga5O12) was used for imitation diamonds and for computer memory.(Hammond, C. R. The Elements, in )Biological roleGadolinium has no known native biological role, but its compounds are used as research tools in biomedicine. Gd3+ compounds are components of contrast agents.  It is used in various channel electrophysiology experiments to block sodium leak channels, as well as to stretch activated ion channels.()SafetyAs a free ion, gadolinium is highly toxic, but MRI contrast agents are chelated compounds and are considered safe enough to be used in most persons. The toxicity depends on the strength of the chelating agent.()  US Food and Drug Administration approved Gd chelated contrast agents include: Omniscan, Multihance, Magnevist, ProHance, Vasovist, Eovist and OptiMARK.()(The Elements, Theodore Gray, Black Dog & Leventhal Publishers, 2009)Gadolinium MRI contrast agents have proved safer than the iodinated contrast agents used in X-ray radiography or tomography. Anaphylactoid reactions are rare, occurring in approx. 0.030.1%.() Although gadolinium agents have proved useful for patients with renal impairment, in patients with severe renal failure requiring dialysis, there is a risk of a rare but serious illnesses, called systemic fibrosis() or fibrosing dermopathy,() that has been linked to the use of four gadolinium-containing MRI contrast agents. The disease resembles scleromyxedema and to some extent scleroderma. It may occur months after contrast has been injected. Its association with gadolinium and not the carrier molecule is confirmed by its occurrence in from contrast materials in which gadolinium is carried by very different carrier molecules.Current guidelines in the States are that dialysis patients should only receive gadolinium agents where essential, and that dialysis should be performed as soon as possible after the scan is complete, in order to remove the agent from the body promptly.( ) After several years of controversy during which up to 100 Danish patients have been gadolinium poisoned (and some died) after Omniscan use, it has been admitted by the Norwegian medical company Nycomed that they were aware of the dangers of using gadolinium based agents for their product.()ReferencesExternal links*Nephrogenic Systemic Fibrosis  Complication of Gadolinium MR Contrast (series of images at MedPix website)*Its Elemental  Gadolinium*Refrigerator uses gadolinium metal that heats up when exposed to magnetic field*FDA advisory on gadolinium-based contrast*Abdominal MR imaging: important considerations for evaluation of gadolinium enhancement Rafael O.P. de Campos, Vasco Herdia, Ersan Altun, Richard C. Semelka, Department of Radiology University of North Carolina Hospitals Chapel Hillar:az:Qadoliniumbn:be:bs:Gadolinijumbg:ca:Gadolinicv:cs:Gadoliniumco:Gadoliniucy:Gadoliniwmda:Gadoliniumde:Gadoliniumet:Gadoliiniumel:es:Gadolinioeo:Gadolinioext:Gadolniueu:Gadoliniofa:hif:Gadoliniumfr:Gadoliniumfur:Gadoliniga:Gadailiniamgv:Gadolinniumgl:Gadolinio()xal:ko:hy:hi:hr:Gadolinijio:Gadolinioid:Gadoliniumit:Gadoliniohe:jv:Gadoliniumkk:kv:ht:Gadolinymla:Gadoliniumlv:Gadolnijslb:Gadoliniumlt:Gadolinislij:Gadoliniojbo:jinmrgadolinihu:Gadolniumml:mr:ms:Gadoliniummy:mrj:nl:Gadoliniumja:no:Gadoliniumnn:Gadoliniumpnb:pl:Gadolinpt:Gadolnioro:Gadoliniuqu:Gadolinyuru:sah:stq:Gadoliniumsq:Gadoliniscn:Gadoliniusimple:Gadoliniumsk:Gadolniumsl:Gadolinijsr:sh:Gadolinijumfi:Gadoliniumsv:Gadoliniumta:th:tr:Gadolinyumuk:ur:ug:vi:Gadoliniwar:Gadolinyoyo:Gadoliniumzh-yue:zh:
12720
Guerrilla_warfare
Guerrilla warfare is a form of warfare and refers to conflicts in which a small group of combatants including, but not limited to, armed civilians (or irregulars) use tactics, such as ambushes, sabotage, raids, the element of surprise, and extraordinary mobility to harass a larger and less-mobile traditional army, or strike a vulnerable target, and withdraw almost immediately.The term means little war in Spanish, and the word, guerrilla, has been used to describe the concept since the 18th century, and perhaps earlier. Ety Moreover the term guerrilla was used within the English language as early as 1809. The word was used to describe the fighters, and their tactics (e.g.the town was taken by the guerrillas). However, in most languages guerrilla still denotes the specific style of warfare. The use of the diminutive evokes the differences in number, scale, and scope between the guerrilla army and the formal, professional army of the state.  An early example of this came when General Burgoyne who, during the campaign of the American War of Independence, noted that, in proceeding through dense woodland: The enemy is infinitely inferior to the Kings Troop in open space, and hardy combat, is well fitted by disposition and practice, for the stratagems of enterprises of Little War...upon the same principle must be a constant rule, in or near woods to place advanced sentries, where they may have a tree or some other defence to prevent their being taken off by a single marksman.So conscious of hidden marksmen was Burgoyne that he asked his men, When the Lieutenant General visits an outpost, the men are not to stand to their Arms or pay him any compliment, clearly aware he would be singled out.(Rogers, Horatio (ed.), A Journal Kept in Canada and Upon Burgoynes Campaign in 1776 and 1777 by Lieutenant James M. Hadden, Roy. Art., Jorel Munsells Sons, (Albany, NY, 1884), pp.71 - 77.)Strategy, tactics and organizationThe strategy and tactics of guerrilla warfare tend to focus around the use of a small, mobile force competing against a larger, more unwieldy one.() The guerrilla focuses on organizing in small units, depending on the support of the local population, as well as taking of terrain more accommodating of small units.Tactically, the guerrilla army would avoid any confrontation with large units of enemy troops, but seek and eliminate small groups of soldiers to minimize losses and exhaust the opposing force. Not limiting their targets to personnel, enemy resources are also preferred targets. All of that is to weaken the enemys strength, to cause the enemy eventually to be unable to prosecute the war any longer, and to force the enemy to withdraw.  It is often misunderstood that guerrilla warfare must involve disguising as civilians to cause enemy troops to fail in telling friend from foe. However, this is a not a primary feature of a guerrilla war. This type of war can be practiced anywhere there are places for combatants to cover themselves and where such advantage cannot be made use of by a larger and more conventional forcHistory China and Vietnam Sun Tzu, in his Art of War (6th century BCE), was the earliest to propose the use of guerrilla warfare.(Leonard, Thomas M., Encyclopedia of the developing world, 1989, p. 728. One of the earliest proponents of guerrilla war tactics is the Chinese master of warfare, Sun Tzu.) This directly inspired the development of modern guerrilla warfare.;((Snyder, Craig. Contemporary security and strategy, 1999, p. 46. Many of Sun Tzus strategic ideas were adopted by the practitioners of guerrilla warfare.)Communist leaders like Zedong and North Vietnamese Chi Minh both implemented guerrilla warfare in the style of Sun Tzu,( which served as a model for similar strategies elsewhere, such as the Cuban foco theory and the anti-Soviet Mujahadeen in Afghanistan.(McNeilly, Mark. Sun Tzu and the Art of Modern Warfare, 2003, p. 204. American arming and support of the anti-Soviet Mujahadeen in Afghanistan is another example.) While the tactics of modern guerrilla warfare originate in the 20th century, irregular warfare, using elements later characteristic of modern guerrilla warfare, has existed throughout the battles of many ancient civilizations.The earliest description of guerrilla warfare is an alleged battle between Emperor Huang and the Miao in China.(Western Political Science Association. The Western political quarterly: Volume 15, 1962, p.180. We might note that the first guerrilla war had been carried on in 360 BC in China, when Emperor Huang was fighting the Miao race under Tsi Yao) Guerrilla warfare was not unique to China, nomadic and migratory tribes such as the Scythians, Goths, Huns, and Magyars used elements of guerrilla warfare to fight the Empire, Empire, and the Great.() The Mongols faced irregulars composed of armed peasants in Hungary after the of Mohi. The various castles provided power bases for the Hungarian resistance fighters; while the Mongols devastated the countryside, the Mongols were unable to take the castles and walled cities. In 1242, the Hungarians ambushed and destroyed two toumens of rearguard troops in the Carpathian mountains, where light horse is at a disadvantage because of rough terrain.In the 15th century, Vietnamese leader Loi launched a guerrilla war against the Chinese.(Le Loi And The Le Dynasty) One of the most successful guerrilla wars against the invading Ottomans was led by Skanderbeg from 1443 to 1468. In 1443 he rallied Albanian forces and drove the Turks from his homeland. For 25 years Skanderbeg kept the Turks from retaking Albania, which due to its proximity to Italy, could easily have served as a springboard to the rest of Europe.(Scanderbeg) In 1462, the Ottomans were driven back by Wallachian prince III Dracula. Vlad was unable to stop the Turks from entering Wallachia, so he resorted to guerrilla war, constantly organizing small attacks and ambushes on the Turks.(Vlad The Impaler: Brief History)  Poland During the Deluge in Poland, guerrilla tactics were also applied.(The reign of the Vasa dynasty (1587-1668) the wars with Sweden and the events of the Swedish Deluge) In the years war between England and France, commander du Guesclin used guerrilla tactics to pester the English invaders. The Frisian warlord Gerlofs Donia fought a guerrilla conflict against I of Castile(Geldersche Volks-Almanak Published 1853) and with co-commander Jelckama against Charles V.()() Holland During the Revolt of the 16th century, the Geuzen waged a guerrilla war against the Empire.(Geuzen, or Gueux (Dutch history)) During the War, a pro-Danish guerrilla group known as the Snapphane fought against the Swedes. In Balkan tradition, the Hajduk was an outlaw who engaged in robbery and guerrilla warfare against the Turks. Finland Finnish guerrillas, sissis, fought against Russian occupation troops in the Northern War, 1700-1721. The Russians retaliated brutally against the civilian populace; the period is called Isoviha (Greater Wrath) in Finland.Image:Shivaji-Dhurandhar.jpg|right|thumb|180px|Painting of Shivaji. Scotland One of the most successful of the guerrilla campaigns was that of the Bruce in the Scottish War of Independence when using strategies of ambushes, avoiding large battles, destroying enemy strongholds and using a scorched earth policy, the Scots forced the English out of Scotland without a single large-scale battle until the of Bannockburn eight years after the start of the war.(Scott, Ronald McNair, Robert Bruce, King of the Scots, 1989, p. 242)  India In the 17th century, Marathas, on the Indian peninsula, under its leader Shivaji waged a successful guerrilla war against the Empire and founded the Empire which lasted until it was superseded by the Empire.Kerala Varma Pazhassi Raja, a prince from a small kingdom in Kerala, led many well organized guerrilla struggles against the army of the India Trading Company. Pazhassi Raja revolted against the British for giving his land to his uncle for lease as punishment against the Rajas stand on taxes. With the help of Unni Moopan Mappila, he revolted several times against the atrocities happening against the people of his state. On June 28, 1795, the prince challenged the British by stopping all tax collection. See here for detailsIn the 17th and 18th century, Sikh fighters in the region waged successful guerrilla warfare against Mughal, Persian and Afghan invasions, until they founded the empire under Singh. North America Colonial Period In the mid 17th century the Colonists of New France were in conflict with the Iroquois Confederacy. Iroquois defenders used small bands of raiders targeting the colonists logistics and communications.  The small raids did not require any political sanction.  Tactically, the Iroquois made use of cover, concealment, camouflage, superior firelock muskets (many settlers still relied on matchlocks)and marksmanship.(Patrick M.Malone. The Skulking Way of War:Technology and Tactics Among the New England Indians. Madison Books. 2000. p. 70)  The colonists of New France began calling these Indian tactics La Petite Guerre because the raiders were usually small scale forces.  In contrast to small-scale raids Indian Nations also had a tradition of a large scale force, sanctioned by political leaders for war at a national level.(Robert Rogers. A Concise Account of North America. London. 1765. p. 220)  French colonist, translator, and milice leader Pierre Boucher began to adopt Indian tactics in 1651. Under the tutelage of friendly Wendake, Wobanaki, Algonquin and Ottawa tutors the Milice and Marines of New France learned the ways of La Petite Guerre, stopping the devastating Iroquois raids and buying time until military forces from France arrived. In the early to mid 18th century Combined French and Indian forces brought La Petite Guerre to New England and the Maritime Provinces. New Englanders began adopting Indian tactics during Phillips War. Led by Major Benjamin Church, New Englanders combined Ranging units of friendly Indians and Plymouth Separatists who scouted and raided during Phillips War, Williams War and Annes War.  File:Rugendas - Guerillas.jpg|thumb|left|220px|Indian guerrillas in Brazil c.1820During Le Loutres War in Scotia and Acadia, the Mikmaq and Acadians conducted a petite guerre against the British.(John Grenier. War In Nova Scotia. 2008.)  Both French and English colonial forces fielded combined units using the tactics of La Petite Guerre.During the and Indian War La Petite Guerre came to front stage when the Ohio valley Indians defeated Braddocks expedition near the forks of the Ohio.  Braddocks defeat was a sensation in the newspapers of England.  Sadly, as James Smith points out, Europeans began to take sole credit for these victories.It may be said by some that the French were also engaged in this war: true, they were; yet I know it was the Indians that laid the plan, and with small assistance, put it into execution. The Indians had no aid from the French, or any other power, when they besieged Fort Pitt in the year 1763, and cut off the communications or a considerable time, between that post and Fort Loudon (James Smith. An account of the remarkable occurences. Lexington. 1799. p. 153)In the Northeast, a New Hampshire backwoodsman, Robert Rogers, began to make a stir in the British military establishment for his success using the tactics of the little war.  British military leaders like Jeffery Amherst, John Forbes and Henry Bouquet understood they needed to learn and adopt the techniques and tactics of the little war, or be consumed, like Braddock. The British military establishment began adopting some of the tactics of La Petite Guerre as light infantry.(Horn, Bernd The Canadian way of war:serving the national interest, Dundurn Press Ltd., 2006, 21.) In Scotia and Acadia the Mikmaq and Acadians conducted a petite guerre against the British, who were engaged in deporting the Acadians from the region and had a bounty on the heads of male Mikmaq.(By the close of the eighteenth century, both French and English military systems adopted la Petite Guerre.  The English created Light Infantry Units infantry and the French created Voltigeur Voltigeurs units based on their experiences with irregular guerilla forces in North America and elsewhere around the world. Ireland File:Dwyer.jpg|thumb|120px|left|DwyerIn 17th century Ireland, Irish irregulars called tories and rapparees used guerrilla warfare in the Confederate Wars and the War in Ireland. After the failure of the Irish Rebellion, Dwyer led a guerrilla campaign from 1799 to 1803. He targeted local loyalists and yeomen, attacking small parties of the military and eluding any major sweeps against them. As the campaign progressed Dwyer became a household name. On December 1803 Dwyer finally capitulated. He was transported to South Wales (Australia) as an unsentenced exile. He served as inspiration to later Irish Rebels during the War of Independence a hundred and twenty years or so later. Spain Image:El Tres de Mayo, by Francisco de Goya, from Prado in Google Earth.jpg|thumb|right|Third of May 1808 by Goya, showing Spanish resisters being executed by Napoleons troops.In 1808, when Napoleons army began its occupation of Spain, bands of guerrillas that formed spontaneously were very effective in fighting the army, resulting in the English word guerrilla (see Etymology above).  That war began in 1808 with the occupation of Spain by Napoleons French army. Bands of guerrillas and the normal Spanish army both fought Napoleon. These guerrillas were very effective in fighting Napoleon. Their principal function was to disrupt the supply and communication lines of the French army by intercepting messages and by seizing convoys of supplies, arms, and money. They did so much damage to Napoleons army that Joseph Leopold Hugo, a French general, was ordered to pursue exclusively Diez and his guerrillas.  Second Boer War Image:Afrikaner Commandos2.JPG|thumb|right|190px|Boer guerrillas during the Boer War in South Africa.Guerrillas also fought the British in the war in South Africa known as the Boer War. The harsh South African terrain made it difficult for the British to seek out the groups of Boer fighters who targetted railways and communications, making fleeting attacks on unsuspecting British troops.One of the ways in which the British tackled this style of warfare was the introduction of Camps and the policy of burning down farms and houses. This was to stop the families of Boer fighters passing supplies to the Boer troops. American Civil War During the Civil War of 1861-1865, the breakaway Confederate States for a time attempted to use guerrilla warfare as part of broader military strategy. The Confederacys Ranger Act of April 21, 1862 empowered President Davis to commission officers who would recruit irregular forces. The law was controversial from the start, and many military commanders, including Robert E. Lee, feared that the regular army would be unable to control the guerrilla units.(Charleston Mercury, January 12, 1864; January 15, 1864.) This judgment proved to be correct, and uncontrolled guerrilla violence in Missouri, Arkansas, and western Virginia (and the lack of positive military results) led to the repeal of the act in February 1864.(Myers, Barton A. Executing Daniel Bright: Race, Loyalty, and Guerrilla Violence in a Coastal Carolina Community, 1861-1865, Louisiana State University Press Press, 2009, 122.) The repeal of the law, however, made little difference to many of the guerrillas. In Missouri, the violence did not subside until years after the war had ended.(Fellman, Michael, Inside War: The Guerrilla Conflict in Missouri During the American Civil War, Oxford University Press, 1989, 38, 57, 235. Dennis, Charles H. Eugene Fields Creative Years, Doubleday, Page, 1924, 1415, 2830.) During the 1870s eastern newspapers depicted the continuing violence in Missouri as something that set the state apart from the rest of the country.(The Amenities of Travel, New York Times, August 29, 1873, 4.) of Michel  Coilein.jpg|right|150px|thumb|Michael Collins. World War I During World War I (19141918) Paul Emil von Lettow-Vorbeck led a guerrilla campaign in East African which lasted the entire war. His innovative and creative solutions to daily problems proved to be insuperable for a succession of British commanders, allowing him to bleed Allied forces from European fronts. Although he never had more than 3,000 European and 15,000 native soldiers, von Lettow-Vorbeck consumed the efforts of over 250,000 Allied (mostly British) soldiers. Von Lettow-Vorbeck and the men of the Schutztruppe are little known outside Germany, but they were never defeated and have the distinction of being the only Germans of World War I to occupy British soil, however transiently.(Crowson, Thomas A. (2003). When Elephants Clash: A Critical Analysis of Major General Paul Emil Von Lettow-Vorbeck in the East African Theater of the Great War. Abstract (2003). Retrieved 20 July 2010)In the War of Independence in 1919-21, guerrilla warfare was used in a successful attempt to allow Ireland to set up its own parliament and to leave the United Kingdom. However the same tactics failed to overthrow the Treaty in the Phase of the Irish Civil War. The guerrillas leader Michael Collins is often cited as the father of modern urban guerrilla warfare.In the Spanish post civil war (19391952) there were a lot of rural guerrillas in the mountains, and some urban guerrilla in Catalua, Madrid, Mlaga and Granada.(Julio Arstegui y Jorge Marco: El ltimo frente. La Resistencia armada antifranquista en Espaa, 1939-1952, La Catarata, Madrid, 2008.)(Jorge Marco: Hijos de una guerra. Los hermanos Quero y la resistencia antifranquista. Comares, Granada, 2010.)World War IIFile:Kovpak partisanki.jpg|thumb|Female partisans operating under Kovpak in Ukraine.Many clandestine organizations (often known as resistance movements) operated in the countries occupied by Germany during War II. In March 1940, a Polish partisan unit led by Major Dobrzaski completely destroyed a battalion of German infantry in a skirmish near the village of Huciska.(Marek Szymanski: Oddzial majora Hubala, Warszawa 1999, ISBN 83-912237-0-1)(Aleksandra Zikowska Boehm: A Polish Partisans Story (to be published by Military History Press)) By 1944 the Polish resistance was thought to number 400,000.(Poland - World War II) In Yugoslavia, guerrillas under General Mihailovi, known as Chetniks, and communist guerrilla under Broz Tito known as Partisans, engaged the Germans in a guerrilla war. Titos partisans numbered approximately 800,000 men by the end of the war.(The Partisan War) The strength of the partisan units and formations can not be accurately estimated, but in Belarus alone is thought to have been in excess of 300,000. Vadim Erlikman estimates the paramilitary and Soviet partisan death toll at 400,000.(Vadim Erlikman. Poteri narodonaseleniia v XX veke : spravochnik. Moscow 2004. ISBN 5-93165-107-1 pp. 20-21) Timothy Snyder wrote that In the guise of anti-partisan actions, the Germans killed perhaps three quarters of a million people, about 350,000 in Belarus alone, and lower but comparable numbers in Poland and Yugoslavia.(Timothy Snyder. Holocaust: The Ignored Reality)  On the other side of the world, guerrilla forces in Southeast Asian countries like the Philippine resistance forces, were a mill stone around the neck of the Japanese. For example, tens of thousands of Japanese troops were committed to anti-guerrilla operations in the Philippines. Not only did this cause a drain on Japanese military resources, but the guerrillas prevented the Japanese from making the most effective use of the islands resources (food, ore, civilian labor, etc.) in their war effort. And more importantly, Philippine guerrillas provide vast amounts of intelligence data to Allied headquarters that is necessary to outmaneuver the Japanese forces in the time of the liberation campaign of 1944.(Schmidt LS. American Involvement in the Filipino Resistance. 1982.)(Keats J. They Fought Alone. 1990.) In China, Muslim General Zhanshan commanded 3,500 guerrilla fighters against the Japanese, conducting attacks such as a raid on the Manchukuo treasury, attacking Changchun, the capital, and hijacking from an airfield six Japanese planes.()Foco theoryIn the 1960s the Marxist revolutionary Guevara developed the foco () theory of revolution in his book Guerrilla Warfare, based on his experiences during the 1959 Revolution. This theory was later formalized as focalism by Debray. Its central principle is that vanguardism by cadres of small, fast-moving paramilitary groups can provide a focus for popular discontent against a sitting regime, and thereby lead a general insurrection. Although the original approach was to mobilize and launch attacks from rural areas, many foco ideas were adapted into guerrilla warfare movements.Twentieth and Twenty-First Century guerrilla conflictsThe tactics of guerrilla warfare were used successfully in the 20th century by&mdash;among others&mdash; Zedong and the Liberation Army in the Sino-Japanese War and Civil War. Castro, Guevara and the of July Movement in the Revolution. Chi Minh, Nguyen Giap, Cong and select members of the Berets in the War. The Tigers of Tamil Eelam in the Lankan Civil War, the Mujahideen in the war in Afghanistan, Grivas and Nikos Sampsons Greek guerrilla group EOKA in Cyprus, Velouchiotis and Sarafis and the EAM against the occupation of Greece during World War II, Emil von Lettow-Vorbeck and the German Schutztruppe in War I, Broz Tito and the Partisans in War II, and the antifrancoist guerrilla in Spain during the Franco dictatorship,(Julio Arstegui y Jorge Marco: El ltimo frente. Los hermanos Quero y la resistencia armada antifranquista, 1939-1952. La Catarata, Madrid, 2008.) the Liberation Army in the War, and the Republican Army during the War of Independence.(The Irish Question: Two Centuries of Conflict by Lawrence John McCaffrey (ISBN 978-0-8131-0855-1), page 152) Most factions of the Taliban, Insurgency, Colombias FARC, and the Party of India (Maoist) are said to be engaged in some form of guerrilla warfare&mdash;as was, until recently, the Party of Nepal (Maoist). In India, Marathas under leadership of Shivaji used it to overthrow of the Mughals. It was also effectively used by Tope and Laxmibai in the Rebellion of 1857, as well as by Raja of Kerala to fight the British.Present ongoing guerrilla wars, and regions facing recent guerrilla war activity include:Africa:* * Civil War* Conflict* Civil War* Sudan* Rebellion (20072009)* Uganda - Lords Resistance Army* Sahara WarAsia:* Conflict* conflict* India - Communist insurgency* for a Free Life in Kurdistan conflict* Conflict* insurgency in the Philippines* Thailand insurgency in Thailand along the border* war in Afghanistan* Lankan Civil War* insurgency in Afghanistan* ConflictEurope:* WarLatin America:* armed conflict (1964present)* Mart National Liberation Front (FMLN), El Salvador - became a political party and have current presidency* conflict in Peru* Revolution* Peru - Shining Path (Communist)* Army of National Liberation, Mexico - have been relatively non-violent since 1994Russia:* Chechen WarCounter-guerrilla warfarePrinciplesThe guerrilla can be difficult to beat, but certain principles of counter-insurgency warfare are well known since the 1950s and 1960s and have been successfully applied.Classic guidelinesThe widely distributed and influential work of Sir Robert Thompson, counter-insurgency expert of the Emergency, offers several such guidelines. Thompsons underlying assumption is that of a country minimally committed to the rule of law and better governance. Some governments, however, give such considerations short shrift, and their counter-insurgency operations have involved mass murder, genocide, starvation and the massive spread of terror, torture and execution. The totalitarian regimes of Hitler are classic examples, as are more modern conflicts in places like Afghanistan. In the war in Afghanistan for example, the Soviets countered the Mujahideen with a policy of wastage and depopulation, driving over one third of the Afghan population into exile (over 5 million people), and carrying out widespread destruction of villages, granaries, crops, herds and irrigation systems, including the deadly and widespread mining of fields and pastures.Many modern countries employ manhunting doctrine to seek out and eliminate individual guerrillas. Elements of Thompsons moderate approach are adapted here:(Robert Thompson (1966). Defeating Communist Insurgency: The Lessons of Malaya and Vietnam, Chatto & Widus, ISBN 0-7011-1133-X)# The people are the key base to be secured and defended rather than territory won or enemy bodies counted. Contrary to the focus of conventional warfare, territory gained, or casualty counts are not of overriding importance in counter-guerrilla warfare. The support of the population is the key variable. Since many insurgents rely on the population for recruits, food, shelter, financing, and other materials, the counter-insurgent force must focus its efforts on providing physical and economic security for that population and defending it against insurgent attacks and propaganda.# There must be a clear political counter-vision that can overshadow, match or neutralize the guerrilla vision. This can range from granting political autonomy, to economic development measures in the affected region. The vision must be an integrated approach, involving political, social and economic and media influence measures. A nationalist narrative for example, might be used in one situation, an ethnic autonomy approach in another. An aggressive media campaign must also be mounted in support of the competing vision or the counter-insurgent regime will appear weak or incompetent.# Practical action must be taken at the lower levels to match the competitive political vision. It may be tempting for the counter-insurgent side to simply declare guerrillas terrorists and pursue a harsh liquidation strategy. Brute force however, may not be successful in the long run. Action does not mean capitulation, but sincere steps such as removing corrupt or arbitrary officials, cleaning up fraud, building more infrastructure, collecting taxes honestly, or addressing other legitimate grievances can do much to undermine the guerrillas appeal.# of force. The counter-insurgent regime must not overreact to guerrilla provocations, since this may indeed be what they seek to create a crisis in civilian morale. Indiscriminate use of firepower may only serve to alienate the key focus of counterinsurgency- the base of the people. Police level actions should guide the effort and take place in a clear framework of legality, even if under a State of Emergency. Civil liberties and other customs of peacetime may have to be suspended, but again, the counter-insurgent regime must exercise restraint, and cleave to orderly procedures. In the counter-insurgency context, boots on the ground are even more important than technological prowess and massive firepower, although anti-guerrilla forces should take full advantage of modern air, artillery and electronic warfare assets.(Learning from Iraq: Counterinsurgency in American Strategy - Steven Metz. US Army Strategic Studies Institute monograph, December 2006, http://www.strategicstudiesinstitute.army.mil/pubs/display.cfm?pubID752, retrieved June 1, 2007)# Big unit action may sometimes be necessary. If police action is not sufficient to stop the guerrilla fighters, military sweeps may be necessary. Such big battalion operations may be needed to break up significant guerrilla concentrations and split them into small groups where combined civic-police action can control them.# Aggressive mobility. Mobility and aggressive small unit action is extremely important for the counter-insurgent regime. Heavy formations must be lightened to aggressively locate, pursue and fix insurgent units. Huddling in static strongpoints simply concedes the field to the insurgents. They must be kept on the run constantly with aggressive patrols, raids, ambushes, sweeps, cordons, roadblocks, prisoner snatches, etc.# Ground level embedding and integration. In tandem with mobility is the embedding of hardcore counter-insurgent units or troops with local security forces and civilian elements. The US Marines in Vietnam also saw some success with this method, under its CAP (Combined Action Program) where Marines were teamed as both trainers and stiffeners of local elements on the ground. US Special Forces in Vietnam like the Green Berets, also caused significant local problems for their opponents by their leadership and integration with mobile tribal and irregular forces.(Michael Lee Lanning and Daniel Craig, Inside the VC and NVA, and Inside the LRRPs)  The CIAs Activities Division created successful guerrilla forces from the Hmong tribe during the war in Vietnam in the 1960s,(Shooting at the Moon: The Story of Americas Clandestine War in Laos, Steerforth Press, 1996 |isbn9781883642365) from the Alliance against the Taliban during the war in Afghanistan in 2001,(Bush at War, Bob Woodward, Simon and Shuster, 2002) and from the Kurdish Peshmerga against al-Islam and the forces of Hussein during the war in Iraq in 2003.(Operation Hotel California: The Clandestine War inside Iraq, Mike Tucker, Charles Faddis, 2008, The Lyons Press |isbn9781599213668)(Plan of Attack, Bob Woodward, Simon and Shuster, 2004 isbn9780743255479)  In Iraq, the 2007 US surge strategy saw the embedding of regular and special forces troops among Iraqi army units. These hardcore groups were also incorporated into local neighborhood outposts in a bid to facilitate intelligence gathering, and to strengthen ground level support among the masses.(# Cultural sensitivity. Counter-insurgent forces require familiarity with the local culture, mores and language or they will experience numerous difficulties. Americans experienced this in Vietnam and during the US invasion of Iraqi and occupation, where shortages of Arabic speaking interpreters and translators hindered both civil and military operations.(Learning from Iraq, op. cit.)# Systematic intelligence effort. Every effort must be made to gather and organize useful intelligence. A systematic process must be set up to do so, from casual questioning of civilians to structured interrogations of prisoners. Creative measures must also be used, including the use of double agents, or even bogus liberation or sympathizer groups that help reveal insurgent personnel or operations.# Methodical clear and hold. An ink spot clear and hold strategy must be used by the counter-insurgent regime, dividing the conflict area into sectors, and assigning priorities between them. Control must expand outward like an ink spot on paper, systematically neutralizing and eliminating the insurgents in one sector of the grid, before proceeding to the next. It may be necessary to pursue holding or defensive actions elsewhere, while priority areas are cleared and held.# Careful deployment of mass popular forces and special units. Mass forces include village self-defence groups and citizen militias organized for community defence and can be useful in providing civic mobilization and local security. Specialist units can be used profitably, including commando squads, long range reconnaissance and hunter-killer patrols, defectors who can track or persuade their former colleagues like the Carson units in Vietnam, and paramilitary style groups.# The limits of foreign assistance must be clearly defined and carefully used. Such aid should be limited either by time, or as to material and technical, and personnel support, or both. While outside aid or even troops can be helpful, lack of clear limits, in terms of either a realistic plan for victory or exit strategy, may find the foreign helper taking over the local war, and being sucked into a lengthy commitment, thus providing the guerrillas with valuable propaganda opportunities as the stream of dead foreigners mounts. Such a scenario occurred with the US in Vietnam, with the American effort creating dependence in South Vietnam, and war weariness and protests back home. Heavy-handed foreign interference may also fail to operate effectively within the local cultural context, setting up conditions for failure.# Time. A key factor in guerrilla strategy is a drawn-out, protracted conflict that wears down the will of the opposing counter-insurgent forces. Democracies are especially vulnerable to the factor of time. The counter-insurgent force must allow enough time to get the job done. Impatient demands for victory centered around short-term electoral cycles play into the hands of the guerrillas, though it is equally important to recognize when a cause is lost and the guerrillas have won.VariantsSome writers on counter-insurgency warfare emphasize the more turbulent nature of todays guerrilla warfare environment, where the clear political goals, parties and structures of such places as Vietnam, Malaysia, or El Salvador are not as prevalent. These writers point to numerous guerrilla conflicts that center around religious, ethnic or even criminal enterprise themes, and that do not lend themselves to the classic national liberation template. The wide availability of the Internet has also cause changes in the tempo and mode of guerrilla operations in such areas as coordination of strikes, leveraging of financing, recruitment, and manipulation. While the classic guidelines still apply, todays anti-guerrilla forces need to accept a more disruptive, disorderly and ambiguous mode of operation.:Insurgents may not be seeking to overthrow the state, may have no coherent strategy or may pursue a faith-based approach difficult to counter with traditional methods. There may be numerous competing insurgencies in one theater, meaning that the counterinsurgent must control the overall environment rather than defeat a specific enemy. The actions of individuals and the propaganda effect of a subjective single narrative may far outweigh practical progress, rendering counterinsurgency even more non-linear and unpredictable than before. The counterinsurgent, not the insurgent, may initiate the conflict and represent the forces of revolutionary change. The economic relationship between insurgent and population may be diametrically opposed to classical theory. And insurgent tactics, based on exploiting the propaganda effects of urban bombing, may invalidate some classical tactics and render others, like patrolling, counterproductive under some circumstances. Thus, field evidence suggests, classical theory is necessary but not sufficient for success against contemporary insurgencies...( Counter-insurgency Redux, David Kilcullen)Popular culture*Whom the Bell Tolls, an Hemingway novel which tells the story of Robert Jordan, an American volunteer attached to a guerrilla unit during the Civil War.*The Fighting Guerrillas (1943), a 20th Century Fox movie on the guerrilla resistance movement of General Draza Mihailovich in German-occupied Yugoslavia during World War II.*Undercover (1943), a British film produced by Ealing Studios, released in the US by Columbia pictures as Underground Guerrillas.*The 1965 novel Dune features such warfare as conducted against Harkonnen by the nomadic Fremen tribe, led by Atreides.*Season 3 of Battlestar Galactica which focuses on the guerrilla war against the Cylons by the former citizens of the Twelve Colonies on New Caprica.*The Tomorrow series by John Marsden about guerrilla warfare after a fictional invasion and occupation of Australia.*Che, Soderberghs two-part 2008 biopic about Guevara starring del Toro as Che.*Faction: Guerrilla, a game in which the player is a guerrilla fighting an entrenched enemy.*Radio, a 1999 rock song by Against the Machine.*Dawn, a 1984 American war film about a group of high school students become engaged in guerrilla warfare after their country is invaded by Cubans and Russians.See also* warfare* strategy* military* of guerrilla movements* of guerrilla fighters* of revolutions and rebellions* Long range reconnaissance patrol* Partisan* warfare* Doctrine* forces* warfareFootnotesFurther References:* Robert Asprey, War in the Shadows: The Guerrilla in History.* Fitzroy Maclean, Disputed Barricade: The Life and Times of Josip Broz Tito.* Peter MacDonald, Giap: The Victor in Vietnam.* Keats J. 1990. They Fought Alone. Time Life. ISBN 0-8094-8555-9* Schmidt LS. 1982. American Involvement in the Filipino Resistance on Mindanao During the Japanese Occupation, 1942-1945. M.S. Thesis. U.S. Army Command and General Staff College. 274 pp.External links* Spanish Anthem of the traditional Guerrilleros unit* Tribute to Mexican Women Guerrilleras. On the Freedom Country* abcNEWS: The Secret War - Pakistani militants conduct raids in Iran* abcNEWS Exclusive: The Secret War - Deadly guerrilla raids in Iran* Insurgency Research Group - Multi-expert blog dedicated to the study of insurgency and the development of counter-insurgency policy.* Guerrilla warfare on Spartacus Schoolnet* Encyclopaedia Britannica, Guerrilla warfare* Mao on Guerrilla warfare* Relearning Counterinsurgency Warfare* * Counter Insurgency Jungle Warfare School (CIJWS)Indiamharibsibn:ratovanjebr:Gouvrezelca:Guerrillavlkaherwfilwrolda:Guerillakrigde:Guerillael:de guerrillaseo:Geriloeu:Gerrillafr:Gurillaga:Treallchogaochtde guerrillasko:ratovanjeid:Gerilyais:Skruhernaurit:Guerrigliahe:ku:Gerlakarkarashu:Gerilla-hadviselsms:Gerilanl:Guerrillaja:no:Geriljakrignn:Geriljanrm:Dgrrilleuxpl:Partyzantkapt:Guerrilhade gheril warfarevojnabojevanjesh:Gerilafi:Sissisotasv:Gerillakrigfringth:sava tranh du kchzh:
13169
Gneiss
Gneiss () is a common and widely distributed type of rock formed by high-grade regional metamorphic processes from pre-existing formations that were originally either igneous or sedimentary rocks.EtymologyThe etymology of the word gneiss is disputed. Some sources say it comes from the High German verb gneist (to spark; so called because the rock glitters). It has occurred in English since at least 1757.(Online Etymology Dictionary)Other sources claim the root to be an old Saxon mining term that seems to have meant decayed, rotten, or possibly worthless material.CompositionGneissic rocks are usually medium- to coarse-foliated and largely recrystallized but do not carry large quantities of micas, chlorite or other platy minerals. Gneisses that are metamorphosed igneous rocks or their equivalent are termed granite gneisses, diorite gneisses, etc. Depending on their composition, they may also be called garnet gneiss, biotite gneiss, albite gneiss, etc.Gneiss displays banding where the minerals are arranged into bands of more mafic minerals and more felsic minerals. This is developed under high temperature and pressure conditions.Image:Study of Gneiss Rock.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Study of Gneiss Rock, Glenfinlas, the Trossachs, Scotland. A pen and ink study by Ruskin, 1853, is now in the Museum, Oxford.TypesOrthogneiss designates a gneiss derived from an igneous rock, and paragneiss is one from a sedimentary rock. Gneissose is used to describe rocks with properties similar to gneiss.LewisianMost of the Hebrides of Scotland have a bedrock formed from Lewisian gneiss. These are amongst the oldest rocks in Europe and some of the oldest in the world, having been formed in the Precambrian super-eon, up to 3 billion years ago. In addition to the Outer Hebrides, they form basement deposits on the Scottish mainland west of the Moine Thrust and on the islands of Coll and Tiree.(Gillen (2003) page 44.) These rocks are largely igneous in origin, mixed with metamorphosed marble, quartzite and schist and intruded by later basaltic dykes and granite magma.(McKirdy et al. (2007) page 95.) The gneisss delicate pink colours are exposed throughout the islands and it is sometimes referred to by geologists as The Old Boy.(Murray (1966) p. 2)Augen gneissAugen gneiss, from the German Augen , meaning eye, is a coarse-grained gneiss, interpreted as resulting from metamorphism of granite, which contains characteristic elliptic or lenticular shear bound feldspar porphyroclasts, normally microcline, within the layering of the quartz, biotite and magnetite bands.Image:GneissBoulderOsmussaar.jpg|thumb|left|Boulder of gneissic breccia on Osmussaar, Estonia, apparently thrown there by the Neugrund impactSee also* of rock typesReferences*Blatt, Harvey and Robert J. Tracy, 1996, Petrology: Igneous, Sedimentary and Metamorphic, 2nd ed., pp. 359365, Freeman, ISBN 0-7167-2438-3* Gillen, Con (2003) Geology and landscapes of Scotland. Harpenden. Terra Publishing. ISBN 1903544092* McKirdy, Alan Gordon, John & Crofts, Roger (2007) Land of Mountain and Flood: The Geology and Landforms of Scotland. Edinburgh. Birlinn.  ISBN 9781841583570* Murray, W.H. (1966) The Hebrides. London. Heinemann.FootnotesExternal links**bs:Gnajsbg:ca:Gneis(hornina)da:Gnejsde:Gneiset:Gneissel:es:Gneiseo:Gnejsoeu:Gneissfa:fr:Gneissgl:Gneisko:hr:Gnajsio:Gneisoid:Gneisis:Gneisit:Ortogneisska:kk:lb:Gneislt:Gneisashu:Gneiszmk:nl:Gneisja:no:Gneisnn:Gneispl:Gnejspt:Gnaissero:Gnaisru:simple:Gneisssk:Rulasr:sh:Gnajsfi:Gneissisv:Gnejsth:tr:Gnaysuk:vi:Gnaizh:
13428
Economy_of_Hungary
spelling        The economy of Hungary is a medium-sized, structurally, politically and institutionally open economy in Europe and is part of the European Unions (EU) market. Like most Eastern European economies, the economy of Hungary experienced market liberalisation in the early 1990s as part of the transition from economy to economy.Hungary is a member of the Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development (OECD) since 1995,() a member of the World Trade Organization (WTO) since 1996,() and a member of the European Union since 2004.()Declining exports, reduced domestic consumption and fixed asset accumulation hit Hungary hard during the Crisis of 2008, making the country enter a severe recession of -6.4%, one of the worst economic contractions in its history. However, the country has recovered quite well from the recession, though high unemployment, sluggish growth and the external debt burden are continuing problems.  A recent estimate done by the CIA has shown that Industrial Production Growth Rate is growing by 11%, among one of the highest in the world, and a signal that the economy is recovering.History of the Hungarian economyHungarian Economy up to the change of regimeHungarian economy prior to War II was primarily oriented towards agriculture and small-scale manufacturing. Hungarys strategic position in Europe and its relative lack of natural resources have dictated a traditional reliance on foreign trade. In the early 1950s, the communist government forced rapid industrialisation after the standard Stalinist pattern in an effort to encourage a more self-sufficient economy. Most economic activity was conducted by state-owned enterprises or cooperatives and state farms.Social and economical changes have already taken place starting from 1968. This year the Socialist Workers Party (HSWP) introduced the Economic Mechanism which had three main fields.* State enterprises were more free in investments and hiring. They also got greater autonomy in internal decisions thus making them more efficient. Limited number of small private businesses were allowed to operate in the private sector, too.* Prices were put in three categories: fixed prices determined by the ministry (mainly raw materials), limited prices (which included basic aliments and could move in a certain price window), and completely free-floating prices.*  Liberalised import which improved the efficiency of enterprises and made Hungary a part of international flow of goods.Starting from the 70s Hungarys foreign debts rose from $1 billion in 1973 to $15 billion in 1993 because of the wide social welfare system, consumer subsidies, and unprofitable state enterprises () which were core elements of HSWP First Secretary Kdrs communism. Joint venture law was introduced as well as income tax and Hungary built a two-tier banking system.(Because of these preliminary changes, the change of regime in 1989 went smoothly in Hungary. The government and the opposition met in the Hungarian Round Table Talks from March to September 1989 where the ground rules of the transition were declared. The first democratic elections were held in April 1990 and brought the victory of Hungarian Democratic Forum (MDF) with Antall as prime minister.Privatization in HungaryIn January 1990, the State Privatization Agency (SPA, llami Vagyongynksg) was established to manage the first steps of privatization. Because of Hungarys USD 21.2bn foreign debt, the government decided to sell state property instead of distributing it for free among the people.() The SPA was attacked by populist groups because several companies management had the right to find buyers and discuss sale terms with them thus stealing the company. Another reason for discontent was that the state offered large tax subsidies and environmental investments, which sometimes cost more than the selling price of the company. Along with the acquisition of companies, foreign investors launched many greenfield investments.(The center-right Hungarian Democratic Forum government of 1990-1994 decided to demolish agricultural co-operatives by splitting them up and giving machinery and land to the former members.() The government also introduced a Law of Recompensation which offered vouchers to people who used to own land before nationalization of land in 1948. These people (or their inheritors) could exchange their vouchers to lands of the agricultural cooperatives, who were forced to give up some of their land for this purpose.(Small stores and retail businesses were privatized between 1990 and 1994, however, the greenfield investments of foreign companies like Tesco, Cora, and Ikea had a lot bigger economic impact.( Many public utilities, including the national telecommunications company (Matv) and the national oil and gas conglomerate (Group), and the electricity supply and production companies were privatized as well.()Though most banks were sold to foreign investors, the largest bank, National Savings Bank (OTP) was kept as a mostly Hungarian-owned bank. 20%-20% of the shares were sold to foreign institutional investors and given to the Social Security organizations, 5% were bought by employees, and 8% was offered at the Stock Exchange.()Hungarys economy since 1990thumb|right|180px|altChart showing GDP growth, inflation, and active population in Hungary 1990-2010.|GDP growth, inflation, and active population in Hungary 1990-2010thumb|right|180px|altChart showing GDP per capita in USD at 2000 market prices in Hungary 1991-2010.|GDP per capita in USD at 2000 market prices in Hungary 1991-2010thumb|right|180px|altGeneral government gross debt in the Czech Republic, Poland, Hungary, Romania, Slovakia, EU27, and the Euro zone.|General government gross debt in Hungary amongst other countries and the EUReaching 1995, Hungarys fiscal indices deteriorated: foreign investment fell as well as judgement of foreign analysts on economic outlook.() Due to high demand in import goods, Hungary also had a high trade deficit ( ) and budget gap, and it could not reach an agreement with the IMF, either.(()After not having a of finance for more than a month, prime minister Horn appointed Bokros as Finance Minister on March 1, 1995. He introduced a string of austerity measures (the Bokros Package) on March 12, 1995 which had the following key points: one-time 9% devaluation of the forint, introducing a constant sliding devaluation, 8% additional customs duty on all goods except for energy sources, limitation of growth of wages in the public sector, simplified and accelerated privatization. The package also included welfare cutbacks, including abolition of free higher education and dental service; reduced family allowances, child-care benefits, and maternity payments depending on income and wealth; lowering subsidies of pharmaceuticals, and raising retirement age.These reforms not only increased investor confidence,() but they were also supported by the IMF and the World Bank,() however, they were not welcome widely by the Hungarians; Bokros broke the negative record of popularity: 9% of the population wanted to see him in an important political position () and only 4% were convinced that the  reforms would improve the countrys finances in a big way  (In 1996, the Ministry of Finance introduced a new pension system instead of the fully state-backed one: private pension savings accounts were introduced, which were 50% social security based and 50% funded.(In 2006 Prime Minister Gyurcsny was reelected on a platform promising economic reform without austerity.However, after the elections in April 2006, the Socialist coalition under Prime Minister Ferenc Gyurcsany unveiled a package of austerity measures which were designed to reduce the budget deficit to 3% of GDP by 2008.Because of the austerity program, the economy of Hungary slowed down in 2007. However, due to many large investments, GDP growth may improve to 2.8-4.0 percent in the second half of 2008.  In foreign investments, Hungary has seen a shift from lower-value textile and food industry to investment in luxury vehicle production, renewable energy systems, high-end tourism, and information technology. As well as farming in the southern region of Hungary.2008-2009 financial crisisOn 27 October 2008, Hungary reached an agreement with the IMF and EU for a rescue package of US$25 billion, aiming to restore financial stability and investors confidence.()Because of the uncertainty of the crisis, banks gave less loans which led to a decrease in investment. This along with price-awareness and fear of bankruptcy led to a fallback in consumption which then increased job losses and decreased consumption even further. Inflation did not rise significantly, but real wages decreased.()The fact that the euro and the Swiss franc is worth a lot more in forints than they did before affected a lot of people. According to The Daily Telegraph, statistics show that more than 60 percent of Hungarian mortgages and car loans are denominated in foreign currencies.()Though the forint has got stronger, some economists believe that The Hungarian forint is too strong in the current economic environment.()Hungarian economy today  Physical properties  Natural resources Image:Hungary topographic map.jpg|thumb|right|180px|Topographic map of HungaryHungarys total land area is 93,030 km2 along with 690 km2 of water surface area which altogether makes up 1% of Europes area.Nearly 75% of Hungarys landscape consists of flat plains. Additional 20% of the countrys area consists of foothills whose altitude is 400 m at the most; higher hills and water surface makes up the remaining 5%.The two flat plains that take up three quarters of Hungarys area are the Hungarian Plain and the Hungarian Plain. Hungarys most significant natural resource is arable land. About 83% of the countrys total territory is suitable for cultivation;( of this portion, 75% (around 50% of the countrys area) is covered by arable land, which is an outstanding ratio compared to other EU countries.( Hungary lacks extensive domestic sources of energy and raw materials needed for further industrial development.19% of the country is covered by forests. These are located mainly in the foothills such as the North Hungarian and the Mountains, and the Alpokalja. The composition of forests is various; mostly oak or beech, but the rest include fir, willow, acacia and plane.Image:Medicinal Bath Hvz 01.jpg|thumb|left|180px|Medicinal bath in HvzIn European terms, Hungarys underground water reserve is one of the largest. Hence the country is rich in brooks and hot springs as well as medicinal springs and spas; as of 2003, there are 1250 springs that provide water warmer than 30 degrees.() 90% of Hungarys drinking water is mostly retrieved from such sources.()The major rivers of Hungary are the Danube and the Tisza. The Danube also flows through parts of Germany, Austria, Slovakia, Serbia, and Romania. It is navigable within Hungary for 418 km. The Tisza River is navigable for 444 km in the country. Hungary has three major lakes. Lake Balaton, the largest, is 78 km long and from 3 to 14 km wide, with an area of 592 km2. Lake Balaton is Central Europes largest lake and a prosperous tourist spot and recreation area. Its shallow waters offer summer bathing and during the winter its frozen surface provides facilities for winter sports. Smaller bodies of water include Velence (26 km2) in Fejr County and Fert (82 km2 within Hungary). Infrastructure  Transport Image:Hungarian motorway constructions.png|thumb|right|180px|Total length of in HungaryHungary has 31 058 km of roads and motorways of 1118 km. The total length of motorways has doubled in the last ten years with the most (106) kilometers built in 2006. Budapest is directly connected to the Austrian, Slovenian, Croatian and Serbian borders via motorways.Due to its location and geographical features, several transport corridors cross Hungary. corridors no. IV, V, and X, and European routes no. E60, E71, E73, E75, and E77 go through Hungary. Thanks to its radial road system, all of these routes touch Budapest.There are five international, four domestic, four military and several non-public airports in Hungary. The largest airport is the Ferihegy International Airport (BUD) located at the southeastern border of Budapest. In 2008, the airport had 3,866,452 arriving and 3,970,951 departing passengers.( )In 2006 the Hungarian railroad system was 7685 km long, 2791 km of it electrified. Public utilities Electricity is available in every settlement in Hungary.Piped gas is available in 2873 settlements, 91.1% of all of them.() To avoid gas shortages due to Ukrainian pipeline shutdowns like the one in January 2009,() Hungary participates both in the Nabucco and the Stream gas pipeline projects. Hungary also has strategical gas reserves: the latest reserve of 1.2 billion cubic meters was opened in October 2009.()In 2008, 94.9% of households had running water.( ) Though it is the responsibility of municipal governments to provide people with healthy water supply,() the Hungarian government and the European Union offer subsidies to those who wish to develop water supplies or sewage systems.() Partly because of these subsidies, 71.3% of all dwellings are connected to the sewage system, up from 50,1% in 2000.( )Internet penetration has been rising significantly over the past few years: the ratio of households having an internet connection has risen from 22.1% (49% of which was broadband) in 2005 to 48.4% (87.3% of which was broadband) in 2008.( )The Ministry of Economy and Transport introduced the eHungary program in 2004 aiming to provide every person in Hungary with internet access by setting up eHungary points in public spaces like libraries, schools and cultural centers.() The program also includes the introduction of the eCounsellor network  a service through which professionals provide assistance for citizens in the effective usage of electronic information, services and knowledge.() Sectors  Agriculture vineyard.jpg|thumb|right|180px|Tokaj vineyard with ripening grapesAgriculture accounted for 4.3% of GDP in 2008( ) and along with the food industry occupied roughly 7.7% of the labor force.( ) These two figures represent only the primary agricultural production: along with related businesses, agriculture makes up about 13% of the GDP.( Hungarian agriculture is virtually self-sufficient and due to traditional reasons export-oriented(): exports related to agriculture make up 20-25% of the total. About half of Hungarys total land area is agricultural area under cultivation; this ratio is prominent among other EU members.( This is due to the countrys favourable conditions including climate and the plains that make up about half of Hungarys landscape. The most important crops are wheat, corn, sunflower, potato, sugar beet, canola and a wide variety of fruits (notably apple, peach, pear, grape, watermelon, plum etc.). Hungary has several wine regions producing among others the worldwide famous white dessert wine Tokaji and the red Bulls Blood. Another traditional world-famous alcoholic drink is the fruit brandy plinka.Mainly cattle, pigs, poultry and sheep are raised in the country. The livestock includes the Grey Cattle which is a major tourist attraction in the Hungarian National Park of Hortobgy. An important component of the countrys gastronomic heritage is gras with about 33000 farmers engaged in the industry. Hungary is the second largest world producer and the biggest exporter of foie gras (exporting mainly to France).Another symbol of Hungarian agriculture and cuisine is the paprika (both sweet and hot types). The country is one of the leading paprika producers of the world with Szeged and Kalocsa being the centres of production. Health care  Industry The main sectors of Hungarian industry are heavy industry (mining, metallurgy, machine and steel production), energy production, mechanical engineering, chemicals, food industry and automobile production. The industry is leaning mainly on processing industry and (including construction) accounted for 29,32% of GDP in 2008.() Due to the sparse energy and raw material resources, Hungary is forced to import most of these materials to satisfy the demands of the industry. Following the transition to market economy, the industry underwent restructuring and remarkable modernization. The leading industry is machinery, followed by chemical industry (plastic production, pharmaceuticals), while mining, metallurgy and textile industry seemed to be losing importance in the past two decades. In spite of the significant drop in the last decade, food industry is still giving up to 14% of total industrial production and amounts to 7-8% of the countrys exports.()Nearly 50% of energy consumption is dependent on imported energy sources. Gas and oil are transported through pipelines from Russia forming 72% of the energy structure, while nuclear power produced by the nuclear power station of Paks accounts for 12%. Automobile production Image:Audi TT Gyr.jpg|thumb|right|180px|Final inspection of assembled TTs in GyrHungary is a favoured destination of foreign investors of automotive industry resulting in the presence of Motors (Szentgotthrd), Suzuki (Esztergom) and the largest Audi factory (Gyr) in Central Europe.17% of the total Hungarian exports comes from the exports of Audi, Opel and Suzuki. The sector employs about 90.000 people in more than 350 car component manufacturing companies.()Audi has built the largest engine manufacturing plant of Europe (third largest in the world) in Gyr becoming Hungarys largest exporter with total investments reaching over  3,300 million until 2007.() Audis workforce assembles the TT, the Audi TT Roadster and the A3 Cabriolet in Hungary.( The plant delivers engines to carmakers Volkswagen, Skoda, Seat and also to Lamborghini.(Daimler-Benz invests  800 million ($1.2 billion) and creates up to 2,500 jobs at a new assembly plant in Kecskemt, Hungary() with capacity for producing 100,000 Mercedes-Benz compact cars a year.()Opel produced 80,000 Astra and 4,000 Vectra cars from March 1992 until 1998 in Szentgotthrd, Hungary.() Today, the plant produces about half million engines and cylinder heads a year.( Services The tertiary sector accounted for 64% of GDP in 2007 and its role in the Hungarian economy is steadily growing due to constant investments into transport and other services in the last 15 years. Located in the heart of Central-Europe, Hungarys geostrategic location plays a significant role in the rise of the service sector as the countrys central position makes it suitable and rewarding to invest.The total value of imports was 68,62 billion euros, the value of exports was 68,18 billion euros in 2007. The external trade deficit decreased by 12,5% since the previous year, easing down from 2,4 billion to 308 million euros in 2007. In the same year, 79% of Hungarys export and 70% of the imports were transacted inside the EU.()TourismImage:Balaton Hungary Landscape.jpg|thumb|right|180px|BalatonTourism employs nearly 150 thousand people and the total income from tourism was 4 billion euros in 2008.() One of Hungarys top tourist destinations is Balaton, the largest freshwater lake in Central Europe, with a number of 1,2 million visitors in 2008. The most visited region is Budapest, the Hungarian capital attracted 3,61 million visitors in 2008.Hungary was the worlds 26th most visited country in 2007.() The Hungarian spa culture is world-famous, with thermal baths of all sorts and over 50 spa hotels located in many towns, each of which offer the opportunity of a pleasant, relaxing holiday and a wide range of quality medical and beauty treatments. Currency coins and banknotesThe currency of Hungary is the Hungarian forint (HUF, Ft) since 1 August 1946. A forint consists of 100 fillrs, however, these have not been in circulation since 1999, they are only used in accounting.There are six coins (5, 10, 20, 50, 100, 200)()  and six banknotes (500, 1000, 2000, 5000, 10000 and 20000).() The 1 and 2 forint coins were withdrawn in 2008, yet prices remained the same as stores follow the official rounding scheme () for the final price. The 200 forint note was withdrawn on 16 November 2009.()As a member of the Union, the long term aim of the Hungarian government is to replace the forint with the euro.() See also: Fiscal policy.You can check current exchange rates with graphs of past rates at Google Finance.The fulfillment of the Maastricht criteria1 Current EU member states that have not yet adopted the Euro, candidates and official potential candidates.  No more than 1.5% higher than the 3 best-performing EU member states. No more than 2% higher than the 3 best-performing EU member states.4 Formal obligation for Euro adoption in the country EU Treaty of Accession or the Framework for membership negotiations.5 Values from May 2008 report.() To be updated each year. Socio-economic characteristics  Human capital thumb|right|180px|Language learning among students in upper secondary education in Hungary in 2007in Hungary is free and compulsory from the age of 5 to 18.() The state provides free pre-primary schooling for all children, 8 years of general education and 4 years of upper secondary level general or vocational education.( Higher education system follows the three-cycle structure and the credit system of the process.( Governments aim to reach European standards and encourage international mobility by putting emphasis on digital literacy, and enhancing foreign language studies: all secondary level schools teach foreign languages and at least one language certificate is needed for the acquisition of a diploma.( Over the past decade, this resulted in a drastic increase in the number of people speaking at least one foreign language.()Hungarys most prestigious universities are:* Lornd University (Etvos Lornd Tudomnyegyetem, or ELTE, which is among the top 500 universities in the world())* University of Technology and Economics (Budapesti Mszaki s Gazdasgtudomnyi Egyetem, or BME) BME is considered the oldest Institutes of Technology of university rank and structure in the world. Established 1782.* University of Budapest (Budapesti Corvinus Egyetem, or BCE)* European University (Kzp-eurpai Egyetem, or CEU)* of Pcs (Pcsi Tudomnyegyetem, or PTE)* of Szeged (Szegedi Tudomnyegyetem or SZTE) In 2010, the QS World University Rankings put the University of Szeged as 451st-500th among universities globally.* of Debrecen (Debreceni Egyetem or DE)Financial sources for education are mainly provided by the state (making up 5.1-5.3% of the annual GDP).( In order to improve the quality of higher education, the government encourages contributions by students and companies. Another important contributor is the EU.(thumb|right|180px|Mathematics score in PISA 2006 of Hungary among other countriesThe system has weaknesses, the most important being segregation and unequal access to quality education.( The 2006 PISA report concluded that while students from comprehensive schools did better than the OECD average, pupils from vocational secondary schools did much worse.() Another problem is of the higher educations: response to regional and labour market needs is insufficient.( Government plans include improving the career guidance system and establishing a national digital network that will enable the tracking of jobs and facilitate the integration into the labour market.( Social stratification As most post-communist countries, Hungarys economy is affected by its social stratification in terms of income and wealth, age, gender and racial inequalities.Image:Lorenz curve of Denmark, Hungary, and Namibia.png|thumb|right|180px|curve of Denmark, Hungary, and NamibiaHungarys coefficient of 0.269() ranks 11th in the world.() The graph on the right shows that Hungary is close in equality to the world-leader Denmark. The highest 10% of the population gets 22.2% of the incomes.( According to the business magazine Napi Gazdasg, the owner of the biggest fortune, 300 billion HUF, is Sndor Demjn.() On the other hand, the lowest 10% gets 4% of the incomes. Considering the standard EU indicators (Percentage of the population living under 60% of the per capita median income), 13% of the Hungarian population is stricken by poverty.() According to the Development Report, the countrys HPI-1 value is 2.2% (3rd among 135 countries),() and its HDI value is 0.879 (43rd out of 182).(Image:Age Pyramid of Hungary.png|thumb|right|180px|pyramid of HungaryThe fertility rate in Hungary, just like in many European countries, is very low: 1.34 children/women (205th in the world)() Life expectancy at birth is 73.3 years.,( while the expected number of healthy years is 57.6 for females and 53.5 for males. The average life expectancy overall is 73.1 years.()Hungarys GDI (gender-related development index) value of 0.879( is 100% of its HDI value (3rd best in the world).( 55.5% of the female population (between 15 and 64) participate in the labour force, and the ratio of girls to boys in primary and secondary education is 99%.(Racial inequality, which strikes primarily in Hungary, is a serious problem. Although the definition of the Roma identity is controversial,() qualitative studies prove that the Roma employment rate decreased significantly following the of Communism(): due to the tremendous layoffs of unskilled workers() during the transition years, more than one-third of Roma were excluded from the labour market.() Therefore, this ethnic conflict is inherently interconnected with the income inequalities in the country()  at least two-thirds of the poorest 300,000 people in Hungary are Romas.( Furthermore, ethnic discrimination is outstandingly high, 32% of Romas experience discrimination when looking for work.() Consequently, new Roma entrants to the labour market are rarely able to find employment,( which creates a motivation deficit and further reinforces segregation and unemployment.( ) Institutional quality Twenty years after the change of the regime, corruption remains to be a severe issue in Hungary.() According to International Hungary, almost one-third of top managers claim they regularly bribe politicians.( Most people (42%) in Hungary think that the sector most affected by bribery is the political party system.() Bribery is common in the healthcare system in the form of gratitude payment92% of all people think that some payment should be made to the head surgeon conducting a heart operation or an obestetrician for a child birth.()Another problem is the administrative burden: in terms of the ease of doing business, Hungary ranks 47th out of 183 countries in the world.() The five days time(  required to start a new business ranks 29th, and the country is 122nd concerning the ease of paying taxes.()In accordance with the theory of the of powers, the judicial system is independent from the legislative and the executive branches.() Consequently, courts and prosecutions are not influenced by the government. However, the legal system is slow and overburdened, which makes proceedings and rulings lengthy and inefficient.() Such a justice system is hardly capable of prosecuting corruption and protecting the countrys financial interests.( State participation  Monetary policy Image:Baserate Hungary.jpg|thumb|altChart showing the base rate of National Bank.|Base rate of Hungarian National Bank (MNB).File:Mnb hu.jpg|left|x150 px|thumb| National Bank (MNB)The Hungarian organization responsible for controlling the countrys monetary policy is the National Bank (Hungarian: Magyar Nemzeti Bank, MNB) which is the central bank in Hungary.() According to the Hungarian Law of National Bank (which became operative in 2001.  LVIII. Law about The Hungarian National Bank()), the primary objective of MNB is to achieve and maintain price stability. This aim is in line with the European and international practice.Price stability means achieving and maintaining a basically low, but positive inflation rate. This level is around 2-2.5% according to international observations, while the Central Bank aims at inflation rates of below, but close to 2% over the medium term.() Since Hungary is in the process of catching up (effect), the long-term objective is a slightly higher figure, around 2.3-3.2%.() Therefore the medium term inflation target of the Hungarian National Bank is 3%.()Concerning the exchange rate system, the exchange rate system is in use since 26 February 2008, as a result of which HUF is fluctuating in accordance with the effects of the market in the face of the reference currency, the euro.thumb|right|180px|Forint exchange rates from June 2008 to September 2009The chart on the right shows forint exchange rates for the British pound (GBP), euro (EUR), franc (CHF), and the U.S. dollar (USD) from June 2008 to September 2009. It indicates that a relatively strong forint weakened since the beginning of the financial crisis, and that its value has recently taken an upward turn.Compared to the euro the forint was at peak on June 18, 2008 when 1000 Ft was 4.36 and 1 was 229.11Ft. The forint was worth the least on March 6, 2009; this day 1000 Ft was 3.16 and 1 was 316Ft).Compared to USD, most expensive/cheapest dates are June 22, 2008 and March 6, 2009 with 1000HUF/USD rates 6.94 and 4.01 respectively. Fiscal policy In Hungary, state revenue makes up 44% and expenditure makes up 45% of the GDP which is relatively high compared to other EU members.() This can be traced back to historical reasons such as socialist economic tradition as well as cultural characteristics that endorse paternalist beaviour on the states part, meaning that people have a habitual reflex that make them call for state subsidies.() Some economists() dispute this point, claiming that expenditure ran up to todays critical amount from 2001, during two left-wing government cycles.(Along with joining the EU the country undertook the task of joining the Eurozone as well. Therefore, the Maastricht criteria which forms the conditionalities of joining the Eurozone acts as an authoritative guideline to Hungarian fiscal politics. Although there has been remarkable progress, recent years statistics still point at significant discrepancies between the criteria and fiscal indices. The target date for adapting the Euro has not been fixed, either.General government deficit has shown a drastic decline to -3.4% (2008) from -9.2% (2006).( ) According to an MNB forecast however, until 2011, the deficit will by a small margin fall short of the 3.0% criterion.()Another criterion that is found lacking is the ratio of gross government debt to GDP which, since 2005, exceeds the allowed 60%.() According to an ESA95 figure, in 2008 the ratio increased from 65.67% to 72.61%, which primarily results from the requisition of an IMF-arranged financial assistance package.()Hungarys balance of payments on its current account has been negative since 1995, around 6-8% in the 2000s() reaching a negative peak 8.5% in 2008.( Still, current account deficit will expectedly decrease in the following period, as imports will diminish compared to exports as an effect of the financial crisis.() Tax system In Hungary, the 1988 reform of taxes introduced a comprehensive tax system which mainly consists of central and local taxes, including a personal income tax, a corporate income tax and a added tax.() Among the total tax income the ratio of local taxes is solely 5% while the EU average is 30%.()The central tax system consists of three components:Personal income taxThe taxation of an individual is progressive, determining the tax rate based on the individuals income: with earning up to 1,900,000 forints a year, the tax is 18%, the tax on incomes above this limit is 36% since 1 of July, 2009.()According to the income-tax returns of 2008, 14,6% of taxpayers was charged for 64,5% of the total tax burdens.()Corporate income taxCorporate tax is fixed at 16% of the positive rateable value, with an additional tax called solidarity tax of 4%, the measure of which is calculated based on the result before tax of the company (the solidarity tax has been in use since September, 2006). The actual rateable value might be different is the two cases.Value added tax (VAT)The rate of value added tax in Hungary is 25% since 1 of July, 2009. At the same time, reduced rates of 18% came into practice, concerning basic food (milk, flavoured milk, dairy products, corn, flour) and distance heating, medicines have a rate of 5%.()Miscellaneous dataHouseholds with access to fixed and mobile telephone access(IT and telecommunications in Central and Eastern Europe )* landline telephone - 50% (2009)* mobile telephone - 84% (2009)Broadband penetration rate(* fixed broadband- 18.7% (2010)* mobile broadband- 3.8% (2009)Individuals using computer and internet(* computer - 65% (2009)* internet - 62% (2009) External relations  The EU Hungary joined the European Union on 05/01/2004 after a successful referendum() among the EU-10. The EUs free trade system helps Hungary, as it is a relatively small country and thus needs export and import.After the accession to the EU, Hungarian workers could immediately go to work to Ireland, Sweden and the United Kingdom. Other countries imposed restrictions.() Rest of the world  Foreign trade In 2007, 25% of all exports of Hungary were of high technology, which is the 5th largest ratio in the European Union after Malta, Cyprus, Ireland, and the Netherlands. The EU10 average was 17.1% and the Eurozone average was 16% in 2007.( See also * National Bank* of Hungarian companies* of banks in Hungary* Stock Exchange* BUX* of Europe* Hungary* in HungaryReferences External links * Hungarian National Bank* Hungarian Central Statistical Office* Hungarian Financial Supervisory Authority* Hungarian Competition Authority* Ministry of Finance* OECDs Hungary country web site* OECD economic survey of Hungary* Hungarian IT: Coping With Economic Transition And Globalisation* The Political and Economic Transition in Hungary* CIA The World Factbook* Economy of Hungary Maarskade Hungrade la Hongriede HungraMaarskedi HungariaHungarydOngriaWgierda Hungriae Hungarist Hungaryzh:
13806
History_of_Malaysia
Malaysia is a country in East Asia whose strategic sea-lane position brought trade and foreign influences that fundamentally influenced its history. Hindu and Buddhist cultures imported from India dominated early Malaysian history. They reached their peak in the Sumatran-based Srivijaya civilization, whose influence extended through Sumatra, Java, the Peninsula and much of Borneo from the 7th to the 14th centuries.Although Muslims had passed through Malaysia as early as the 10th century, it was not until the 14th and 15th centuries that Islam first established itself on the Malayan Peninsular. The adoption of Islam by the 15th century saw the rise of number sultanates, the most prominent of which was the Melaka (Malacca). Islamic culture has had a profound influence on the people, but has also been influenced by them. The Portuguese were the first European colonial powers to establish themselves in Malaysia, capturing Malacca in 1511, followed by the Dutch. However, it was the British, who after initially establishing bases at Jesselton, Kuching, Penang and Singapore, ultimately secured their hegemony across the territory that is now Malaysia. The Treaty of 1824 defined the boundaries between Malaya and the East Indies (which became Indonesia). A fourth phase of foreign influence was immigration of Chinese and Indian workers to meet the needs of the colonial economy created by the British in the Malay Peninsula and Borneo.(Annual Report on the Federation of Malaya: 1951 in C.C. Chin and Karl Hack, Dialogues with Chin Peng pp. 380, 81.)Japanese invasion during War II ended British domination in Malaysia. The subsequent occupation from 1942 to 1945 unleashed nationalism in Malaya and Borneo. In the Peninsula, the Communist Party took up arms against the British. A tough military response was needed to end the insurgency and bring about the establishment of an independent, multi-racial of Malaya in 1957. On 31 August 1963, the British territories in Borneo and Singapore were granted independence and formed Malaysia with the Peninsular states on 16 September 1963. Approximately two years later, Singapore was expelled from the Federation. A confrontation with Indonesia occurred in the early-1960s. riots in 1969 led to the imposition of emergency rule, and a curtailment of political life and liberties which has never been fully reversed. Since 1970 the National Front coalition headed by Malays National Organisation (UMNO) has governed Malaysia. growth dramatically increased living standards by the 1990s. This growing prosperity helped minimise political discontent.PrehistoryThe earliest evidence of human habitation in Malaysia dates back 40,000 years.() A study of Asian genetics points to the idea that the original humans in Asia came from in Asia.() The indigenous groups on the peninsula can be divided into three ethnicities, the Negritos, the Senois, and the proto-Malays.(http://scialert.net/fulltext/?doijbs.2010.71.83&org11) The first inhabitants of the Malay Peninsula were most probably Negritos.() These Mesolithic hunters were probably the ancestors of the Semang, an ethnic Negrito group who have a long history in the Malay Peninsula.()The Senoi appear to be a composite group, with approximately half of the maternal DNA lineages tracing back to the ancestors of the Semang and about half to later ancestral migrations from Indochina. Scholars suggest they are descendants of early Austronesian-speaking agriculturalists, who brought both their language and their technology to the southern part of the peninsula approximately 4,000 years ago. They united and coalesced with the indigenous population.()The Malays have a more diverse origin.,(Minority Rights Group International, World Directory of Minorities and Indigenous Peoples  Malaysia : Orang Asli, 2008, available at: http://www.unhcr.org/refworld/docid/49749ce85.html 7 July 2010) and were settled in Malaysia by 1000BC.() Although they show some connections with other inhabitants in Southeast Asia, some also have an ancestry in Indochina around the time of the Glacial Maximum, about 20,000 years ago. Anthropologists support the notion that the Proto-Malays originated from what is today Yunnan, China.(R.H von Geldern, J.H.C Kern, J.R Foster, J.R Logen, Slametmuljana and Asmah Haji Omar.A history of Malaya and her neighbours  Page 21  by Francis Joseph Moorhead, published by Longmans of Malaysia, 1965India and ancient Malaya (from the earliest times to circa A.D. 1400)  Page 3  by D. Devahuti, Published by D. Moore for Eastern Universities Press, 1965The making of modern Malaya: a history from earliest times to independence  Page 5  by N. J. Ryan, Oxford University Press, 1965The cultural heritage of Malaya  Page 2  by N. J. Ryan published by Longman Malaysia, 1971A history of Malaysia and Singapore  Page 5  by N. J. Ryan published by Oxford University Press, 1976How the dominoes fell: Southeast Asia in perspective  Page 7  by Mae H. Esterline, Hamilton Press, 1986A design guide of public parks in Malaysia  Page 38  by Jamil Abu Bakar published by Penerbit UTM, 2002, ISBN 983-52-0274-5, ISBN 978-983-52-0274-2An introduction to the Malaysian legal system  Page 1  by Min Aun Wu, Heinemann Educational Books (Asia), 1975A short history of Malaysia  Page 22  by Harry Miller published by F.A. Praeger, 1966Malaya and its history  Page 14  by Sir Olaf Winstedt published by Hutchinson University Library, 1962Southeast Asia, past & present  Page 10  by D. R. SarDesai published by Westview Press, 1994Malaya  Page 17  by Norton Sydney Ginsburg, Chester F. Roberts published by University of Washington Press, 1958Asia: a social study  Page 43  by David Tulloch published by Angus and Robertson, 1969Area handbook on Malaya University of Chicago, Chester F. Roberts, Bettyann Carner published by University of Chicago for the Human Relations Area Files, 1955Thailand into the 80s  Page 12  by Samnak Nyok Ratthamontr published by the Office of the Prime Minister, Kingdom of Thailand, 1979Man in Malaya  Page 22  by B. W. Hodder published by Greenwood Press, 1973The modern anthropology of South-East Asia: an introduction, Volume 1 of The modern anthropology of South-East Asia, RoutledgeCurzon Research on Southeast Asia Series  Page 54  by Victor T. King, William D. Wilder published by Routledge, 2003, ISBN 0-415-29751-6, ISBN 978-0-415-29751-6Journal of the Malaysian Branch of the Royal Asiatic Society  Page 17  by Royal Asiatic Society of Great Britain and Ireland. Malaysian Branch, Singapore, 1936Malay and Indonesian leadership in perspective  Page 9  by Ahmad Kamar, 1984The Malay peoples of Malaysia and their languages  Page 36  by Asmah Haji Omar published by Dewan Bahasa dan Pustaka, Kementerian Pelajaran Malaysia, 1983Encyclopedia of world cultures Volume 5  Page 174  by David Levinson  History  1993 published by G.K. Hall, 1993Indigenous peoples of Asia  Page 274  by Robert Harrison Barnes, Andrew Gray, Benedict Kingsbury published by the Association for Asian Studies, 1995Peoples of the Earth: Indonesia, Philippines and Malaysia edited by Edward Evan Evans-Pritchard published by Danbury Press, 1973American anthropologist Vol 60  Page 1228  by American Anthropological Association, Anthropological Society of Washington (Washington, D.C.), American Ethnological Society, 1958Encyclopaedia Of Southeast Asia (set Of 5 Vols.)  Page 4  by Brajendra Kumar published by Akansha Publishing House, 2006, ISBN 81-8370-073-X, ISBN 978-81-8370-073-3)This was followed by an early-Holocene dispersal through the Malay Peninsula into the Archipelago.() Around 300 BC, they were pushed inland by the Deutero-Malays, an Iron Age or Bronze Age people descended partly from the Chams of Cambodia and Vietnam. The first group in the peninsula to use metal tools, the Deutero-Malays were the direct ancestors of todays Malays,( and brought with them advanced farming techniques.( The Malays remained politically fragmented throughout the Malay archipelago, although a common culture and social structure was shared.(Early kingdomsIn the first millennium CE Malays became the dominant race on the peninsula. The small early states that were established were greatly influenced by Indian culture.( Indian influence in the region dates back to at least the 3rd century BCE. The Malay Peninsula was known to ancient Tamils as Suvarnadvipa or the Golden Peninsula. It was shown on Ptolemys map as the Golden Khersonese.  He referred to the Straits of Melaka as Sinus Sabaricus.(ASEAN Member: Malaysia Retrieved 29 May 2008.) Trade relations with China and India were established in the 1st century BC.( In the early centuries of the first millennium, the people of the Malay Peninsula adopted the Indian religions of Hinduism and Buddhism, religions which had a major effect on the language and culture of those living in Malaysia.() The Sanskrit writing system was used as early as the 4th century.()There were numerous Malay kingdoms in the 2nd and 3rd century, as many as 30, mainly based on the Eastern side of the Malay peninsula.( Among the earliest kingdoms known to have been based in what is now Malaysia is the ancient empire of Langkasuka, located in the northern Malay Peninsula and based somewhere in Kedah.( It was closely tied to Funan in Cambodia, which also ruled part of northern Malaysia until the 6th century. According to the Melayu (Malay Annals), the Khmer prince Raja Ganji Sarjuna founded the kingdom of Negara (modern-day Beruas, Perak) in the 700s. Chinese chronicles of the 5th century CE speak of a great port in the south called Guantoli, which is thought to have been in the of Malacca. In the 7th century, a new port called Shilifoshi is mentioned, and this is believed to be a Chinese rendering of Srivijaya.Between the 7th and the 13th century, much of the peninsula was under the buddhist Srivijaya empire.( The site of Srivijayas centre is thought be at a river mouth in eastern Sumatra, based near what is now Palembang.( For over six centuries the Maharajahs of Srivijaya ruled a maritime empire that became the main power in the archipelago. The empire was based around trade, with local kings (dhatus or community leaders) swearing allegiance to the central lord in order for mutual profit.()In 1025 and 1026 Gangga Negara was attacked by Chola I, the Tamil emperor who is now thought to have laid Gelanggi to waste. Kedahknown as Kedaram, Cheh-Cha (according to I-Ching) or Kataha, in ancient Pallava or Sanskritwas in the direct route of the invasions and was ruled by the Cholas from 1025. The senior Cholas successor, Vira Rajendra Chola, had to put down a Kedah rebellion to overthrow other invaders. The coming of the Chola reduced the majesty of Srivijaya, which had exerted influence over Kedah, Pattani and as far as Ligor.Pattinapalai, a Tamil poem of the 2nd century CE, describes goods from Kedaram heaped in the broad streets of the Chola capital. A 7th-century Sanskrit drama, Kaumudhimahotsva, refers to Kedah as Kataha-nagari. The Agnipurana also mentions a territory known as Anda-Kataha with one of its boundaries delineated by a peak, which scholars believe is Jerai. Stories from the Katasaritasagaram describe the elegance of life in Kataha. The Buddhist kingdom of Ligor took control of Kedah shortly after. Its king Chandrabhanu used it as a base to attack Lanka in the 11th century, an event noted in a stone inscription in Nagapattinum in Nadu and in the Sri Lankan chronicles, Mahavamsa.At times, the Khmer kingdom, the Siamese kingdom, and even Cholas kingdom tried to exert control over the smaller Malay states.( The power of Srivijaya declined from the 12th century as the relationship between the capital and its vassals broke down. Wars with the Javanese caused it to request assistance from China, and wars with Indian states are also suspected. In the 11th century CE the centre of power shifted to Melayu, a port possibly located further up the Sumatran coast at near the River.( The power of the Buhhdist Maharajas was further undermined by the spread of Islam. Areas which were converted to Islam early, such as Aceh, broke away from Srivijayas control. By the late 13th century, the Siamese kings of Sukhothai had brought most of Malaya under their rule. In the 14th century, the Hindu Java-based Majapahit empire came into possession of the peninsula.(Arrival of IslamIslam came to the Archipelago via Arab and Indian traders in the 13th century, ending the age of Hinduism and Buddhism.( It arrived in the region gradually, and became the religion of the elite before it spread to the commoners. The Islam in Malaysia was influenced by previous religions and was originally not orthodox.(The port of Malacca on the west coast of the Malay Peninsula was founded in 1402 by Parameswara, a Srivijaya prince fleeing Temasek (now Singapore),( who was claimed in the Melayu to be a descendant of the Great. Parameswara in particular sailed to Temasek to escape persecution. There he came under the protection of Temagi, a Malay chief from Patani who was appointed by the king of Siam as regent of Temasek. Within a few days, Parameswara killed Temagi and appointed himself regent. Some five years later he had to leave Temasek, due to threats from Siam. During this period, a Javanese fleet from Majapahit attacked Temasek.File:KlMuseumBatuBersurat.jpg|thumb|upright|The earliest record of a local law influenced by Islamic teaching and written in Jawi. The stone monument is found in Terengganu.Parameswara headed north to found a new settlement. At Muar, Parameswara considered siting his new kingdom at either Busuk or at Buruk. Finding that the Muar location was not suitable, he continued his journey northwards. Along the way, he reportedly visited Sening Ujong (former name of present-day Sungai Ujong) before reaching a fishing village at the mouth of the Bertam River (former name of the Melaka River), and founded what would become the Sultanate. Over time this developed into modern-day Town. According to the Annals, here Parameswara saw a deer outwitting a dog resting under a tree. Taking this as a good omen, he decided to establish a kingdom called Malacca. He built and improved facilities for trade. The Sultanate is commonly considered the first independent state in the peninsula.()At the time of Melakas founding, the emperor of Dynasty China was sending out fleets of ships to expand trade. Admiral Zheng He called at Malacca and brought Parameswara with him on his return to China, a recognition of his position as legitimate ruler of Malacca. In exchange for regular tribute, the Chinese emperor offered Melaka protection from the constant threat of a Siamese attack. The Chinese and Indians who settled in the Malay Peninsula before and during this period are the ancestors of todays Baba-Nyonya and Chetti community. According to one theory, Parameswara became a Muslim when he married a Princess of Pasai and he took the fashionable Persian title Shah, calling himself Iskandar Shah.(A History of the Malay Peninsula.) Chinese chronicles mention that in 1414, the son of the first ruler of Malacca visited the Ming emperor to inform them that his father had died. Parameswaras son was then officially recognised as the second ruler of Melaka by the Chinese Emperor and styled Raja Sri Rama Vikrama, Raja of Parameswara of Temasek and Malacca and he was known to his Muslim subjects as Sultan Sri Iskandar Zulkarnain Shah or Sultan Iskandar Shah. He ruled Malacca from 1414 to 1424.(() Through the influence of Indian Muslims and, to a lesser extent, people from China, Islam became increasingly common during the 15th century.After an initial period paying tribute to the Ayutthaya,( the kingdom rapidly assumed the place previously held by Srivijaya, establishing independent relations with China, and exploiting its position dominating the Straits to control the China-India maritime trade, which became increasingly important when the Mongol conquests closed the overland route between China and the west.Within a few years of its establishment, Malacca officially adopted Islam. Parameswara became a Muslim, and due to the fact Malacca was under a Muslim Prince the conversion of Malays to Islam accelerated in the 15th century.() The power of the Malaccan Sultanate helped Islams rapid spread through the archipelago. Malacca was an important commercial centre during this time, attracting trade from around the region.( By the start of the 16th century, with Malaccan Sultanate in the peninsula and parts of Sumatra,(sultanate of Malacca. Encyclopdia Britannica. Encyclopdia Britannica Online. Encyclopdia Britannica, 2011. Web. 29 Jun. 2011. .) the of Demak in Java,(Demak. Encyclopdia Britannica. Encyclopdia Britannica Online. Encyclopdia Britannica, 2011. Web. 29 Jun. 2011. .) and other kingdoms around the archipelago increasingly converting to Islam,(Anthony Reid, Islamization and Christianization in Southeast Asia: the Critical Phase, 1550-1650. IN Southeast Asia in the Early Modern Era: Trade, Power, and Belief, ed. Anthony Reid. Ithaca, NY: Cornell University Press, pp.151-79) it had become the dominant religion among Malays, and reached as far as the modern day Philippines, leaving Bali as an isolated outpost of Hinduism today.Malaccas reign lasted little more than a century, but during this time became the established centre of Malay culture. Most future Malay states originated from this period.( Malacca became a cultural centre, creating the matrix of the modern Malay culture: a blend of indigenous Malay and imported Indian, Chinese and Islamic elements. Malaccas fashions in literature, art, music, dance and dress, and the ornate titles of its court, came to be seen as the standard for all ethnic Malays. The court of Malacca also gave great prestige to the language, which had originally evolved in Sumatra and been brought to Malacca at the time of its foundation. In time Malay came to be the language of all the Malaysian states, although local languages survived in many places. After the fall of Malacca, the Sultanate of Brunei became the major centre of Islam.(Struggles for hegemonyThe closing of the overland route from Asia to Europe by the Empire and the claim towards trade monopoly with India and south-east Asia by Arab traders, led European powers to look for a maritime route. In 1511 de Albuquerque led an expedition to Malaya which seized Malacca with the intent of using it as a base for activities in southeast Asia.( This was the first colonial claim on what is now Malaysia.( The son of the last Sultan of Melaka fled to the southern tip of the peninsula, where he founded a state that which became the of Johor.( Another son created the Perak Sultanate to the north. By the late 16th century the tin mines of northern Malaya had been discovered by European traders, and Perak grew wealthy on the proceeds of tin exports.( Portuguese influence was strong, as they aggressively tried to convert the population of Malacca to Catholicism.( In 1571 the Spanish captured Manila and established a colony in the Philippines, sharply ruducing the Sultanate of Bruneis power.(File:A Famosa Fortress, Melaka.jpg|thumb|250px|left|altStained ruin of a stone building, showing a central arch, flanked by two columns, with a stone relief above the arch, also flanked by two columns, and a second free-standing arch perched on the very top of the ruin.|Famosa fortress in Malacca. It was built by the Portuguese in the 16th century.After the fall of Malacca to Portugal, the Johor Sultanate and the Sultanate of Aceh on northern Sumatra moved to fill in the power vacuum left behind.( The three powers struggled to dominate the Malay peninsula and the surrounding islands.( Johor founded in the wake of Malaccas conquest grew powerful enough to rival the Portuguese, although it was never able to recapture the city. Instead it expanded in other directions, building in 130 years one of the largest Malay states.( In this time the numerous attempts to recapture Malacca led to a strong backlash from the Portuguese, whose raids even reached Johors capital of Johor Lama in 1587.(In 1607, the of Aceh rose as the powerful and wealthiest state in archipelago. Under Muda reign, he extended the sultanates control over a number of Malay states. A notable conquest was Perak, a tin-producing state on the Peninsula.( The strength of his formidable fleet was brought to an end with a disastrous campaign against Malacca in 1629, when the combined Portuguese and Johor forces managed to destroy all his ships and 19,000 troops according to Portuguese account. Aceh forces was not destroyed, however, as Aceh was able to conquer Kedah within the same year and taking many of its citizens to Aceh. The Sultans son in law, Iskandar Thani, former prince of Pahang later became his successor. The conflict over control of the straits went on until 1641, when the Dutch (allied to Johor) gained control of Malacca.In the early 17th century the East India Company (Vereenigde Oost-Indische Compagnie, or VOC ) was established. During this time the Dutch were at war with Spain, who obtained the Portuguese Empire due to the Union. From there they expanded across the archipelago, forming an alliance with Johor and using this to push the Portuguese out of Malacca in 1641.( Backed by the Dutch, Johore established a loose hegemony over the states, except Perak, which was able to play off Johore against the Siamese to the north and retain its independence. The Dutch did not interfere in local matters in Malacca, but at the same time diverted most trade to its colonies on Java.(The weakness of the small coastal Malay states led to the immigration of the Bugis, escaping from Dutch colonization of Sulawesi, who established numerous settlements on the peninsula which they used to interfere with Dutch trade.( They seized control of Johor following the assassination of the last Sultan of the old Melaka royal line in 1699. Bugis expanded their power in the states of Johor, Kedah, Perak, and Selangor.( The Minangkabau from center Sumatra migrated into Malaya, and eventually established their own state in Sembilan. The fall of Johore left a vacuum on the Malay Peninsula which was partly filled by the Siamese kings of kingdom, who made the five northern Malay states &ndash; Kedah, Kelantan, Patani, Perlis and Terengganu &ndash; their vassals. Johores eclipse also left Perak as the unrivalled leader of the Malay states.The economic importance of Malaya to Europe grew rapidly during the 18th century. The fast-growing tea trade between China and Kingdom increased the demand for high-quality Malayan tin, which was used to line tea-chests. Malayan pepper also had a high reputation in Europe, while Kelantan and Pahang had gold mines. The growth of tin and mining and associated service industries led to the first influx of foreign settlers into the Malay world &ndash; initially Arabs and Indians, later Chinese &ndash; who colonised the towns and soon dominated economic activities. This established a pattern which characterised Malayan society for the next 200 years &ndash; a rural Malay population increasingly under the domination of wealthy urban immigrant communities, whose power the Sultans were unable to resist.British Influencethumb|650px|Evolution of MalaysiaEnglish traders had been present in Malay waters since the 17th century. Until the arrival of the British European power became fully apparent in Malaysia.( Before the mid 19th century British interests in the region were predominantly economic, with little interest in territorial control. Already the most powerful colonizer in India, they were looking towards southeast Asia for new resources.() The growth of the China trade in British ships increased the Companys desire for bases in the region. Various islands were used for this purpose, but the first permanent acquisition was Penang, leased from the of Kedah in 1786.() This was followed soon after by the leasing of a block of territory on the mainland opposite Penang (known as Wellesley). In 1795, during the Wars, the British with the consent of the Netherlands occupied Dutch Melaka to forestall possible French interest in the area.( When Malacca was handed back to the Dutch in 1815, the British governor, Raffles, looked for an alternative base, and in 1819 he acquired Singapore from the Sultan of Johor.() The exchange of the British colony of Bencoolen for Malacca with the Dutch left the British as the sole colonial power on the peninsula.( The territories of the British were set up as free ports, attempting to break the monopoly held by other colonial powers as the time, and making them large bases of trade. They allowed Britain to control all trade through the straits of Malacca.( British influence was increased by Malayan fears of Siamese expansionism, to which Britain made a useful counterweight. During the 19th century the Malay Sultans aligned themselves the British Empire, due to the benefits of associations with the British and the belief in superior British civilization.(In 1824 British hegemony in Malaya (before the name Malaysia) was formalised by the Treaty, which divided the Malay archipelago between Britain and the Netherlands. The Dutch evacuated Melaka( and renounced all interest in Malaya, while the British recognised Dutch rule over the rest of the East Indies. By 1826 the British controlled Penang, Malacca, Singapore and the island of Labuan, which they established as the crown colony of the Settlements,( administered first under the India Company until 1867, when they were transferred to the Colonial Office in London.(Initially the British followed a policy of non-intervention in relation between the Malay states.( The commercial importance of tin mining in the Malay states to merchants in the Straits Settlements led to infighting between the aristocracy on the peninsula. The destabilisation of these states damaged the commerce in the area, causing British intervention. The wealth of Peraks tin mines made political stability there a priority for British investors, and Perak was thus the first Malay state to agree to the supervision of a British resident.( British diplomacy was employed to bring about a peaceful resolution to civil disturbances caused by Chinese and Malay gangsters employed in a political tussle between Ngah Ibrahim and Raja Muda Abdullah. The Treaty of 1874 paved the way for the expansion of British influence in Malaya. The British concluded treaties with some Malay states, installing residents who advised the Sultans and soon became the effective rulers of their states.() These advisors held power in everything except to do with Malay religion and customs.( Johore alone resisted, by modernizing and giving British and Chinese investors legal protection. By the turn of the 20th century, the states of Pahang, Selangor, Perak, and Sembilan, known together as the Malay States, had British advisors.( In 1909 the Siamese kingdom was compelled to cede Kedah, Kelantan, Perlis and Terengganu, which already had British advisors, over to the British.( Abu Bakar of Johor and Queen Victoria were personal acquaintances, and recognised each other as equals. It was not until 1914 that Sultan Abu Bakars successor, Sultan Ibrahim accepted a British adviser. The four previously Thai states and Johor were known as the Malay States. The states under the most direct British control developed rapidly, becoming the largest suppliers in the world of first tin, then rubber.(During the late 19th century the British also gained control of the north coast of Borneo, where Dutch rule had never been established. Development on the Peninsula and Borneo were generally separate until the 19th century.() The eastern part of this region (now Sabah) was under the nominal control of the Sultan of Sulu, a vassal of the Spanish Philippines. The rest was the territory of the Sultanate of Brunei. In 1841, a British adventurer, Brooke, helped the Sultan of Brunei suppress a revolt, and in return received the title of raja and the right to govern the Sarawak River District. In 1846 his title was recognised as hereditary, and the White Rajahs began ruling Sarawak as a recognised independent state. The Brookes expanded Sarawak at the expense of Brunei.( In 1881 the North Borneo Company was granted control of the territory of North Borneo, appointing a governor and legislature. It was ruled from the office in London. Its status was similar to that of a British Protectorate, and like Sarawak it expanded at the expense of Brunei.( The Spanish Philippines never recognised this loss of the Sultan of Sulus territory, laying the basis of the subsequent Filipino claim to Sabah. In 1888 what was left of Brunei was made a British protectorate, and in 1891 another Anglo-Dutch treaty formalised the border between British and Dutch Borneo.By 1910 the pattern of British rule in the Malay lands was established. The Straits Settlements were a Colony, ruled by a governor under the supervision of the Office in London. Their population was about half Chinese, but all residents, regardless of race, were British subjects. The first four states to accept British residents, Perak, Selangor, Negeri Sembilan and Pahang, were termed the Malay States: while technically independent, they were placed under a Resident-General in 1895, making them British colonies in all but name. The Malay States (Johore, Kedah, Kelantan, Perlis and Terengganu) had a slightly larger degree of independence, although they were unable to resist the wishes of their British Residents for long. Johore, as Britains closest ally in Malay affairs, had the privilege of a written constitution, which gave the Sultan the right to appoint his own Cabinet, but he was generally careful to consult the British first.Race relationsUnlike some colonial powers, the British always saw their empire as primarily an economic concern, and its colonies were expected to turn a profit for British shareholders. Malayas obvious attractions were its tin and gold mines, but British planters soon began to experiment with tropical plantation crops &ndash; tapioca, gambier, pepper and coffee. But in 1877 the rubber plant was introduced from Brazil, and rubber soon became Malayas staple export, stimulated by booming demand from European industry. Rubber was later joined by oil as an export earner. All these industries required a large and disciplined labour force, and the British did not regard the Malays as reliable workers. The solution was the importation of plantation workers from India, mainly Tamil-speakers from India. The mines, mills and docks also attracted a flood of immigrant workers from southern China. Soon towns like Singapore, Penang and Ipoh were majority Chinese, as was Lumpur, founded as a tin-mining centre in 1857. By 1891, when Malayas first census was taken, Perak and Selangor, the main tin-mining states, had Chinese majorities.The Chinese mostly arrived poor; yet, their belief in industriousness and frugality, their emphasis in their childrens education and their maintenance of Confucian family hierarchy, as well as their voluntary connection with tightly knit networks of mutual aid societies (run by Hui-Guan ,  or organizations with nominal geographic affiliations from different parts of China) all contributed to their prosperity. In the 1890s Ah Loy, who held the title of Kapitan China of Kuala Lumpur, was the richest man in Malaya, owning a chain of mines, plantations and shops. Malayas banking and insurance industries were run by the Chinese from the start, and Chinese businesses, usually in partnership with London firms, soon had a stranglehold on the economy. Since the Malay Sultans tended to spend well beyond their means, they were soon indebted to Chinese bankers, and this gave the Chinese political as well as economic leverage. At first the Chinese immigrants were mostly men, and many intended to return home when they had made their fortunes. Many did go home, but many more stayed. At first they married Malay women, producing a community of Sino-Malayans or baba people, but soon they began importing Chinese brides, establishing permanent communities and building schools and temples.The Indians were initially less successful, since unlike the Chinese they came mainly as indentured labourers to work in the rubber plantations, and had few of the economic opportunities that the Chinese had. They were also a less united community, since they were divided between Hindus and Muslims and along lines of language and caste. An Indian commercial and class emerged during the early 20th century, but the majority of Indians remained poor and uneducated in rural ghettos in the rubber-growing areas.Traditional Malay society had great difficulty coping with both the loss of political sovereignty to the British and of economic power to the Chinese. By the early 20th century it seemed possible that the Malays would become a minority in their own country. The Sultans, who were seen as collaborators with both the British and the Chinese, lost some of their traditional prestige, particularly among the increasing number of Malays with a western education, but the mass of rural Malays continued to revere the Sultans and their prestige was thus an important prop for colonial rule. A small class of Malay nationalist intellectuals began to emerge during the early 20th century, and there was also a revival of Islam in response to the perceived threat of other imported religions, particularly Christianity. In fact few Malays converted to Christianity, although many Chinese did. The northern regions, which were less influenced by western ideas, became strongholds of Islamic conservatism, as they have remained.The one consolation to Malay pride was that the British allowed them a virtual monopoly of positions in the police and local units, as well as a majority of those administrative positions open to non-Europeans. While the Chinese mostly built and paid for their own schools and colleges, importing teachers from China, the colonial government fostered education for Malays, opening Malay College in 1905 and creating the Malay Administrative Service in 1910. (The college was dubbed Bab ud-Darajat &ndash; the Gateway to High Rank.) A Malay Teachers College followed in 1922, and a Malay Womens Training College in 1935. All this reflected the official British policy that Malaya belonged to the Malays, and that the other races were but temporary residents. This view was increasingly out of line with reality, and contained the seeds of much future trouble.In the years before War II, the British were concerned with finding the balance between a centralized state and maintaining the power of the Sultans in Malaya.( There were no moves to give Malaya a unitary government, and in fact in 1935 the position of Resident-General of the Federated States was abolished, and its powers decentralised to the individual states. With their usual tendency to racial stereotyping, the British regarded the Malays as amiable but unsophisticated and rather lazy, incapable of self-government, although making good soldiers under British officers. They regarded the Chinese as clever but dangerous &ndash; and indeed during the 1920s and 30s, reflecting events in China, the Chinese Nationalist Party (the Kuomintang) and the Party of China built rival clandestine organisations in Malaya, leading to regular disturbances in the Chinese towns. The British saw no way that Malayas disparate collection of states and races could become a nation, let alone an independent one.War and EmergencyFile:Tugu Negara.jpg|thumb|right|Negara, the Malaysian national monument is dedicated to those that fell during World War II and the Malayan EmergencyThe outbreak of war in the Pacific in December 1941 found the British in Malaya completely unprepared. During the 1930s, anticipating the rising threat of Japanese naval power, they had built a great naval base at Singapore, but never anticipated an invasion of Malaya from the north. Because of the demands of the war in Europe, there was virtually no British air capacity in the Far East. The Japanese were thus able to attack from their bases in Indo-China with impunity, and despite stubborn resistance from British, Australian and Indian forces, they overran Malaya in two months. Singapore, with no landward defences, no air cover and no supply, was forced to surrender in February 1942, doing irreparable damage to British prestige. British North Borneo and Brunei were also occupied.The Japanese had a racial policy just as the British did. They regarded the Malays as a colonial people liberated from British imperialist rule, and fostered a limited form of Malay nationalism, which gained them some degree of collaboration from the Malay service and intellectuals. (Most of the Sultans also collaborated with the Japanese, although they maintained later that they had done so unwillingly.) The occupiers regarded the Chinese, however, as aliens, and treated them with great harshness: during the so-called sook ching (purification through suffering), up to 80,000 Chinese in Malaya and Singapore were killed. Chinese businesses were expropriated and Chinese schools either closed or burned down. Not surprisingly the Chinese, led by the Communist Party (MCP), became the backbone of the Peoples Anti-Japanese Army (MPAJA), which with British assistance became the most effective force in the occupied Asian countries. But the Japanese also offended Malay nationalism by allowing their ally Thailand to re-annex the four northern states, Kedah, Perlis, Kelantan and Terengganu that had been surrendered to British in 1909. The loss of Malayas export markets soon produced mass unemployment which affected all races and made the Japanese increasingly unpopular.During occupation, ethnic tensions were raised and nationalism grew.() The Malayans were thus on the whole glad to see the British back in 1945, but things could not remain as they were before the war, and a stronger desire for independence grew.() Britain was bankrupt and the new Labour government was keen to withdraw its forces from the East as soon as possible. Colonial self-rule and eventual independence were now British policy. The tide of colonial nationalism sweeping through Asia soon reached Malaya. But most Malays were more concerned with defending themselves against the Malayan Communist Party (MCP) which was mostly made up of Chinese, than with demanding independence from the British &ndash; indeed their immediate concern was that the British not leave and abandon the Malays to the armed Communists of the MPAJA, which was the largest armed force in the country.In 1944 the British drew up plans plans for a Union, which would turn the Federated and Unfederated Malay States, plus Penang and Malacca (but not Singapore), into a single crown colony, with a view towards independence. The Bornean territories and Singapore were left out as it was thought this would make the union more difficult to achieve.( There was however strong opposition from the Malays, who opposed the weakening of the Malay rulers and the granting of citizenship to the ethnic Chinese and other minorities.() The British had decided on equality between races as they perceived the Chinese and Indians as more loyal to the British durin the war than the Malays.( The Sultans, who had initially supported it, backed down and placed themselves at the head of the resistance. In 1946 the Malays National Organisation (UMNO) was founded by Malay nationalists led by Dato Onn bin Jaafar, the Chief Minister of Johore.( UMNO favoured independence for Malaya, but only if the new state was run exclusively by the Malays. Faced with implacable Malay opposition, the British dropped the plan for equal citizenship. The Malayan Union was thus established in 1946, and was dissolved in 1948 and replaced by the of Malaya, which restored the autonomy of the rulers of the Malay states under British protection.Meanwhile the Communists were moving towards open insurrection. The MPAJA had been disbanded in December 1945, and the MCP organised as a legal political party, but the MPAJAs arms were carefully stored for future use. The MCP policy was for immediate independence with full equality for all races. This meant it recruited very few Malays. The Partys strength was in the Chinese-dominated unions, particularly in Singapore, and in the Chinese schools, where the teachers, mostly born in China, saw the Party of China as the leader of Chinas national revival. In March 1947, reflecting the international Communist movements turn to left as the War set in, the MCP leader Tek was purged and replaced by the veteran MPAJA guerrilla leader Peng, who turned the party increasingly to action. These rebels, under the leadership of the Communist Party, launched guerrilla operations designed to force the British out of Malaya. In July, following a string of assassinations of plantation managers, the colonial government struck back, declaring a State of Emergency, banning the MCP and arresting hundreds of its militants. The Party retreated to the jungle and formed the Peoples Liberation Army, with about 13,000 men under arms, all Chinese.The Emergency as it was known, lasted from 1948 to 1960, and involved a long anti-insurgency campaign by Commonwealth troops in Malaya. The British strategy, which proved ultimately successful, was to isolate the MCP from its support base by a combination of economic and political concessions to the Chinese and the resettlement of Chinese squatters into New Villages in white areas free of MCP influence. The effective mobilisation of the Malays against the MCP was also an important part the British strategy. From 1949 the MCP campaign lost momentum and the number of recruits fell sharply. Although the MCP succeeded in assassinating the British Commissioner, Sir Gurney, in October 1951, this turn to terrorist tactics alienated many moderate Chinese from the Party. The arrival of Lt-Gen Sir Templer as British commander in 1952 was the beginning of the end of the Emergency. Templer invented the techniques of counter-insurgency warfare in Malaya and applied them ruthlessly. Although the insurgency was defeated Commonwealth troops remained with the backdrop of the War.(Malaya: Sieges End, Time, New York, 2 May 1960.) Against this backdrop, independence for the Federation within the Commonwealth was granted on 31 August 1957,(A New Nation, Time, New York, 9 September 1957) with Abdul Rahman as the first prime minister.(Towards MalaysiaImage:Dataran Merdeka.jpg|thumb|Merdeka (Independence Square) in Kuala Lumpur, where Malaysians celebrate Independence Day on 31 August each yearChinese reaction against the MCP was shown by the formation of the Malayan Chinese Association (MCA) in 1949 as a vehicle for moderate Chinese political opinion. Its leader, Cheng Lock, favoured a policy of collaboration with UMNO to win Malayan independence on a policy of equal citizenship, but with sufficient concessions to Malay sensitivities to ease nationalist fears. Tan formed a close collaboration with Tunku (Prince) Abdul Rahman, the Chief Minister of Kedah and from 1951 successor to Datuk Onn as leader of UMNO. Since the British had announced in 1949 that Malaya would soon become independent whether the Malayans liked it or not, both leaders were determined to forge an agreement their communities could live with as a basis for a stable independent state. The UMNO-MCA Alliance (which was later joined by the Malayan Indian Congress (MIC)), won convincing victories in local and state elections in both Malay and Chinese areas between 1952 and 1955.The introduction of elected government was another important step in defeating the Communists. After Stalins death in 1953, there was a split in the MCP leadership over the wisdom of continuing the armed struggle. Many MCP militants lost heart and went home, and by the time Templer left Malaya in 1954 the Emergency was over, although Chin Peng led a diehard group that lurked in the inaccessible country along the Thai border for many years. The Emergency left a lasting legacy of bitterness between Malays and Chinese.During 1955 and 1956 UMNO, the MCA and the British hammered out a constitutional settlement for a principle of equal citizenship for all races. In exchange, the MCA agreed that Malayas head of state would be drawn from the ranks of the Malay Sultans, that Malay would be the official language, and that Malay education and development would be promoted and subsidised. In effect this meant that Malaya would be run by the Malays, particularly since they continued to dominate the civil service, the army and the police, but that the Chinese and Indians would have proportionate representation in the Cabinet and the parliament, would run those states where they were the majority, and would have their economic position protected. The difficult issue of who would control the education system was deferred until after independence. This came on August 31, 1957, when Tunku Abdul Rahman became the first Prime Minister of independent Malaya.This left the unfinished business of the other British-ruled territories in the region. After the Japanese surrender the family and the British North Borneo Company gave up their control of Sarawak and Sabah respectively, and these became British Crown Colonies. They were much less economically developed than Malaya, and their local political leaderships were too weak to demand independence. Singapore, with its large Chinese majority, achieved autonomy in 1955, and in 1959 the young socialist leader Kuan Yew became Prime Minister. The Sultan of Brunei remained as a British client in his oil-rich enclave. Between 1959 and 1962 the British government orchestrated complex negotiations between these local leaders and the Malayan government.In 1961, Abdul Rahman mooted the idea of forming Malaysia, which would consist of Brunei, Malaya, Sabah, Sarawak and Singapore, all of which had been British colonies. The reasoning behind this was that this would allow the government to control and combat communist activities, especially in Singapore. It was also feared that if Singapore achieved independence, it would become a base for Chinese chauvinists to threaten Malayan sovereignty. To balance out the ethnic composition of the new nation, the other states, whose Malay and indigenous populations would cancel out the Singaporean Chinese majority, were also included.(Shuid, Mahdi & Yunus, Mohd. Fauzi (2001). Malaysian Studies, p. 29. Longman. ISBN 983-74-2024-3.)Although Lee Kuan Yew supported the proposal, his opponents from the Singaporean Socialist Front resisted, arguing that this was a ploy for the British to continue controlling the region. Most political parties in Sarawak were also against the merger, and in Sabah, where there were no political parties, community representatives also stated their opposition. Although the of Brunei supported the merger, the Parti Rakyat Brunei opposed it as well. At the Prime Ministers Conference in 1961, Abdul Rahman explained his proposal further to its opponents. In October, he obtained agreement from the British government to the plan, provided that feedback be obtained from the communities involved in the merger. The Commission, named after its head, Lord Cobbold, conducted a study in the Borneo territories and approved a merger with Sabah and Sarawak; however, it was found that a substantial number of Bruneians opposed merger. A referendum was conducted in Singapore to gauge opinion, and 70% supported merger with substantial autonomy given to the state government.(Shuid & Yunus, pp. 30&ndash;31.)(Adam, Ramlah binti, Samuri, Abdul Hakim bin & Fadzil, Muslimin bin (2004). Sejarah Tingkatan 3, p. 207. Bahasa dan Pustaka. ISBN 983-62-8285-8.) The Sultanate of Brunei withdrew from the planned merger due to opposition from certain segments of its population as well as arguments over the payment of oil royalties and the status of the Sultan in the planned merger.(Malaysia: Hurray for Harry, Time, New York, 20 September 1963.)(Malaysia: Fighting the Federation, Time, New York, 21 December 1962.) Additionally, the Bruneian Rakyat Brunei staged an armed revolt, which, though it was put down, was viewed as potentially destabilising to the new nation.(Shuid & Yunus, p. 31.)After reviewing the Cobbold Commissions findings, the British government appointed the Commission to draft a constitution for Malaysia. The eventual constitution was essentially the same as the 1957 constitution, albeit with some rewording. For instance, giving recognition to the special position of the natives of the Borneo States. Sabah, Sarawak and Singapore were also granted some autonomy unavailable to the states of Malaya. After negotiations in July 1963, it was agreed that Malaysia would come into being on 31 August 1963, consisting of Malaya, Sabah, Sarawak and Singapore. The date was to coincide with the independence day of Malaya and the British giving self-rule to Sarawak and Sabah. However, the Philippines and Indonesia strenuously objected to this development, with Indonesia claiming Malaysia represented a form of neocolonialism and the Philippines claiming Sabah as its territory. The opposition from the Indonesian government led by Sukarno and attempts by the United Peoples Party delayed the formation of Malaysia.() Due to these factors, an 8-member United Nations team had to be formed to re-ascertain whether Sabah and Sarawak truly wanted to join Malaysia.(Malaysia: Tunku Yes, Sukarno No, Time, New York, 6 September 1963.)() Malaysia formally came into being on 16 September 1963, consisting of Malaya, Sabah, Sarawak and Singapore. In 1963 the total population of Malaysia was about 10 million.Challenges of independenceAt the time of independence Malaya had great economic advantages. It was among the worlds leading producers of three valuable commodities, rubber, tin and palm oil, and also a significant ore producer. These export industries gave the Malayan government a healthy surplus to invest in industrial development and infrastructure projects. Like other developing nations in the 1950s and 60s, Malaya (and later Malaysia) placed great stress on state planning, although UMNO was never a socialist party. The First and Second Malayan Plans (195660 and 1961-65 respectively) stimulated economic growth through state investment in industry and repairing infrastructure such as roads and ports, which had been damaged and neglected during the war and the Emergency. The government was keen to reduce Malayas dependence on commodity exports, which put the country at the mercy of fluctuating prices. The government was also aware that demand for natural rubber was bound to fall as the production and use of rubber expanded. Since a third of the Malay workforce worked in the rubber industry it was important to develop alternative sources of employment. Competition for Malayas rubber markets meant that the profitability of the rubber industry increasingly depended on keeping wages low, which perpetuated rural Malay poverty.Foreign objectionIndonesian President Sukarno, backed by the powerful Party of Indonesia (PKI), chose to regard Malaysia as a neocolonialist plot against his country, and backed a Communist insurgency in Sarawak, mainly involving elements of the local Chinese community. Indonesian irregular forces were infiltrated into Sarawak, where they were contained by Malaysian and of Nations forces.( This period of Konfrontasi, an economic, political, and military confrontation lasted until the downfall of Sukarno in 1966.( The Philippines objected to the formation of the federation, claiming North Borneo was part of Sulu, and thus the Philippines.(  In 1966 the new president, Marcos, dropped the claim, although it has since been revived and is still a point of contention marring Philippine-Malaysian relations.()()Racial strifeThe Depression of the 1930s, followed by the outbreak of the Sino-Japanese War, had the effect of ending Chinese emigration to Malaya. This stabilised the demographic situation and ended the prospect of the Malays becoming a minority in their own country. At the time of independence in 1957, the Malays were 55% of the population, the Chinese 35% and the Indians 10%. This balance was altered by the inclusion of the majority Chinese Singapore, upsetting many Malays.( The federation increased the Chinese proportion to close to 40%. Both UMNO and the MCA were nervous about the possible appeal of Lees Action Party (then seen as a radical socialist party) to voters in Malaya, and tried to organise a party in Singapore to challenge Lees position there. Lee in turn threatened to run PAP candidates in Malaya at the 1964 federal elections, despite an earlier agreement that he would not do so (see Relations). Racial tensions intensified as PAP created an opposition alliance aiming for equality between races.( This provoked Tunku Abdul Rahman to demand that Singapore withdraw from Malaysia, which it did in August 1965.()The most vexed issues of independent Malaysia were education and the disparity of power among the ethnic communities. The Malays felt unhappy with the wealth of the Chinese community, even after the expulsion of Singapore. Malay political movements emerged based around this.( However, since there was no effective opposition party, these issues were contested mainly within the government, which won all but one seat in the first post-independence Malayan Parliament. The two issues were related, since the Chinese advantage in education played a large part in maintaining their control of the economy, which the UMNO leaders were determined to end. The MCA leaders were torn between the need to defend their own communitys interests and the need to maintain good relations with UMNO. This produced a crisis in the MCA in 1959, in which a more assertive leadership under Chong Eu defied UMNO over the education issue, only to be forced to back down when Tunku Abdul Rahman threatened to break up the coalition.The Education Act of 1961 put UMNOs victory on the education issue into legislative form. Henceforward Malay and English would be the only teaching languages in secondary schools, and state primary schools would teach in Malay only. Although the Chinese and Indian communities could maintain their own Chinese and Tamil-language primary schools, all their students were required to learn Malay, and to study an agreed Malayan curriculum. Most importantly, the entry exam to the of Malaya (which moved from Singapore to Kuala Lumpur in 1963) would be conducted in Malay, even though most teaching at the university was in English until the 1970s. This had the effect of excluding many Chinese students. At the same time Malay schools were heavily subsidised, and Malays were given preferential treatment. This obvious defeat for the MCA greatly weakened its support in the Chinese community.As in education, the UMNO governments unspoken agenda in the field of economic development was to shift economic power away from the Chinese and towards the Malays. The two Malayan Plans, and the First Malaysian Plan (196670), directed resources heavily into developments which would benefit the rural Malay community, such as village schools, rural roads, clinics and irrigation projects. Several agencies were set up to enable Malay smallholders to upgrade their production and increase their incomes. The Federal Land Development Authority (FELDA) helped many Malays buy farms or upgrade ones they already owned. The state also provided a range of incentives and low-interest loans to help Malays start businesses, and government tendering systematically favoured Malay companies, leading many Chinese-owned businesses to Malayanise their management. All this certainly tended to reduce to gap between Chinese and Malay standards of living, although some argued that this would have happened anyway as Malaysias trade and general prosperity increased.The crisis of 1969The collaboration of the MCA and the MIC in these policies weakened their hold on the Chinese and Indian electorates. At the same time, the effects of the governments action policies of the 1950s and 60s had been to create a discontented class of educated but underemployed Malays. This was a dangerous combination, and led to the formation of a new party, the Malaysian Peoples Movement (Gerakan Rakyat Malaysia) in 1968. Gerakan was a deliberately non-communal party, bringing in Malay trade unionists and intellectuals as well as Chinese and Indian leaders. At the same time, an Islamist party, the Party of Malaysia (PAS) and a Chinese socialist party, the Action Party (DAP), gained increasing support, at the expense of UMNO and the MCA respectively.(At the May 1969 federal elections, the UMNO-MCA-MIC Alliance polled only 48 percent of the vote, although it retained a majority in the legislature. The MCA lost most of the Chinese-majority seats to Gerakan or DAP candidates. The victorious opposition celebrated by holding a motorcade on the main streets of Kuala Lumpur with supporters holding up brooms as a signal of its intention to make sweeping changes.  Fear of what the changes might mean for them (as much of the countrys businesses were Chinese owned), a Malay backlash resulted, leading rapidly to riots and inter-communal violence in which about 6,000 Chinese homes and businesses were burned and at least 184 people were killed.()() The government declared a state of emergency, and a National Operations Council, headed by the Deputy Prime Minister, Tun Abdul Razak, took power from the government of Tunku Abdul Rahman, who in September 1970 was forced to retire in favour of Abdul Razak. It consisted of 9 members, mostly Malay, and wielded full political and military power.(Using the Emergency-era Internal Security Act (ISA), the new government suspended Parliament and political parties, imposed press censorship and placed severe restrictions on political activity. The ISA gave the government power to intern any person indefinitely without trial. These powers were widely used to silence the governments critics, and have never been repealed. The Constitution was changed to make illegal any criticism, even in Parliament, of the Malaysian monarchy, the special position of Malays in the country, or the status of Malay as the national language.In 1971 Parliament reconvened, and a new government coalition, the National Front (Barisan Nasional), took office.( This included UMNO, the MCA, the MIC, the much weakened Gerakan, and regional parties in Sabah and Sarawak. The DAP was left outside as the only significant opposition party. The PAS also joined the Front but was expelled in 1977. Abdul Razak held office until his death in 1976. He was succeeded by Datuk Onn, the son of UMNOs founder Onn Jaafar, and then by Tun Dr bin Mohamad, who had been Education Minister since 1981, and who held power for 22 years. During these years policies were put in place which led to the rapid transformation of Malaysias economy and society, such as the controversial New Economic Policy, which was intended to increase proportionally the share of the economic pie of the bumiputras (indigenous people, which includes the majority Malays, but not always the indigenous population) as compared to other ethnic groupswas launched by Prime Minister Abdul Razak. Malaysia has since maintained a delicate ethno-political balance, with a system of government that has attempted to combine overall economic development with political and economic policies that promote equitable participation of all races.()Modern Malaysiathumb|right|altStreet scene; a large fountain visible in the right foreground, a row of palm trees stretching away to the left, and in the centre of the image, across the street, a large white and beige stone building, with a tall domed central tower and two smaller domed towers to the right and left.|Kuala Lumpur, a blend of old and new.In 1970 75 percent of Malaysians living below the line were Malays, the majority of Malays were still rural workers, and Malays were still largely excluded from the modern economy. The governments response was the New Economic Policy of 1971, which was to be implemented through a series of four five-year plans from 1971 to 1990. The plan had two objectives: the elimination of poverty, particularly rural poverty, and the elimination of the identification between race and prosperity.( This latter policy was understood to mean a decisive shift in economic power from the Chinese to the Malays, who until then made up only 5% of the professional class.(Poverty was tackled through an policy which resettled 250,000 Malays on newly cleared farmland, more investment in infrastructure, and the creation of trade zones in rural areas to create new manufacturing jobs. Little was done to improve the living standards of the low-paid workers in plantation agriculture, although this group steadily declined as a proportion of the workforce. By 1990 the poorest parts of Malaysia were rural Sabah and Sarawak, which lagged significantly behind the rest of the country. During the 1970s and 80s rural poverty did decline, particularly in the Malayan Peninsula, but critics of the governments policy contend that this was mainly due to the growth of overall national prosperity (due in large part to the discovery of important oil and gas reserves) and migration of rural people to the cities rather than to state intervention. These years saw rapid growth in Malaysian cities, particularly Kuala Lumpur, which became a magnet for immigration both from rural Malaya and from poorer neighbours such as Indonesia, Bangladesh, Thailand and the Philippines. Urban poverty became a problem for the first time, with towns growing up around the cities.The second arm of government policy, driven mainly by Mahathir first as Education Minister and then as Prime Minister, was the transfer of economic power to the Malays. Mahathir greatly expanded the number of secondary schools and universities throughout the country, and enforced the policy of teaching in Malay rather than English. This had the effect of creating a large new Malay professional class. It also created an unofficial barrier against Chinese access to education, since few Chinese are sufficiently fluent in Malay to study at Malay-language universities. Chinese families therefore sent their children to universities in Singapore, Australia, Britain or the United States &ndash; by 2000, for example, 60,000 Malaysians held degrees from Australian universities. This had the consequence of exposing large numbers of Malaysians to life in Western countries, creating a new source of discontent. Mahathir also greatly expanded educational opportunities for Malay women &ndash; by 2000 half of all university students were women.Image:KLCC twin towers2.JPG|thumb|left|Twin Towers, Kuala Lumpur the tallest building in South-East Asia.To find jobs for all these new Malay graduates, the government created several agencies for intervention in the economy. The most important of these were PERNAS (National Corporation Ltd.), PETRONAS (National Petroleum Ltd.), and HICOM (Heavy Industry Corporation of Malaysia), which not only directly employed many Malays but also invested in growing areas of the economy to create new technical and administrative jobs which were preferentially allocated to Malays. As a result, the share of Malay equity in the economy rose from 1.5 percent in 1969 to 20.3 percent in 1990, and the percentage of businesses of all kinds owned by Malays rose from 39 percent to 68 percent. This latter figure was deceptive because many businesses that appeared to be Malay-owned were still indirectly controlled by Chinese, but there is no doubt that the Malay share of the economy considerably increased. The Chinese remained disproportionately powerful in Malaysian economic life, but by 2000 the distinction between Chinese and Malay business was fading as many new corporations, particularly in growth sectors such as technology, were owned and managed by people from both ethnic groups.Malaysias rapid progress since 1970, which was only temporarily disrupted by the financial crisis of 1997, has not been matched by change in Malaysian politics. The repressive measures passed in 1970 remain in place. Malaysia has had regular elections since 1974, and although campaigning is reasonably free at election time, it is in effect a one-party state, with the UMNO-controlled National Front usually winning nearly all the seats, while the DAP wins some Chinese urban seats and the PAS some rural Malay ones. Since the DAP and the PAS have diametrically opposed policies, they have been unable to form an effective opposition coalition. There is almost no criticism of the government in the media and public protest remains severely restricted. The ISA continues to be used to silence dissidents, and the members of the UMNO movement are deployed to physically intimidate opponents.Mahathir administrationFile:Mahathir 2007.jpg|right|200px|thumb|altA photo showing former Prime Minister Mahatir bin Mohamad standing with head down and surrounded by government officials at the celebration of the 50th independence day.|bin Mohamad was the leading force in making Malaysia into a major industrial power.The restoration of democracy after the 1969 crisis caused disputes in the UMNO, a struggle of power which increased after the death of Tun Abdul Razak. The ailing Datuk Hussein Bin Onn replaced him, but the fight for control shifted to appointing the deputy prime minister. Mahathir bin Mahamad was chosen, an advocate of bumiputra who also tried to benefit the other ethnic communities.(Under the premiership of bin Mohamad, Malaysia experienced economic growth from the 1980s, a 1985-86 property market depression,() and returned to growth through to the mid-1990s.() Mahathir increased privatization and introduced the New Development Policy (NDP), designed to increase economic wealth for all Malaysians, rather than just Malays.( The period saw a shift from an agriculture-based economy to one based on manufacturing and industry in areas such as computers and consumer electronics. It was during this period, too, that the physical landscape of Malaysia changed with the emergence of numerous mega-projects. Notable amongst these projects were the construction of the Twin Towers (at the time the tallest building in the world, and, as of 2010, still the tallest twin building), International Airport (KLIA), the North-South Expressway, the International Circuit, the Multimedia Super Corridor (MSC), the Bakun hydroelectric dam and Putrajaya, the new federal administrative capital.Under bin Mohamads long Prime Ministership (19812003), Malaysias culture became increasingly centralized and authoritarian, due to Mahathirs belief that the multiethnic Malaysia could only remain stable through controlled democracy. In 1986-87, he faced leadership challenges among his own party. The Internal Security Act was invoked in October 1987 arresting 106 people, including opposition leaders. The head of the judiciary and 5 members of the supreme court who had questioned his use of the ISA were also arrested, and a clampdown on Malaysias press occurred.(culminating in the dismissal and imprisonment on unsubstantiated charges of the Deputy Prime Minister, Ibrahim, in 1997 after an internal dispute within the government. The complicity of the judiciary in this piece of persecution was seen as a particularly clear sign of the decline of Malaysian democracy. The Anwar affair led to the formation of a new party, the Justice Party, or Keadilan, led by Anwars wife, Dr. Azizah Wan Ismail. At the 1999 elections Keadilan formed a coalition with the DAP and the PAS known as the Alternative Front (Alternatif). The result of this was that the PAS won a number of Malay seats from UMNO, but many Chinese voters disapproved of this unnatural alliance with the Islamist PAS, causing the DAP to lose many of its seats to the MCA, including that of its veteran leader, Kit Siang. Wan Azizah won her husbands former constituency in Penang but otherwise Keadilan made little impact.In the late 1990s, Malaysia was shaken by the Asian financial crisis, which damaged Malaysias assembly line based economy. Mahathir combated it initially with IMF approved policies. However, the devaluation of the Ringgit and the deepening recession caused him to create his own programme, based on protecting Malaysia from foreign investors and reinvigorating the economy through construction projects and the lowering of interest rates. The policies caused Malaysias economy to rebound by 2002, but brought disagreement between Mahathir and his deputy, Ibrahim, who backed the IMF policies.( This led to the sacking of the Anwar, causing political unrest.() Anwar was arrested and banned from politics on what are considered trumped up charges.( In 2003 Dr Mahathir, Malaysias longest serving prime minister, voluntarily retired in favour of his new deputy, Ahmad Badawi.(Badawi administrationDato Seri Ahmad Badawi freed Anwar,( which was seen as a portent of a mild liberalisation. At the 2004 election, the National Front led by Abdullah had a massive victory,( virtually wiping out the PAS and Keadilan, although the DAP recovered the seats it had lost in 1999. This victory was seen as the result mainly of Abdullahs personal popularity and the strong recovery of Malaysias economy, which has lifted the living standards of most Malaysians to almost world standards, coupled with an ineffective opposition. The governments objective is for Malaysia to become a fully country by 2020 as expressed in 2020. It leaves unanswered, however, the question of when and how Malaysia will acquire a first world system (a multi-party democracy, a free press, an independent judiciary and the restoration of civil and political liberties) to go with its new economic maturity.In November 2007, Malaysia was rocked by two anti-government rallies. The 2007 Bersih Rally which was attended by 40,000 people was held in Kuala Lumpur, Malaysia, on November 10 to campaign for reform. It was precipitated by allegations of corruption and discrepancies in the Malaysian election system that heavily favor the ruling political party, Barisan Nasional, which has been in power since Malaysia achieved its independence in 1957.() Another rally was held on 25 November in the Malaysian capital led by HINDRAF. The rally organiser, the Hindu Rights Action Force, had called the protest over alleged discriminatory policies favouring ethnic Malays. The crowd was estimated to be between 5,000 and 30,000.(30,000 Hindraf protesters rally in KL streets, Malaysiakini, 25 November 2007.) In both cases the government and police tried to prevent the gatherings from taking place. In 16 October 2008, HINDRAF was banned when the government labelled the organisation as a threat to national security.()See alsoReferences**Goh, Cheng Teik (1994). Malaysia: Beyond Communal Politics. Pelanduk Publications. ISBN 967-978-475-4.*Musa, M. Bakri (1999). The Malay Dilemma Revisited. Merantau Publishers. ISBN 1-58348-367-5.*Ye, Lin-Sheng (2003). The Chinese Dilemma. East West Publishing. ISBN 0-9751646-1-9.External links* Economic History of MalaysiaNotesMalaysiasde Malasiade la MalaisieMalaysia Malaysiavan Maleisida Malsias Malaysiazh:
14380
Helium-3
Helium-3 (He-3, sometimes called tralphium(from tri alpha named by Gamow )) is a light, non-radioactive isotope of helium with two protons and one neutron. It is rare on Earth, and is sought for use in fusion research. The abundance of helium-3 is thought to be greater on the Moon (embedded in the upper layer of regolith by the wind over billions of years) and the systems giants (left over from the original nebula), though still low in quantity (28 ppm of lunar regolith is helium-4 and from 1 ppb to 50 ppb is helium-3).(})()The helion, the nucleus of a helium-3 atom, consists of two protons but only one neutron, in contrast to two neutrons in ordinary helium. Its existence was first proposed in 1934 by the Australian nuclear physicist Oliphant while based at Cambridge Universitys Laboratory, in an experiment in which fast deuterons were reacted with other deuteron targets (the first demonstration of nuclear fusion).() Helium-3 was postulated to be a radioactive isotope until helions from it were identified in a sample of natural helium (which is mostly helium-4) from both the atmosphere and gas well sources, by Luis W. Alvarez and Cornog in a cyclotron experiment at the Berkeley National Laboratory, in 1939.() Although helium-3 was found to be about 10000 times more rare with respect to helium-4 in helium from wells, its significant presence in underground gas deposits implied that it either did not decay, or else had an extremely long half-life compatible with a isotope. Helium-3 occurs as primordial nuclide, escaping from the Earths crust into the atmosphere and into space, over time. It is also a natural nucleogenic and nuclide, produced when lithium is bombarded by natural neutrons generated by spontaneous fission, and by cosmic rays. Some helium-3 in the atmosphere is also a relic of open air weapon testing. Tritium, with a roughly 12-year half-life, decays into helium-3, which can be recovered. Irradiation of lithium in a reactoreither a fusion or fission reactorcan also produce tritium, and thus (after decay) helium-3. Helium-3 is proposed as a second-generation fusion fuel for fusion power uses, but such systems are still in very early experimental development phases. Helium-3 is used in neutron detection, and extremely low temperature cryogenics. It has been used as a magnetizable (hyperpolarized) gas to carry out nuclear magnetic imaging studies of the lungs. Physical properties Due to the lower atomic mass of helium-3 (3.0160293 amu), it has significantly different properties from helium-4 (4.0026 amu). Because of the weak induced dipole-dipole interaction between helium atoms, their physical properties are mainly determined by point energy (groundstate kinetic energy), and the properties of helium-3 cause it to have higher zero point energy, which means helium-3 can overcome dipole-dipole interaction with less thermal energy than helium-4. Helium-3 boils at 3.19 kelvin compared to helium-4s 4.23 K, and its critical point is also lower at 3.35 K, compared to helium-4s 5.19 K. It has less than half the density when liquid at its boiling point: 0.059 g/ml compared to helium-4s 0.12473 g/ml at one atmosphere. Its latent heat of vaporization is also considerably lower at 0.026 kJ/mol compared to helium-4s 0.0829 kJ/mol.(Teragons Summary of Cryogen Properties Teragon Research, 2005) Thermodynamic properties of state for 3He are available along the vapor-liquid equilibrium line,(Huang Y.H., Chen G.B., Li X.Y. Arp V.D. Density equation for saturated 3He. Int. J. Thermophys., 2005, 26:1-13.)(Huang Y.H., Chen G.B. A practical vapor pressure equation for helium-3 from 0.01 K to the critical point. Cryogenics, 2006, 46(12): 833-839.) the liquid-solid equilibrium line,(Huang Y.H., Chen G.B. Melting-pressure and density equations of 3He at temperatures from 0.001 to 30 K. Phys. Rev. B, 2005, 72(18):184513.) and the normal compressed liquid and gas phases.(Huang Y.H., Chen G.B., and Arp V.D. Debye equation of state for fluid helium-3, J. Chem. Phys., 2006, 125: 1-10.) Fusion reactions right|300px|thumb|The fusion reaction rate increases rapidly with temperature until it maximizes and then gradually drops off. The DT rate peaks at a lower temperature (about 70 keV, or 800 million kelvins) and at a higher value than other reactions commonly considered for fusion energy.Some fusion processes produce highly energetic neutrons which render reactor components radioactive with products through the continuous bombardment of the reactors components with emitted neutrons.  Because of this bombardment and irradiation, generation must occur indirectly through thermal means, as in a fission reactor. However, the appeal of helium-3 fusion stems from the aneutronic nature of its reaction products. Helium-3 itself is non-radioactive. The lone high-energy by-product, the proton, can be contained using electric and magnetic fields.  The momentum energy of this proton (created in the fusion process) will interact with the containing electromagnetic field, resulting in direct net electricity generation.()Due to the higher barrier, the temperatures required for 21H + 32He fusion are much higher than those of conventional 21H + 31H (deuterium + tritium) fusion. Moreover, since both reactants need to be mixed together to fuse, reactions between nuclei of the same reactant will occur, and the D-D reaction (21H + 21H) does produce a neutron. Reaction rates vary with temperature, but the D-3He reaction rate is never greater than 3.56 times the D-D reaction rate (see graph). Therefore fusion using D-3He fuel may produce a somewhat lower neutron flux than D-T fusion, but is by no means clean, negating some of its main attraction. A second possibility, fusing 32He with itself (32He + 32He), requires even higher temperatures (since now both reactants have a +2 charge), and thus is even more difficult than the D-3He reaction. However, it does offer a possible reaction that produces no neutrons; the protons it produces possess charges and can be contained using electric and magnetic fields, which in turn results in direct electricity generation. 32He + 32He fusion has been demonstrated in the laboratory and is thus theoretically feasible and would have immense advantages, but commercial viability is many years in the future.() The amounts of helium-3 needed as a replacement for conventional fuels are substantial by comparison to amounts currently available. The total amount of energy produced in the 21H + 32He reaction is 18.4 MeV, which corresponds to some 493 megawatt-hours (4.93x108 Wh) per three grams (one mole) of He. Even if that total amount of energy could be converted to electrical power with 100% efficiency (a physical impossibility), it would correspond to about 30 minutes of output of a gigawatt electrical plant; a years production by the same plant would require some 17.5 kilograms of helium-3.The amount of fuel needed for large-scale applications can also be put in terms of total consumption: According to the US Energy Information Administration, Electricity consumption by 107 million U.S. households in 2001 totaled 1,140 billion kWh (1.14x1015 Wh). Again assuming 100% conversion efficiency, 6.7 tons of helium-3 would be required for that segment of the energy demand of the United States, 15 to 20 tons given a more realistic end-to-end conversion efficiency. Neutron detection Helium-3 is a most important isotope in instrumentation for detection. It has a high absorption cross section for thermal neutron beams and is used as a converter gas in neutron detectors. The neutron is converted through the nuclear reaction:n + 3He   3H + 1H + 0.764 MeVinto charged particles tritium (T, 3H) and protium (p, 1H) which then are detected by creating a charge cloud in the stopping gas of a counter or a tube.(A Modular Neutron Detector | Summer 2003| Los Alamos National Laboratory)Furthermore, the absorption process is strongly spin-dependent, which allows a spin-polarized helium-3 volume to transmit neutrons with one spin component while absorbing the other. This effect is employed in neutron polarization analysis, a technique which probes for magnetic properties of matter.(NCNR Neutron Spin Filters)(ILL 3He spin filters)(Polarization Analysis using Polarized 3He)The States of Homeland Security had hoped to deploy detectors to spot smuggled plutonium in shipping containers by their neutron emissions, but the worldwide shortage of helium-3 following the draw down in nuclear weapons production since the War has to some extent prevented this.(Nuclear Bomb Detectors Stopped by Material Shortage) Cryogenics A refrigerator uses helium-3 to achieve temperatures of 0.2 to 0.3 kelvin. A refrigerator uses a mixture of helium-3 and helium-4 to reach cryogenic temperatures as low as a few thousandths of a kelvin.(Dilution Refrigeration)An important property of helium-3, which distinguishes it from the more common helium-4, is that its nucleus is a fermion since it contains an odd number of spin 1/2 particles. Helium-4 nuclei are bosons, containing an even number of spin 1/2 particles. This is a direct result of the addition rules for quantized angular momentum. At low temperatures (about 2.17 K), helium-4 undergoes a transition: A fraction of it enters a superfluid phase that can be roughly understood as a type of condensate. Such a mechanism is not available for helium-3 atoms, which are fermions. However, it was widely speculated that helium-3 could also become a superfluid at much lower temperatures, if the atoms formed into pairs analogous to pairs in the theory of superconductivity. Each Cooper pair, having integer spin, can be thought of as a boson. During the 1970s, David Lee, Osheroff and Coleman Richardson discovered two phase transitions along the melting curve, which were soon realized to be the two superfluid phases of helium-3.()() The transition to a superfluid occurs at 2.491 millikelvins (i.e., 0.002491 K) on the melting curve. They were awarded the 1996 Prize in Physics for their discovery. Tony Leggett won the 2003 Nobel Prize in Physics for his work on refining understanding of the superfluid phase of helium-3.()In zero magnetic field, there are two distinct superfluid phases of 3He, the A-phase and the B-phase. The B-phase is the low-temperature, low-pressure phase which has an isotropic energy gap. The A-phase is the higher temperature, higher pressure phase that is further stabilized by a magnetic field and has two point nodes in its gap. The presence of two phases is a clear indication that 3He is an unconventional superfluid (superconductor), since the presence of two phases requires an additional symmetry, other than gauge symmetry, to be broken. In fact, it is a p-wave superfluid, with spin one, S1, and angular momentum one, L1.  The ground state corresponds to total angular momentum zero, JS+L0 (vector addition).  Excited states are possible with non-zero total angular momentum, J>0, which are excited pair collective modes. Because of the extreme purity of superfluid 3He (since all materials except 4He have solidified andsunk to the bottom of the liquid 3He and any 4He has phase separated entirely, this is the most pure condensed matter state), these collective modes have been studied with much greater precision than in any other unconventional pairing system. Production Current US industrial consumption of Helium-3 is approximately 60,000 liters per year;(The Helium 3 Shortage: Supply, Demand, and Options for Congress) cost at auction has typically been approximately $100/liter although increasing demand has raised prices to as much as $2000/liter in recent years.(Physics Projects Deflate for Lack of Helium-3) Helium-3 is naturally present in small quantities due to radioactive decay, but virtually all helium-3 used in industry is manufactured. Helium-3 is a product of tritium decay, and tritium can be produced through neutron bombardment of deuterium, lithium, boron, or nitrogen targets. Production of tritium in significant quantities requires the high neutron flux of a nuclear reactor; breeding tritium with lithium-6 consumes the neutron, while breeding with lithium-7 produces a low energy neutron as a replacement for the consumed fast neutron. Current supplies of helium-3 come, in part, from the dismantling of nuclear weapons where it accumulates,(http://afci.lanl.gov/aptnews/aptnews.mar1_98.html)(IEER: Science for Democratic Action Vol. 5 No. 1) however the need for warhead disassembly is diminishing. Consequently tritium itself is in short supply, and the US Department of Energy recently began producing it by the lithium irradiation method at the Tennessee Valley Authoritys Watts Bar reactor.( Substantial quantities of tritium could also be extracted from the heavy water coolant in CANDU nuclear reactors.Production of helium-3 from tritium at a rate sufficient to meet world demand will require significant investment, as tritium must be produced at the same rate as helium-3, and approximately eighteen times as much tritium must be maintained in storage as the amount of helium-3 produced annually by decay (production rate dN/dt from number of moles or other unit mass of tritium N, is N   N ln 2/t where the value of t/(ln 2) is about 18 years; see decay). If commercial fusion reactors were to use helium-3 as a fuel, they would require tens of tons of helium-3 each year to produce a fraction of the worlds power, requiring substantial expansion of facilities for tritium production and storage.(Wittenberg 1994) Abundance  Solar nebula (primordial) abundance One early estimate of the primordial ratio of 3He to 4He in the solar nebula has been the measurement of their ratio in the atmosphere of Jupiter, measured by mass spectrometer of the Galileo atmospheric entry probe. This ratio is about 1:10,000,(http://adsabs.harvard.edu/abs/1996Sci...272..846N) or 100 parts of 3He per million parts of 4He. This is roughly the same ratio of the isotopes in lunar regolith, when it contains 28 ppm helium-4 and 2.8 ppb helium-3 (which is at the lower end of actual sample measurements, which vary from about 1.4 to 15 ppb). However, terrestrial ratios of the isotopes are lower by a factor of 100, mainly due to enrichment of helium-4 stocks in the mantle by billions of years of decay from uranium and thorium. Terrestrial abundance 3He is a primordial substance in the Earths mantle, considered to have become entrapped within the Earth during planetary formation. The ratio of 3He to 4He within the Earths crust and mantle is less than that for assumptions of solar disk composition as obtained from meteorite and lunar samples, with terrestrial materials generally containing lower 3He/4He ratios due to ingrowth of 4He from radioactive decay.3He is present within the mantle, in the ratio of 200-300 parts of 3He to a million parts of 4He. Ratios of 3He/4He in excess of atmospheric are indicative of a contribution of 3He from the mantle. Crustal sources are dominated by the 4He which is produced by the decay of radioactive elements in the crust and mantle.The ratio of Helium-3 to Helium-4 in natural Earth-bound sources varies greatly.(Aldrich, L.T.; Nier, Alfred O. Phys. Rev. 74, 1590 - 1594 (1948). The Occurrence of He3 in Natural Sources of Helium. Page 1592, Tables I and II.)(Holden, Normen E. 1993. Helium Isotopic Abundance Variation in Nature. copy of paper BNL-49331 Table II. 3He Abundance of Natural Gas ... 3He in ppm ... Aldrich 0.05 - 0.5 ... Sano 0.46 - 22.7, Table V. ... of Water ... 3He in ppm ... 1.6 - 1.8 East Pacific ... 0.006 - 1.5 Manitoba Chalk River ... 164 Japan Sea (Aldrich measured Helium from US wells, Sano that of Taiwan gas http://www.nature.com/nature/journal/v323/n6083/abs/323055a0.html)) Samples of the ore Spodumene from Edison Mine, South Dakota were found to contain 12 parts of He-3 to a million parts of Helium-4. Samples from other mines showed 2 parts per million.(Helium is also present as up to 7% of some natural gas sources,(WebElements Periodic Table: Professional Edition: Helium: key information) and large sources have over 0.5 percent (above 0.2 percent makes it viable to extract).(Smith, D.M. any concentration of helium above approximately 0.2 percent is considered worthwhile examining ... U.S. government still owns approximately 1 billion nm3 of helium inventory, Middle East and North Africa ... many very large, helium-rich (up to 0.5 percent) natural gas fields (Smith uses nm3 to mean normal metre, elsewhere called cubic metre at STP)) Algerias annual gas production is assumed to contain 100 million normal cubic metres( and this would contain between 5 and 50 m3 of Helium-3 (about 1 to 10 kilograms) using the normal abundance range of 0.5 to 5 ppm. Similarly the US 2002 stockpile of 1 billion normal m3( would have contained about 10 to 100 kilograms of He-3.3He is also present in the atmosphere. The natural abundance of 3He in naturally occurring helium gas is 1.38 (1.38 parts per million). The partial pressure of helium in the Earths atmosphere is about 0.52 Pa, and thus helium accounts for 5.2 parts per million of the total pressure (101325 Pa) in the Earths atmosphere, and 3He thus accounts for 7.2 parts per trillion of the atmosphere. Since the atmosphere of the Earth has a mass of about 5.14 metric tons,(The Mass of the Atmosphere: A Constraint on Global Analyses) the mass of 3He in the Earths atmosphere is the product of these numbers, or about 37,000 tons of 3He.3He is produced on Earth from three sources: lithium spallation, rays, and beta decay of tritium (3H). The contribution from cosmic rays is negligible within all except the oldest regolith materials, and lithium spallation reactions are a lesser contributor than the production of 4He by particle emissions.The total amount of helium-3 in the mantle may be in the range of 100 thousand to a million tonnes. However, most of the mantle is not directly accessible. Some helium-3 leaks up through deep-sourced hotspot volcanoes such as those of the Hawaiian islands, but only 300 grams per year is emitted to the atmosphere. ridges emit another 3 kilogram per year. Around subduction zones, various sources produce helium-3 in gas deposits which possibly contain a thousand tonnes of helium-3 (although there may be 25 thousand tonnes if all ancient subduction zones have such deposits). Wittenberg estimated that United States crustal natural gas sources may have only half a tonne total.(Wittenberg 1994 Page 3, Table 1. Page 9.) Wittenberg cited Andersons estimate of another 1200 metric tonnes in dust particles on the ocean floors.(Wittenberg 1994 Page A-1 citing Anderson 1993, 1200 metric tone) In the 1994 study, extracting helium-3 from these sources consumes more energy than fusion would release.(Wittenberg 1994 Page A-4 1 kg (3He), pumping power would be 1.13x10^6MYyr ... fusion power derived ... 19 MWyr) Wittenberg also writes that extraction from US crustal natural gas, consumes ten times the energy available from fusion reactions.(Wittenberg 1994 Page A-4 using Table 1 page A-5 of US crustal natural gas) Medical lung imaging The nuclei of some atoms (such as He-3, but not He-4)  have an intrinsic spin. In a magnetized (or polarized) gas, these spins can be lined up in the same direction, by various means. After this, like gyroscopes, the nuclei continue to spin with their axes pointed toward one direction in space, regardless of the direction of changing motions of the gas atoms that contain them. Polarized (also referred to as hyperpolarized) helium-3 gas may be produced directly, using lasers of the appropriate frequency. With the use of a thin layer of protective caesium metal on the inside of gas cylinders, the magnetized gas may then be stored at pressures of 10 atm, for up to 100 hours. When inhaled, mixtures containing the gas can be imaged with an MRI-like scanner which produces breath-by-breath images of lung ventilation, in real-time. Applications of this experimental technique are just beginning to be explored.(Take a deep breath of nuclear spin - CERN Courier) Extraterrestrial supplies Materials on the Moons surface contain helium-3 at concentrations on the order of between 1.4 and 15 ppb in sunlit areas,(FTI Research Projects :: 3He Lunar Mining)() and may contain concentrations as much as 50 ppb in permanently shadowed regions.(  A number of people, starting with Kulcinski in 1986,() have proposed to explore the moon, mine lunar regolith and use the helium-3 for fusion. Because of the low concentrations ofhelium-3, any mining equipment would need to process extremely large amounts of regolith (over 100,000 million tons of regolith to obtain one ton of helium 3),( Wisconsin Center for Space Automation and Robotics Technical Report WCSAR-TR-AR3-9311-2.) and some proposals have suggested that helium-3 extraction be piggybacked onto a larger mining and development operation.The primary objective of Space Research Organizations first lunar probe called Chandrayaan-I, launched on October 22, 2008, was reported in some sources to be mapping the Moons surface for helium-3-containing minerals.()  However, this is debatable; no such objective is mentioned in the projects official list of goals, while at the same time, many of its scientific payloads have noted helium-3-related applications.(http://www.isro.org/chandrayaan/htmls/objective_scientific.htm)(http://luna-ci.blogspot.com/2008/11/chandrayaan-1-payload-feature-2-sub-kev.html)Cosmochemist and geochemist Ziyuan from the Academy of Sciences  who is now in charge of the Chinese Lunar Exploration Program has already stated on many occasions that one of the main goals of the program would be the mining of helium-3, from which operation each year three space shuttle missions could bring enough fuel for all human beings across the world.(He asked for the moon-and got it) which is an extreme overstatement however, as one payload to GTO of current spacecraft designs is less than 4 tonnes. To bring enough fuel for all human beings across the world,( more than one Space Shuttle load (and the processing of 4 million tons of regolith) per week would be necessary.In January 2006, the Russian space company Energiya announced that it considers lunar helium-3 a potential economic resource to be mined by 2020,(SPACE.com - Russian Rocket Builder Aims for Moon Base by 2015, Reports Say) if funding can be found.()()Mining giants for helium-3 has also been proposed.( NASA Technical Memorandum 2006-214122.  AIAA20054319. Prepared for the 41st Joint Propulsion Conference and Exhibit cosponsored by AIAA, ASME, SAE, and ASEE, Tucson, Arizona, July 1013, 2005.) The Interplanetary Societys hypothetical Daedalus interstellar probe design was fueled by helium-3 mines in the atmosphere of Jupiter, for example. Jupiters high gravity makes this a less energetically favorable operation than extracting helium-3 from the other gas giants of the solar system, however. Power generation A second-generation approach to controlled fusion power involves combining helium-3 (32He) and deuterium (21H). This reaction produces a helium-4 ion (42He) (like an particle, but of different origin) and a high-energy proton (positively charged hydrogen ion) (11p). The most important potential advantage of this fusion reaction for power production as well as other applications lies in its compatibility with the use of electrostatic fields to control fuel ions and the fusion protons. Protons, as positively charged particles, can be converted directly into electricity, through use of solid-state conversion materials as well as other techniques. Potential conversion efficiencies of 70 percent may be possible, as there is no need to convert proton energy to heat in order to drive a turbine-powered electrical generator.There have been many claims about the capabilities of Helium-3 power plants. According to proponents, fusion power plants operating on deuterium and helium-3 would offer lower capital and costs than their competitors due to less technical complexity, higher conversion efficiency, smaller size, the absence of radioactive fuel, no air or water pollution, and only low-level radioactive waste disposal requirements. Recent estimates suggest that about $6 billion in investment capital will be required to develop and construct the first helium-3 fusion plant. Financial breakeven at todays wholesale electricity prices (5 US cents per kilowatt-hour) would occur after five 1-gigawatt plants were on line, replacing old conventional plants or meeting new demand.()The reality is not so clear-cut. The most advanced fusion programs in the world are confinement fusion (such as Ignition Facility) and confinement fusion (such as ITER and other tokamaks). In the case of the former, there is no solid roadmap to power generation. In the case of the latter, commercial power generation is not expected until around 2050.() In both cases, the type of fusion discussed is the simplest: D-T fusion. The reason for this is the very low barrier for this reaction; for D+He-3, the barrier is much higher, and He-3He-3 higher still. The immense cost of reactors like ITER and Ignition Facility are largely due to their immense size, yet to scale up to higher plasma temperatures would require reactors far larger still. The 14.7 MeV proton and 3.6 MeV alpha particle from DHe-3 fusion, plusthe higher conversion efficiency, means that more electricity is obtained per kilogram than with D-T fusion (17.6 MeV), but not that much more. As a further downside, the rates of reaction for He-3 fusion reactions are not particularly high, requiring a reactor that is larger still or more reactors to produce the same amount of electricity.To attempt to work around this problem of massively large power plants that may not even be economical with D-T fusion, let alone the far more challenging DHe-3 fusion, a number of other reactors have been proposed  the Fusor, Polywell, fusion, and many more, though many of these concepts have fundamental problems with achieving a net energy gain,  and generally attempt to achieve fusion in thermal disequilibrium, something that could potentially prove impossible,() and consequently, these long-shot programs tend to have trouble garnering funding despite their low budgets.  Unlike the big, hot fusion systems, however, if such systems were to work, they could scale to the higher barrier aneutronic fuels.  However, these systems would scale well enough that their proponents tend to promote p-B fusion, which requires no exotic fuels like He-3. In popular culture * Helium-3 was harvested in the 2009 science fiction movie Moon, by the storys protagonist Sam Bell, the occupant of a mining station on the far side of the Moon.(Scott, A. O. Moon, New York Times, June 12, 2009.)(SciFi Movie Review: Moon,SciTechStory.com website, October 23, 2010.)(Ebert, Roger. Reviews: Moon, Sun-Times, June 17, 2009)* The isotope is mined from asteroids to be used as fuel for the entire economy in the space combat game Allegiance.* Helium-3 is described as a common commercial starship fuel in the science fiction role-playing games Effect (2007) and Effect 2 (2010), where it is harvested from gas giants.* In the Japanese hard science fiction manga Planetes, 70% of the worlds energy demands are provided by electricity produced by nuclear fusion, with the main fuel source being helium-3.* The isotope was harvested from gas giants by Edenists for use as starship fuel by Adamists in Nights Dawn Trilogy (1996, 1997, and 1999), by British science fiction author Peter F. Hamilton.(Hamilton, P. The Reality Dysfunction: The Nights Dawn Trilogy Book One, First Subterranean Press, 2009, ASIN: B003RPVZMW.)* Mark Ansons science fiction thriller Below Mercury(Anson, Mark. Below Mercury. Glenn Field Publishing, 2011. ISBN 978-0-9568898-0-5) is set in the abandoned workings of Erebus Mine, an ice mining and helium-3 extraction facility in the depths of Chao Meng-fu crater, on the South Pole of Mercury. Notes and references  Bibliography * * *  External links * The Nobel Prize in Physics 2003, presentation speech* Moon for Sale: A BBC Horizon documentary on the possibility of lunar mining of Helium-3ca:Heli-3es:Helio-33ko:-3it:Elio-3lv:Hlijs-3ja:3no:Helium-33ru:-3fi:Helium-3sv:Helium-3tr:Helyum-3zh:-3
14668
Economy_of_Iraq
spelling        Iraqs economy is dominated by the petroleum sector, which has traditionally provided about 95% of foreign exchange earnings.(http://www.globalsecurity.org/military/library/report/crs/crs_iraq_economy.pdf) In the 1980s, financial problems caused by massive expenditures in the eight-year war with Iran and damage to oil export facilities by Iran led the government to implement austerity measures, borrow heavily, and later reschedule foreign debt payments; Iraq suffered economic losses of at least $80 billion from the war.(Christopher Parker and Pete W. Moore from merip.org) After the end of hostilities, in 1988, oil exports gradually increased with the construction of new pipelines and restoration of damaged facilities.(Current GDP per capita from the Resources Institute) Since mid-2009, oil export earnings have returned to levels seen before Iraqi Freedom and government revenues have rebounded, along with global oil prices. In 2011 Baghdad probably will increase oil exports above the current level of  per day as a result of new contracts with international oil companies, but is likely to fall short of the  per day it is forecasting in its budget. Iraqs recent contracts with major oil companies have the potential to greatly expand oil revenues, but Iraq will need to upgrade its oil processing, pipeline, and export infrastructure to enable these deals to reach their potential.An improved security environment and an initial wave of foreign investment are helping to spur economic activity, particularly in the energy, construction, and retail sectors. Broader economic improvement, long-term fiscal health, and sustained increases in the standard of living still depend on the government passing major policy reforms and on continued development of Iraqs massive oil reserves. Although foreign investors viewed Iraq with increasing interest in 2010, most are still hampered by difficulties in acquiring land for projects and by other regulatory impediments.Inflation has decreased consistently since 2006 as the security situation has improved. However, Iraqi leaders remain hard pressed to translate macroeconomic gains into improved lives for ordinary Iraqis. Unemployment remains a problem throughout the country. Reducing corruption and implementing reforms - such as bank restructuring and developing the private sector - would be important steps in this direction.GDP of Iraq grew 56% in the 60s reaching a peak growth of 57% in the 70s.  However, whilst the mid 1980s GDP per capita shrank by 23% amid the War, GDP has now almost doubled since 2005.Economic sanctions of the 1990sIraqs seizure of Kuwait in August 1990, subsequent international economic sanctions, and damage from military action by an international coalition beginning in January 1991, drastically reduced economic activity. The governments policies of supporting large military and internal security forces and of allocating resources to key supporters of the regime have exacerbated shortages. The implementation of the UNs for Food program in December 1996 has helped improve economic conditions. For the first six six-month phases of the program, Iraq was allowed to export limited amounts of oil in exchange for food, medicine, and other humanitarian goods. In December 1999, the UN Security Council authorized Iraq to export as much oil as required to meet humanitarian needs. Oil exports are now about three-quarters their prewar level. Per capita food imports have increased significantly, while medical supplies and health care services are steadily improving. Per capita output and living standards are still well below the prewar level, but any estimates have a wide range of error.Iraqs economy is characterized by a heavy dependence on oil exports and an emphasis on development through central planning. Prior to the outbreak of the war with Iran in September 1980, Iraqs economic prospects were bright. Oil production had reached a level of 560,000 m (3.5 million barrels) per day, and oil revenues were 21 billion in 1979 and 27 G$ in 1980. At the outbreak of the war, Iraq had amassed an estimated 35 billion in exchange reserves.The War depleted Iraqs foreign exchange reserves, devastated its economy, and left the country saddled with a foreign debt of more than $40 billion. After hostilities ceased, oil exports gradually increased with the construction of new pipelines and the restoration of damaged facilities.The economic sanctions were fully lifted in 24 May 2003, shortly after Saddam Hussein was overthrown. This resulted in economic growth of 53% topping the list of the worlds fastest growing economy.SanctionsIraqs seizure of Kuwait in August 1990, subsequent international sanctions, and damage from the ensuing War of 1991 drastically reduced economic activity. Although government policies supporting large military and internal security forces and allocating resources to key supporters of the Baath Party government hurt the economy, implementation of the Nations corruption-plagued oil-for-food program in December 1996 was to have improved conditions for the average Iraqi citizen.In December 1999, the Security Council authorised Iraq to export under the program as much oil as required to meet humanitarian needs. Iraq changed its oil currency from the U.S. dollar to the euro in 2000. Oil exports were more than three-quarters of the pre-war level. However, 28% of Iraqs export revenues under the program were deducted to meet UN Compensation Fund and UN administrative expenses. The drop in GDP in 2001 was largely the result of the global economic slowdown and lower oil prices. Following the invasion of Iraq, the economy to a great extent shut down; attempts are underway to revive it from the damages of war and rampant crime.After the Fall of Saddam HusseinSince the peak of 1980, the nominal GDP of Iraq steadily shrunk to $12.3 billion in 2000. However removal of sanctions, after the overthrow of Saddam, had immediate effect. The nominal GDP had reached $55.4 billion by 2007(Iraqs Economy from World Factbook) due to increase in oil output as well as international prices. In 2006, the real GDP growth was estimated at almost 17 percent.(http://georgewbush-whitehouse.archives.gov/infocus/iraq/iraq_strategy_nov2005.html)Bremer, chief executive of the Provisional Authority, planned to restructure Iraqs state owned economy with market thinking. Order 39 laid out the framework for full privatization in Iraq, except for primary extraction and initial processing of oil, and permitted 100% foreign ownership of Iraqi assets. Paul Bremer also ordered a flat tax rate of 15% and allowed foreign corporations to repatriate all profits earned in Iraq. Opposition from senior Iraqi officials, together with the poor security situation, meant that Bremers privatization plan was not implemented during his tenure, though his orders remain in place. In addition to approximately 200 other state owned businesses, privatization of the oil industry was scheduled to begin sometime in late 2005, though it is opposed by the of Oil Unions in Iraq.File:BaghdadStreet.jpg|thumb|right|240px|Business storefront signs in downtown Baghdad, Iraq in April 2005.Bremers transitional government featured figures close to the W. Bush administration, such as grain-trading industry lobbyist Amstutz, who was put in charge of agricultural policy in Iraq.()One of the key economic challenges was Iraqs immense foreign debt, estimated at $125 billion.  Although some of this debt was derived from normal export contracts that Iraq had failed to pay for, some was a result of military and financial support during Iraqs war with Iran.The Jubilee Iraq campaign(http://www.jubileeiraq.org/odiousdebt.htm) argued that much of these debts were odious (illegitimate). However, as the concept of odious debt is not accepted, trying to deal with the debt on those terms would have embroiled Iraq in legal disputes for years. Iraq decided to deal with its debt more pragmatically and approached the Club of official creditors.In a December 2006 International article, a study by Insight in London was reported to show that Civil war or not, Iraq has an economy, andmother of all surprisesits doing remarkably well. Real estate is booming. Construction, retail and wholesale trade sectors are healthy, too, according to report. The U.S. Chamber of Commerce reports 34,000 registered companies in Iraq, up from 8,000 three years ago. Sales of secondhand cars, televisions and mobile phones have all risen sharply. Estimates vary, but one from Global Insight puts GDP growth at 17 percent last year and projects 13 percent for 2006. The World Bank has it lower: at 4 percent this year. But, given all the attention paid to deteriorating security, the startling fact is that Iraq is growing at all.()Between  and  of Iraqs declared oil production over the past four years could have been siphoned off through corruption or smuggling, according to a US Study from May 12, 2007.()IndustryTraditionally, Iraqs manufacturing activity has been closely connected to the industry. The major industries in that category have been petroleum refining and the manufacture of chemicals and fertilizers. Before 2003, diversification was hindered by limitations on privatization and the effects of the international sanctions of the 1990s. Since 2003, security problems have blocked efforts to establish new enterprises. The construction industry is an exception; in 2000 cement was the only major industrial product not based on hydrocarbons. The construction industry has profited from the need to rebuild after Iraqs several wars. In the 1990s, the industry benefited from government funding of extensive infrastructure and housing projects and elaborate palace complexes.Primary sectorsAgricultureHistorically,  50 to 60 percent of Iraqs arable land has been under cultivation. Because of ethnic politics, valuable farmland in Kurdish territory has not contributed to the national economy, and inconsistent agricultural policies under Saddam Hussein discouraged domestic market production. Despite its abundant land and water resources, Iraq is a net food importer. Under the UN for Food program, Iraq imported large quantities of grains, meat, poultry, and dairy products. The government abolished its farm collectivization program in 1981, allowing a greater role for private enterprise in agriculture.The international Oil-for-Food program (19972003) further reduced farm production by supplying artificially priced foreign foodstuffs. The military action of 2003 did little damage to Iraqi agriculture; because of favorable weather conditions, in that year grain production was 22 percent higher than in 2002. Although growth continued in 2004, experts predicted that Iraq will be an importer of agricultural products for the foreseeable future. Long-term plans call for investment in agricultural machinery and materials and more prolific crop varietiesimprovements that did not reach Iraqs farmers under the Hussein regime. In 2004 the main agricultural crops were wheat, barley, corn, rice, vegetables, dates, and cotton, and the main livestock outputs were cattle and sheep.The Agricultural Cooperative Bank, capitalized at nearly 1 G$ - by 1984, targets its low-interest, low-collateral loans to private farmers for mechanization, poultry projects, and orchard development. Large modern cattle, dairy, and poultry farms are under construction. Obstacles to agricultural development include labour shortages, inadequate management and maintenance, salinization, urban migration, and dislocations resulting from previous land reform and collectivization programs.Importation of foreign workers and increased entry of women into traditionally male labour roles have helped compensate for agricultural and industrial labour shortages exacerbated by the war. A disastrous attempt to drain the southern marshes and introduce irrigated farming to this region merely destroyed a natural food producing area, while concentration of salts and minerals in the soil due to the draining left the land unsuitable for agriculture.()In the Madain Qada region east of Baghdad, hundreds of small farmers united to form the Madain Association for Agricultural Development, an agricultural cooperative that provides its members with irrigation and greenhouses as well as access to credit.()Forestry, fishing, and miningThroughout the twentieth century, human exploitation, shifting agriculture, forest fires, and uncontrolled grazing denuded large areas of Iraqs natural forests, which in 2005 were almost exclusively confined to the northeastern highlands. Most of the trees found in that region are not suitable for lumbering. In 2002 a total of 112,000 cubic meters of wood were harvested, nearly half of which was used as fuel.Despite its many rivers, Iraqs fishing industry has remained relatively small and based largely on marine species in the Persian Gulf. In 2001 the catch was 22,800 tons.Aside from hydrocarbons, Iraqs mining industry has been confined to extraction of relatively small amounts of phosphates (at Akashat), salt, and sulfur (near Mosul). Since a productive period in the 1970s, the mining industry has been hampered by the War (198088), the sanctions of the 1990s, and the economic collapse of 2003.EnergyAs one of the three most oil-rich countries in the world, Iraq has the resources for complete energy independence.  By world standards, production costs for Iraqi oil are relatively low. However, three wars (Iraq-Iran War from 19801988, Gulf War 1991 and the Iraqi Invasion of 2003) in addition to the UN sanctions - which lasted for twelve years from 1991 to 2003, left the industrys infrastructure in poor condition. The lifting of sanctions in 2003 allowed repairs to begin. However, since 2003 oil pipelines and installations have been sabotaged persistently. In 2004 Iraq had eight oil refineries, the largest of which were at Baiji, Basra, and Daura. Sabotage and technical problems at the refineries forced Iraq to import fuels, liquid petroleum gas, and other refined products from nearby countries. In October 2004, for example, Iraq spent US$60 million for imported gasoline. In late 2004 and early 2005, regular sabotage of plants and pipelines reduced export and domestic distribution of oil, particularly to Baghdad. Nationwide fuel shortages and power outages resulted.In 2004 plans called for increased domestic utilization of natural gas to replace oil and for use in the industry. However, because most of Iraqs gas output is associated with oil, output growth depends on developments in the oil industry.As much as 90 percent of Iraqs power generating and distribution systems were destroyed in the Gulf War of 1991, and full recovery never occurred. In mid-2004, Iraq had an estimated 5,000 megawatts of power-generating capacity, compared with 7,500 megawatts of demand.  At that time, the transmission system included 17,700 kilometers of line. In 2004 plans called for construction of two new power plants and restoration of existing plants and transmission lines to ease the blackouts and economic hardship caused by this shortfall, but sabotage and looting held capacity below 6,000 megawatts. In 2004 the World Bank estimated that US$12 billion would be needed for near-term restoration, and the Ministry of Electricity estimated that US$35 billion would be necessary to rebuild the system fully.In 2007, hydrocarbon industries accounted for well over 70 per cent of the Iraqi economy and 95 per cent of the governments revenues. Diversification of the economy into non-hydrocarbon industries remain a long-term issue.2009 Oil services contractsBetween June 2009 and February 2010 the Iraqi Oil Ministry tendered for the award of Service Contracts to develop Iraqs existing oil fields.  The results of the tender, which was broadcast live on Iraqi television, are as follows for all major fields awarded but excluding the Kurdish controlled areas where Production Sharing Contracts have been awarded which are currently being disputed by the Baghdad government.  All contracts are awaiting final ratification of the awards by the Iraqi government. Company shares are subject to change as a result of commercial negotiations between parties.If all contracts awarded reach their stated target plateau production then this will increase Iraqi production from todays 2.5 mb/d by 9.4 mb/d to a total of 11.9 mb/d, comparable to current Saudi declared capacity of 12.5 mb/d.Notes: 1. Field shares are as a % of the total.  The Iraq state retains a 25% share in all fields for which Service Contracts have been awarded. 2. Production Increase Share is the millions bbls per day that will attract the Service Fee for the company. 3. Gross revenue at plateau is the total payment each company will receive upon reaching their declared target plateau production rate (in between 5 and 8 years depending on field), before deduction of any operating costs but in addition to recovery of all development costs as billions of US$ per annum.  The total gross revenue for all companies, after recovery of capital costs, is at plateau production of an additional 9.4 mb/d, 4.34 bn US per annum at a $70 bbl oil price.  The 2010 Iraq govt budget is $60 billion.  $300 billion is approximately $10,000 per annum for each Iraqi citizen.In summary the shares by region in the increased production are:ServicesFinanceIraqs financial services have been the subject of post-Hussein reforms. The 17 private banks established during the 1990s were limited to domestic transactions and attracted few private depositors. Those banks and two main state banks were badly damaged by the international embargo of the 1990s. To further privatize and expand the system, in 2003 the Provisional Authority removed restrictions on international bank transactions and freed the Bank of Iraq (CBI) from government control. In its first year of independent operation, the CBI received credit for limiting Iraqs inflation. In 2004 three foreign banks received licenses to do business in Iraq.Private securityBecause of the danger posed by Iraqs ongoing insurgency, the security industry has been a uniquely prosperous part of the services sector. Often run by former U.S. military personnel, in 2005 at least 26 companies offered personal and institutional protection, surveillance, and other forms of security.RetailIn the early post-Hussein period, a freewheeling retail trade in all types of commodities straddled the line between legitimate and illegitimate commerce, taking advantage of the lack of income tax and import controls.TourismThe Iraq tourism industry, which in peaceful times has profited from Iraqs many places of cultural interest (earning US$14 million in 2001), has been dormant since 2003. Despite conditions, in 2005 the Iraqi Tourism Board maintained a staff of 2,500 and 14 regional offices. Between 2009 and 2010, 165 tourists from 16 different countries entered Iraq to visit historic sites; as of January 2011, a U.S. State Department grant provided $2 million to help preserve Babylon, supporting the re-opening of one of the sites two museums.()TelecommunicationsDuring 2003-8, mobile phone subscriptions had expanded over hundredfold to 10 million nationwide, according to the Institute.(http://abcnews.go.com/International/Story?id4473387&page2)Labor forceIn 2002 Iraqs labor force was estimated at 6.8 million people.In 1996 some 66.4 percent of the labor force worked in services, 17.5 percent in industry, and 16.1 percent in agriculture. 2004 estimates of Iraqs unemployment ranged from 30 percent to 60 percent.The CPA has referred to a 25% unemployment rate, the Iraqi Ministry of Planning mentioned a 30% unemployment rate, whereas the Iraqi Ministry of Social Affairs claims it to be 48%.( Other sources are claiming a 20% unemployment rate and a probably 60% under-employment rate.() The actual figure is problematic because of high participation in black-market activities and poor security conditions in many populous areas. In central Iraq, security concerns discouraged the hiring of new workers and the resumption of regular work schedules. At the same time, the return of Iraqis from other countries increased the number of job seekers. In late 2004, most legitimate jobs were in the government, the army, the oil industry, and security-related enterprises.(http://www.iq.undp.org/ILCS/labour.htm) Under Saddam Hussein Hussein, many of the highest-paid workers were employed by the greatly overstaffed government, whose overthrow disrupted the input of these people to the economy. In 2004 the U.S. Agency for International Development committed US$1 billion for a worker-training program. In early 2004, the minimum wage was US$72 per month.Mean wages were $2.10 per man-hour in 2009.External tradeFrom the 1990s until 2003, the international embargo restricted Iraqs export activity almost exclusively to oil. In 2003 oil accounted for about US$7.4 billion of Iraqs total US$7.6 billion of export value, and statistics for earlier years showed similar proportions. After the end of the trade embargo in 2003 expanded the range of exports, oil continued to occupy the dominant position: in 2004 Iraqs export income doubled (to US$16.5 billion), but oil accounted for all but US$340 million (2 percent) of the total. In late 2004, sabotage significantly reduced oil output, and experts forecast that output, hence exports, would be below capacity in 2005 as well. In 2004 the chief export markets were the United States (which accounted for nearly half), Italy, France, Jordan, Canada, and the Netherlands. In 2004 the value of Iraqs imports was US$21.7 billion, incurring a trade deficit of about US$5.2 billion. In 2003 the main sources of Iraqs imports were Turkey, Jordan, Vietnam, the United States, Germany, and Britain. Because of Iraqs inactive manufacturing sector, the range of imports was quite large, including food, fuels, medicines, and manufactured goods. By 2010, exports rose to US$50.8 billion and imports rose to US$45.2 billion.  Chief 2009 export partners were: U.S., India, Italy, South Korea, Taiwan, China, Netherlands, and Japan. Chief 2009 import partners were: Turkey, Syria, U.S., China, Jordan, Italy, and Germany.(http://www.state.gov/r/pa/ei/bgn/6804.htm)ReferencesExternal links**Iraq Inter-Agency Information & Analysis Unit Reports, Maps and Assessments of Iraq from the UN Inter-Agency Information & Analysis Unitde lIraqde Irakde lIrakde Iraqdi IrakdIraqdo Iraqueekonomi
14914
Industrial_Revolution
File:Maquina vapor Watt ETSIIM.jpg|250px|thumb|A steam engine, the engine fuelled primarily by coal that propelled the Industrial Revolution in Great Britain and the world.(The Industrial Revolution was a period from the 18th to the 19th century where major changes in agriculture, manufacturing, mining, transportation, and technology had a profound effect on the socioeconomic and cultural conditions of the times. It began in the Kingdom, then subsequently spread throughout Europe, North America, and eventually the world.The Industrial Revolution marks a major turning point in human history; almost every aspect of daily life was influenced in some way. Most notably, average income and population began to exhibit unprecedented sustained growth. In the two centuries following 1800, the worlds average per capita income increased over 10-fold, while the worlds population increased over 6-fold.( In the words of Nobel Prize winner Robert E. Lucas, Jr., For the first time in history, the living standards of the masses of ordinary people have begun to undergo sustained growth ... Nothing remotely like this economic behavior has happened before.(Starting in the later part of the 18th century, there began a transition in parts of Great Britains previously manual labour and draft-animalbased economy towards machine-based manufacturing. It started with the mechanisation of the textile industries, the development of iron-making techniques and the increased use of refined coal.( Trade expansion was enabled by the introduction of canals, improved roads and railways.(The introduction of steam power fuelled primarily by coal, wider utilisation of wheels and powered machinery (mainly in manufacturing) underpinned the dramatic increases in production capacity.( The development of all-metal tools in the first two decades of the 19th century facilitated the manufacture of more production machines for manufacturing in other industries. The effects spread throughout Europe and America during the 19th century, eventually affecting most of the world, a process that continues as industrialisation. The impact of this change on society was enormous.(The First Industrial Revolution, which began in the 18th century, merged into the Industrial Revolution around 1850, when technological and economic progress gained momentum with the development of steam-powered ships, railways, and later in the 19th century with the combustion engine and electrical power generation. The period of time covered by the Industrial Revolution varies with different historians. Hobsbawm held that it broke out in Britain in the 1780s and was not fully felt until the 1830s or 1840s,( while S. Ashton held that it occurred roughly between 1760 and 1830.(Some 20th century historians such as Clapham and Crafts have argued that the process of economic and social change took place gradually and the term revolution is a misnomer. This is still a subject of debate among historians.(( GDP per capita was broadly stable before the Industrial Revolution and the emergence of the modern capitalist economy.( The Industrial Revolution began an era of per-capita growth in capitalist economies.( Economic historians are in agreement that the onset of the Industrial Revolution is the most important event in the history of humanity since the domestication of animals and plants.(InnovationsFile:Mule-jenny.jpg|thumb|The only surviving example of a mule built by the inventor CromptonThe commencement of the Industrial Revolution is closely linked to a small number of innovations,( made in the second half of the 18th century:*Textiles  Cotton spinning using Richard Arkwrights frame, James Hargreavess Spinning Jenny, and Samuel Cromptons Spinning Mule (a combination of the Spinning Jenny and the Water Frame). This was patented in 1769 and so came out of patent in 1783. The end of the patent was rapidly followed by the erection of many mills. Similar technology was subsequently applied to spinning worsted yarn for various textiles and flax for linen.*Steam power  The improved engine invented by Watt and patented in 1775 was initially mainly used to power pumps for pumping water out of mines, but from the 1780s was applied to power other types of machines. This enabled rapid development of efficient semi-automated factories on a previously unimaginable scale in places where waterpower was not available.*Iron making  In the Iron industry, coke was finally applied to all stages of iron smelting, replacing charcoal. This had been achieved much earlier for lead and copper as well as for producing iron in a furnace, but the second stage in the production of bar iron depended on the use of and stamping (for which a patent expired in 1786) or puddling (patented by Cort in 1783 and 1784).These represent three leading sectors, in which there were key innovations, which allowed the economic take off by which the Industrial Revolution is usually defined. This is not to belittle many other inventions, particularly in the textile industry. Without some earlier ones, such as the jenny and shuttle in the textile industry and the smelting of pig iron with coke, these achievements might have been impossible. Later inventions such as the loom and Richard Trevithicks high pressure engine were also important in the growing industrialisation of Britain. The application of steam engines to powering mills and ironworks enabled these to be built in places that were most convenient because other resources were available, rather than where there was water to power a watermill.In the textile sector, such mills became the model for the organisation of human labour in factories, epitomised by Cottonopolis, the name given to the vast collection of mills, factories and administration offices based in Manchester. The assembly line system greatly improved efficiency, both in this and other industries. With a series of men trained to do a single task on a product, then having it moved along to the next worker, the number of finished goods also rose significantly.Also important was the 1756 rediscovery of concrete (based on hydraulic lime mortar) by the British engineer Smeaton, which had been lost for 1300 years.(Transfer of knowledgeFile:Wright of Derby, The Orrery.jpg|thumb|left|Philosopher Lecturing on the Orrery (ca. 1766)Informal philosophical societies spread scientific advancesKnowledge of innovation was spread by several means. Workers who were trained in the technique might move to another employer or might be poached. A common method was for someone to make a study tour, gathering information where he could. During the whole of the Industrial Revolution and for the century before, all European countries and America engaged in study-touring; some nations, like Sweden and France, even trained civil servants or technicians to undertake it as a matter of state policy. In other countries, notably Britain and America, this practice was carried out by individual manufacturers anxious to improve their own methods. Study tours were common then, as now, as was the keeping of travel diaries. Records made by industrialists and technicians of the period are an incomparable source of information about their methods.Another means for the spread of innovation was by the network of informal philosophical societies, like the Lunar Society of Birmingham, in which members met to discuss natural philosophy (i.e. science) and often its application to manufacturing. The Lunar Society flourished from 1765 to 1809, and it has been said of them, They were, if you like, the revolutionary committee of that most far reaching of all the eighteenth century revolutions, the Industrial Revolution.( Other such societies published volumes of proceedings and transactions. For example, the London-based Royal Society of Arts published an illustrated volume of new inventions, as well as papers about them in its annual Transactions.There were publications describing technology. Encyclopaedias such as Harriss Technicum (1704) and Reess Cyclopaedia (18021819) contain much of value. Cyclopaedia contains an enormous amount of information about the science and technology of the first half of the Industrial Revolution, very well illustrated by fine engravings. Foreign printed sources such as the des Arts et Mtiers and Diderots Encyclopdie explained foreign methods with fine engraved plates.Periodical publications about manufacturing and technology began to appear in the last decade of the 18th century, and many regularly included notice of the latest patents. Foreign periodicals, such as the des Mines, published accounts of travels made by French engineers who observed British methods on study tours.Technological developments in BritainTextile manufactureFile:Spinning jenny.jpg|thumb|right|Model of the jenny in a museum in Wuppertal, Germany. The spinning jenny was one of the innovations that started the revolutionIn the early 18th century, British textile manufacture was based on wool which was processed by individual artisans, doing the spinning and weaving on their own premises. This system is called a industry. Flax and cotton were also used for fine materials, but the processing was difficult because of the pre-processing needed, and thus goods in these materials made only a small proportion of the output.Use of the wheel and hand loom restricted the production capacity of the industry, but incremental advances increased productivity to the extent that manufactured cotton goods became the dominant British export by the early decades of the 19th century. India was displaced as the premier supplier of cotton goods.Paul patented the Roller Spinning machine and the flyer-and-bobbin system for drawing wool to a more even thickness, developed with the help of John Wyatt in Birmingham. Paul and Wyatt opened a mill in Birmingham which used their new rolling machine powered by a donkey. In 1743, a factory was opened in Northampton with fifty spindles on each of five of Paul and Wyatts machines. This operated until about 1764. A similar mill was built by Bourn in Leominster, but this burnt down. Both Lewis Paul and Daniel Bourn patented carding machines in 1748. Using two sets of rollers that travelled at different speeds, it was later used in the first cotton spinning mill. Lewiss invention was later developed and improved by Arkwright in his frame and Crompton in his mule.Other inventors increased the efficiency of the individual steps of spinning (carding, twisting and spinning, and rolling) so that the supply of yarn increased greatly, which fed a weaving industry that was advancing with improvements to shuttles and the loom or frame. The output of an individual labourer increased dramatically, with the effect that the new machines were seen as a threat to employment, and early innovators were attacked and their inventions destroyed.To capitalise upon these advances, it took a class of entrepreneurs, of which the most famous is Arkwright. He is credited with a list of inventions, but these were actually developed by people such as Highs and John Kay; Arkwright nurtured the inventors, patented the ideas, financed the initiatives, and protected the machines. He created the mill which brought the production processes together in a factory, and he developed the use of powerfirst horse power and then water powerwhich made cotton manufacture a mechanised industry. Before long steam power was applied to drive textile machinery.MetallurgyFile:Philipp Jakob Loutherbourg d. J. 002.jpg|left|thumb|by Night, 1801, Philipp Jakob Loutherbourg the YoungerBlast furnaces light the iron making town of CoalbrookdaleFile:Reverberatory furnace diagram.png|thumb|right|The Reverberatory Furnace could produce iron using mined coal. The burning coal remained separate from the iron ore and so did not contaminate the iron with impurities like sulphur. This opened the way to increased iron production.The major change in the metal industries during the era of the Industrial Revolution was the replacement of organic fuels based on wood with fuel based on coal. Much of this happened somewhat before the Industrial Revolution, based on innovations by Sir Clement Clerke and others from 1678, using coal furnaces known as cupolas. These were operated by the flames, which contained monoxide, playing on the ore and reducing the oxide to metal. This has the advantage that impurities (such as sulphur) in the coal do not migrate into the metal. This technology was applied to lead from 1678 and to copper from 1687. It was also applied to iron foundry work in the 1690s, but in this case the reverberatory furnace was known as an air furnace. The foundry cupola is a different (and later) innovation.This was followed by Abraham Darby, who made great strides using coke to fuel his furnaces at Coalbrookdale in 1709. However, the coke iron he made was used mostly for the production of cast iron goods such as pots and kettles. He had the advantage over his rivals in that his pots, cast by his patented process, were thinner and cheaper than theirs. Coke pig iron was hardly used to produce bar iron in forges until the mid 1750s, when his son Darby II built Horsehay and Ketley furnaces (not far from Coalbrookdale). By then, coke pig iron was cheaper than charcoal pig iron.Bar iron for smiths to forge into consumer goods was still made in forges, as it long had been. However, new processes were adopted in the ensuing years. The first is referred to today as and stamping, but this was superseded by Henry Corts puddling process. From 1785, perhaps because the improved version of potting and stamping was about to come out of patent, a great expansion in the output of the British iron industry began. The new processes did not depend on the use of charcoal at all and were therefore not limited by charcoal sources.Up to that time, British iron manufacturers had used considerable amounts of imported iron to supplement native supplies. This came principally from Sweden from the mid-17th century and later also from Russia from the end of the 1720s. However, from 1785, imports decreased because of the new iron making technology, and Britain became an exporter of bar iron as well as manufactured iron consumer goods.Since iron was becoming cheaper and more plentiful, it also became a major structural material following the building of the innovative Iron Bridge in 1778 by Darby III.File:Ironbridge 6.jpg|thumb|Iron Bridge, Shropshire, EnglandAn improvement was made in the production of steel, which was an expensive commodity and used only where iron would not do, such as for the cutting edge of tools and for springs. Huntsman developed his steel technique in the 1740s. The raw material for this was blister steel, made by the process.The supply of cheaper iron and steel aided the development of boilers and steam engines, and eventually railways. Improvements in tools allowed better working of iron and steel and further boosted the industrial growth of Britain.MiningFile:Horse Railway in Coal Mine.jpg|left|thumb|Men working their own mines. Early 1900s, USACoal mining in Britain, particularly in South Wales started early. Before the steam engine, pits were often shallow pits following a seam of coal along the surface, which were abandoned as the coal was extracted. In other cases, if the geology was favourable, the coal was mined by means of an adit or drift mine driven into the side of a hill. mining was done in some areas, but the limiting factor was the problem of removing water. It could be done by hauling buckets of water up the shaft or to a sough (a tunnel driven into a hill to drain a mine). In either case, the water had to be discharged into a stream or ditch at a level where it could flow away by gravity. The introduction of the steam engine greatly facilitated the removal of water and enabled shafts to be made deeper, enabling more coal to be extracted. These were developments that had begun before the Industrial Revolution, but the adoption of James Watts more efficient steam engine from the 1770s reduced the fuel costs of engines, making mines more profitable. Coal mining was very dangerous owing to the presence of firedamp in many coal seams. Some degree of safety was provided by the lamp which was invented in 1816 by Sir Davy and independently by Stephenson. However, the lamps proved a false dawn because they became unsafe very quickly and provided a weak light. Firedamp explosions continued, often setting off dust explosions, so casualties grew during the entire 19th century. Conditions of work were very poor, with a high casualty rate from rock falls.Steam powerFile:Savery-engine.jpg|upright|thumb|left|The 1698 Savery Engine  the worlds first commercially useful engine: built by SaveryThe development of the steam engine was an essential early element of the Industrial Revolution; however, for most of the period of the Industrial Revolution, the majority of industries still relied on wind and water power as well as horse- and man-power for driving small machines.The first real attempt at industrial use of steam power was due to Savery in 1698. He constructed and patented in London a low-lift combined vacuum and pressure water pump, that generated about one horsepower (hp) and was used in numerous water works and tried in a few mines (hence its brand name, The Miners Friend), but it was not a success since it was limited in pumping height and prone to boiler explosions.Dampfmaschine aus Meyers 1890.png|thumb|upright|Newcomens steam powered atmospheric engine was the first practical engine. Subsequent steam engines were to power the Industrial RevolutionThe first safe and successful steam power plant was introduced by Newcomen before 1712. Newcomen apparently conceived the steam engine quite independently of Savery, but as the latter had taken out a very wide-ranging patent, Newcomen and his associates were obliged to come to an arrangement with him, marketing the engine until 1733 under a joint patent.(( Newcomens engine appears to have been based on Papins experiments carried out 30 years earlier, and employed a piston and cylinder, one end of which was open to the atmosphere above the piston. Steam just above atmospheric pressure (all that the boiler could stand) was introduced into the lower half of the cylinder beneath the piston during the gravity-induced upstroke; the steam was then condensed by a jet of cold water injected into the steam space to produce a partial vacuum; the pressure differential between the atmosphere and the vacuum on either side of the piston displaced it downwards into the cylinder, raising the opposite end of a rocking beam to which was attached a gang of gravity-actuated reciprocating force pumps housed in the mineshaft. The engines downward power stroke raised the pump, priming it and preparing the pumping stroke. At first the phases were controlled by hand, but within ten years an escapement mechanism had been devised worked by a vertical plug tree suspended from the rocking beam which rendered the engine self-acting.A number of Newcomen engines were successfully put to use in Britain for draining hitherto unworkable deep mines, with the engine on the surface; these were large machines, requiring a lot of capital to build, and produced about . They were extremely inefficient by modern standards, but when located where coal was cheap at pit heads, opened up a great expansion in coal mining by allowing mines to go deeper. Despite their disadvantages, Newcomen engines were reliable and easy to maintain and continued to be used in the coalfields until the early decades of the 19th century. By 1729, when Newcomen died, his engines had spread (first) to Hungary in 1722, Germany, Austria, and Sweden. A total of 110 are known to have been built by 1733 when the joint patent expired, of which 14 were abroad. In the 1770s, the engineer Smeaton built some very large examples and introduced a number of improvements. A total of 1,454 engines had been built by 1800.(File:Watt James von Breda.jpg|thumb|upright|WattA fundamental change in working principles was brought about by Watt. In close collaboration with Boulton, he had succeeded by 1778 in perfecting his steam engine, which incorporated a series of radical improvements, notably the closing off of the upper part of the cylinder thereby making the low pressure steam drive the top of the piston instead of the atmosphere, use of a steam jacket and the celebrated separate steam condenser chamber. All this meant that a more constant temperature could be maintained in the cylinder and that engine efficiency no longer varied according to atmospheric conditions. These improvements increased engine efficiency by a factor of about five, saving 75% on coal costs.Nor could the atmospheric engine be easily adapted to drive a rotating wheel, although Wasborough and Pickard did succeed in doing so towards 1780. However by 1783 the more economical Watt steam engine had been fully developed into a double-acting rotative type, which meant that it could be used to directly drive the rotary machinery of a factory or mill. Both of Watts basic engine types were commercially very successful, and by 1800, the firm Boulton & Watt had constructed 496 engines, with 164 driving reciprocating pumps, 24 serving furnaces, and 308 powering mill machinery; most of the engines generated from 5 to .The development of tools, such as the lathe, planing and shaping machines powered by these engines, enabled all the metal parts of the engines to be easily and accurately cut and in turn made it possible to build larger and more powerful engines.Until about 1800, the most common pattern of steam engine was the engine, built as an integral part of a stone or brick engine-house, but soon various patterns of self-contained portative engines (readily removable, but not on wheels) were developed, such as the engine. Towards the turn of the 19th century, the Cornish engineer Trevithick, and the American, Evans began to construct higher pressure non-condensing steam engines, exhausting against the atmosphere. This allowed an engine and boiler to be combined into a single unit compact enough to be used on mobile road and rail locomotives and steam boats.In the early 19th century after the expiration of Watts patent, the steam engine underwent many improvements by a host of inventors and engineers.ChemicalsFile:Thamestunnel.jpg|right|thumb|The Tunnel (opened 1843).Cement was used in the worlds first underwater tunnelThe large scale production of chemicals was an important development during the Industrial Revolution. The first of these was the production of sulphuric acid by the chamber process invented by the Englishman Roebuck (Watts first partner) in 1746. He was able to greatly increase the scale of the manufacture by replacing the relatively expensive glass vessels formerly used with larger, less expensive chambers made of riveted sheets of lead. Instead of making a small amount each time, he was able to make around  in each of the chambers, at least a tenfold increase.The production of an alkali on a large scale became an important goal as well, and Leblanc succeeded in 1791 in introducing a method for the production of carbonate. The process was a reaction of sulphuric acid with sodium chloride to give sodium sulphate and acid. The sodium sulphate was heated with limestone (carbonate) and coal to give a mixture of carbonate and calcium sulphide. Adding water separated the soluble sodium carbonate from the calcium sulphide. The process produced a large amount of pollution (the hydrochloric acid was initially vented to the air, and calcium sulphide was a useless waste product). Nonetheless, this synthetic soda ash proved economical compared to that from burning specific plants (barilla) or from kelp, which were the previously dominant sources of soda ash,(and also to potash (carbonate) derived from hardwood ashes.These two chemicals were very important because they enabled the introduction of a host of other inventions, replacing many small-scale operations with more cost-effective and controllable processes. Sodium carbonate had many uses in the glass, textile, soap, and paper industries. Early uses for sulphuric acid included pickling (removing rust) iron and steel, and for bleaching cloth.The development of bleaching powder (hypochlorite) by Scottish chemist Tennant in about 1800, based on the discoveries of French chemist Louis Berthollet, revolutionised the bleaching processes in the textile industry by dramatically reducing the time required (from months to days) for the traditional process then in use, which required repeated exposure to the sun in bleach fields after soaking the textiles with alkali or sour milk. Tennants factory at St Rollox, North Glasgow, became the largest chemical plant in the world.In 1824 Aspdin, a British bricklayer turned builder, patented a chemical process for making cement which was an important advance in the building trades. This process involves sintering a mixture of clay and limestone to about , then grinding it into a fine powder which is then mixed with water, sand and gravel to produce concrete. Portland cement was used by the famous English engineer Isambard Brunel several years later when constructing the Tunnel.(Cement was used on a large scale in the construction of the sewerage system a generation later.Machine toolsFile:Joseph whitworth.jpg|thumb|left|upright|Sir WhitworthThe Industrial Revolution could not have developed without tools, for they enabled manufacturing machines to be made. They have their origins in the tools developed in the 18th century by makers of clocks and watches and scientific instrument makers to enable them to batch-produce small mechanisms. The mechanical parts of early textile machines were sometimes called clock work because of the metal spindles and gears they incorporated. The manufacture of textile machines drew craftsmen from these trades and is the origin of the modern engineering industry.Machines were built by various craftsmencarpenters made wooden framings, and smiths and turners made metal parts. A good example of how machine tools changed manufacturing took place in Birmingham, England, in 1830. The invention of a new machine by Gillott, Mitchell and Stephen Perry allowed mass manufacture of robust, cheap steel pen nibs; the process had been laborious and expensive. Because of the difficulty of manipulating metal and the lack of machine tools, the use of metal was kept to a minimum. Wood framing had the disadvantage of changing dimensions with temperature and humidity, and the various joints tended to rack (work loose) over time. As the Industrial Revolution progressed, machines with metal frames became more common, but they required machine tools to make them economically. Before the advent of machine tools, metal was worked manually using the basic hand tools of hammers, files, scrapers, saws and chisels. Small metal parts were readily made by this means, but for large machine parts, production was very laborious and costly.File:Lathe.PNG|thumb|right|A lathe from 1911, a machine tool able to shape parts (usually metal)for other machinesApart from workshop lathes used by craftsmen, the first large machine tool was the cylinder boring machine used for boring the large-diameter cylinders on early steam engines. The planing machine, the slotting machine and the shaping machine were developed in the first decades of the 19th century. Although the machine was invented at this time, it was not developed as a serious workshop tool until during the Second Industrial Revolution.Military production, as well, had a hand in the development of machine tools. Maudslay, who trained a school of machine tool makers early in the 19th century, was employed at the Arsenal, Woolwich, as a young man where he would have seen the large horse-driven wooden machines for cannon boring made and worked by the Verbruggans. He later worked for Bramah on the production of metal locks, and soon after he began working on his own. He was engaged to build the machinery for making ships pulley blocks for the Navy in the Block Mills. These were all metal and were the first machines for production and making components with a degree of interchangeability. The lessons Maudslay learned about the need for stability and precision he adapted to the development of machine tools, and in his workshops he trained a generation of men to build on his work, such as Richard Roberts, Clement and Whitworth.James Fox of Derby had a healthy export trade in machine tools for the first third of the century, as did Murray of Leeds. Roberts was a maker of high-quality machine tools and a pioneer of the use of jigs and gauges for precision workshop measurement.Gas lightingAnother major industry of the later Industrial Revolution was lighting. Though others made a similar innovation elsewhere, the large scale introduction of this was the work of Murdoch, an employee of and Watt, the Birmingham steam engine pioneers. The process consisted of the large scale gasification of coal in furnaces, the purification of the gas (removal of sulphur, ammonia, and heavy hydrocarbons), and its storage and distribution. The first gas lighting utilities were established in London between 1812-20. They soon became one of the major consumers of coal in the UK. Gas lighting had an impact on social and industrial organisation because it allowed factories and stores to remain open longer than with tallow candles or oil. Its introduction allowed night life to flourish in cities and towns as interiors and streets could be lighted on a larger scale than before.Glass makingPalace interior.jpg|thumb|The Crystal Palace held the Great Exhibition of 1851A new method of producing glass, known as the cylinder process, was developed in Europe during the early 19th century. In 1832, this process was used by the Brothers to create sheet glass. They became the leading producers of window and plate glass. This advancement allowed for larger panes of glass to be created without interruption, thus freeing up the space planning in interiors as well as the fenestration of buildings. Crystal Palace is the supreme example of the use of sheet glass in a new and innovative structure.Paper machineA machine for making a continuous sheet of paper on a loop of wire fabric was patented in 1798 by Nicholas Louis Robert who worked for Saint-Lger Didot family in France.  The machine is known as a Fourdrinier after the financiers, brothers Sealy and Fourdrinier, who were stationers in London.  Although greatly imoproved and with many variations, the Fourdriner machine is the predominant means of paper production today.Effects on agricultureThe invention of machinery played a big part in driving forward the British Agricultural Revolution. Agricultural improvement began in the centuries before the Industrial revolution got going and it may have played a part in freeing up labour from the land to work in the new industrial mills of the 18th century. As the revolution in industry progressed a succession of machines became available which increased food production with ever fewer labourers.Jethro Tulls drill invented in 1701 was a mechanical seeder which distributed seeds efficiently across a plot of land. Joseph Foljambes Rotherham plough of 1730, was the first commercially successful iron plough.( Andrew Meikles machine of 1784 was the final straw for many farm labourers, and led to the 1830 agricultural rebellion of the Riots.Transport in BritainAt the beginning of the Industrial Revolution, inland transport was by navigable rivers and roads, with coastal vessels employed to move heavy goods by sea. Railways or wagon ways were used for conveying coal to rivers for further shipment, but canals had not yet been constructed. Animals supplied all of the motive power on land, with sails providing the motive power on the sea.The Industrial Revolution improved Britains transport infrastructure with a turnpike road network, a canal and waterway network, and a railway network. Raw materials and finished products could be moved more quickly and cheaply than before. Improved transportation also allowed new ideas to spread quickly.Coastal sailSailing vessels had long been used for moving goods round the British coast. The trade transporting coal to London from Newcastle had begun in medieval times. The transport of goods coastwise by sea within Britain was common during the Industrial Revolution, as for centuries before. This became less important with the growth of the railways at the end of the period.Navigable riversAll the major rivers of the United Kingdom were navigable during the Industrial Revolution. Some were anciently navigable, notably the Severn, Thames, and Trent. Some were improved, or had navigation extended upstream, but usually in the period before the Industrial Revolution, rather than during it.The Severn, in particular, was used for the movement of goods to the Midlands which had been imported into Bristol from abroad, and for the export of goods from centres of production in Shropshire (such as iron goods from Coalbrookdale) and the Country. Transport was by way of trowssmall sailing vessels which could pass the various shallows and bridges in the river. The trows could navigate the Bristol Channel to the South Wales ports and Somerset ports, such as Bridgwater and even as far as France.CanalsFile:WalesC0047.jpg|thumbnail|Aqueduct, Llangollen, WalesCanals began to be built in the late 18th century to link the major manufacturing centres in the Midlands and north with seaports and with London, at that time itself the largest manufacturing centre in the country. Canals were the first technology to allow bulk materials to be easily transported across the country. A single canal horse could pull a load dozens of times larger than a cart at a faster pace. By the 1820s, a national network was in existence. Canal construction served as a model for the organisation and methods later used to construct the railways. They were eventually largely superseded as profitable commercial enterprises by the spread of the railways from the 1840s on.Britains canal network, together with its surviving mill buildings, is one of the most enduring features of the early Industrial Revolution to be seen in Britain.RoadsMuch of the original British road system was poorly maintained by thousands of local parishes, but from the 1720s (and occasionally earlier) turnpike trusts were set up to charge tolls and maintain some roads. Increasing numbers of main roads were turnpiked from the 1750s to the extent that almost every main road in England and Wales was the responsibility of some turnpike trust. New engineered roads were built by John Metcalf, Telford and John Macadam. The major turnpikes radiated from London and were the means by which the Royal Mail was able to reach the rest of the country. Heavy goods transport on these roads was by means of slow, broad wheeled, carts hauled by teams of horses. Lighter goods were conveyed by smaller carts or by teams of pack horse. Stage coaches carried the rich, and the less wealthy could pay to ride on carriers carts.RailwaysBilly eight wheels.jpg|thumb|200px|right|Puffing Billy,  an early railway steam locomotive, constructed in 1813-1814 for colliery work.Wagonways for moving coal in the mining areas had started in the 17th century and were often associated with canal or river systems for the further movement of coal. These were all horse drawn or relied on gravity, with a stationary steam engine to haul the wagons back to the top of the incline. The first applications of the steam locomotive were on wagon or plate ways (as they were then often called from the cast iron plates used). Horse-drawn public railways did not begin until the early years of the 19th century. Steam-hauled public railways began with the and Darlington Railway in 1825 and the and Manchester Railway in 1830. Construction of major railways connecting the larger cities and towns began in the 1830s but only gained momentum at the very end of the first Industrial Revolution.After many of the workers had completed the railways, they did not return to their rural lifestyles but instead remained in the cities, providing additional workers for the factories.Railways helped Britains trade enormously, providing a quick and easy way of transport and an easy way to transport mail and news.Social effectsIn terms of social structure, the Industrial Revolution witnessed the triumph of a class of industrialists and businessmen over a landed class of nobility and gentry.File:Mill Children in Macon.jpg|thumb|Textile mill workers. Spinning machinery. Georgia, 1909Ordinary working people found increased opportunities for employment in the new mills and factories, but these were often under strict working conditions with long hours of labour dominated by a pace set by machines. As late as the year 1900, most industrial workers in the United States still worked a 10-hour day (12 hours in the steel industry), yet earned from 20 to 40 percent less than the minimum deemed necessary for a decent life.( However, harsh working conditions were prevalent long before the Industrial Revolution took place. Pre-industrial society was very static and often cruellabour, dirty living conditions, and long working hours were just as prevalent before the Industrial Revolution.(Factories and urbanisationFile:Cottonopolis1.jpg|thumb|left|Manchester, England (Cottonopolis), pictured in 1840, showing the mass of factory chimneysIndustrialisation led to the creation of the factory. Arguably the first was John Lombes water-powered silk mill at Derby, operational by 1721. However, the rise of the factory came somewhat later when cotton spinning was mechanised.The factory system was largely responsible for the rise of the modern city, as large numbers of workers migrated into the cities in search of employment in the factories. Nowhere was this better illustrated than the mills and associated industries of Manchester, nicknamed Cottonopolis, and arguably the worlds first industrial city. For much of the 19th century, production was done in small mills, which were typically water-powered and built to serve local needs. Later each factory would have its own steam engine and a chimney to give an efficient draft through its boiler.The transition to industrialisation was not without difficulty. For example, a group of English workers known as Luddites formed to protest against industrialisation and sometimes sabotaged factories.In other industries the transition to factory production was not so divisive. Some industrialists themselves tried to improve factory and living conditions for their workers. One of the earliest such reformers was Owen, known for his pioneering efforts in improving conditions for workers at the New Lanark mills, and often regarded as one of the key thinkers of the early socialist movement.By 1746, an integrated brass mill was working at Warmley near Bristol. Raw material went in at one end, was smelted into brass and was turned into pans, pins, wire, and other goods. Housing was provided for workers on site. Wedgwood and Boulton were other prominent early industrialists, who employed the factory system.Child labourThe Industrial Revolution led to a population increase, but the chances of surviving childhood did not improve throughout the Industrial Revolution (although infant mortality rates were reduced markedly).(( There was still limited opportunity for education, and children were expected to work. Employers could pay a child less than an adult even though their productivity was comparable; there was no need for strength to operate an industrial machine, and since the industrial system was completely new there were no experienced adult labourers. This made child labour the labour of choice for manufacturing in the early phases of the Industrial Revolution between the 18th and 19th centuries. In England and Scotland in 1788, two-thirds of the workers in 143 water-powered mills were described as children.(labour had existed before the Industrial Revolution, but with the increase in population and education it became more visible. Many children were forced to work in relatively bad conditions for much lower pay than their elders,( 10-20% of an adult males wage.( Children as young as four were employed.( Beatings and long hours were common, with some child miners and hurriers working from 4 am until 5 pm.( Conditions were dangerous, with some children killed when they dozed off and fell into the path of the carts, while others died from gas explosions.( Many children developed cancer and other diseases and died before the age of 25.( Workhouses would sell orphans and abandoned children as pauper apprentices, working without wages for board and lodging.( Those who ran away would be whipped and returned to their masters, with some masters shackling them to prevent escape.( Children employed as scavenger by mills would climb under machinery to pick up cotton, working 14 hours a day, six days a week. Some lost hands or limbs, others were crushed under the machines, and some were decapitated.( Young girls worked at match factories, where phosphorus fumes would cause many to develop jaw.( Children employed at glassworks were regularly burned and blinded, and those working at potteries were vulnerable to poisonous clay dust.(Reports were written detailing some of the abuses, particularly in the coal mines( and textile factories( and these helped to popularise the childrens plight. The public outcry, especially among the upper and middle classes, helped stir change in the young workers welfare.Politicians and the government tried to limit child labour by law, but factory owners resisted; some felt that they were aiding the poor by giving their children money to buy food to avoid starvation, and others simply welcomed the cheap labour. In 1833 and 1844, the first general laws against child labour, the Acts, were passed in England: Children younger than nine were not allowed to work, children were not permitted to work at night, and the work day of youth under the age of 18 was limited to twelve hours. Factory inspectors supervised the execution of the law, however, their scarcity made enforcement difficult.( About ten years later, the employment of children and women in mining was forbidden. These laws decreased the number of child labourers; however, child labour remained in Europe and the United States up to the 20th century.(HousingFile:Dore London.jpg|thumb|right|Over London by Rail Dor c. 1870. Shows the densely populated and polluted environments created in the new industrial citiesLiving conditions during the Industrial Revolution varied from the splendour of the homes of the owners to the squalor of the lives of the workers. Poor people lived in very small houses in cramped streets. These homes would share toilet facilities, have open sewers and would be at risk of developing pathologies associated with persistent dampness. Disease was spread through a contaminated water supply. Conditions did improve during the 19th century as public health acts were introduced covering things such as sewage, hygiene and making some boundaries upon the construction of homes. Not everybody lived in homes like these. The Industrial Revolution created a larger middle class of professionals such as lawyers and doctors. The conditions for the poor improved over the course of the 19th century because of government and local plans which led to cities becoming cleaner places, but life had not been easy for the poor before industrialisation. However, as a result of the Revolution, huge numbers of the working class died due to diseases spreading through the cramped living conditions. Chest diseases from the mines, cholera from polluted water and typhoid were also extremely common, as was smallpox. Accidents in factories with child and female workers were regular. Strikes and riots by workers were also relatively common.A description of housing of the mill workers in England in 1844 was given by Engels.(  In the introduction of the 1892 edition of Engels(1844) he notes that most of the conditions he wrote about in 1844 had been greatly improved.LudditesFile:Luddite.jpg|thumb|right|The Leader of the luddites, engraving of 1812File:Chartist meeting, Kennington Common.jpg|thumb|The Great Chartist Meeting on Common, 1848The rapid industrialisation of the English economy cost many craft workers their jobs. The movement started first with lace and hosiery workers near Nottingham and spread to other areas of the textile industry owing to early industrialisation. Many weavers also found themselves suddenly unemployed since they could no longer compete with machines which only required relatively limited (and unskilled) labour to produce more cloth than a single weaver. Many such unemployed workers, weavers and others, turned their animosity towards the machines that had taken their jobs and began destroying factories and machinery. These attackers became known as Luddites, supposedly followers of Ludd, a folklore figure. The first attacks of the Luddite movement began in 1811. The Luddites rapidly gained popularity, and the British government took drastic measures using the militia or army to protect industry. Those rioters who were caught were tried and hanged, or transported for life.Unrest continued in other sectors as they industrialised, such as agricultural labourers in the 1830s, when large parts of southern Britain were affected by the Swing disturbances. Threshing machines were a particular target, and rick burning was a popular activity. However the riots led to the first formation of unions, and further pressure for reform.Organisation of labourThe Industrial Revolution concentrated labour into mills, factories and mines, thus facilitating the organisation of combinations or unions to help advance the interests of working people. The power of a union could demand better terms by withdrawing all labour and causing a consequent cessation of production. Employers had to decide between giving in to the union demands at a cost to themselves or suffering the cost of the lost production. Skilled workers were hard to replace, and these were the first groups to successfully advance their conditions through this kind of bargaining.The main method the unions used to effect change was action. Many strikes were painful events for both sides, the unions and the management. In England, the Act forbade workers to form any kind of trade union from 1799 until its repeal in 1824. Even after this, unions were still severely restricted.In 1832, the year of the Reform Act which extended the vote in England but did not grant universal suffrage, six men from Tolpuddle in Dorset founded the Friendly Society of Agricultural Labourers to protest against the gradual lowering of wages in the 1830s. They refused to work for less than 10 shillings a week, although by this time wages had been reduced to seven shillings a week and were due to be further reduced to six shillings. In 1834 James Frampton, a local landowner, wrote to the Prime Minister, Lord Melbourne, to complain about the union, invoking an obscure law from 1797 prohibiting people from swearing oaths to each other, which the members of the Friendly Society had done. James Brine, James Hammett, George Loveless, Georges brother James Loveless, Georges brother in-law Thomas Standfield, and Thomass son John Standfield were arrested, found guilty, and transported to Australia. They became known as the Tolpuddle martyrs.In the 1830s and 1840s the Chartist movement was the first large scale organised working class political movement which campaigned for political equality and social justice. Its Charter of reforms received over three million signatures but was rejected by Parliament without consideration.Working people also formed friendly societies and co-operative societies as mutual support groups against times of economic hardship. Enlightened industrialists, such as Owen also supported these organisations to improve the conditions of the working class.Unions slowly overcame the legal restrictions on the right to strike. In 1842, a General Strike involving cotton workers and colliers was organised through the Chartist movement which stopped production across Great Britain.(Eventually effective political organisation for working people was achieved through the trades unions who, after the extensions of the franchise in 1867 and 1885, began to support socialist political parties that later merged to became the British Labour Party.Standards of livingThe history of the change of living conditions during the industrial revolution has been very controversial, and was the topic that from the 1950s to the 1980s caused most heated debate among economic and social historians.( A series of 1950s essays by Phelps Brown and V. Hopkins later set the academic consensus that the bulk of the population, that was at the bottom of the social ladder, suffered severe reductions in their living standards.(Chronic hunger and malnutrition were the norm for the majority of the population of the world including England and France, until the latter part of the 19th century. Until about 1750, in large part due to malnutrition, life expectancy in France was about 35 years, and only slightly higher in England.  The U.S. population of the time was adequately fed, were much taller and had life expectancies of 4550 years.(  A vivid description of living standards of the mill workers in England in 1844 was given by Friedrich Engels.(During the period 1813-1913, there was a significant increase in worker wages.(((Population increaseAccording to Robert Hughes in The Fatal Shore, the population of England and Wales, which had remained steady at 6 million from 1700 to 1740, rose dramatically after 1740. The population of England had more than doubled from 8.3 million in 1801 to 16.8 million in 1851 and, by 1901, had nearly doubled again to 30.5 million.( As living conditions and health care improved during the 19th century, Britains population doubled every 50 years.(( Europes population increased from about 100 million in 1700 to 400 million by 1900.(Other effectsThe application of steam power to the industrial processes of printing supported a massive expansion of newspaper and popular book publishing, which reinforced rising literacy and demands for mass political participation.During the Industrial Revolution, the expectancy of children increased dramatically. The percentage of the children born in London who died before the age of five decreased from 74.5% in 17301749 to 31.8% in 18101829.(The growth of modern industry from the late 18th century onward led to massive urbanisation and the rise of new great cities, first in Europe and then in other regions, as new opportunities brought huge numbers of migrants from rural communities into urban areas. In 1800, only 3% of the worlds population lived in cities,( a figure that has risen to nearly 50% at the beginning of the 21st century.( In 1717 Manchester was merely a market town of 10,000 people, but by 1911 it had a population of 2.3 million.(The greatest killer in the cities was tuberculosis (TB).( According to the Harvard University Library, By the late 19th century, 70 to 90% of the urban populations of Europe and North America were infected with the TB bacillus, and about 80% of those individuals who developed active tuberculosis died of it. About 40% of working-class deaths in cities were from tuberculosis.(Continental EuropeThe Industrial Revolution on Europe came a little later than in Britain. In many industries, this involved the application of technology developed in Britain in new places. Often the technology was purchased from Britain or British engineers and entrepreneurs moved abroad in search of new opportunities. By 1809 part of the Ruhr Valley in Westphalia was called Miniature England because of its similarities to the industrial areas of England. The German, Russian and Belgian governments all provided state funding to the new industries.  In some cases (such as iron), the different availability of resources locally meant that only some aspects of the British technology were adopted.Wallonia, BelgiumFile:Houding1.jpg|thumb|Lifts on Canal du Centre (1888 - 1917) near Louvire, WalloniaFile:Bois-du-Luc CM3JPG.jpg|thumb|Workers housing at Bois-du-Luc (1838-1853) in La LouvireRenowned for its coal and steel, Wallonia has experienced strong industrial growth since the Middle Ages. For many years, heavy industry was the driving force behind the regions economy. Indeed, Wallonia was the birthplace of the industrial revolution on continental Europe:Before railway construction on the Continent demanded huge quantities of maleable iron mainly for rails, for which low quality iron sufficed, Wallonia was the only Continental region to follow the British model successfully. Since the middle of the 1820s, numerous works comprising coke blast furnaces as well as puddling and rolling mills were built in the coal mining areas around Lige and Charleroi. Excelling all others, John Cockerills factories at Seraing integrated all stages of production, from engineering to the supply of raw materials, as early as 1825.(Wallonia came to be regarded as an example of the radical evolution of industrial expansion. Thanks to coal (the French word houille was coined in Wallonia),( the region geared up to become the 2nd industrial power in the world after England. But it is also pointed out by many researchers, with its industriel, Especially in the Haine, Sambre and Meuse valleys, between the Borinage and Lige, (...) there was a huge industrial development based on coal-mining and iron-making....( Philippe Raxhon wrote about the period after 1830: It was not propaganda but a reality the Walloon regions were becoming the second industrial power all over the world after England.(  The sole industrial centre outside the collieries and blast furnaces of Walloon was the old cloth making town of Ghent.( Michel De Coster, Professor at the Universit de Lige wrote also: The historians and the economists say that Belgium was the second industrial power of the world, in proportion to its population and its territory (...) But this rank is the one of Wallonia where the coal-mines, the blast furnaces, the iron and zinc factories, the wool industry, the glass industry, the weapons industry... were concentrated  (Demographic effectsFile:Belgium resources 1968.jpg|thumb|Wallonias industriel (the blue area in the north is not in Wallonia)File:Chassis  molette de Crachet  Frameries vue large.JPG|thumb|Gallow frame of the Crachet in Frameries IN Wallonias French Chssis  molettes or Belfleur (French Chevalement1905.jpg|thumb|Official Poster of the Liges World fair in 1905 Wallonia was also the birthplace of a strong Socialist party and strong trade-unions in a particular sociological landscape. At the left, the Sillon industriel, which runs from Mons in the west, to Verviers in the east (except part of North Flanders, in another period of the industrial revolution, after 1920). Even if Wallonia is the second industrial country after England, the effect of the industrial revolution there was very different. In Breaking stereotypes, Muriel Neven and Isabelle Devious say:The industrial revolution changed a mainly rural society into an urban one, but with a strong contrast between northern and southern Belgium. During the Ages and the Early Modern Period, Flanders was characterised by the presence of large urban centres (...) at the beginning of the nineteenth century this region (Flanders), with an urbanisation degree of more than 30 per cent, remained one of the most urbanised in the world. By comparison, this proportion reached only 17 per cent in Wallonia, barely 10 per cent in most West European countries, 16 per cent in France and 25 per cent in England. Nineteenth century industrialisation did not affect the traditional urban infrastructure, except in Ghent (...) Also, in Wallonia the traditional urban network was largely unaffected by the industrialisation process, even though the proportion of city-dwellers rose from 17 to 45 per cent between 1831 and 1910. Especially in the Haine, Sambre and Meuse valleys, between the Borinage and Lige, where there was a huge industrial development based on coal-mining and iron-making, urbanisation was rapid. During these eighty years the number of municipalities with more than 5,000 inhabitants increased from only 21 to more than one hundred, concentrating nearly half of the Walloon population in this region. Nevertheless, industrialisation remained quite traditional in the sense that it did not lead to the growth of modern and large urban centres, but to a conurbation of industrial villages and towns developed around a coal-mine or a factory. Communication routes between these small centres only became populated later and created a much less dense urban morphology than, for instance, the area around Lige where the old town was there to direct migratory flows.(FranceThe industrial revolution in France was a particular process for it did not correspond to the main model followed by other countries. Notably, most French historians argue that France did not go through a clear take-off.( Instead, Frances economic growth and industrialisation process was slow and steady along the 18th and 19th centuries. However, some stages were identified by Maurice Lvy-Leboyer :* French Revolution and Napoleonic wars (17891815),* industrialisation, along with Britain (18151860),* economic slowdown (18601905),* renewal of the growth after 1905.SwedenDuring the period 1790-1815 Sweden experienced two parallel economic movements: an agricultural revolution with larger agricultural estates, new crops and farming tools and a commercialization of farming, and a protoindustrialisation, with small industries being established in the countryside and with workers switching between agricultural work in the summer season and industrial production in the winter season. This led to economic growth benefiting large sections of the population and leading up to a consumption revolution starting in the 1820s. In the period 1815-1850 the protoindustries developed into more specialized and larger industries. This period witness increasing regional specialization with mining in Bergslagen, textile mills in Sjuhradsbygden and forestry in Norrland. Several important institutional changes took place in this period, such as free and mandatory schooling introduced 1842 (as first country in the world), the abolishment of a previous national monopoly on trade in handicrafts in 1846, and a stock company law in 1848. During the period 1850-1890 Sweden witnessed a veritable explosion in its export sector, with agricultural crops, wood and steel being the three dominating categories. Sweden abolished most tariffs and other barriers to free trade in the 1850s and joined the gold standard in 1873. During the period 1890-1930 the second industrial revolution took place in Sweden. During this period new industries developed with their focus on the domestic market: mechanical engineering, power utilities, papermaking and textile industries.United StatesThe United States originally used horse-powered machinery to power its earliest factories, but eventually switched to water power, with the consequence that industrialisation was essentially limited to England and the rest of the United States, where fast-moving rivers were located. Horse-drawn production proved to be economically challenging and a more difficult alternative to the newer water-powered production lines. However, the raw materials (cotton) came from the United States. It was not until after the Civil War in the 1860s that steam-powered manufacturing overtook water-powered manufacturing, allowing the industry to fully spread across the nation.Somers and the Brothers founded the Cotton Manufactory in 1787, the first cotton mill in America, the largest cotton mill of its era,( and a significant milestone in the research and development of cotton mills in the future. This cotton mill was designed to utilise horse-powered production, however the operators quickly learned that the economic stability of their horse-drawn platform was unstable, and had fiscal issues for years after it was built. Despite the losses, the Manufactory served as a playground of innovation, both in turning a large amount of cotton, but also developing the water-powered milling structure used in Slaters Mill.(File:Bethlehem Steel.jpg|thumb|300px|right|Steel, founded in 1857, was once the second-largest manufacturer of steel in the United States; its Pennsylvania, location has been transformed into a casino.Slater (17681835) is the founder of the Mill. As a boy apprentice in Derbyshire, England, he learned of the new techniques in the textile industry and defied laws against the emigration of skilled workers by leaving for New York in 1789, hoping to make money with his knowledge. Slater founded Slaters Mill at Rhode Island, in 1793. He went on to own thirteen textile mills.(  Day established a wool carding mill in the Valley at Massachusetts in 1809, the third woollen mill established in the U.S. (The first was in Connecticut, and the second at Massachusetts.) The John H. Chafee Blackstone River Valley National Heritage Corridor retraces the history of Americas Hardest-Working River, the Blackstone. The River and its tributaries, which cover more than  from Worcester to Providence, was the birthplace of Americas Industrial Revolution. At its peak over 1100 mills operated in this valley, including Slaters mill, and with it the earliest beginnings of Americas Industrial and Technological Development.While on a trip to England in 1810, Newburyport merchant Francis Cabot Lowell was allowed to tour the British textile factories, but not take notes. Realising the of 1812 had ruined his import business but that a market for domestic finished cloth was emerging in America, he memorised the design of textile machines, and on his return to the United States, he set up the Manufacturing Company. Lowell and his partners built Americas second cotton-to-cloth textile mill at Massachusetts, second to the Cotton Manufactory After his death in 1817, his associates built Americas first planned factory town, which they named after him. This enterprise was capitalised in a public stock offering, one of the first uses of it in the United States.  Massachusetts, utilising  of canals and ten thousand horsepower delivered by the River, is considered by some to be a major contributor to the success of the American Industrial Revolution. The short-lived utopia-like Lowell System was formed, as a direct response to the poor working conditions in Britain. However, by 1850, especially following the Irish Potato Famine, the system had been replaced by poor immigrant labour.The industrialisation of the watch industry started 1854 also in Waltham, Massachusetts, at the Watch Company, with the development of machine tools, tools, gauges and assembling methods adapted to the micro precision required for watches.JapanIn 1871 a group of Japanese politicians known as the Mission toured Europe and the USA to learn western ways. The result was a deliberate state led industrialisation policy to prevent Japan from falling behind. The of Japan, founded in 1877, used taxes to fund model steel and textile factories. Education was expanded and Japanese students were sent to study in the west.Second Industrial Revolution and later evolutionSteel is often cited as the first of several new areas for industrial mass-production, which are said to characterise a Second Industrial Revolution, beginning around 1850, although a method for mass manufacture of steel was not invented until the 1860s, when Sir Henry Bessemer invented a new furnace which could convert iron into steel in large quantities. However, it only became widely available in the 1870s after the process was modified to produce more uniform quality.((This second Industrial Revolution gradually grew to include the chemical industries, petroleum refining and distribution, electrical industries, and, in the 20th century, the automotive industries, and was marked by a transition of technological leadership from Britain to the United States and Germany.The introduction of hydroelectric power generation in the Alps enabled the rapid industrialisation of coal-deprived northern Italy, beginning in the 1890s. The increasing availability of economical petroleum products also reduced the importance of coal and further widened the potential for industrialisation.McLuhan analysed the social and cultural impact of the age. While the previous age of mechanisation had spread the idea of splitting every process into a sequence, this was ended by the introduction of the instant speed of electricity that brought simultaneity. This imposed the cultural shift from the approach of focusing on specialised segments of attention (adopting one particular perspective), to the idea of instant sensory awareness of the whole, an attention to the total field, a sense of the whole pattern. It made evident and prevalent the sense of form and function as a unity, an integral idea of structure and configuration. This had major impact in the disciplines of painting (with cubism), physics, poetry, communication and educational theory.(By the 1890s, industrialisation in these areas had created the first giant industrial corporations with burgeoning global interests, as companies like Steel, Electric, Oil and Bayer AG joined the railroad companies on the worlds markets.Intellectual paradigms and criticismCapitalismThe advent of the of Enlightenment provided an intellectual framework which welcomed the practical application of the growing body of scientific knowledgea factor evidenced in the systematic development of the steam engine, guided by scientific analysis, and the development of the political and sociological analyses, culminating in Adam Smiths Wealth of Nations. One of the main arguments for capitalism, presented for example in the book Improving State of the World, is that industrialisation increases wealth for all, as evidenced by raised life expectancy, reduced working hours, and no work for children and the elderly.SocialismSocialism emerged as a critique of capitalism. Marxism began essentially as a reaction to the Industrial Revolution.( According to Marx, industrialisation polarised society into the bourgeoisie (those who own the of production, the factories and the land) and the much larger proletariat (the working class who actually perform the labour necessary to extract something valuable from the means of production). He saw the industrialisation process as the logical dialectical progression of feudal economic modes, necessary for the full development of capitalism, which he saw as in itself a necessary precursor to the development of socialism and eventually communism.RomanticismDuring the Industrial Revolution an intellectual and artistic hostility towards the new industrialisation developed. This was known as the Romantic movement. Its major exponents in English included the artist and poet Blake and poets Wordsworth, Taylor Coleridge, Keats, Lord Byron and Bysshe Shelley. The movement stressed the importance of nature in art and language, in contrast to monstrous machines and factories; the Dark satanic mills of Blakes poem did those feet in ancient time.  Mary Shelleys novel Frankenstein reflected concerns that scientific progress might be two-edged.CausesGDP Capita 1-2003 A.D.png|300px|thumb|Regional GDP per capita changed very little for most of human history before the Industrial Revolution. (The empty areas mean no data, not very low levels. There is data for the years 1, 1000, 1500, 1600, 1700, 1820, 1900, and 2003)The causes of the Industrial Revolution were complicated and remain a topic for debate, with some historians believing the Revolution was an outgrowth of social and institutional changes brought by the end of feudalism in Britain after the Civil War in the 17th century. As national border controls became more effective, the spread of disease was lessened, thereby preventing the epidemics common in previous times.( The percentage of children who lived past infancy rose significantly, leading to a larger workforce. The Enclosure movement and the Agricultural Revolution made food production more efficient and less labour-intensive, forcing the surplus population who could no longer find employment in agriculture into industry, for example weaving, and in the longer term into the cities and the newly developed factories.( The colonial expansion of the 17th century with the accompanying development of international trade, creation of markets and accumulation of capital are also cited as factors, as is the revolution of the 17th century.(Until the 1980s, it was universally believed by academic historians that technological innovation was the heart of the Industrial Revolution and the key enabling technology was the invention and improvement of the engine.( However, recent research into the Era has challenged the traditional, supply-oriented interpretation of the Industrial Revolution.(Mumford has proposed that the Industrial Revolution had its origins in the Middle Ages, much earlier than most estimates.(  He explains that the model for standardised production was the press and that the archetypal model for the industrial era was the clock. He also cites the monastic emphasis on order and time-keeping, as well as the fact that medieval cities had at their centre a church with bell ringing at regular intervals as being necessary precursors to a greater synchronisation necessary for later, more physical, manifestations such as the steam engine.The presence of a large domestic market should also be considered an important driver of the Industrial Revolution, particularly explaining why it occurred in Britain. In other nations, such as France, markets were split up by local regions, which often imposed tolls and tariffs on goods traded amongst them.( Internal tariffs were abolished by VIII of England, they survived in Russia till 1753, 1789 in France and 1839 in Spain.Governments grant of limited monopolies to inventors under a developing patent system (the of Monopolies 1623) is considered an influential factor. The effects of patents, both good and ill, on the development of industrialisation are clearly illustrated in the history of the steam engine, the key enabling technology. In return for publicly revealing the workings of an invention the patent system rewarded inventors such as Watt by allowing them to monopolise the production of the first steam engines, thereby rewarding inventors and increasing the pace of technological development. However monopolies bring with them their own inefficiencies which may counterbalance, or even overbalance, the beneficial effects of publicising ingenuity and rewarding inventors.( Watts monopoly may have prevented other inventors, such as Trevithick, Murdoch or Hornblower, from introducing improved steam engines, thereby retarding the industrial revolution by about 16 years.(Causes for occurrence in EuropeFile:Vereinigte Ostindische Compagnie bond.jpg|thumb|A 1623 East India Company bond.European 17th century colonial expansion, international trade, and creation of financial markets produced a new legal and financial environment, one which supported and enabled 18th century industrial growth.One question of active interest to historians is why the industrial revolution occurred in Europe and not in other parts of the world in the 18th century, particularly China, India, and the East, or at other times like in Classical Antiquity( or the Ages.( Numerous factors have been suggested, including education, technological changes( (see Scientific Revolution in Europe), modern government, modern work attitudes, ecology, and culture.( The of Enlightenment not only meant a larger educated population but also more modern views on work. However, most historians contest the assertion that Europe and China were roughly equal because modern estimates of per capita income on Western Europe in the late 18th century are of roughly 1,500 dollars in power parity (and Britain had a capita income of nearly 2,000 dollars() whereas China, by comparison, had only 450 dollars.Some historians such as Landes( and Weber credit the different belief systems in China and Europe with dictating where the revolution occurred. The religion and beliefs of Europe were largely products of Judaeo-Christianity, and Greek thought. Conversely, Chinese society was founded on men like Confucius, Mencius, Feizi (Legalism), Lao Tzu (Taoism), and Buddha (Buddhism).  Whereas the Europeans believed that the universe was governed by rational and eternal laws, the East believed that the universe was in constant flux and, for Buddhists and Taoists, not capable of being rationally understood. Other factors include the considerable distance of Chinas coal deposits, though large, from its cities as well as the then unnavigable River that connects these deposits to the sea.(Regarding India, the Marxist historian Palme Dutt said: The capital to finance the Industrial Revolution in India instead went into financing the Industrial Revolution in England.( In contrast to China, India was split up into many competing kingdoms, with the three major ones being the Marathas, Sikhs and the Mughals. In addition, the economy was highly dependent on two sectorsagriculture of subsistence and cotton, and there appears to have been little technical innovation. It is believed that the vast amounts of wealth were largely stored away in palace treasuries by totalitarian monarchs prior to the British take over. Absolutist dynasties in China, India, and the Middle East failed to encourage manufacturing and exports, and expressed little interest in the well-being of their subjects.(Causes for occurrence in BritainThe debate about the start of the Industrial Revolution also concerns the massive lead that Britain had over other countries. Some have stressed the importance of natural or financial resources that Britain received from its many overseas colonies or that profits from the British slave trade between Africa and the Caribbean helped fuel industrial investment. It has been pointed out, however, that slave trade and West Indian plantations provided only 5% of the British national income during the years of the Industrial Revolution.( Even though slavery accounted for minimal economic profits in Britain during the Industrial Revolution, Caribbean-based demand accounted for 12% of Englands industrial output.(Alternatively, the greater liberalisation of trade from a large merchant base may have allowed Britain to produce and use emerging scientific and technological developments more effectively than countries with stronger monarchies, particularly China and Russia. Britain emerged from the Wars as the only European nation not ravaged by financial plunder and economic collapse, and possessing the only merchant fleet of any useful size (European merchant fleets having been destroyed during the war by the Navy(). Britains extensive exporting cottage industries also ensured markets were already available for many early forms of manufactured goods. The conflict resulted in most British warfare being conducted overseas, reducing the devastating effects of territorial conquest that affected much of Europe. This was further aided by Britains geographical positionan island separated from the rest of mainland Europe.Another theory is that Britain was able to succeed in the Industrial Revolution due to the availability of key resources it possessed. It had a dense population for its small geographical size. Enclosure of common land and the related agricultural revolution made a supply of this labour readily available. There was also a local coincidence of natural resources in the North of England, the Midlands, Wales and the Lowlands. Local supplies of coal, iron, lead, copper, tin, limestone and water power, resulted in excellent conditions for the development and expansion of industry. Also, the damp, mild weather conditions of the North West of England provided ideal conditions for the spinning of cotton, providing a natural starting point for the birth of the textiles industry.The stable political situation in Britain from around 1688, and British societys greater receptiveness to change (compared with other European countries) can also be said to be factors favouring the Industrial Revolution. In large part due to the Enclosure movement, the peasantry was destroyed as a significant source of resistance to industrialisation, and the landed upper classes developed commercial interests that made them pioneers in removing obstacles to the growth of capitalism.(  (This point is also made in Hilaire Bellocs Servile State.)Britains population grew 280% 1550-1820, while the rest of Western Europe grew 50-80%. 70% of European urbanisation happened in Britain 1750-1800. By 1800, only the Netherlands was more urbanised than Britain. This was only possible because coal, coke, imported cotton, brick and slate had replaced wood, charcoal, flax, peat and thatch. The latter compete with land grown to feed people while mined materials do not. Yet more land would be freed when chemical fertilisers replaced manure and horses work was mechanised. A workhorse needs  for fodder while even early steam engines produced 4 times more mechanical energy.In 1700 5/6 of coal mined worldwide was in Britain while the Netherlands had none; so despite having Europes best transport, most urbanised, well paid, literate people and lowest taxes, it failed to industrialise. In the 18th century it was the only European country whose cities and population shrank. Without coal, Britain would have run out of suitable river sites for mills by the 1830s.(Protestant work ethicAnother theory is that the British advance was due to the presence of an entrepreneurial class which believed in progress, technology and hard work.(The existence of this class is often linked to the Protestant work ethic (see Weber) and the particular status of the Baptists and the dissenting Protestant sects, such as the Quakers and Presbyterians that had flourished with the Civil War. Reinforcement of confidence in the rule of law, which followed establishment of the prototype of constitutional monarchy in Britain in the Revolution of 1688, and the emergence of a stable financial market there based on the management of the national debt by the of England, contributed to the capacity for, and interest in, private financial investment in industrial ventures.Dissenters found themselves barred or discouraged from almost all public offices, as well as education at Englands only two universities at the time (although dissenters were still free to study at Scotlands four universities). When the restoration of the monarchy took place and membership in the official Anglican Church became mandatory due to the Act, they thereupon became active in banking, manufacturing and education. The Unitarians, in particular, were very involved in education, by running Dissenting Academies, where, in contrast to the universities of Oxford and Cambridge and schools such as Eton and Harrow, much attention was given to mathematics and the sciencesareas of scholarship vital to the development of manufacturing technologies.Historians sometimes consider this social factor to be extremely important, along with the nature of the national economies involved. While members of these sects were excluded from certain circles of the government, they were considered fellow Protestants, to a limited extent, by many in the class, such as traditional financiers or other businessmen. Given this relative tolerance and the supply of capital, the natural outlet for the more enterprising members of these sects would be to seek new opportunities in the technologies created in the wake of the scientific revolution of the 17th century.This theory does not explain how the second country to be industrialised-Belgium, was Catholic.Name historyThe earliest use of the term Industrial Revolution yet located seems to be a letter of 6 July 1799 by French envoy Otto, announcing that the process had started in his country.( In his 1976 book A Vocabulary of Culture and Society, Williams states in the entry for Industry: The idea of a new social order based on major industrial change was clear in Southey and Owen, between 1811 and 1818, and was implicit as early as Blake in the early 1790s and Wordsworth at the turn of the century. The term Industrial Revolution applied to technological change was becoming more common by the late 1830s, as in Louis-Auguste Blanqui description in 1837 of la rvolution industrielle. Engels in Condition of the Working Class in England in 1844 spoke of an industrial revolution, a revolution which at the same time changed the whole of civil society. Credit for popularising the term may be given to Toynbee, whose lectures given in 1881 gave a detailed account of it.(See also;General*Capitalism in the nineteenth century*Deindustrialisation*Dialectics of progress*revolution*history of the United Kingdom*Electrification*Industrialisation*revolution*Paper*Papermaking*society*Protestant work ethic*Scientific Revolution;Other* Industrial growth in the Muslim World* Revolution in China* Revolution* and invention in Birmingham* and industrial history of the United StatesReferencesBibliography**************************Historiography* Chambliss, William J. (editor), Problems of Industrial Society, Reading, Massachusetts : Addison-Wesley Publishing Co, December 1973. ISBN 9780201009583*Hawke, Gary.  Reinterpretations of the Industrial Revolution in Patrick OBrien and Roland Quinault, eds. The Industrial Revolution and British Society (1993) pp 5478*NotesIain Stewart)(Made In Beverly-A History of Beverly Industry, by Daniel J. Hoisington. A publication of the Beverly Historic District Commission. 1989.)(Chris Evans, Gran Rydn, The Industrial Revolution in Iron; The impact of British Coal Technology in Ninenteenth-Century Europe Published by Ashgate Publishing, Ltd., Farnham2005, pp. 37-38 ISBN 075463390X.)(Encyclopdia Britannica (2008) Building construction: the reintroduction of modern concrete)(Eric Hobsbawm, The Age of Revolution: Europe 17891848, Weidenfeld & Nicolson Ltd. ISBN 0-349-10484-0)(The UK population: past, present and future (PDF). Statistics.gov.uk)(Muriel Neven and Isabelle Devos, Breaking stereotypes, art. cit., pages 315-316)(Muriel Neven and Isabelle Devos, Breaking stereotypes, in M.Neven and I.Devos (editors), Recent work in Belgian Historical Demography, in Revue belge dhistoire contemporaine, XXXI, 2001, 3-4, pages 347-359 FLWI.ugent.be)(The Life of the Industrial Worker in Nineteenth-Century England, Laura Del Col, West Virginia University.)External links**Internet Modern History Sourcebook: Industrial Revolution*The Day the World Took Off Six part video series from the University of Cambridge tracing the question Why did the Industrial Revolution begin when and where it did.*BBC History Home Page: Industrial Revolution*National Museum of Science and Industry website: machines and personalities*Industrial Revolution and the Standard of Living by Clark Nardinelli  the debate over whether standards of living rose or fell.*Factory Workers in the Industrial Revolution*Revolutionary Players website*The Industrial Revolution --Articles, Video, Pictures, and Facts* http://www.dingdongcounthouse.org.uk The History of the Count House of Ding Dong Mine, Cornwall where Richard Trevithick carried out his first experiments with high pressure steam.RevolusieRevolutionindustrialinqilabKek-bngrevolucijaIndustrialrevoluceChwyldro Diwydiannolindustrielle revolutionRevolutionpreIndustrialrevolucioEndustrialIraultzaRevolutionindustrielleRevolsjegd:Tionndadh-gnomhachaisIndustrialgan:revolucijaIndustriis:Inbyltinginindustrialeindhustriya ViwandaniPesaziyconversiorevolcijaperversmasforradalomIndustrijaliPerindustrianAndustrial my:revolutieja:industrielle revolusjonindustrielle revolusjonenindustrialaRevolutschoonprzemysowaIndustrialrevolyutsiyasindustrialIndustrialnnustrialiRevolutionrevolciarevolucijarevolucijavallankumousrevolutionenIndustriyalta:th:Devrimimng cng nghipfiu-vro:TstspreqIndustriyalzh-yue:perversmoszh:
15443
Imperialism_in_Asia
Imperialism in Asia traces its roots back to the late 15th century with a series of voyages that sought a sea passage to India in the hope of establishing direct trade between Europe and Asia in spices. Before 1500 European economies were largely self-sufficient, only supplemented by minor trade with Asia and Africa. Within the next century, however, European and Asian economies were slowly becoming integrated through the rise of new global trade routes; and the early thrust of European political power, commerce, and culture in Asia gave rise to a growing trade in lucrative commoditiesa key development in the rise of todays modern world free market economyIn the 16th century, the Portuguese broke the monopoly of the Arabs and Italians of trade between Asia and Europe by the discovery of the sea route to India around the Cape of Good Hope.(M. Weisner-Hanks, Early Modern Europe 14501789 (Cambridge, 2006)) However, with the rise of the rival East India Company, Portuguese influence in Asia was gradually eclipsed. Dutch forces first established independent bases in the East (most significantly Batavia, the heavily fortified headquarters of the Dutch East India Company) and then between 1640 and 1660 wrestled Malacca, Ceylon, some southern Indian ports, and the lucrative Japan trade from the Portuguese. Later, the English and the French established settlements in India and established a trade with China and their own acquisitions would gradually surpass those of the Dutch. Following the end of the Years War in 1763, the British eliminated French influence in India and established the East India Company as the most important political force on the Subcontinent.Before the Revolution in the mid-to-late 19th century, demand for oriental goods remained the driving force behind European imperialism, and (with the important exception of British East India Company rule in India) the European stake in Asia remained confined largely to trading stations and strategic outposts necessary to protect trade. Industrialisation, however, dramatically increased European demand for Asian raw materials; and the severe Depression of the 1870s provoked a scramble for new markets for European industrial products and financial services in Africa, the Americas, Eastern Europe, and especially in Asia. This scramble coincided with a new era in global colonial expansion known as the Imperialism, which saw a shift in focus from trade and rule to formal colonial control of vast overseas territories ruled as political extensions of their mother countries. Between the 1870s and the beginning of War I in 1914, the Kingdom, France, and the Netherlands  the established colonial powers in Asia  added to their empires vast expanses of territory in the East, the Indian Subcontinent, and East Asia. In the same period, the of Japan, following the Restoration; the Empire, following the end of the War in 1871; Tsarist Russia; and the States, following the War in 1898, quickly emerged as new imperial powers in Asia and in the Pacific Ocean area.In Asia, World War I and War II were played out as struggles among several key imperial powersconflicts involving the European powers along with Russia and the rising American and Japanese powers. None of the colonial powers, however, possessed the resources to withstand the strains of both world wars and maintain their direct rule in Asia. Although nationalist movements throughout the colonial world led to the political independence of nearly all of the Asias remaining colonies, decolonisation was intercepted by the War; and South East Asia, Asia, the Middle East, and East Asia remained embedded in a world economic, financial, and military system in which the great powers compete to extend their influence. However, the rapid post-war economic development of the Asian Tigers and the Republic of China, along with the collapse of the Union, have loosened European and North American influence in Asia, generating speculation today about the possible re-emergence of China and Japan as regional powers.Early European exploration of AsiaEuropean exploration of Asia started in ancient Roman times. Knowledge of lands as distant as China were held by the Romans. Trade with India through the Roman Egyptian Sea ports was significant in the first centuries of the Era.Medieval European exploration of AsiaImage:Marco Polo traveling.JPG|thumb|Illustration of Polos arrival in a Chinese cityIn the 13th and 14th centuries, a number of Europeans, many of them Christian missionaries, had sought to penetrate China. The most famous of these travelers was Polo. But these journeys had little permanent effect on East-West trade because of a series of political developments in Asia in the last decades of the 14th century, which put an end to further European exploration of Asia. The dynasty in China, which had been receptive to European missionaries and merchants, was overthrown, and the new Ming rulers were found to be inward oriented and unreceptive to foreign religious proselytism. Meanwhile, The Turks consolidated control over the eastern Mediterranean, closing off key overland trade routes. Thus, until the 15th century, only minor trade and cultural exchanges between Europe and Asia continued at certain terminals controlled by Muslim traders.Oceanic voyages to AsiaWestern European rulers determined to find new trade routes of their own. The Portuguese spearheaded the drive to find oceanic routes that would provide cheaper and easier access to South and East Asian goods. This chartering of oceanic routes between East and West began with the unprecedented voyages of Portuguese and Spanish sea captains. Their voyages were influenced by medieval European adventurers, who had journeyed overland to the Far East and contributed to geographical knowledge of parts of Asia upon their return.In 1488, Dias rounded the southern tip of Africa under the sponsorship of Portugals John II, from which point he noticed that the coast swung northeast. Although his crew forced him to turn back, he was pleased with the prospect of soon finding a sea route to India and named the tip as the of Good Hope. Later, starting in 1497, Portuguese navigator da Gama made the first open voyage from Europe to India. In 1520, Magellan, a Portuguese navigator in the service of Spain, found a sea route into the Ocean.Portuguese and Spanish trade and colonization in AsiaFor further detail see Empire.Portuguese monopoly over trade in the Indian OceanImage:Afonso de Albuquerque.jpg|thumb|left|de Albuquerque.Early in the 16th century de Albuquerque (left) emerged as the Portuguese colonial viceroy most instrumental in consolidating Portugals holdings in Africa and in Asia. He understood that Portugal could wrest commercial supremacy from the Arabs only by force, and therefore devised a plan to establish forts at strategic sites which would dominate the trade routes and also protect Portuguese interests on land. In 1510, he seized Goa in India, which enabled him to gradually consolidate control of most of the commercial traffic between Europe and Asia, largely through trade; Europeans started to carry on trade from forts, acting as foreign merchants rather than as settlers.  In contrast, early European expansion in the Indies, (later known to Europeans as a separate continent from Asia that they would call the Americas) following the 1492 voyage of Columbus, involved heavy settlement in colonies that were treated as political extensions of the mother countries.Lured by the potential of high profits from another expedition, the Portuguese established a permanent base south of the Indian trade port of Calicut in the early 15th century. In 1510, the Portuguese seized Goa on the coast of India, which Portugal held until 1961. The Portuguese soon acquired a monopoly over trade in the Indian Ocean.Portuguese viceroy de Albuquerque (15091515) resolved to consolidate Portuguese holdings in Africa and Asia, and secure control of trade with the Indies and China. His first objective was Malacca, which controlled the narrow strait through which most Far Eastern trade moved. Captured in 1511, Malacca became the springboard for further eastward penetration; several years later the first trading posts were established in the Moluccas, or Spice Islands, which was the source for some of the worlds most hotly demanded spices. By 1516, the first Portuguese ships had reached Canton on the southern coasts of China.Image:Portuguese discoveries and explorationsV2en.png|thumb|650px|Portuguese expeditions 14151542: arrival places and dates; Portuguese trade routes in the Ocean (blue); territories of the empire under King John III rule (green)By 1557, the Portuguese gained a permanent base in China at Macau, which they held until 1999. The Portuguese, based at Goa and Malacca, had now established a lucrative maritime empire in the Indian Ocean meant to monopolise the trade. The Portuguese also began a channel of trade with the Japanese, becoming the first recorded Westerners to have visited Japan. This contact introduced Christianity and fire-arms into Japan.The energies of Spain, the other major colonial power of the 16th century, were largely concentrated on the Americas, not South and East Asia. But the Spanish did establish a footing in the Far East in the Philippines. After 1565, cargoes of Chinese goods were transported from the Philippines to Mexico and from there to Spain.  By this long route, Spain reaped some of the profits of Far Eastern commerce. Spanish officials converted the island to Christianity and established some settlements, permanently establishing the Philippines as the area of East Asia most oriented toward the West in terms of culture and commerce.Decline of Portugals Asian empire since the 17th centurytanga 1643 rev-2.png|thumb|A silver Indo-Portuguese coin featuring a standing figure facing right with flag struck for and minted in Goa during the reign of John IV.The lucrative trade was vastly expanded when the Portuguese began to export slaves from Africa in 1541; however, over time, the rise of the slave trade left Portugal over-extended, and vulnerable to competition from other Western European powers. Envious of Portugals control of trade routes, other Western European nations  mainly the Netherlands, France, and England  began to send in rival expeditions to Asia. In 1642, the Dutch drove the Portuguese out of the Gold Coast in Africa, the source of the bulk of Portuguese slave labourers, leaving this rich slaving area to other Europeans, especially the Dutch and the English.Rival European powers began to make inroads in Asia as the Portuguese and Spanish trade in the Indian Ocean declined primarily because they had become hugely over-stretched financially due to the limitations on their investment capacity  and contemporary naval technology. Both of these factors worked in tandem, making control over Indian Ocean trade extremely expensive.The existing Portuguese interests in Asia proved sufficient to finance further colonial expansion and entrenchment in areas regarded as of greater strategic importance in Africa and Brazil. Portuguese maritime supremacy was lost to the Dutch in the 17th century, and with this came serious challenges for the Portuguese. However, they still clung to Macau, and settled a new colony on the island of Timor. It was as recent as the 1960s and 1970s that the Portuguese began to relinquish their colonies in Asia. Goa was invaded by India in 1961 and became an Indian state in 1987; Timor was abandoned in 1975 and was then invaded by Indonesia. It became an independent nation in 2002; and Macau was handed over to the Chinese as per a treaty in 1999.Dutch trade and colonization in AsiaRise of Dutch control over Asian trade in the 17th centuryFile:Dutch settlement in Batavia East Indies 1665.jpg|left|thumb|Dutch settlement in the East Indies. Batavia, Java (now Jakarta), c. 1665.Portuguese decline in Asia was accelerated by the attacks on their commercial empire by the Dutch and the English, which began a global struggle over empire in Asia that lasted until the end of the Years War in 1763. The Netherlands revolt against Spanish rule facilitated Dutch encroachment of the Portuguese monopoly over South and East Asian trade. The Dutch looked on Spains trade and colonies as potential spoils in war. When the two crowns of the Iberian peninsula were joined in 1581, the Dutch felt free to attack Portuguese territories in Asia.By the 1590s, a number of Dutch companies were formed to finance trading expeditions in Asia. Because competition lowered their profits, and because of the doctrines of mercantilism, in 1602 the companies united into a cartel and formed the East India Company, and received from the government the right to trade and colonise territory in the area stretching from the of Good Hope eastward to the of Magellan.In 1605, armed Dutch merchants captured the Portuguese fort at Amboyna in the Moluccas, which was developed into the first secure base of the company. Over time, the Dutch gradually consolidated control over the great trading ports of the East Indies. Control over the East Indies trading ports allowed the company to monopolise the world trade for decades. Their monopoly over the spice trade became complete after they drove the Portuguese from Malacca in 1641 and Ceylon in 1658.Dutch East India Company colonies or outposts were later established in Atjeh (Aceh), 1667; Macassar, 1669; and Bantam, 1682. The company established its headquarters at Batavia (today Jakarta) on the island of Java. Outside the East Indies, the Dutch East India Company colonies or outposts were also established in Persia (now Iran), Bengal (now Bangladesh and part of India), Mauritius (1638-1658/1664-1710), Siam (now Thailand), Guangzhou (Canton, China), Taiwan (16241662), and southern India (16161795). In 1662, Chenggong (also known as Koxinga) expelled the Dutch from Taiwan. (see of Taiwan) Further, the Dutch East India Company trade post on Dejima (16411857), an artificial island off the coast of Nagasaki, was for a long time the only place where Europeans could trade with Japan.In 1652, van Riebeeck established an outpost at the of Good Hope (the southwestern tip of Africa, currently in Africa) to restock company ships on their journey to East Asia. This post later became a fully-fledged colony, the Colony (16521806). As Cape Colony attracted increasing Dutch and European settlement, the Dutch founded the city of Kaapstad (Town).By 1669, the Dutch East India Company was the richest private company in history, with a huge fleet of merchant ships and warships, tens of thousands of employees, a private army consisting of thousands of soldiers, and a reputation on the part of its stockholders for high dividend payments.Dutch New Imperialism in AsiaThe company was in almost constant conflict with the English; relations were particularly tense following the Massacre in 1623. During the 18th century, Dutch East India Company possessions were increasingly focused on the East Indies. After the fourth war between the United Provinces and England (17801784), the company suffered increasing financial difficulties. In 1799, the company was dissolved, commencing official colonisation of the Indies. During the era of New Imperialism the territorial claims of the East India Company (VOC) expanded into a fully fledged colony named the East Indies. Partly driven by re-newed colonial aspirations of fellow European nation states the Dutch strived to establish unchallenged control of the archipelago now known as Indonesia.Six years into formal colonisation of the East Indies, in Europe the Republic was occupied by the French forces of Napoleon. The Dutch government went into exile in England and formally ceded its colonial possessions to Great Britain. The pro-French Governor General Daendels of the Dutch East Indies fought the British in the Java War before surrendering the colony. British Governor Raffles, who the later founded the city of Singapore, ruled the colony the following 10 years of the British interregnum (18061816).After the defeat of Napoleon and the Treaty of 1814 colonial government of the East Indies was ceded back to the Dutch in 1817. The loss of South Africa and the continued scramble for Africa stimulated the Dutch to secure unchallenged dominion over its colony in the East Indies. The Dutch started to consolidate its power base through extensive military campaigns and elaborate diplomatic alliances with indigenous rulers ensuring the Dutch tricolor was firmly planted in all corners of the Archipelago. These military campaigns included: the War (18211837), the War (18251830) and the War (18731904). This raised the need for a considerable military build up of the colonial army (KNIL). From all over Europe soldiers were recruited to join the KNIL.(Note: In 1819 the standing army consisted of over 7,000 European and 5,000 indigenous troops. See: Willems, Wim Sporen van een Indisch verleden (1600-1942). (COMT, Leiden, 1994). Chapter I, P.24 ISBN 90 71042 44 8)The Dutch concentrated their colonial enterprise in the East Indies (Indonesia) throughout the 19th century. The Dutch lost control over the East Indies to the Japanese during much of World War II.() Following the war, the Dutch fought Indonesian independence forces after Japan surrendered to the Allies in 1945. In 1949 most of what was known as the Dutch East Indies was ceded to the independent Republic of Indonesia. In 1962 also New Guinea was annexed by Indonesia de facto ending Dutch imperialism in Asia.British in IndiaPortuguese, French, and British competition in India (16001763)thumb|Robert Clive, 1st Baron Clive.The English sought to stake out claims in India at the expense of the Portuguese dating back to the era. In 1600, Queen Elizabeth I incorporated the English East India Company (later the British East India Company), granting it a monopoly of trade from the Cape of Good Hope eastward to the Strait of Magellan. In 1639 it acquired Madras on the east coast of India, where it quickly surpassed Portuguese Goa as the principal European trading centre on the Indian Subcontinent.Through bribes, diplomacy, and manipulation of weak native rulers, the company prospered in India, where it became the most powerful political force, and outrivaled its Portuguese, and French competitors. For more than one hundred years, English and French trading companies had fought one another for supremacy, and by the middle of the 18th century competition between the British and the French had heated up. French defeat by the British under the command of Clive during the Years War (17561763) marked the end of the French stake in India.Collapse of Mughal IndiaThe British East India Company, although still in direct competition with French and Dutch interests until 1763, was able to extend its control over almost the whole of India in the century following the subjugation of Bengal at the 1757 of Plassey. The British East India Company made great advances at the expense of a Mughal dynasty, seething with corruption, oppression, and revolt, that was crumbling under the despotic rule of Aurangzeb (16581707).The reign of Jahan (16281658) had marked the height of Mughal power. However, the reign of Aurangzeb, a ruthless and fanatical man who intended to rid India of all views alien to the Islamic faith, was disastrous. By 1690, when Mughal territorial expansion reached its greatest extent, Aurangzebs Empire encompassed the entire Indian Subcontinent. But this period of power was followed by one of decline. Fifty years after the death of Aurangzeb, the great Mughal empire had crumbled. Meanwhile, marauding warlords, nobles, and others bent on gaining power left the Subcontinent increasingly anarchic. Although the Mughals kept the imperial title until 1858, the central government had collapsed, creating a power vacuum.From Company to CrownFile:British Empire 1921.png|thumb|350px|right|The Empire in 1920.Aside from defeating the French during the Seven Years War, Clive, the leader of the Company in India, defeated a key Indian ruler of Bengal at the decisive of Plassey (1757), a victory that ushered in the beginning of a new period in Indian history, that of informal British rule. While still nominally the sovereign, the Mughal Indian emperor became more and more of a puppet ruler, and anarchy spread until the company stepped into therole of policeman of India. The transition to formal imperialism, characterised by Queen Victoria being crowned Empress of India in the 1870s was a gradual process. The first step toward cementing formal British control extended back to the late 18th century. The British Parliament, disturbed by the idea that a great business concern, interested primarily in profit, was controlling the destinies of millions of people, passed acts in 1773 and 1784 that gave itself the power to control company policies and to appoint the highest company official in India, the Governor-General. (This system of dual control lasted until 1858.) By 1818 the East India Company was master of all of India. Some local rulers were forced to accept its overlordship; others were deprived of their territories. Some portions of India were administered by the British directly; in others native dynasties were retained under British supervision.Until 1858, however, much of India was still officially the dominion of the Mughal emperor. Anger among some social groups, however, was seething under the governor-generalship of James Dalhousie (18471856), who annexed the Punjab (1849) after victory in  the Second Sikh War, annexed seven princely states on the basis of lapse, annexed the key state of Oudh on the basis of misgovernment, and upset cultural sensibilities by banning Hindu practices such as Sati. The 1857 Sepoy Rebellion, or Indian Mutiny, an uprising initiated by Indian troops, called sepoys, who formed the bulk of the Companys armed forces, was the key turning point. Rumour had spread among them that their bullet cartridges were lubricated with pig and cow fat. The cartridges had to be bit open, so this upset the Hindu and Muslim soldiers. The Hindu religion held cows sacred, and for Muslims pork was considered Haraam. In one camp, 85 out of 90 sepoys would not accept the cartridges from their garrison officer. The British harshly punished those who would not by jailing them. The Indian people were outraged, and on May 10, 1857, sepoys marched to Delhi, and, with the help of soldiers stationed there, captured it. Fortunately for the British, many areas remained loyal and quiescent, allowing the revolt to be crushed after fierce fighting. One important consequence of the revolt was the final collapse of the Mughal dynasty. The mutiny also ended the system of dual control under which the British government and the British East India Company shared authority. The government relieved the company of its political responsibilities, and in 1858, after 258 years of existence, the company relinquished its role. Trained civil servants were recruited from graduates of British universities, and these men set out to rule India. Lord Canning (created earl in 1859), appointed Governor-General of India in 1856, became known as Clemency Canning as a term of derision for his efforts to restrain revenge against the Indians during the Indian Mutiny. When the Government of India was transferred from the Company to the Crown, Canning became the first viceroy of India.Rise of Indian nationalismThe denial of equal status to Indians was the immediate stimulus for the formation in 1885 of the National Congress, initially loyal to the Empire but committed from 1905 to increased self-government and by 1930 to outright independence. The Home charges, payments transferred from India for administrative costs, were a lasting source of nationalist grievance, though the flow declined in relative importance over the decades to independence in 1947.Although majority Hindu and minority Muslim political leaders were able to collaborate closely in their criticism of British policy into the 1920s, British support for a distinct Muslim political organisation, the Muslim League from 1906 and insistence from the 1920s on separate electorates for religious minorities, is seen by many in India as having contributed to Hindu-Muslim discord and the countrys eventual Partition.France in IndochinaFrance, which had lost its empire to the British by the end of the 18th century, had little geographical or commercial basis for expansion in Southeast Asia. After the 1850s, French imperialism was initially impelled by a nationalistic need to rival the United Kingdom and was supported intellectually by the concept of the superiority of French culture and Frances special civilisatricethe civilizing of the native through assimilation to French culture. The immediate pretext for French expansionism in Indochina was the protection of French religious missions in the area, coupled with a desire to find a southern route to China through Tonkin, the European name for the northern region of northern VietnamFrench religious and commercial interests were established in Indochina as early as the 17th century, but no concerted effort at stabilizing the French position was possible in the face of British strength in the Indian Ocean and French defeat in Europe at the beginning of the 19th century. A mid-19th century religious revival under the Second Empire provided the atmosphere within which interest in Indochina grew. Anti-Christian persecutions in the Far East provided the immediate cause. In 1856 the Chinese executed a French missionary in southeastern China, and in 1857 the Vietnamese emperor, faced with a domestic crisis, tried to destroy foreign influences in his country by executing the Spanish bishop of Tonkin. Under III, France decided that Catholicism would be eliminated in the Far East if France did not go to its aid, and accordingly the French joined the British against China in the Opium War from 1857 to 1860 and took action against Vietnam as well. By 1860, the French occupied Saigon.By the of Saigon in 1862, the Vietnamese emperor ceded France three provinces of southern Vietnam to form the French colony of Cochinchina; France also secured trade and religious privileges in the rest of Vietnam and a protectorate over Vietnams foreign relations. Gradually French power spread through exploration, the establishment of protectorates, and outright annexations. Their seizure of Hanoi in 1882 led directly to war with China (18831885), and the French victory confirmed French supremacy in the region. France governed Cochinchina as a direct colony, and central and northern Vietnam under the protectorates of Annam and Tonkin, and Cambodia as protectorates in one degree or another. Laos too was soon brought under French protection.By the beginning of the 20th century, France had created an empire in Indochina nearly 50 percent larger than the mother country. A Governor-General in Hanoi ruled Cochinchina directly and the other regions through a system of residents. Theoretically, the French maintained the precolonial rulers and administrative structures in Annam, Tonkin, Cochinchina, Cambodia, and Laos, but in fact the governor-generalship was a centralised fiscal and administrative regime ruling the entire region. Although the surviving native institutions were preserved in order to make French rule more acceptable, they were almost completely deprived of any independence of action. The ethnocentric French colonial administrators sought to assimilate the upper classes into Frances superior culture. While the French improved public services and provided commercial stability, the native standard of living declined and precolonial social structures eroded. Indochina, which had a population of over eighteen million in 1914, was important to France for its tin, pepper, coal, cotton, and rice. It is still a matter of debate, however, whether the colony was commercially profitable.Russia and The Great GameTsarist Russia is not often regarded as a colonial power such as the United Kingdom or France because of the manner of Russian expansions: unlike the United Kingdom, which expanded overseas, the Russian empire grew from the centre outward by a process of accretion, like the United States. In the 19th century, Russian expansion took the form of a struggle of an effectively landlocked country for access to a water port.While the British were consolidating their hold on India, Russian expansion had moved steadily eastward to the Pacific, then toward the Middle East, and finally to the frontiers of Persia and Afghanistan (both territories adjacent to British holdings in India). In response, the defense of Indias land frontiers and the control of all sea approaches to the Subcontinent via the Canal, the Sea, and the Gulf became preoccupations of British foreign policy in the 19th century.Anglo-Russian rivalry in the Middle East and Central Asia led to a brief confrontation over Afghanistan in the 1870s. In Persia (now Iran), both nations set up banks to extend their economic influence. The United Kingdom went so far as to invade Tibet, a land subordinate to the Chinese empire, in 1904, but withdrew when it became clear that Russian influence was insignificant and when Chinese resistance proved tougher than expected.In 1907, the United Kingdom and Russia signed an agreement which  on the surface ended their rivalry in Central Asia. (see Entente) As part of the entente, Russia agreed to deal with the sovereign of Afghanistan only through British intermediaries. In turn, the United Kingdom would not annex or occupy Afghanistan. Chinese suzerainty over Tibet also was recognised by both Russia and the United Kingdom, since nominal control by a weak China was preferable to control by either power. Persia was divided into Russian and British spheres of influence and an intervening neutral zone. The United Kingdom and Russia chose to reach these uneasy compromises because of growing concern on the part of both powers over German expansion in strategic areas of China and Africa.Following the entente, Russia increasingly intervened in Persian domestic politics and suppressed nationalist movements that threatened both Petersburg and London. After the Russian Revolution, Russia gave up its claim to a sphere of influence, though Soviet involvement persisted alongside the United Kingdoms until the 1940s.In the Middle East, a German company built a railroad from Constantinople to Baghdad and the Gulf. Germany wanted to gain economic influence in the region and then, perhaps, move on to Iran and India. This was met with bitter resistance by the United Kingdom, Russia, and France who divided the region among themselves.Imperialism in ChinaQing territorial expansionBy the late 19th century, in response to competition with other states, the Qing government of China attempted to exert direct control of its frontier areas by conquest or, if already under military control, conversion into provinces.The Qing had also expanded into Taiwan near the beginning of its dynasty, but did not convert it into a province until 1885, after Japanese interest and French invasion had challenged Qing control. Some Western studies of the Qing dynasty have used the concept of colonialism as a framework to describe the expansion of the Qing into Taiwan.(Taiwans Imagined Geography: Chinese Colonial Travel Writing and Pictures, 16831895. By Emma Jinhua Teng. Cambridge MA and London: Harvard University Asia) The use of the term colonialism or imperialism to describe this expansion is controversial, as it contests the claims of current governments to rule Taiwan.After British troops invaded Tibet in the waning days of the Qing Dynasty, the Qing responded by sending Erfeng to further integrate Tibet into China.  He succeeded in abolishing the powers of the Tibetan local leaders in Kham and appointing Chinese magistrates in their places by 190910. Qing forces were also sent to -Tsang in 1910 to establish a direct control over Tibet proper, though a province was never established in this area.Process of expansionThe ability of Qing China to project power into Asia came about because of two changes, one social and one technological.  The social change was that under the Qing dynasty, from 1642, China came under the control of the Manchus who organised their military forces around cavalry which was more suited for projection than traditional Chinese infantry.  The technological change was advances in the cannon and artillery which negated the military advantage that the people of the Steppe had with their cavalry (although cannons and firearms were used in China centuries beforehand to combat similar threats, see of Song Dynasty). Zunghar Khanate (   ) was the last great independent nomadic power on the steppe in Central Asia. The Dzungars were deliberately exterminated in a brutal campaign of ethnic genocide. It has been estimated that more than a million people were slaughtered, and it took generations for it to recover.(Tyler (2003), p. 55)  The Manchu ruling family (Gioro) was a supporter of Tibetan Buddhism and so many of the ruling groups were linked by religion. China most of the time had little ambitions to conquer or establish colonies. There were exceptions to this, such as the ancient Dynasty (202 BC-220 AD) establishing control over northern Vietnam, northern Korea, and the Basin of Central Asia. The short-lived Dynasty (581618 AD) had high imperial aims, reinvading Annam (northern Vietnam) and attacking Champa (southern Vietnam), while they also attempted to conquer Korea, which failed (see Wars). The later Dynasty (618907) aided the Korean Silla Kingdom in defeating their two Korean rivals, yet became shortchanged when they discovered Silla was not about to allow the Tang to claim much of Goguryeos territory (as it had been under the Chinese Han Dynastys control a few centuries before, the Han having wrested it from native kingdoms at that time). The Tang Dynasty established control over the Tarim Basin region as well, fighting wars with the new Tibetan Empire and stripping them of their colonies in Central Asia (which was abandoned after the Lushan Rebellion). The Dynasty (9601279), in securing maritime trade routes that ran from South East Asia into the Indian Ocean, had established fortified trade bases in the Philippines. The Mongol-lead Dynasty (12791368) made attempts to invade Japan after securing the Korean peninsula through the vassaldom of the Korean Goryeo dynasty, yet both of these military ventures failed (see Invasions of Japan). Yet even when the Chinese had established their first standing navy in the 12th century (under the Southern Song), and when they had the worlds strongest and biggest naval fleet during the Dynasty (13681644), their aim was not colonisation, but tribute gathering. Rather, Chinese immigrated overseas to areas outside the control of their government.  For instance, numerous southern Chinese emigrants settled in areas of Southeast Asia outside Chinese political control; to this day their descendants remain an economic elite, especially in Malaysia and Singapore, and to a fair extent, also in Indonesia and the Philippines.European penetration of ChinaImage:China imperialism cartoon.jpg|left|200px|thumb|A shocked mandarin in Manchu robe in the back, with Queen Victoria (UK), William II (Germany), Nicholas II (Russia), Marianne (France), and a samurai (Japan) cutting up a pie with Chine (China in French) written on it.The 16th century brought many Jesuit missionaries to China, such as Ricci, who established missions where Western science was introduced, and where Europeans gathered knowledge of Chinese society, history, culture, and science. During the 18th century, merchants from Western Europe came to China in increasing numbers. However, merchants were confined to Guangzhou and the Portuguese colony of Macau, as they had been since the 16th century. European traders were increasingly irritated by what they saw as the relatively high customs duties they had to pay and by the attempts to curb the growing import trade in opium. By 1800, its importation was forbidden by the imperial government. However, the opium trade continued to boom.Early in the 19th century, serious internal weaknesses developed in the dynasty that left China vulnerable to Western, Japanese, and Russian imperialism. In 1839, China found itself fighting the Opium War with Britain. China was defeated, and in 1842, agreed to the provisions of the of Nanjing. Kong Island was ceded to Britain, and certain ports, including Shanghai and Guangzhou, were opened to British trade and residence. In 1856, the Opium War broke out. The Chinese were again defeated, and now forced to the terms of the 1858 of Tientsin.  The treaty opened new ports to trade and allowed foreigners to travel in the interior. Christians gained the right to propagate their religionanother means of Western penetration. The United States and Russia later obtained the same prerogatives in separate treaties.Toward the end of the 19th century, China appeared on the way to territorial dismemberment and economic vassalagethe fate of Indias rulers that played out much earlier. Several provisions of these treaties caused long-standing bitterness and humiliation among the Chinese: extraterritoriality (meaning that in a dispute with a Chinese person, a Westerner had the right to be tried in a court under the laws of his own country), customs regulation, and the right to station foreign warships in Chinese waters.The rise of Japan since the Restoration as an imperial power led to further subjugation of China. In a dispute over Chinas longstanding claim of suzerainty in Korea, war broke out between China and Japan, resulting in humiliating defeat for the Chinese. By the of Shimonoseki (1895), China was forced to recognize effective Japanese rule of Korea and Taiwan was ceded to Japan until its recovery in 1945 at the end of the WWII by the Republic of China.Chinas defeat at the hands of Japan was another trigger for future aggressive actions by Western powers. In 1897, Germany demanded and was given a set of exclusive mining and railroad rights in Shandong province. Russia obtained access to Dairen and Port Arthur and the right to build a railroad across Manchuria, thereby achieving complete domination over a large portion of northwestern China. The United Kingdom and France also received a number of concessions. At this time, much of China was divided up into spheres of influence: Germany dominated Jiaozhou (Kiaochow) Bay, Shandong, and the He (Hwang-Ho) valley; Russia dominated the Peninsula and Manchuria; the United Kingdom dominated Weihaiwei and the Yangtze Valley; and France dominated the Bay and several other southern provinces.China continued to be divided up into these spheres until the United States, which had no sphere of influence, grew alarmed at the possibility of its businessmen being excluded from Chinese markets. In 1899, Secretary of State Hay asked the major powers to agree to a policy of equal trading privileges. In 1900, several powers agreed to the U.S.-backed scheme, giving rise to the Open Door policy, denoting freedom of commercial access and non-annexation of Chinese territory. In any event, it was in the European powers interest to have a weak but independent Chinese government. The privileges of the Europeans in China were guaranteed in the form of treaties with the Qing government. In the event that the Qing government totally collapsed, each power risked losing the privileges that it already had negotiated.The erosion of Chinese sovereignty contributed to a spectacular anti-foreign outbreak in June 1900, when the Boxers (properly the society of the righteous and harmonious fists) attacked European legations in Beijing, provoking a rare display of unity among the powers, whose troops landed at Tianjin and marched on the capital. British and French forces looted, plundered and burned the Summer Palace to the ground for the second time (the first time being in 1860, following the Second Opium War), as a form of threat to force the Qing empire to give in to their demands. German forces were particularly severe in exacting revenge for the killing of their ambassador, while Russia tightened its hold on Manchuria in the northeast until its crushing defeat by Japan in the war of 19041905.Although extraterritorial jurisdiction was abandoned by the United Kingdom and the United States in 1943, foreign political control of parts of China only finally ended with the incorporation of Hong Kong and the small Portuguese territory of Macau into the Republic of China in 1997 and 1999 respectively.U.S. Imperialism in the Pacific and AsiaImage:Filipinoinsurgents.jpg|thumb|1899 photo of Filipino troops killed by Americans in the War.As the United States emerged as a new imperial power in the Pacific and Asia, one of the two oldest Western imperialist powers in the regions, Spain, was finding it increasingly difficult to maintain control of territories it had held in the regions since the 16th century. In 1896, a widespread revolt against Spanish rule broke out in the Philippines. Meanwhile, the recent string of U.S. territorial gains in the Pacific posed an even greater threat to Spains remaining colonial holdings.In 1867, the Islands were occupied by the U.S. and Alaska was purchased from Russia. The next advance was in the Islands, where Europeans had earlier set up a lucrative plantation economy exporting sugar. In the 19th century U.S. capital poured into the islands sugar industry; and Hawaii came increasingly under the effective control of U.S. corporations. The U.S. consolidated its influence in Hawaii in 1893, when Marines engineered a revolt that deposed the Hawaiian queen and set up a new U.S.-backed regime. Five years later, the U.S. dissolved the republic and annexed the islands.As the U.S. continued to expand its economic and military power in the Pacific, it declared war against Spain in 1898. During the War, U.S. Admiral Dewey destroyed the Spanish fleet at Manila and U.S. troops landed in the Philippines. Spain later agreed by treaty to cede the Philippines in Asia and Guam in the Pacific. In the Caribbean, Spain ceded Rico to the U.S. The war also marked the end of Spanish rule in Cuba, which was to be granted nominal independence but remained heavily influenced by the U.S. government and U.S. business interests. One year following its treaty with Spain, the U.S. occupied the small Pacific outpost of Island.The Filipinos, who assisted U.S. troops in fighting the Spanish, wished to establish an independent state and, on June 12, 1898, declared independence from Spain. In 1899, fighting between the Filipino nationalists and the U.S. broke out; it took the U.S. almost fifteen years to fully subdue the insurgency. The U.S. sent 70,000 troops and suffered thousands of casualties. The Filipinos, however, suffered considerably higher casualties, through fighting, extrajudicial executions and disease.U.S. attacks into the countryside often included scorched earth campaigns where entire villages were burned and destroyed, tortured, and concentrated into camps known as protected zones. Many of these civilian casualties resulted from disease and famine. Reports of the execution of U.S. soldiers taken prisoner by the Filipinos led to disproportionate reprisals by American forces. Many U.S. officers and soldiers called the war a nigger killing business.In 1914, C. Worcester, U.S. Secretary of the Interior for the Philippines (19011913) described the regime of civilisation and improvement which started with American occupation and resulted in developing naked savages into cultivated and educated men. Nevertheless, some Americans, such as Twain, deeply opposed American involvement/imperialism in the Philippines, leading to the abandonment of attempts to construct a permanent U.S. naval base and using it as an entry point to the Chinese market. In 1916, Congress guaranteed the independence of the Philippines by 1945.World War I: Changes in ImperialismWorld War I brought about the fall of several empires in Europe. This had repercussions around the world. The defeated Powers included Germany and the Turkish Empire. Germany lost all of its colonies in Asia. German New Guinea, a part of New Guinea, became administered by Australia. German possessions and concessions in China, including Qingdao, became the subject of a controversy during the Paris Peace Conference when the government in China agreed to cede these interests to Japan, to the anger of many Chinese people. Although the Chinese diplomats refused to sign the agreement, these interests were ceded to Japan with the support of the United States and the United Kingdom.Turkey gave up her Arab provinces; Syria, Palestine, and Mesopotamia (now Iraq) came under French and British control as of Nations Mandates. The discovery of petroleum first in Iran and then in the Arab lands in the interbellum provided a new focus for activity on the part of the United Kingdom, France, and the United States.JapanIn 1641, all Westerners were thrown out of Japan. For the next two centuries, Japan was free from Western influence, except for at the port of Nagasaki, which Japan allowed Dutch merchant vessels to enter on a limited basis.Japans freedom from Western penetration ended on 8 July 1853, when Commodore Matthew Perry of the Navy sailed a squadron of black-hulled warships into Edo (modern Tokyo) harbor. The Japanese told Perry to sail to Nagasaki but he refused. Perry sought to present a letter from U.S. President Fillmore to the emperor which demanded concessions from Japan. Japanese authorities responded by stating that they could not present the letter directly to the emperor, but scheduled a meeting on July 14 with a representative of the emperor. On 14 July, the squadron sailed towards the shore, giving a demonstration of their cannons firepower thirteen times. Perry landed with a large detachment of Marines and presented the emperors representative with Fillmores letter. Perry said he would return, and did so, this time with even more war ships. The U.S. show of force led to Japans concession to the of Kanagawa on 31 March 1854.  These events made Japanese authorities aware that the country was lacking technologically and needed to industrialise in order to keep their power. This realisation eventually led to the Restoration.The Restoration of 1868 led to administrative modernisation and subsequent rapid economic development. Japan had little natural resources of her own and needed both overseas markets and sources of raw materials, fuelling a drive for imperial conquest which began with the defeat of China in 1895.Taiwan, ceded by Dynasty China, became the first Japanese colony. In 1899 Japan won agreement from the powers to abandon extraterritoriality, and an alliance with the United Kingdom established it in 1902 as an international power. Its spectacular defeat of Russia in 1905 gave it the southern portion of the island of Sakhalin, the former Russian lease of the Peninsula with Port Arthur (Lshunkou), and extensive rights in Manchuria (see the War).Japans encroachment on Korea began with the 1876 of Kanghwa with the Dynasty of Korea, increased with the 1895 assassination of Myeongseong and the 1905 Treaty, and was completed with the 1910 Japan-Korea Annexation Treaty when Korea was formally annexed to the Japanese empire, see under Japanese rule.Japan was now one of the most powerful forces in the East, and in 1914, it entered World War I on the side of the United Kingdom, seizing German-occupied Kiaochow and subsequently demanding Chinese acceptance of Japanese political influence and territorial acquisitions (Demands, 1915). Mass protests in Peking in 1919 coupled with Allied (and particularly U.S.) opinion led to Japans abandonment of most of the demands and Jiaozhous return (1922) to China.Japans rebuff was perceived in Tokyo as only temporary, and in 1931, Japanese army units based in Manchuria seized control of the region; full-scale war with China followed in 1937, drawing Japan toward an overambitious bid for Asian hegemony (East Asia Co-Prosperity Sphere), which ultimately led to defeat and the loss of all its overseas territories after World War II (see expansionism and nationalism).Post World War II eraDecolonisation and the rise of nationalism in AsiaIn the aftermath of World War II, European colonies, controlling more than one billion people throughout the world, still ruled most of the Middle East, South East Asia, and the Indian Subcontinent. However, the image of European pre-eminence was shattered by the wartime Japanese occupations of large portions of British, French, and Dutch territories in the Pacific. The destabilisation of European rule led to the rapid growth of nationalist movements in Asia  especially in Indonesia, Malaya, Burma, and French Indochina.The war, however, only accelerated forces already in existence undermining Western imperialism in Asia. Throughout the colonial world, the processes of urbanisation and capitalist investment created professional merchant classes that emerged as new Westernised elites. While imbued with Western political and economic ideas, these classes increasingly grew to resent their unequal status under European rule.British in India and the Middle EastIn India, the westward movement of Japanese forces towards Bengal during World War II had led to major concessions on the part of British authorities to Indian nationalist leaders. In 1947, the United Kingdom, devastated by war and embroiled in economic crisis at home, granted India its independence as two nations: India and Pakistan. The following year independence was granted to Burma and Ceylon.In the Middle East, the United Kingdom granted independence to Jordan in 1946 and two years later ended its mandate of Palestine, an action that led to the creation of the state of Israel and decades of bitter wars between this new nation and the Arab world, which continues to this day. (see conflict)Dutch East IndiesFollowing the end of the war, nationalists in Indonesia demanded complete independence from the Netherlands. A brutal conflict ensued, and finally, in 1949, through Nations mediation, the Dutch East Indies achieved independence, becoming the new nation of Indonesia. Dutch imperialism moulded this new multi-ethnic state comprising roughly 3,000 islands of the Indonesian archipelago with a population at the time of over 100 million.The end of Dutch rule opened up latent tensions between the roughly 300 distinct ethnic groups of the islands, with the major ethnic fault line being between the Javanese and the non-Javanese.United States in AsiaIn the Philippines, the U.S. remained committed to its previous pledges to grant the islands their independence, and the Philippines became the first of the Western-controlled Asian colonies to be granted independence post-World War II. However, the Philippines remained under pressure to adopt a political and economic system similar to their old imperial master.This aim was greatly complicated by the rise of new political forces. During the war, the Hukbalahap (Peoples Army), which had strong ties to the Party of the Philippines (PKP), fought against the Japanese occupation of the Philippines and won strong popularity among many sectors of the Filipino working class and peasantry. In 1946, the PKP participated in elections as part of the Democratic Alliance. However, with the onset of the War, its growing political strength drew a reaction from the ruling government and the United States, resulting in the repression of the PKP and its associated organisations. In 1948, the PKP began organizing an armed struggle against the government and continued U.S. military presence. In 1950, the PKP created the Peoples Liberation Army (Hukbong Mapagpalaya ng Bayan), which mobilised thousands of troops throughout the islands. The insurgency lasted until 1956, when the PKP gave up armed struggle.In 1968, the PKP underwent a split, and in 1969 the Maoist faction of the PKP created the Peoples Army. Maoist rebels re-launched an armed struggle against the government and the U.S. military presence in the Philippines, which continues to this day.France in IndochinaPost-war resistance to French ruleFrance remained determined to retain its control of Indochina. However, in Hanoi, in 1945, a broad front of nationalists and socialists led by Chi Minh established an independent Republic of Vietnam, commonly referred to as the Minh regime by Western outsiders. France, seeking to regain control of Vietnam, countered with a vague offer of self-government under French rule. Frances offers were unacceptable to Vietnamese nationalists; and in December 1946, war broke out between France and the Viet Minh. Meanwhile, the French managed to set up a puppet regime in Saigon in 1950. The U.S. then recognised the regime in Saigon, and provided the French military effort massive military aid.The French were also forced to deal with resistance in Cambodia. In 1945, Cambodia declared its independence as the Kingdom of Kampuchea, with Sihanouk installed as monarch and Ngoc Thanh acting as prime minister. The French wanted to reassert control, but were unable to act at the time. The United Kingdom supported Frances efforts to reassert its control of Cambodia, but were unable to act. On October 8, 1945, the British arrived in Penh with a detachment of Nepali Gurkhas. Thanh was arrested, and the government was overthrown, with the French put back in charge.Later, anti-colonial militants retreated into the countryside and formed armed groups known as the Issarak (Khmer Independence). They operated initially along the border with Thailand and were assisted by the Thai government. In the countryside, French forces fought the Khmer Issarak. However, the French were not able to fully regain their control of Cambodia. On 17 April 1950, the first national conference of the Khmer resistance was held and the Issarak Front was created, with Ngoc Minh at the head. Sihanouk demanded sovereignty from the French and on 9 November 1953, Cambodia was granted independence.Meanwhile, in Vietnam, the French war against the Viet Minh regime, begun in 1946, continued for nearly eight years. The French were gradually worn down by guerrilla and jungle fighting. The turning point for France occurred at Bien Phu in 1954, which resulted in the surrender of ten thousand French troops. Paris was forced to accept a political settlement that year at the Geneva Conference, which led to a precarious set of agreements regarding the future political status of Laos, Cambodia, and Vietnam.Postcolonialism and the Vietnam WarAs France withdrew from Indochina, the U.S. moved into Frances old role in supporting the pro-Western Saigon regime, leading to the war.Post-colonialism and war in CambodiaThe United States also became involved in Cambodias domestic politics. The U.S. became increasingly unhappy with Sihanouk because of his non-aligned stance in the War and the war between the Hanoi and Saigon regimes in Vietnam.U.S. armed forces then entered Cambodia from the Vietnam-Cambodia border. However, massive protest by students and workers in the U.S. forced the US to withdraw its land forces from Cambodia. Sihanouk declared Nols government illegitimate and formed a government-in-exile in Beijing known as the Government of the National Union of Kampuchea (GRUNK) and a political coalition in Cambodia known as the United Front of Kampuchea (FUNK), which in turn was aligned with the Peoples National Liberation Armed Forces (CPNLAF). The U.S. Air Force attacked the base of the CPNLAF, the Cambodian countryside, dropping hundreds of thousands of tons of bombs, killing many people. By 1975, the CPNLAF had defeated Lon Nols army and on 17 April 1975 the CPNLAF entered Phnom Penh and ousted Lon Nols regime. However, the loose coalition behind CPNLAF proved unable to establish itself as a stable postcolonial regime. The ensuing Civil War resulted in decades of political turmoil and the emergence of the Rouge, making Cambodia the stage to one of the bloodiest conflicts in the 20th century.List of European colonial acquisitions in Asia*Burma (18241948, merged with India by the British from 1886 to 1937)*Ceylon (now Lanka)::Ceylon (15051658):Ceylon (16561796):Ceylon (18151948)*Timor (17021975, now Timor)*Hong Kong (1842-1997)*India (includes the territory of present day India, Pakistan and Bangladesh)::India (15101961):India (17691954):India (16051825):India (16961869):India (16131947)::British East India Company (17571858)::Raj (18581947)*Indochina (18871953), including::* French Laos:*French Cambodia:*Annam (now Vietnam)*East Indies (now Indonesia)  Dutch colony from 1602  1949 (included New Guinea until 1962)*Macau  Portuguese colony, the first European colony in China (15571999), longest European occupation in Asia, 442 years.*Malaya (now part of Malaysia)::Malacca (15111641):Malacca (16411824):Malaya, included:::*Settlements (18261946)::*Malay States (18951946)::*Malay States:of Malaya (under British rule, 19481963)*Borneo (now part of Malaysia), including::*Labuan (18461963):*North Borneo (18821963):*of Sarawak (19461963)*Manchuria  ceded to Empire through of Aigun (1858) and of Peking (1860)*Philippines::Philippines (15651898, 2nd longest European occupation in Asia, 333 years),:of the Philippines, States colony (18981946, excluding the Japanese occupation during War II)*Singapore  British colony (18191959)*Taiwan::Formosa (16261642):Formosa (16241662)References and further reading* Erik Ringmar, Fury of the Europeans: Liberal Barbarism and the Destruction of the Emperors Summer PalaceReferences th:
16223
Joel
Joel or Yoel may refer to:* (given name), origin of the name including a list of people with the first name* (prophet), a prophet of an ancient Israel** of Joel, a book in the Jewish Tanakh, and the Christian Bible*JO:EL, Danish rapper, singer and producer, signed to Danish Tabu RecordsJoel is the surname of:* family, a British family of brothers who became rich from diamond and gold mining in South Africa* Joel* Joel, an American singer-songwriter* Joel (philosopher), German philosopher* Amson Joel, German entrepreneur* Joel, American war hero and Medal of Honor recipient* Jol, Silesian Jewish philosopher* M. Joel, president of Yeshiva University* Joel, American actorJoel or Yoel is the given name of:* Spitzer, cessation educator who often signs his posts Joel* Stransky, South African rugby union player* Judah, American 3x world champion kickboxer and boxer & trainer* Teitelbaum former Rebbe of Satmar. He was probably the best known Haredi opponent of all forms of modern political Zionism.(desambiguaci)nl:Joelno:Joel(ujednoznacznienie)pt:Joelro:Ioelru:sk:Joel
16674
Kiribati
footnotes                 1 Supplemented by a nearly equal amount from external sources.Kiribati ( ;()), officially the Republic of Kiribati, is an nation located in the central tropical Ocean. The permanent population exceeds just over 100,000 (2011),() and is composed of 32 atolls  and one raised coral island, dispersed over 3.5 million square kilometres, (1,351,000 square miles) straddling the equator, and bordering the Date Line at its easternmost point.The name Kiribati is the local pronunciation of Gilberts, derived from the main island chain, the Islands. The capital of Tarawa consists of a number of islets connected through a series of causeways, located in the Tarawa archipelago. Kiribati became independent from the Kingdom in 1979. It is a member of the of Nations, the IMF and the Bank, and became a full member of the Nations in 1999.EtymologyKiribati was named in French by captains Krusenstern and Isidore Duperrey les Gilbert,(Both maps, published in 1820, were written in French. In English, the archipelago was named Kingsmill during most of the XIXth Century and its name start to be Gilberts only in 1892.) Gilbert Islands, after the British Captain Thomas Gilbert, who sighted the islands in 1788. The current name, Kiribati, is an adaptation of Gilberts, from the former European name the Gilbert Islands. Although the indigenous language name for the Gilbert Islands proper is Tungaru, the new state chose the name Kiribati, the Gilbertese rendition of Gilberts, as an equivalent of the former colony to acknowledge the inclusion of islands which were never considered part of the Gilberts chain.(Ernest Sabatier. Dictionnaire gilbertin-franais Tabuiroa, 1954 says that Kiribati is already the meaning for all the Gilberts District of GEIC. But Reilly Ridgell. Pacific Nations and Territories: The Islands of Micronesia, Melanesia, and Polynesia. 3rd Edition. Honolulu: Bess Press, 1995. p. 95)HistoryFile:Tarawa.jpg|thumb|250px|left|text-top||American marines assault a Japanese bunker during the of Tarawa, November 1943.File:CarolinePic-Kepler-Long.JPG|thumb|right|300px|Atoll channel between west side of Long Island and Nake Island.Early historyThe area now called Kiribati has been inhabited by Micronesians speaking the same Oceanic language since sometime between 3000 BC(Cinderellas of the Empire, Barrie Macdonald, IPS, of the South Pacific, 2001, p. 1) and AD 1300. The area was not isolated; invaders from Tonga, Samoa, and Fiji later introduced Polynesian and Melanesian cultural aspects, respectively. Intermarriage tended to blur cultural differences and resulted in a significant degree of cultural homogenisation.(I-Kiribati Ministry of Finance and Economic Development: History)Colonial eraThe islands were first sighted by British and American ships in the late 18th and early 19th centuries. The main island chain was named the Islands in 1820 by a Russian admiral, Adam von Krusenstern, and French captain Louis Duperrey, after a British captain named Thomas Gilbert, who crossed the archipelago in 1788 when sailing from Australia to China.()From the early 19th century, Western whalers, merchant vessels and slave traders visited the islands, introducing diseases and firearms.(see reference note n3) The first British settlers arrived in 1837. In 1892 the Gilbert Islands consented to become a British protectorate together with the nearby Islands. They were administered by the Western Pacific High Commission based in Fiji.( Together they became the colony of the and Ellice Islands in 1916. Christmas Island (or Kiritimati) became part of the colony in 1919 and the Islands were added in 1937.Atoll and others of the Gilbert group were occupied by Japan during World War II. Tarawa was the site of one of the bloodiest battles in US Marine Corps history. Marines landed in November 1943; the of Tarawa was fought at Kiribatis former capital Betio on Tarawa Atoll.Some of the islands of Kiribati, especially in the remote Islands, were formerly used by the United States and United Kingdom for weapons testing including hydrogen bombs in the late 1950s and early 1960s.Independence to present dayThe Gilbert and Ellice Islands gained self-rule in 1971, and were separated in 1975 and granted internal self-government by Britain. In 1978 the Ellice Islands became the independent nation of Tuvalu. The Gilbert Islands became independent as Kiribati on 12 July 1979. Although the indigenous language name for the Gilbert Islands proper is Tungaru, the new state chose the name Kiribati, the Gilbertese rendition of Gilberts, as an equivalent of the former colony to acknowledge the inclusion of Banaba, the Islands, and the Islands, which were never considered part of the Gilberts chain.(Reilly Ridgell. Pacific Nations and Territories: The Islands of Micronesia, Melanesia, and Polynesia. 3rd Edition. Honolulu: Bess Press, 1995. p. 95) In the of Tarawa, signed shortly after independence and ratified in 1983, the United States relinquished all claims to the sparsely inhabited Phoenix Islands and those of the Line Islands that are part of Kiribati territory.Overcrowding has been a problem. In 1988 it was announced that 4,700 residents of the main island group would be resettled onto less-populated islands. Tito was elected president in 1994. Kiribatis 1995 act of moving the date line far to the east to encompass the Line Islands group, so that it would no longer be divided by the date line, courted controversy. The move, which fulfilled one of President Titos campaign promises, was intended to allow businesses all across the expansive nation to keep the same business week. This also enabled Kiribati to become the first country to see the dawn of the third millennium, an event of significance for tourism. Tito was reelected in 1998. Kiribati gained UN membership in 1999.()In 2002 Kiribati passed a controversial law enabling the government to shut down newspapers. The legislation followed the launching of Kiribatis first successful nongovernment-run newspaper. President Tito was reelected in 2003, but was removed from office in March 2003 by a no-confidence vote and replaced by a Council of State. Tong of the opposition party Te Koaua was elected to succeed Tito in July 2003. He was re-elected in 2007.()In the summer of 2008, Kiribati officials asked Australia and New Zealand to accept Kiribati citizens as permanent refugees. Kiribati is expected to be the first country in which all land territory disappears due to global change. In June 2008, the Kiribati president Tong said that the country has reached the point of no return; he added: To plan for the day when you no longer have a country is indeed painful but I think we have to do that.(Leader of disappearing island nation says climate change an issue of survival, not economics, Herald Tribune, 5 June 2008)(Kiribatis President: Our Lives Are At Stake: For the Islands of Kiribati, Global Warming Poses Immediate Dangers, Broadcasting Corporation, 2 April 2007)(Paradise lost: climate change forces South Sea islanders to seek sanctuary abroad, The Independent, 6 June 2008)(Tiny atoll in Pacific cries out for help, The Times of India, 6 June 2008)PoliticsThe Kiribati Constitution, promulgated 12 July 1979, provides for free and open elections. The executive branch consists of a president (te Beretitenti), a vice president and a cabinet (the president is also chief of the cabinet and has to be an MP). Under the constitution, the president, nominated from among the elected legislators, is limited to three 4-year terms. The cabinet is composed of the president, vice president and 10 ministers (appointed by the president) who are members of the House of Assembly.The legislative branch is the unicameral Maneaba Ni Maungatabu (House of Assembly). It has elected members, including by constitutional mandate a representative of the Banaban people in Fiji (Banaba Island, former Ocean Island), in addition to the attorney general, who serves as an ex-officio member. Legislators serve for a four-year term.The constitutional provisions governing administration of justice are similar to those in other former British possessions in that the judiciary is free from governmental interference. The judicial branch is made up of the High Court (in Betio) and the Court of Appeal. The president appoints the presiding judges.Local government is through island councils with elected members. Local affairs are handled in a manner similar to town meetings in colonial America. Island councils make their own estimates of revenue and expenditure and generally are free from central government controls.Kiribati has formal political parties but their organisation is quite informal. Ad hoc opposition groups tend to coalesce around specific issues. Today the only recognisable parties are the Boutokaan te Koaua Party, Maneaban te Mauri Party, Maurin Kiribati Party  and Tabomoa Party. There is universal suffrage at age 18.In government terms, Kiribati has a police force, which carries out law enforcement functions and paramilitary duties, and which has small police posts on all islands, but no military. The police have one patrol boat.()Island groupsKiribati was formally divided into districts until its independence. The country is now divided into three island groups which have no administrative function, including a group which unites the Line Islands and the Phoenix Islands (ministry at London, Christmas). Each inhabited island has its own council (three councils on Tarawa: Betio, South-Tarawa, North-Tarawa; two councils on Tabiteuea).The original districts used to be:* Banaba* Atoll* Gilbert Islands* Gilbert Island* Southern Gilbert Islands* IslandsThe island groups include:* Islands* Islands, the second largest protected reserve in the world ()() since the establishment of the Archipelago as a marine reserve.* IslandsFour of the former districts (including Tarawa) lie in the Islands, where most of the countrys population lives. Five of the Islands are uninhabited (Island, Island, Island, Island and Island). The Islands are uninhabited except for Kanton, and have no representation. Banaba itself is sparsely inhabited now. There is also a non-elected representative of the Banabans on Island in Fiji. Each of the 21 inhabited islands has a local council that takes care of the daily affairs. Atoll has three councils: Betio Town Council, Te Inainano Urban Council (for the rest of Tarawa) and Eutan Tarawa Council (for North Tarawa).Foreign relationsKiribati was admitted as the 186th member of the United Nations in September 1999.Regional relationsKiribati maintains cordial relations with most countries and has close relations with its Pacific neighbours, Japan, Australia and New Zealand, which provide the majority of the countrys foreign aid. Taiwan and Japan also have specified-period licences to fish in Kiribatis waters. In November 1999 it was announced that Japans Space Development Agency planned to lease land on Kiritimati (Christmas Island) for 20 years, on which to build a spaceport.  The agreement stipulated that Japan was to pay US$840,000 per year and would also pay for any damage to roads and the environment. A Japanese-built downrange station operates on Kiritimati() and an abandoned airfield on the island was designated as the landing strip for a proposed reusable unmanned shuttle called HOPE-X. HOPE-X, however, was eventually cancelled by Japan in 2003. International relations of climate change As one of the worlds most vulnerable nations in terms of the effects of climate change, Kiribati has been an active participant in international diplomatic efforts relating to climate change, most importantly the UNFCCC conferences of the parties (COP). Kiribati is a member of the of Small Island States (AOSIS), an intergovernmental organization of low-lying coastal and small Island countries. Established in 1990, the main purpose of the alliance is to consolidate the voices of Island Developing States (SIDS) to address global warming. AOSIS has been very active from its inception, putting forward the first draft text in the Protocol negotiations as early as 1994.In 2009 President Tong attended the Vulnerable Forum (V11) in the Maldives, along with 10 other countries that are vulnerable to climate-change, and signed the Bandos Island declaration on Nov. 10 2009, pledging to show moral leadership and commence greening their economies by voluntarily committing to achieving carbon neutrality. In November 2010, Kiribati will host the Climate Change Conference (TCCC), the purpose of which is to support the initiative of the President of Kiribati to hold a consultative forum between vulnerable states and their partners with a view of creating an enabling environment for multi-party negotiations under the auspices of the UNFCCC. The conference is a successor event to the Climate Vulnerable Forum. Based on the lessons learned in the COP process to-date, the TCCC proposes a more inclusive format of consultations, involving key partners among major developed and developing nations.(Government of Kiribati announces the Tarawa Climate Change Conference) The TCCC will be a major advocacy and partnership building event embedded in the overall context of global and regional (Pacific) consultations on climate change. Furthermore, the TCCC aims to be an integral part of the process of regional and global consultations scheduled to take place in 2010. The ultimate objective of TCCC is to reduce the number and intensity of various fault lines between parties to the COP process, explore elements of agreement between the parties and thereby to support Kiribatis and other parties contribution to COP16 to be held in Cancun, Mexico, from 29 November to 10 December 2010.GeographyKiribati consists of about 32 atolls and one solitary island (Banaba), extending into both the eastern and western hemispheres. The groups of islands are:* Banaba: an isolated island between Nauru and the Gilbert Islands* Islands: 16 atolls located some  north of Fiji* Islands: 8 atolls and coral islands located some   southeast of the Gilberts* Islands: 8 atolls and one reef, located about   east of the GilbertsBanaba (or Ocean Island) is a raised-coral island which was once a rich source of phosphates, but it was mostly mined out before independence. The rest of the land in Kiribati consists of the sand and reef rock islets of atolls or coral islands which rise but a few metres (half a dozen feet or so) above sea level.The soil is thin and calcareous, making agriculture very difficult.Kiritimati (Christmas Island) in the Line Islands is the worlds largest atoll. Based on a 1995 realignment of the Date Line, Kiribati is now the easternmost country in the world, and the Islands is the first area to enter into a new year, including year 2000. For that reason, the Island has been renamed Island.() The majority of Kiribati, including the capital, is not first, for example New Zealand (UTC+13 in January) has an earlier new year.According to the Regional Environment Programme(previously South Pacific Regional Environment Programme (SPREP)), two small uninhabited Kiribati islets, Tebua Tarawa and Abanuea, disappeared underwater in 1999.()  The islet of Tepuka Savilivili (Tuvalu; not a Gilbertese name) no longer has any coconut trees due to salt water infiltration into the water table.(http://news.neoblack.com/news_item.asp?newsid1066) The United Nations Panel on Climate Change predicts that sea levels will rise by about half a metre (20 in) by 2100 due to warming and a further rise would be inevitable. It is thus likely that within a century the nations arable land will become subject to increased salination and will be largely submerged.()However, sea-level rise may not necessarily mean Kiribati will be inundated. Paul Kench at the University of Auckland in New Zealand and Arthur Webb at the South Pacific Applied Geoscience Commission in Fiji released a study in 2010 on the dynamic response of reef islands to sea level rise in the central Pacific. Kiribati was mentioned in the study, and Webb and Kench found that the three major urbanised islands in Kiribati - Betio, Bairiki and Nanikai - increased by 30 per cent (36 hectares), 16.3 per cent (5.8 hectares) and 12.5 per cent (0.8 hectares), respectively.(http://www.newscientist.com/article/mg20627633.700-shapeshifting-islands-defy-sealevel-rise.html)The Adaptation Program (KAP) is a US $5.5 million initiative that was originally enacted by the national government of Kiribati with the support of the Environment Facility (GEF), the Bank, the Nations Development Program, and the Japanese Government. Australia later joined the coalition, donating US $1.5 million to the effort. The program aims to take place over 6 years, supporting measures that reduce Kiribatis vulnerability to the effects of change and sea level rise by raising awareness of climate change, assessing and protecting available water resources, and managing inundation. At the start of the Adaptation Program, representatives from each of the inhabited atolls identified key climatic changes that had taken place over the past 20-40 years, and proposed coping mechanisms to deal with these changes under 4 categories of urgency of need. The program is now focusing on the countrys most vulnerable sectors in the most highly populated areas. Initiatives include improving water supply management in and around Tarawa; coastal management protection measures such as mangrove re-plantation and protection of public infrastructure; strengthening laws to reduce coastal erosion; and population settlement planning to reduce personal risks.(Government of Kiribati Climate Change Strategies)Kiribati is the only country in all four hemispheres.(http://www.worldatlas.com/aatlas/infopage/eastwestco.htm)EconomyKiribati is one of the worlds poorest countries. It has few natural resources. Commercially viable phosphate deposits on  Banaba  were exhausted at the time of independence. Copra and fish now represent the bulk of production and exports. Kiribati is considered one of the developed countries in the world. In one form or another, Kiribati gets a large portion of its income from abroad. Examples include fishing licenses, development assistance, worker remittances, and tourism. Given Kiribatis limited domestic production ability, it must import nearly all of its essential foodstuffs and manufactured items; it depends on these external sources of income for financing.The economy of Kiribati benefits from international development assistance programs. The multilateral donors providing development assistance in 2009 were the Union (A$9 million), the Nations Development Program (A$3.7 million), and the Health Organisation (A$100,000).(  The bilateral donors providing development assistance in 2009 were Australia (A$11 million), Japan (A$2 million), Zealand (A$6.6 million), Taiwan (A$10.6 million), and other donors providing A$16.2 million, including technical assistance grants from the Development Bank.() ()The major donors in 2010/2011 were Australia (A$15 million), Taiwan (A$11 million); Zealand (A$6 million), the Bank (A$4 million), and the Development Bank.()In 1956 Kiribati established a wealth fund to act as a store of wealth for the countrys earnings from phosphate mining.In 2008, the Equalization Reserve Fund was valued at US$ 400 million.(Sovereign Wealth Fund Institute) The RERF assets declined from A$637 million (420 percent of GDP) in 2007 to A$570.5 million (350 percent of GDP) in 2009.() As the result of the Global Financial Crisis (GFC) the RERF was exposure to failed Icelandic banks, as well drawdowns were made by the government of Kiribati to finance budgetary shortfalls.(In May 2011 the IMF country report assessment of the Economy of Kiribati is that: After two years of contraction, the economy recovered in the second half of 2010 and inflation pressure dissipated. It is estimated to have grown by 1 percent for the year. Despite a weather-related drop in copra production, private sector activity appears to have picked up, especially in retail. Tourist arrivals rebounded by 20 percent compared to 2009, although from a very low base. Despite the rise in world food and fuel prices, inflation has bounced from 2008 crisis-highs into negative territory, reflecting the strong appreciation of the Australian dollar, which is used as the domestic currency, and a decline in the world price of rice. Credit growth in the overall economy declined in 2009 as economic activity stalled. But it started to pick up in the second half of 2010 as the recovery gained traction.(DemographicsThe native people of Kiribati are called I-Kiribati. The word Kiribati is the local spelling of the word Gilbert and the original name of this British colony was the Islands. The indigenous format of the name was adopted when independence was gained in 1979.Ethnically, the I-Kiribati are Micronesians. Recent archaeological evidence indicates that Austronesians originally settled the islands thousands of years ago. Around the 14th century, Fijians, Samoans, and Tongans invaded the islands, thus diversifying the ethnic range and introducing Polynesian linguistic traits. Intermarriage among all ancestral groups, however, has led to a population reasonably homogeneous in appearance and traditions.The people of Kiribati speak an Oceanic language called Gilbertese. Although English is the language, it is not used very often outside the island capital of Tarawa. It is more likely that English is mixed in its use with Gilbertese. Older generations of I-Kiribati tend to use more complicated versions of the language.Christianity is the major religion, having been introduced by missionaries in the 19th century. The population is predominantly Roman Catholic, although a substantial portion of the population is Congregationalist Protestant. Many other Protestant denominations, including more evangelical types, are also represented. The Bah religion also exists in Kiribati, along with Jehovahs Witnesses and the Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints (Mormons), the latter numbering 11,511 at the end of 2005.(Global Mormonism &raquo; Kiribati at globalmormonism.byu.edu)Human developmentThe Kiribati Census in 2010 estimated the population at 103,500. The people of Kiribati mostly live in villages with populations between 50 and 3,000 on the outer islands. Most houses are made of materials obtained from coconut and pandanus trees. Frequent droughts hinder reliable large-scale agriculture, so the islanders have largely turned to the sea for livelihood and subsistence. Most are outrigger sailors and fishers. Copra plantations serve as a second source of employment. In recent years, large numbers of citizens have moved to the more urban island capital of Tarawa.(HealthThe population of Kiribati has a life expectancy at birth of 60 years (57 for males, and 63 for females) and an infant mortality rate of 54 deaths per 1,000 live births.( Tuberculosis is present in the country.(http://apps.who.int/globalatlas/predefinedReports/TB/PDF_Files/kir.pdf) Government expenditure on health was at US$268 per capita (PPP) in 2006.() In 1990-2007, there were 23 physicians per 100,000 persons.() Since the arrival of Cuban doctors, the infant mortality rate has decreased significantly.()EducationPrimary education is free and compulsory for the first six years, now being extended to nine years. Mission schools are slowly being absorbed into the government primary school system. Higher education is expanding; students may seek technical, teacher or marine training, or study in other countries. To date, most choosing to do the latter have gone to Fiji, and those wishing to complete medical training have been sent to Cuba.(Pacific Magazine: I-Kiribati Students Perform Well In Cuba)TransportFile:Bonriki International Airport.jpg|thumb|175px|International AirportBeginning in January 2009, Kiribati has two domestic airlines: Kiribati and Sun Airways. Both airlines are based in Tarawas International Airport and serve destinations across the Gilbert Islands only.Neither the Phoenix nor Line Islands are served by the domestic carriers. Fijis national carrier Pacific provides an international service to International Airport on Kiritimati from Fijis main airport, International Airport.Internationally, Airline, the national airline of Nauru, also provides a weekly service on behalf of Air Kiribati from Tarawa to International Airport, as well as a service to International Airport, connecting to Honiara, the capital of the Islands, and further to Brisbane, Australia.CultureSongs (te anene) and above all dances (te mwaie) are held in high regard.MusicKiribati folk music is generally based on chanting or other forms of vocalising, accompanied by percussion. Public performances in modern Kiribati are generally performed by a seated chorus, accompanied by a guitar. However, during formal performances of the standing dance (Te Kaimatoa) or the hip dance (Te Buki) a wooden box is used as a percussion instrument. This box is constructed so as to give a hollow and reverberating tone when struck simultaneously by a chorus of men sitting around it. Traditional songs are often love-themed, but there are also competitive, religious, childrens, patriotic, war and wedding songs .  There are also stick dances (which accompany legends and semi-historical stories . These stick dances or tirere (pronounced seerere) are only performed during major festivals.DanceThe uniqueness of Kiribati when compared with other forms of Pacific island dance is its emphasis on the outstretched arms of the dancer and the sudden birdlike movement of the head. The Frigate bird (Fregata minor) on the Kiribati flag refers to this bird-like style of Kiribati dancing.  Most dances are in the standing or sitting position with movement limited and staggered. Smiling whilst dancing is generally considered vulgar within the context of Kiribati dancing. This is due to its origin of not being solely as a form of entertainment but as a form of storytelling and a display of the skill, beauty and endurance of the dancer.(See Louis Stevensons In the South Seas and the New Zealand Book Awards winner Akekeia! by Tony & Joan Whincup, Wellington, 2001.)Outside perspectivesEdward Carlyon Eliot, who was Resident Commissioner of the Gilbert & Ellice Islands (now Kiribati & Tuvalu) from 1913 to 1920 describes this period in his book Broken Atoms (autobiographical reminiscences)  Pub. G. Bles, London, 1938.Sir Grimble wrote about his time working in the British colonial service in Kiribati (then the Gilbert Islands) from 1914 to 1932 in two popular books A Pattern of Islands (1952) and Return to the Islands (1957). He also undertook academic studies of Gilbertese culture.Maarten Troosts more recent autobiographical experiences on the Atoll are documented in his book Sex Lives of Cannibals (2004).Further Reading* Cinderellas of the Empire: towards a history of Kiribati and Tuvalu, by Barrie Macdonald, Institute of Pacific Studies, of the South Pacific, Suva, Fiji, 2001. ISBN 982-02-0335-X (National University Press, first published 1982)* A Pattern of Islands by Sir Arthur Grimble, John Murray & Co, London, 1952; republished 2011 by Eland, London, ISBN 978-1906011-45-1* Return to the Islands by Sir Arthur Grimble, John Murray & Co, London, 1957* The Sex Lives of Cannibals by J. Maarten Troost, Broadway, 2004, ISBN-10: 0767915305 ISBN-13: 978-0767915304* Kiribati existe Pp. 2943; y De Abemama a Madrid Pp. 4354 en Son los mares del Sur, by Luis Pancorbo: Maeva, Madrid, 1997, ISBN 84-86478-60-X* Lonely Planet Guide: South Pacific & Micronesia by variousSee also*in Kiribati*Scout Association*enforcement in Kiribati*rights in Kiribati*Climate Change Conference*in KiribatiReferencesExternal links* Kiribati National Tourism Office* Parliament of Kiribati* Kiribati National Climate Change Portal*Chief of State and Cabinet Members; General information**Kiribati from UCB Libraries GovPubs* * * * Phoenix Islands Protected Area* Paradise Lost? (A recent PBS/NOW program on global warming)*Exhibit: The Alfred Agate Collection: The United States Exploring Expedition, 1838-1842 from the Navy Art Galleryace:Kiribatiaf:Kiribatials:Kiribatiar:an:Kiribatifrp:Kiribatiast:Kiribatiaz:Kiribatibn:bjn:Kiribatizh-min-nan:Kiribatibe:be-x-old:bcl:Kiribatibo:bs:Kiribatibr:Kiribatibg:ca:Kiribaticv:ceb:Kiribatics:Kiribaticy:Kiribatida:Kiribatide:Kiribatidv:nv:Klbaset:Kiribatiel:es:Kiribatieo:Kiribatoext:Quiribatieu:Kiribatifa:hif:Kiribatifr:Kiribatify:KiribatyChiribatigd:Kiribatigl:Kiribatiko:hi:hr:Kiribatiio:Kiribatiilo:Kiribatibpy:id:Kiribatiie:Kiribatios:is:Kribatit:Kiribatihe:jv:Kiribatikn:pam:Kiribatika:kk:kw:Kiribatirw:Kiribatisw:Kiribatiht:Kiribsmrj:la:Kiribatilv:Kiribatilb:Kiribatilt:Kiribatislij:Kiribatilmo:Kiribatihu:Kiribatimk:ml:mt:Kiribatimr:arz:ms:Kiribatimn:my:nah:Quiribatina:Kiribatnl:Kiribatija:pih:Kiribaatino:Kiribatinn:Kiribatinov:Kiribatioc:Kiribatiuz:Kiribatipnb:ps:pms:Kiribatitpi:Kiribasnds:Kiribatipl:Kiribatipt:Kiribaticrh:Kiribatiro:Kiribatiqu:Kiribatiru:sah:se:Kiribatism:Kilibatisa:sco:Kiribatisq:Kiribatiscn:Kiribatisimple:Kiribatisk:Kiribaticu:sl:Kiribatiszl:Kiribatiso:Kiribatickb:sr:sh:Kiribatifi:Kiribatisv:Kiribatitl:Kiribatita:tt:th:tr:Kiribatiuk:ur:ug:vi:Kiribativo:Kiribatunsfiu-vro:Kiribatiwar:Kiribatiwo:Kiribatiyo:Krbtdiq:Kiribatizea:Kiribatibat-smg:Krbatiszh:
16779
Ku_Klux_Klan
below  The 3rd Klan is decentralized, with approx. 179 chapters.Ku Klux Klan, often abbreviated KKK and informally known as the Klan, is the name of three distinct past and present far-right(ODonnell, Patrick (Editor), 2006. Ku Klux Klan Americas First Terrorists Exposed, p. 210. ISBN 1419649787.)(Chalmers, David Mark, 2003. Backfire: How the Ku Klux Klan Helped the Civil Rights Movement, p. 163. ISBN 9780742523111.)(Berlet, Chip; Lyons, Matthew Nemiroff (2000). Right-wing populism in America: too close for comfort. Press. p. 60. ISBN 9781572305625.)(Rory McVeigh, The rise of the Ku Klux Klan: right-wing movements and national politics organizations. University of Minnesota Press. 2009.) organizations in the United States, which have advocated extremist reactionary currents such as supremacy, nationalism, and anti-immigration, historically expressed through terrorism.(( Since the mid-20th century, the KKK has also been anti-communist.(Charles Quarles, The Ku Klux Klan and related American racialist and antisemitic organizations: a history and analysis, McFarland, 1999) The current manifestation is splintered into several chapters and is classified as a group.(Both the Anti-Defamation League and the Southern Poverty Law Center include it in their lists of hate groups. See also Bfrian Levin, Brian Cyberhate: A Legal and Historical Analysis of Extremists Use of Computer Networks in America in Perry, Barbara, editor. Hate and Bias Crime: A Reader. p. 112 p. Google Books)The first Klan flourished in the South in the 1860s, then died out by the early 1870s. Members adopted white costumes: robes, masks, and conical hats, designed to be outlandish and terrifying, and to hide their identities.(Elaine Frantz Parsons, Midnight Rangers: Costume and Performance in the Reconstruction-Era Ku Klux Klan. Journal of American History 92.3 (2005): 81136, in Cooperative) The second KKK flourished nationwide in the early and mid 1920s, and adopted the same costumes and code words as the first Klan, while introducing cross burnings.( The third KKK emerged after World War II and was associated with opposing the civil rights movement and progress among minorities. The second and third incarnations of the Ku Klux Klan made frequent reference to Americas Anglo-Saxon and Celtic blood, harking back to 19th-century nativism and claiming descent from the original 18th-century British colonial revolutionaries.(Michael Newton, The Invisible Empire: The Ku Klux Klan in Florida) All incarnations of the Klan have well-established records of engaging in terrorism, though historians debate how widely the tactic was supported by the membership of the second KKK.Three KlansFirst KKKThe first Klan was founded in 1865 in Tennessee, as a terrorist organization(Economist, The Civil War: Finally Passing, April 2, 2011, pp. 2325.) by veterans of the Confederate Army.() They named it after the Greek word kuklos, which means circle. The name means Circle of Brothers.()Although there was no organizational structure above the local level, similar groups arose across the South, adopting the name and methods. Klan groups spread throughout the South as an insurgent movement during the era in the United States. As a secret vigilante group, the Klan targeted freedmen and their allies; it sought to restore supremacy by threats and violence, including murder, against black and white Republicans. In 1870 and 1871 the federal government passed the Force Acts, which were used to prosecute Klan crimes.() Prosecution of Klan crimes and enforcement of the Force Acts suppressed Klan activity. In 1874 and later, however, newly organized and openly active paramilitary organizations, such as the League and the Red Shirts, started a fresh round of violence aimed at suppressing blacks voting and running Republicans out of office. These contributed to segregationist white Democrats regaining political power in all the Southern states by 1877.Second KKKIn 1915, the second Klan was founded and remained a small organization in Georgia. Starting in 1921, it adopted a modern business system of recruiting (which paid most of the initiation fee and costume charges to the organizers) and grew rapidly nationwide at a time of prosperity. Reflecting the social tensions of urban industrialization and vastly increased immigration, its membership grew most rapidly in cities, and spread to the Midwest and West out of the South. The second KKK preached Americanism and purification of politics, with strong racism, anti-Catholicism, anti-Communism, nativism, and antisemitism. Some local groups took part in attacks on private houses, and carried out other violent activities. The violent episodes were generally in the South.(Jackson 1992 ed., pp. 241242.)The second Klan was a formal fraternal organization, with a national and state structure. At its peak in the mid-1920s, the organization claimed to include about 15% of the nations eligible population, approximately 45 million men. Internal divisions, criminal behavior by leaders, and external opposition brought about a collapse in membership, which had dropped to about 30,000 by 1930. It finally faded away in the 1940s.()Third KKKThe Ku Klux Klan name was used by many independent local groups opposing the Rights Movement and desegregation, especially in the 1950s and 1960s. During this period, they often forged alliances with Southern police departments, as in Alabama; or with governors offices, as with George Wallace of Alabama.(McWhorter 2001.) Several members of KKK groups were convicted of murder in the deaths of civil rights workers and children in the bombing of the 16th Street Baptist Church in Birmingham. Today, researchers estimate that there may be approximately 150 Klan chapters with upwards of 5,000 members nationwide.()Today, a large majority of sources consider the Klan to be a subversive or terrorist organization.()()()() In 1999, the city council of South Carolina passed a resolution declaring the Klan to be a terrorist organization.() A similar effort was made in 2004 when a professor at the of Louisville began a campaign to have the Klan declared a terrorist organization so it could be banned from campus.() In April 1997, FBI agents arrested four members of the True Knights of the Ku Klux Klan in Dallas for conspiracy to commit robbery and to blow up a natural gas processing plant.(Domestic terrorism by the Klan remained a key concern Dallas.FBI.gov)First Klan 18651874 Creation and naming Image:Kkk-carpetbagger-cartoon.jpg|thumb|250px|A cartoon threatening that the KKK would lynch carpetbaggers. From the Independent Monitor, Alabama, 1868.Six well-educated Confederate veterans from Tennessee, created the original Ku Klux Klan on December 24, 1865, during Reconstruction of the South after the Civil War.(Horn 1939, p. 9. The founders were John C. Lester, John B. Kennedy, James R. Crowe, Frank O. McCord, Richard R. Reed, and J. Calvin Jones.)(Fleming, Walter J., Ku Klux Klan: Its Origins, Growth and Disbandment, p. 27, 1905, Neale Publishing.) The name was formed by combining the Greek  (, circle) with clan.(Horn 1939, p. 11, states that Reed proposed  () and Kennedy added clan. Wade 1987, p. 33 says that Kennedy came up with both words, but Crowe suggested transforming  into .) The group was known for a short time as the Kuklux Clan. The Ku Klux Klan was one among a number of secret, oath-bound organizations using violence, including the Southern Cross in Orleans (1865), and the of the White Camelia (1867) in Louisiana.(W.E.B. Du Bois, Black Reconstruction in America: 18601880, New York: Oxford University Press, 1935; reprint, The Free Press, 1998, pp.679680)Historians generally see the KKK as part of the postwar insurgent violence related not only to the high number of veterans in the population, but also to their effort to control the dramatically changed social situation by using extrajudicial means to restore white supremacy. In 1866, Mississippi Governor L. Sharkey reported that disorder, lack of control and lawlessness were widespread; in some states armed bands of Confederate soldiers roamed at will. The Klan used public violence against blacks as intimidation. They burned houses, and attacked and killed blacks, leaving their bodies on the roads.(W.E.B. Du Bois, Black Reconstruction in America: 18601880, New York: Oxford University Press, 1935; reprint, The Free Press, 1998, p. 671675.)thumb|A political cartoon depicting the KKK and the Democratic Party as continuations of the ConfederacyIn an 1867 meeting in Tennessee, Klan members gathered to try to create a hierarchical organization with local chapters eventually reporting up to a national headquarters. They elected Brian A. Scates to be the Leader and President of this organization. Since most of the Klans members were veterans, they were used to the hierarchical structure of the organization, but the Klan never operated under this centralized structure. Local chapters and bands were highly independent.Former Confederate Brigadier General George Gordon developed the Prescript, or Klan dogma. The Prescript suggested elements of white supremacist belief. For instance, an applicant should be asked if he was in favor of a white mans government, the reenfranchisement and emancipation of the white men of the South, and the restitution of the Southern people to all their rights.() The latter is a reference to the Oath, which stripped the vote from white persons who refused to swear that they had not borne arms against the Union. Gordon was said to have told former trader and Confederate General Bedford Forrest about the Klan. Forrest allegedly responded, Thats a good thing; thats a damn good thing. We can use that to keep the niggers in their place.(Horn 1939. Horn casts doubt on some other aspects of the story.) Forrest went on to become Wizard, the Klans national leader.(()(Hurst pp. 284285. Wills p. 336. Wills quotes two KKK members who identified Forrest as a Klan leader. James R. Crowe stated, After the order grew to large numbers we found it necessary to have someone of large experience to command. We chose General Forrest. Another member wrote, N. B. Forest of Confederate fame was at our head, and was known as the Grand Wizard. I heard him make a speech in one of our Dens.)Image:NathanBedfordForrest.jpg|thumb|left|upright|Bedford ForrestIn an 1868 newspaper interview, Forrest stated that the Klans primary opposition was to the Leagues, Republican state governments, people like Tennessee governor Brownlow and other carpetbaggers and scalawags. He argued that many southerners believed that blacks were voting for the Republican Party because they were being hoodwinked by the Loyal Leagues.(Cincinnati Commercial, August 28, 1868, quoted in Wade, 1987.) One Alabama newspaper editor declared The League is nothing more than a nigger Ku Klux Klan.(Horn 1939, p. 27.)Despite Gordons and Forrests work, local Klan units never accepted the Prescript and continued to operate autonomously. There were never hierarchical levels or state headquarters. Klan members used violence to settle old feuds and local grudges, as they worked to restore white dominance in the disrupted postwar society. The historian Elaine Frantz Parsons describes the membership:Lifting the Klan mask revealed a chaotic multitude of antiblack vigilante groups, disgruntled poor white farmers, wartime guerrilla bands, displaced Democratic politicians, illegal whiskey distillers, coercive moral reformers, sadists, rapists, white workmen fearful of black competition, employers trying to enforce labor discipline, common thieves, neighbors with decades-old grudges, and even a few freedmen and white Republicans who allied with Democratic whites or had criminal agendas of their own. Indeed, all they had in common, besides being overwhelmingly white, southern, and Democratic, was that they called themselves, or were called, Klansmen.(Parsons 2005, p. 816.)Historian Foner observed:In effect, the Klan was a military force serving the interests of the Democratic party, the planter class, and all those who desired restoration of white supremacy. Its purposes were political, but political in the broadest sense, for it sought to affect power relations, both public and private, throughout Southern society. It aimed to reverse the interlocking changes sweeping over the South during Reconstruction: to destroy the Republican partys infrastructure, undermine the Reconstruction state, reestablish control of the black labor force, and restore racial subordination in every aspect of Southern life.(Foner 1989, p. 425426.)To that end they worked to curb the education, economic advancement, rights, and right to keep and bear arms of blacks.( The Ku Klux Klan soon spread into nearly every southern state, launching a of terror against Republican leaders both black and white. Those political leaders assassinated during the campaign included Arkansas Congressman M. Hinds, three members of the Carolina legislature, and several men who served in constitutional conventions.(Foner 1989, p. 342.)ActivitiesImage:Misissippi ku klux.jpg|thumb|upright|Three Ku Klux Klan members arrested in County, Mississippi, September 1871, for the attempted murder of an entire family.Klan members adopted masks and robes that hid their identities and added to the drama of their night rides, their chosen time for attacks. Many of them operated in small towns and rural areas where people otherwise knew each others faces, and sometimes still recognized the attackers. The kind of thing that men are afraid or ashamed to do openly, and by day, they accomplish secretly, masked, and at night. With this method both the high and the low could be attacked.(W.E.B. Du Bois, Black Reconstruction in America: 18601880, New York: Oxford University Press, 1935; reprint, The Free Press, 1998, pp. 677678.) The Ku Klux Klan night riders sometimes claimed to be ghosts of Confederate soldiers so, as they claimed, to frighten superstitious blacks. Few freedmen took such nonsense seriously.(Eric Foner, Reconstruction: Americas Unfinished Revolution, 18631877, New York: Perennial Classics, 1989; reprinted 2002, p.432)The Klan attacked black members of the Leagues and intimidated southern Republicans and Bureau workers. When they killed black political leaders, they also took heads of families, along with the leaders of churches and community groups, because people had many roles. Agents of the Freedmens Bureau reported weekly assaults and murders of blacks.Armed guerrilla warfare killed thousands of Negroes; political riots were staged; their causes or occasions were always obscure, their results always certain: ten to one hundred times as many Negroes were killed as whites. Masked men shot into houses and burned them, sometimes with the occupants still inside. They drove successful black farmers off their land. Generally, it can be reported that in North and South Carolina, in 18 months ending in June 1867, there were 197 murders and 548 cases of aggravated assault.(W.E.B. Du Bois, Black Reconstruction in America: 18601880, New York: Oxford University Press, 1935; reprint, The Free Press, 1998, pp. 674675)Klan violence worked to suppress black voting. More than 2,000 persons were killed, wounded and otherwise injured in Louisiana within a few weeks prior to the Presidential election of November 1868. Although Landry Parish had a registered Republican majority of 1,071, after the murders, no Republicans voted in the fall elections. White Democrats cast the full vote of the parish for Grants opponent. The KKK killed and wounded more than 200 black Republicans, hunting and chasing them through the woods. Thirteen captives were taken from jail and shot; a half-buried pile of 25 bodies was found in the woods. The KKK made people vote Democratic and gave them certificates of the fact.(W.E.B. Du Bois, Black Reconstruction in America: 18601880, New York: Oxford University Press, 1935; reprint, The Free Press, 1998, pp.680681)In the April 1868 Georgia gubernatorial election, Columbia County cast 1,222 votes for Republican Bullock. By the November presidential election, however, Klan intimidation led to suppression of the Republican vote and only one person voted for S. Grant.()Klansmen killed more than 150 African Americans in a county in Florida, and hundreds more in other counties. Freedmens Bureau records provided a detailed recounting of Klansmens beatings and murders of freedmen and their white allies.(Michael Newton, The Invisible Empire: The Ku Klux Klan in Florida, pp. 130. Newton quotes from the Testimony Taken by the Joint Select Committee to Enquire into the Condition of Affairs in the Late Insurrectionary States, Vol. 13. Washington, D.C.: U.S. Government Printing Office, 1872. Among historians of the Klan, this volume is also known as The KKK testimony.)Milder encounters also occurred. In Mississippi, according to the Congressional inquiry:(Rhodes 1920, pp. 157158.)One of these teachers (Miss Allen of Illinois), whose school was at Cotton Gin Port in Monroe County, was visited ... between one and two oclock in the morning on March 1871, by about fifty men mounted and disguised. Each man wore a long white robe and his face was covered by a loose mask with scarlet stripes. She was ordered to get up and dress which she did at once and then admitted to her room the captain and lieutenant who in addition to the usual disguise had long horns on their heads and a sort of device in front. The lieutenant had a pistol in his hand and he and the captain sat down while eight or ten men stood inside the door and the porch was full. They treated her gentlemanly and quietly but complained of the heavy school-tax, said she must stop teaching and go away and warned her that they never gave a second notice. She heeded the warning and left the county.By 1868, two years after the Klans creation, its activity was beginning to decrease.(Horn 1939, p. 375.) Members were hiding behind Klan masks and robes as a way to avoid prosecution for freelance violence. Many influential southern Democrats feared that Klan lawlessness provided an excuse for the federal government to retain its power over the South, and they began to turn against it.(Wade 1987, p. 102.) There were outlandish claims made, such as Georgian H. Hill stating that some of these outrages were actually perpetrated by the political friends of the parties slain.(ResistanceUnion Army veterans in mountainous County, Alabama, organized the anti-Ku Klux. They put an end to violence by threatening Klansmen with reprisals unless they stopped whipping Unionists and burning black churches and schools. Armed blacks formed their own defense in South Carolina and patrolled the streets to protect their homes.(Foner 1989, p. 435.)National sentiment gathered to crack down on the Klan, even though some Democrats at the national level questioned whether the Klan really existed or believed that it was just a creation of nervous Southern Republican governors.(Wade 1987.) Many southern states began to pass anti-Klan legislation.In January 1871, Pennsylvania Republican Senator John Scott convened a Congressional committee which took testimony from 52 witnesses about Klan atrocities. They accumulated 12 volumes of horrifying testimony. In February, former Union General and Congressman Benjamin Franklin Butler of Massachusetts introduced the Rights Act of 1871 (Ku Klux Klan Act). This added to the enmity that southern white Democrats bore toward him.(Horn 1939, p. 373.) While the bill was being considered, further violence in the South swung support for its passage. The of South Carolina appealed for federal troops to assist his efforts in keeping control of the state. A riot and massacre in a Mississippi, courthouse were reported, from which a black state representative escaped only by taking to the woods.(Wade 1987, p. 88.) The 1871 Civil Rights Act allowed President S. Grant to suspend Corpus.()Image:BenFrankButler.jpg|thumb|left|upright|Benjamin Franklin Butler wrote the Rights Act of 1871 (Klan Act)In 1871, President S. Grant signed Butlers legislation. The Ku Klux Klan Act was used by the Federal government together with the 1870 Force Act, another act that President Grant signed, to enforce the civil rights provisions for individuals under the constitution. Under the 1871 Klan Act, after the Klan refused to voluntarily dissolve, President Grant issued a suspension of Corpus, and sent Federal troops into 9 Carolina counties. The Klansmen were arrested and prosecuted in Federal court. More African Americans served on juries in Federal court than were selected for local or state juries, so they had a chance to participate in the process.(( In the crackdown, hundreds of Klan members were fined or imprisoned.The Klan declines and is superseded by other groupsAlthough Forrest boasted that the Klan was a nationwide organization of 550,000 men and that he could muster 40,000 Klansmen within five days notice, as a secret or invisible group, it had no membership rosters, no chapters, and no local officers. It was difficult for observers to judge its actual membership. It had created a sensation by the dramatic nature of its masked forays and because of its many murders.In 1870 a federal grand jury determined that the Klan was a terrorist organization.() It issued hundreds of indictments for crimes of violence and terrorism. Klan members were prosecuted, and many fled from areas that were under federal government jurisdiction, particularly in South Carolina.(Trelease 1995.) Many people not formally inducted into the Klan had used the Klans costume for anonymity, to hide their identities when carrying out acts of violence. Forrest ordered the Klan to disband in 1869, stating that it was being perverted from its original honorable and patriotic purposes, becoming injurious instead of subservient to the public peace.(quotes from Wade 1987.) Historian Horn writes generally speaking, the Klans end was more in the form of spotty, slow, and gradual disintegration than a formal and decisive disbandment.(Horn 1939, p. 360.) A reporter in Georgia wrote in January 1870, A true statement of the case is not that the Ku Klux are an organized band of licensed criminals, but that men who commit crimes call themselves Ku Klux.(Horn 1939, p. 362.)William Holden of North Carolina.While people used the Klan as a mask for nonpolitical crimes, state and local governments seldom acted against them. African Americans were kept off juries. In lynching cases, all-white juries almost never indicted Ku Klux Klan members. When there was a rare indictment, juries were unlikely to vote for a conviction. In part, jury members feared reprisals from local Klansmen.Others may have agreed with lynching as a way of keeping dominance over black men. In many states, officials were reluctant to use black militia against the Klan out of fear that racial tensions would be raised.() When Republican of North Carolina Woods Holden called out the militia against the Klan in 1870, it added to his unpopularity. Combined with violence and fraud at the polls, the Republicans lost their majority in the state legislature. Disaffection with Holdens actions led to white Democratic legislators impeaching Holden and removing him from office, but their reasons were numerous.(Wade 1987, p. 85.)The Klan was destroyed in South Carolina(Wade, p102) and decimated throughout the rest of the South, where it had already been in decline. Attorney General Tappan Ackerman led the prosecutions.(Wade 1987, p. 109, writes that by ca. 18711874, For many, the lapse of the enforcement acts was justified since their reason for beingthe Ku-Klux Klanhad been effectively smashed as a result of the dramatic showdown in South Carolina.)In some areas, other local paramilitary organizations such as the League, Red Shirts, saber clubs, and rifle clubs continued to intimidate and murder black voters.(Wade 1987, p. 109110.)In 1874, organized white paramilitary groups formed in the Deep South to replace the faltering Klan: the League in Louisiana and the Red Shirts in Mississippi, North and Carolina. They campaigned openly to turn Republicans out of office, intimidated and killed black voters, tried to disrupt organizing and suppress black voting. They were out in force during the campaigns and elections of 1874 and 1876, contributing to the conservative Democrats regaining power in 1876, against a background of electoral violence.Shortly after, in States v. Cruikshank (1875), the Supreme Court ruled that the Force Act of 1870 did not give the Federal government power to regulate private actions, but only those by state governments. The result was that as the century went on, African Americans were at the mercy of hostile state governments that refused to intervene against private violence and paramilitary groups.Whereas the number of indictments across the South was large, the number of cases leading to prosecution and sentencing was relatively small. The overloaded federal courts were not able to meet the demands of trying such a tremendous number of cases, a situation that led to selective pardoning. By late 1873 and 1874, most of the charges against Klansmen were dropped although new cases continued to be prosecuted for several more years. Most of those sentenced had either served their terms or been pardoned by 1875.The Court of the United States eviscerated the Ku Klux Act in 1876 by ruling that the federal government could no longer prosecute individuals although states would be forced to comply with federal civil rights provisions. Republicans passed a second civil rights act (the Civil Rights Act of 1875) to grant equal access to public facilities and other housing accommodations regardless of race. Ironically, the Klan during this period served to further Northern reconstruction efforts, as Ku Klux violence provided the political climate needed to pass civil rights protections for blacks. Although the Ku Klux Act of 1871 dismantled the first Klan, Southern whites formed other, similar groups that kept blacks away from the polls through intimidation and physical violence. Reconstruction ended with the election of President Rutherford B. Hayes, who suspended the federal military occupation of the South; yet blacks still found themselves without the basic civil liberties that Congressional Republicans had sought to secure.(Ku Klux Klan Act of 1871. Civil Rights in the United States. 2 vols. Macmillan Reference USA, 2000. Reproduced in History Resource Center. Farmington Hills, MI: Gale. Galenet.Galegroup.com) In 1882, the Supreme Court ruled in States v. Harris that the Klan Act was partially unconstitutional. It ruled that Congresss power under the Fourteenth Amendment did not extend to the right to regulate against private conspiracies.()Klan costumes, also called regalia, disappeared by the early 1870s (Wade 1987, p. 109). The fact that the Klan did not exist for decades was shown when Simmonss 1915 recreation of the Klan attracted only two aging former Reconstruction Klansmen. All other members were new.((Wade 1987, p. 144).) By 1872, the Klan was broken as an organization.(The Rise and Fall of Jim Crow: The Enforcement Acts, 18701871, Public Broadcast Service. Retrieved April 5, 2008.) Nonetheless, the goals that the Klan had failed to achieve itself, such as suppressing suffrage for Southern blacks and driving a wedge between poor whites and blacks, were largely accomplished by the 1890s by militant Southern whites. Lynchings of African Americans, far from being ended by the Klans disintegration, instead peaked in 1892 with 161 deaths.()The second Klan: 19151944Refounding in 1915Image:Birth-of-a-nation-poster-color.jpg|thumb|Movie poster for Birth of a Nation. It has been widely noted for reviving the Ku Klux Klan.Image:The-clansman-cropped.jpg|thumb|left|upright|An illustration from Clansman: Take dat fum yo equalImage:President Woodrow Wilson portrait December 2 1912.jpg|thumb|upright|President WilsonImage:Lynching of Leo Frank 1.jpg|thumb|upright|The lynching of Frank August 17, 1915 in Marietta, GeorgiaImage:William-joseph-simmons2.jpg|thumb|upright|J. Simmons founded the second Ku Klux Klan in 1915Image:initiationkkk.jpg|left|thumb|Clarke illustration in Ku Klux Klan In Prophecy by Bishop White published by the of Fire Church in 1925 at NJImage:Defender18thkkk.jpg|right|thumb|From Guardians of Liberty 1926 ill. by Rev. ClarkeImage:theendkkk.jpg|right|thumb|The End Referring to the end of Catholic influence in the US. Guardians of Liberty 1926Image:klanphoto1923.jpg|right|thumb|Photograph on Page 4, February 1923 edition of Good CitizenThree events in 1915 acted as catalysts to the revival of the Klan:* The film Birth of a Nation was released, mythologizing and glorifying the first Klan.* Frank was lynched near Atlanta after the Georgia governor commuted his death sentence to life in prison. Frank had been convicted in 1913 and sentenced to death for the rape and murder of a young white factory worker named Phagan, in a trial marked by intimidation of the jury and media frenzy. His legal appeals had been exhausted.* The second Ku Klux Klan was founded by J. Simmons at Mountain, outside Atlanta. It added to the original anti-black ideology with a new anti-immigrant, anti-Catholic, prohibitionist and antisemitic agenda. Most of the founders were from an Atlanta-area organization calling itself the Knights of Mary Phagan, which had organized around Leo Franks trial. The new organization emulated the fictionalized version of the Klan presented in The Birth of a Nation.The Birth of a NationDirector W. Griffiths The Birth of a Nation glorified the original Klan. His film was based on the book and play Clansman and the book Leopards Spots, both by Dixon, Jr.. Dixon said his purpose was to revolutionize northern sentiment by a presentation of history that would transform every man in my audience into a good Democrat! The film created a nationwide Klan craze. At the official premier in Atlanta, members of the Klan rode up and down the street in front of the theater.(Dray 2002.)Much of the modern Klans iconography, including the standardized white costume and the lighted cross, are derived from the film. Its imagery was based on Dixons romanticized concept of old England and Scotland, as portrayed in the novels and poetry of Sir Scott. The films influence and popularity were enhanced by a widely reported endorsement by historian and U.S. President Wilson.The Birth of a Nation included extensive quotations from Woodrow Wilsons History of the American People, as if to give it a stronger basis. After seeing the film in a special House screening, Wilson allegedly said, It is like writing history with lightning, and my only regret is that it is all so terribly true.(Dray 2002, p. 198. Griffith quickly relayed the comment to the press, where it was widely reported. In subsequent correspondence, Wilson discussed Griffiths filmmaking in a positive tone, without challenging use of his statement.) Given Wilsons views on race and the Klan, his statement was taken as supportive of the film. In later correspondence with Griffith, Wilson confirmed his enthusiasm. Wilsons remarks immediately became controversial. Wilson tried to remain aloof, but finally, on April 30, he issued a denial.(Wade 1987, p. 137.) The historian Arthur Link quoted comments by Wilsons aide, Tumulty: the President was entirely unaware of the nature of the play before it was presented and at no time has expressed his approbation of it.(Letter from J. M. Tumulty, secretary to President Wilson, to the Boston branch of the NAACP, quoted in Link, Wilson.)Leo FrankAnother event that influenced the Klan was sensational coverage in 1913 of the trial, conviction and sentencing of a Jewish factory manager from Atlanta named Frank. In lurid newspaper accounts, Frank was accused of the rape and murder of Phagan, a girl employed at his factory.After a trial in Georgia in which a mob daily surrounded the courtroom, Frank was convicted. Because of the presence of the armed mob, the judge asked Frank and his counsel to stay away when the verdict was announced. Franks legal appeals of his trial failed, despite the revelation of new evidence casting doubt on his guilt. Supreme Court Justice Oliver Wendell Holmes dissented from other justices in their upholding of his conviction and condemned the mobs intimidation of the jury as the courts failing to provide process to the defendant. After the governor commuted Franks sentence to life imprisonment in 1915, a mob calling itself the Knights of Mary Phagan kidnapped Frank from prison and lynched him.The Frank trial was used skillfully by Georgia politician and publisher E. Watson, the editor for The Jeffersonian magazine. He was a leader in recreating the Klan and was later elected to the U.S. Senate. The new Klan was inaugurated in 1915 at a meeting led by J. Simmons on top of Mountain. A few aging members of the original Klan attended, along with members of the self-named Knights of Mary Phagan.Simmons stated that he had been inspired by the original Klans Prescripts, written in 1867 by Confederate veteran George Gordon in an attempt to create a national organization. These were never adopted by the Klan, however.(The Ku Klux Klan and Related American Racialist and Antisemitic Organizations: A History and Analysis by Chester L Quarles, Page 219. The second Klans constitution and preamble, reprinted in Quarles book, stated that the second Klan was indebted to the original Klans Prescripts.) The Prescript stated the Klans purposes in idealistic terms, hiding the fact that its members committed acts of vigilante violence and murder from behind masks.Social factorsThe second Klan arose during the of American race relations, in response to urbanization and industrialization. Massive immigration from the largely Catholic countries of eastern and southern Europe led to friction with Americas longer-established Protestant citizens. The Great Migration of African Americans to the North stoked racism by whites in Northern industrial cities; thus the second Klan would achieve its greatest political power not in any Southern state, but in Indiana. The migration of African Americans and whites from rural areas to Southern cities further increased tensions. The Klan grew most rapidly in urbanizing cities which had high growth rates between 1910 and 1930, such as Detroit, Memphis, Dayton, Atlanta, Dallas, and Houston. In Michigan, more than half of the members lived in Detroit and were concerned about urban issues: limited housing, rapid social change, competition for jobs.(Jackson 1967, p. 241.) Horn, a Southern historian sympathetic to the first Klan, was careful in an oral interview to distinguish it from the later spurious Ku Klux organization which was in ill-reputeand, of course, had no connection whatsoever with the Klan of Reconstruction days.()In an era without Social Security or widely available insurance, it was common for men to join organizations such as the Elks or the of the World to provide for their families in case they died or were unable to work. The founder of the new Klan, J. Simmons, was a member of twelve different fraternal organizations. He recruited for the Klan with his chest covered with fraternal badges, and consciously modeled the Klan after those organizations.()Klan organizers, called Kleagles, signed up hundreds of new members, who paid initiation fees and bought KKK costumes. The organizer kept half the money and sent the rest to state or national officials. When the organizer was done with an area, he organized a huge rally, often with burning crosses and perhaps presented a Bible to a local Protestant minister. He then left town with the money. The local units operated like many fraternal organizations and occasionally brought in speakers.The Klans growth was also affected by mobilization for War I and postwar tensions, especially in the cities where strangers came up against each other more often. Southern whites resented the arming of black soldiers. Black veterans did not want to go back to second-class status in the United States. Some were lynched, still in uniform, upon returning from overseas service.(Maxine D. Rogers, et al., Documented History of Rosewood, Florida in January 1923, op.cit., pp.46, accessed March 28, 2008; Clarence Lusane (2003), Hitlers Black Victims, p. 89.)ActivitiesIn reaction to social changes, the Klan adopted anti-Jewish, anti-Catholic, anti-Communist and anti-immigrant slants.Although Klan members were concentrated in the South, Midwest and west, there were some members in England, too. Klan members torched an American school in Rhode Island.()TemperanceLender et al. state that the Klans resurgence in the 1920s was aided by the movement. In Arkansas and elsewhere, the Klan opposed bootleggers, and in 1922, two hundred Klan members set fire to saloons in Union County. The national Klan office was finally established in Dallas, Texas, but Rock, Arkansas was the home of the Women of the Ku Klux Klan. The first head of this auxiliary was a former president of the Arkansas WCTU.(Lender et al. 1982, p. 33.) One historian contends that the KKKs support for Prohibition represented the single most important bond between Klansmen throughout the nation.(Prendergast 1987, pp. 2552, 27.) Membership in the Klan and other prohibition groups overlapped, and they often coordinated activities. For example, Young Clarke, a top leader of the Klan, raised funds for both the Klan and the League.(Barr 1999, p. 370.) Clarke was indicted in 1923 for violations of the Act.()Labor and anti-unionismThe social unrest of the postwar period included labor strikes in response to low wages and poor working conditions in many industrial cities, often led by immigrants, who also organized unions. Klan members worried about labor organizers effect on their jobs, as well as the socialist leanings of some of the immigrants, which only added to the tensions. They also resented upwardly mobile ethnic Catholics.(Maxine D. Rogers, et al., Documented History of Rosewood, Florida in January 1923, op.cit., p.6. Retrieved March 28, 2008.) At the same time, in cities Klan members were themselves working in industrial environments and often struggled with working conditions.In southern cities such as Alabama, Klan members kept control of access to the better-paying industrial jobs but opposed unions. During the 1930s and 1940s, Klan leaders urged members to disrupt the of Industrial Organizations (CIO), which advocated industrial unions and was open to African-American members. With access to dynamite and skills from their jobs in mining and steel, in the late 1940s some Klan members in Birmingham began using bombings to intimidate upwardly mobile blacks who moved into middle-class neighborhoods. By mid-1949, there were so many charred house carcasses that the area Hills was informally named Dynamite Hill.( Independent Klan groups remained active in Birmingham and were deeply engaged in violent opposition to the Civil Rights Movement.(Diane McWhorter, Carry Me Home: Birmingham, Alabama, The Climactic Battle of the Civil Rights Revolution, New York: Touchstone Book, 2002, p.75)UrbanizationImage:Stonemtn2.jpg|thumb|Mountain, site of the founding of the second Klan in 1915A significant characteristic of the second Klan was that it was an organization based in urban areas, reflecting the major shifts of population to cities in both the North and the South. In Michigan, for instance, 40,000 members lived in Detroit, where they made up more than half of the states membership. Most Klansmen were lower- to middle-class whites who were trying to protect their jobs and housing from the waves of newcomers to the industrial cities: immigrants from southern and eastern Europe, who tended to be Catholic and Jewish in numbers higher than earlier groups of immigrants; and black and white migrants from the South. As new populations poured into cities, rapidly changing neighborhoods created social tensions. Because of the rapid pace of population growth in industrializing cities such as Detroit and Chicago, the Klan grew rapidly in the U.S. Midwest. The Klan also grew in booming Southern cities such as Dallas and Houston.(Jackson, 1992.)In the medium-size industrial city of Massachusetts in the 1920s, the Klan ascended to power quickly but diminished as a result of opposition from the Catholic Church. There was no violence and the local newspaper ridiculed Klansmen as night-shirt knights. Half of the members were American, including some first-generation immigrants. The ethnic and religious conflicts between Worcester residents is discussed. Swedish Protestants fought against Irish Catholics for political and ideological control of the city.(Emily Parker, Night-Shirt Knights in the City: The Ku Klux Klan in 1920s Worcester, Massachusetts, New England Journal of History, Fall 2009, Vol. 66 Issue 1, pp 6278)For some states, historians have obtained membership rosters of some local units and matched the names against city directory and local records to create statistical profiles of the membership. Big city newspapers were often hostile and ridiculed Klansmen as ignorant farmers. Detailed analysis from Indiana showed the rural stereotype was false for that state:Indianas Klansmen represented a wide cross section of society: they were not disproportionately urban or rural, nor were they significantly more or less likely than other members of society to be from the working class, middle class, or professional ranks. Klansmen were Protestants, of course, but they cannot be described exclusively or even predominantly as fundamentalists. In reality, their religious affiliations mirrored the whole of white Protestant society, including those who did not belong to any church.(Moore 1991.)The Klan attracted people but most of them did not remain in the organization for long. Membership in the Klan turned over rapidly as people found out that it was not the group they wanted. Millions joined, and at its peak in the 1920s, the organization included about 15% of the nations eligible population. The lessening of social tensions contributed to the Klans decline.The burning crossImage:Burning-cross2.jpg|thumb|burning is said to have been introduced by J. Simmons, the founder of the second Klan in 1915.The second Klan adopted a burning cross as its symbol. No such crosses had been used by the first Klan, but the burning cross became a symbol of intimidation by the second Klan.() The burning of the cross was also used during the second Klan as a symbol of Christian fellowship, and its lighting during meetings was steeped in Christian prayer, the singing of hymns, and other overtly religious symbolism.()The practice of cross burning had been loosely based on ancient Scottish clans burning a St. Andrews cross (an X-shaped cross) as a beacon to muster forces for war. In The Clansman (see above), Dixon had falsely claimed that the first Klan had used fiery crosses when rallying to fight against Reconstruction. Griffith brought this image to the screen in The Birth of a Nation; he mistakenly portrayed the burning cross as an upright cross rather than the St. Andrews cross. Simmons adopted the symbol wholesale from the movie, prominently displaying it at the 1915 Stone Mountain meeting. The symbol has been associated with the Klan ever since.()EducationIn an attempt to gain a foothold in education, the Klan in 1921 bought University, a struggling Baptist university in Atlanta. Nathan Bedford Forrest, grandson of the confederate general by the same name, was appointed business manager, and the school would teach pure, 100 percent Americanism.() Enrollment was dismal and the school closed after its first year of Klan ownership. Ironically the complex would later be used as a synagogue.Political influencethumb|upright|Sheet music to We Are All Loyal Klansmen, 1923File:Good Citizen Pillar of Fire Church July 1926.jpg|left|thumb|Good Citizen July 1926 Published by of Fire ChurchImage:Ballot1.jpg|left|thumb|upright|Clarke illustration in of the Fiery Cross, 1928The Klan had major political influence in several states, and it was influential mostly in the center of the country. The Klan spread from the South into the Midwest and Northern states. It also arose in Canada, where there was a large movement against Catholic immigrants.() At its peak, Klan membership exceeded four million and comprised 20% of the adult white male population in many broad geographic regions, and 40% in some areas. Most of the Klans membership resided in Midwestern states.In another well-known example from 1924, the Klan decided to turn California, into a model Klan city. It secretly took over the City Council. When the members affiliation became known, the city conducted a special recall election, and citizens voted out the Klan members.(Its been seventy years since Anaheim booted the Klan, reprinted from the Angeles Times)The Klan issue played a significant role at the bitterly divisive Democratic National Convention in New York City. The leading candidates were Protestant Gibbs McAdoo, with a base in areas where the Klan was strong, and Catholic New York Governor Smith, with a base in the large cities. After weeks of stalemate, both candidates withdrew in favor of a compromise. Anti-Klan delegates proposed a resolution indirectly attacking the Klan; it was narrowly defeated.(Lee N. Allen, The McAdoo Campaign for the Presidential Nomination in 1924, Journal of Southern History, May 1963, Vol. 29 Issue 2, pp 211228)(Douglas B. Craig, After Wilson: The Struggle for the Democratic Party, 19201934 (1992) ch 23)In some states, such as Alabama, members of the KKK worked for political and social reform. The states Klansmen were among the foremost advocates of better public schools, effective prohibition enforcement, expanded road construction, and other political measures which benefited lower-class white people. By 1925, the Klan was a political force in the state, as leaders such as Thomas Heflin, Bibb Graves, and Black manipulated the KKK membership to try to build political power against the Black Belt planters, who had long dominated the state.(Feldman 1999.) Black was elected US senator in 1926; President D. Roosevelt appointed Black to the Supreme Court not knowing he had been active in the Klan in the 1920s. In 1926, with Klan support, Graves won the Alabama governors office. He was a former Klan chapter head. He pushed for increased education funding, better public health, new highway construction, and pro-labor legislation. Because the Alabama state legislature refused to redistrict until 1972, however, even the Klan was unable to break the planters and rural areas hold on legislative power.Its predecessor had been an exclusively partisan Democratic organization in the South. The second Klan grew in the Midwest, where for a time, its members were courted by both Republicans and Democrats. The KKK state organizations endorsed candidates from either party that supported its goals; Prohibition in particular helped the Klan and some Republicans to make common cause in the Midwest. In the South, however, the southern Klan remained Democratic, closely allied with Democratic police, sheriffs, and other functionaries of local government. With continuing disfranchisement of most African Americans and many poor whites, the only political activity took place within the Democratic Party.Resistance and declineThe Ku Klux Klan rose to prominence in Indiana politics and society after World War I. It was made up of American-born, white Protestants of many income and social levels. Nationally, in the 1920s, Indiana had the most powerful Ku Klux Klan. Though it counted a high number of members statewide, (over 30% of its white male citizens()) its importance peaked with the 1924 election of Edward Jackson for governor. A short time later, the scandal surrounding the murder trial of Stephenson destroyed the image of the Ku Klux Klan as upholders of law and order. By 1926 the Ku Klux Klan was crippled and discredited. ()File:D. C. Stephenson Grand Dragon of the Klu Klux Klan in Indiana, c 1922.jpg|thumb|upright|C. Stephenson, Grand Dragon of the Klan. His conviction for murdering a young white schoolteacher in 1925 devastated the Indiana Klan.C. Stephenson was the Dragon of Indiana and 22 northern states. He led the states under his control to separate from the national KKK organization in 1923. In his 1925 trial, he was convicted for second degree murder for his part in the rape and subsequent death() of Oberholtzer. After Stephensons conviction in a sensational trial, the Klan declined dramatically in Indiana. Historian Moore concluded that a failure in leadership caused the Klans collapse:Stephenson and the other salesmen and office seekers who maneuvered for control of Indianas Invisible Empire lacked both the ability and the desire to use the political system to carry out the Klans stated goals. They were uninterested in, or perhaps even unaware of, grass roots concerns within the movement. For them, the Klan had been nothing more than a means for gaining wealth and power. These marginal men had risen to the top of the hooded order because, until it became a political force, the Klan had never required strong, dedicated leadership. More established and experienced politicians who endorsed the Klan, or who pursued some of the interests of their Klan constituents, also accomplished little. Factionalism created one barrier, but many politicians had supported the Klan simply out of expedience. When charges of crime and corruption began to taint the movement, those concerned about their political futures had even less reason to work on the Klans behalf.:(Moore 1991, p.186.)Many groups and leaders, including prominent Protestant ministers such as Niebuhr in Detroit, spoke out against the Klan. In response to blunt attacks against Jewish Americans and the Klans campaign to outlaw private schools, the Jewish League was formed after the lynching of Leo Frank. When one civic group began to publish Klan membership lists, the number of members quickly declined. The Association for the Advancement of Colored People carried on public education campaigns in order to inform people about Klan activities and lobbied against Klan abuses in Congress. After its peak in 1925, Klan membership in most areas of the Midwest began to decline rapidly.(In Alabama, KKK vigilantes, thinking that they had governmental protection, launched a wave of physical terror in 1927. They targeted both blacks and whites for violation of racial norms and for perceived moral lapses.(Rogers et al., pp. 432433.) This led however to a large backlash beginning in the media. C. Hall, Sr., editor of the Advertiser, began publishing a series of editorials and articles that attacked the Klan for its racial and religious intolerance. Hall won a Prize for his crusade.(Rogers et al., p. 433.) Other newspapers kept up a steady, loud attack on the Klan, referring to the organization as violent and un-American. Sheriffs cracked down. In the 1928 presidential election, the state voted for the Democratic candidate Al Smith, although he was Catholic.Klan membership in Alabama dropped to less than 6,000 by 1930. Small independent units continued to be active in Birmingham, where in the late 1940s, members launched a reign of terror by bombing the homes of upwardly mobile African Americans. Activism by such independent KKK groups increased as a reaction against the Rights Movement of the 1950s and 1960s.Wizard Wesley Evans sold the organization in 1939 to Colescott, an Indiana veterinarian, and Samuel Green, an Atlanta obstetrician. They were unable to staunch the declining membership. In 1944, the IRS filed a lien for $685,000 in back taxes against the Klan, and Colescott was forced to dissolve the organization in 1944. Local Klan groups closed over the following years.()thumb|left|Ku Klux Klan members march down Pennsylvania Avenue in Washington, D.C. in 1928Due in part to the Klan terror directed at them, five million blacks left the South for northern, midwestern and western cities from 1940 to 1970.After World War II, folklorist and author Kennedy infiltrated the Klan and provided information to media and law enforcement agencies. He also provided secret code words to the writers of the Superman radio program, resulting in episodes in which Superman took on the KKK. Kennedys intention to strip away the Klans mystique and trivialize the Klans rituals and code words may have contributed to the decline in Klan recruiting and membership.() In the 1950s, Kennedy wrote a bestselling book about his experiences, which further damaged the Klan.(Kennedy 1990.)The following table shows the change in the Klans estimated membership over time.( and ) (The years given in the table represent approximate time periods.)Later Klans, 1950 through 1960sImage:Poster35.jpg|thumb|250px|Soviet propaganda poster (Freedom, American style, 1950, by Nikolay Dolgorukov and Efimov), showing the KKKs lynchings of blacks.The name Ku Klux Klan began to be used by several independent groups. Beginning in the 1950s, for instance, individual Klan groups in Alabama, began to resist social change and blacks improving their lives by bombing houses in transitional neighborhoods. There were so many bombings in Birmingham of blacks homes by Klan groups in the 1950s that the citys nickname was Bombingham.(During the tenure of Connor as police commissioner in the city, Klan groups were closely allied with the police and operated with impunity. When the Riders arrived in Birmingham, Connor gave Klan members fifteen minutes to attack the riders before sending in the police to quell the attack.( When local and state authorities failed to protect the Freedom Riders and activists, the federal government established effective intervention.In states such as Alabama and Mississippi, Klan members forged alliances with governors administrations.( In Birmingham and elsewhere, the KKK groups bombed the houses of rights activists. In some cases they used physical violence, intimidation and assassination directly against individuals. Many murders went unreported and were not prosecuted by local and state authorities. Continuing disfranchisement of blacks across the South meant that most could not serve on juries, which were all white.According to a report from the Regional Council in Atlanta, the homes of 40 black Southern families were bombed during 1951 and 1952. Some of the bombing victims were social activists whose work exposed them to danger, but most were either people who refused to bow to racist convention or were innocent bystanders, unsuspecting victims of random violence.(Egerton 1994, p. 562563.)Among the more notorious murders by Klan members:* The 1951 Christmas Eve bombing of the home of Association for the Advancement of Colored People (NAACP) activists Harry and Harriette Moore in Florida, resulting in their deaths.(Who Was Harry T. Moore?  The Palm Beach Post, August 16, 1999)* The 1957 murder of Edwards, Jr. Klansmen forced Edwards to jump to his death from a bridge into the River.()* The 1963 assassination of NAACP organizer Evers in Mississippi. In 1994, former Ku Klux Klansman De La Beckwith was convicted.* The 1963 bombing of the 16th Street Baptist Church in Birmingham, Alabama, which killed four African-American girls. The perpetrators were Klan members Chambliss, convicted in 1977, Thomas Blanton and Frank Cherry, convicted in 2001 and 2002. The fourth suspect, Cash, died before he was indicted.* The 1964 murders of three civil rights workers, Chaney, Goodman and Schwerner, in Mississippi. In June 2005, Klan member Ray Killen was convicted of manslaughter.()* The 1964 murder of two black teenagers, Hezekiah Dee and Eddie Moore in Mississippi. In August 2007, based on the confession of Klansman Marcus Edwards, Ford Seale, a reputed Ku Klux Klansman, was convicted. Seale was sentenced to serve three life sentences. Seale was a former Mississippi policeman and sheriffs deputy.()* The 1965 Alabama murder of Liuzzo. She was a Southern-raised Detroit mother of five who was visiting the state in order to attend a civil rights march. At the time of her murder Liuzzo was transporting Civil Rights Marchers.* The 1966 firebombing death of NAACP leader Dahmer Sr., 58, in Mississippi. In 1998 former Ku Klux Klan wizard Bowers was convicted of his murder and sentenced to life. Two other Klan members were indicted with Bowers, but one died before trial, and the others indictment was dismissed.There was also resistance to the Klan. In 1953, newspaper publisher Horace Carter received a prize for reporting on the activities of the Klan. In a 1958 Carolina incident, the Klan burned crosses at the homes of two Lumbee Native Americans who had associated with white people, and they threatened to return with more men. When the KKK held a nighttime rally nearby, they were quickly surrounded by hundreds of armed Lumbees. Gunfire was exchanged, and the Klan was routed at what became known as the of Hayes Pond.(Ingalls 1979; )While the Bureau of Investigation (FBI) had paid informants in the Klan, for instance in Birmingham in the early 1960s, its relations with local law enforcement agencies and the Klan were often ambiguous. The head of the FBI, Edgar Hoover, appeared more concerned about Communist links to civil rights activists than about controlling Klan excesses against citizens. In 1964, the FBIs COINTELPRO program began attempts to infiltrate and disrupt civil rights groups.(As 20th-century Supreme Court rulings extended federal enforcement of citizens rights, the government revived the Force Act and Klan Act from Reconstruction days. Federal prosecutors used these laws as the basis for investigations and indictments in the 1964 murders of Chaney, Goodman and Schwerner;() and the 1965 murder of Liuzzo.() They were also the basis for prosecution in 1991 in v. Alexandria Womens Health Clinic.Contemporary Klan: 1970spresentImage:Kkk-march-violence.jpg|thumb|Violence at a Klan march in Alabama, 1977Once African Americans secured federal legislation to protect civil and voting rights, the KKK shifted its focus to opposing court-ordered busing to desegregate schools, action and more open immigration. In 1971, KKK members used bombs to destroy 10 school buses in Michigan.Altercation with Communist Workers PartyOn November 3, 1979, five protesters were killed by KKK and Nazi Party members in the massacre in North Carolina.() This incident was the culmination of attempts by the Communist Workers Party to organize industrial workers, predominantly black, in the area.(Mark Hand (November 18, 2004). The Greensboro Massacre. Press Action.)Jerry Thompson infiltrationJerry Thompson, a newspaper reporter who infiltrated the KKK in 1979, reported that the FBIs COINTELPRO efforts were highly successful. Rival KKK factions accused each others leaders of being informants. Bill Wilkinson of the Invisible Empire, Knights of the Ku Klux Klan, was revealed to have been working for the FBI.(Thompson 1982.)Thompson, the journalist who claimed he had infiltrated the Klan, related that KKK leaders who appeared indifferent to the threat of arrest showed great concern about a series of civil lawsuits filed by the Poverty Law Center for damages of millions of dollars. These were filed after KKK members shot into a group of African Americans. Klansmen curtailed activities to conserve money for defense against the lawsuits. The KKK also used lawsuits as tools; they filed a libel suit to prevent publication of a paperback edition of Thompsons book.Tennessee shootingIn 1980, three KKK members shot four elderly black women (Viola Ellison, Lela Evans, Opal Jackson and Katherine Johnson) in Chattanooga, Tennessee, following a KKK initiation rally. A fifth woman, Fannie Crumsey, was injured by flying glass in the incident. Attempted murder charges were filed against the three KKK members, two of whomBill Church and Larry Paynewere acquitted by an all-white jury, and the other of whomMarshall Thrashwas sentenced by the same jury to nine months on lesser charges. He was released after three months.()()() In 1982, a jury awarded the five women $535,000 in a civil rights trial.()Michael Donald lynchingAfter Donald was lynched in 1981 in Alabama, the FBI investigated his death and two local KKK members were convicted of having a role, including Francis Hays, who was sentenced to death. With the support of attorneys Dees and Joseph J. Levin of the Poverty Law Center (SPLC), Donalds mother, Beulah Mae Donald, sued the KKK in civil court in Alabama. Her lawsuit against the Klans of America was tried in February 1987. The all-white jury found the Klan responsible for the lynching of Donald and ordered the Klan to pay US$7 million. To pay the judgment, the KKK turned over all of its assets, including its national headquarters building in Tuscaloosa.() After exhausting the appeals process, Hays was executed for Donalds death in Alabama on June 6, 1997. It was the first time since 1913 that a white man had been executed in Alabama for a crime against an African American.()Neo-Nazi alliances and StormfrontIn 1995, Don Black and Chlo Hardin, former KKK Grand Wizard Dukes ex-wife, began a small board system (BBS) called Stormfront. Today, Stormfront has become a prominent online forum for nationalism, Neo-Nazism, speech, racism, and antisemitism.(RedState, White Supremacy, and Responsibility, Kos, December 5, 2005)(Bill OReilly, Circling the Wagons in Georgia, News Channel, May 8, 2003)(WIPO Arbitration and Mediation Center: Case No. DTV2001-0023, Intellectual Property Organization, January 13, 2002) Duke has an account on Stormfront which he uses to post articles from his own website, as well as polling forum members for opinions and questions, in particular during his internet broadcasts. Duke has worked with Don Black on numerous projects including Red Dog in 1980.(Captmike works undercover with the US Government to stop the invasion of the Island Nation of Dominica. manana.com)(Operation Red Dog: Canadian neo-nazis were central to the planned invasion of Dominica in 1981 canadiancontent.ca)Modern statisticsThe modern KKK is not one organization; rather it is composed of small independent chapters across the U.S.( According to the report, the KKKs estimated size then was No more than a few thousand, organized into slightly more than 100 units.) The formation of independent chapters has made KKK groups more difficult to infiltrate, and researchers find it hard to estimate their numbers. Estimates are that about two-thirds of KKK members are concentrated in the United States, with another third situated primarily in the lower Midwest.()()() KKK members have stepped up recruitment in recent years, but the organization grows slowly, with membership estimated at 5,0008,000 across 179 chapters. These recent membership campaigns have been based on issues such as peoples anxieties about immigration, urban crime and marriage.() Many KKK groups have formed strong alliances with other white supremacist groups, such as neo-Nazis. Some KKK groups have become increasingly Nazified, adopting the look and emblems of power skinheads.()On November 14, 2008, an all-white jury of seven men and seven women awarded $1.5 million in compensatory damages and $1 million in punitive damages to plaintiff Jordan Gruver, represented by the Poverty Law Center against the Klans of America.() The ruling found that five IKA members had savagely beaten Gruver, then 16 years old, at a Kentucky county fair in July 2006.()The Civil Liberties Union (ACLU) has provided legal support to various factions of the KKK in defense of their First Amendment rights to hold public rallies, parades, and marches, as well as their right to field political candidates.(See, e.g.,  (accessed August 2009);  The ACLU professes a mission to defend the constitutional rights of all groups, whether left, center, or right.)Current Klan splinter divisions have grown substantially since the 2008 election of U.S. President Obama, the first African-American to hold the office;()() the Klan has expanded its recruitment efforts to white supremacists at the international level.() Current membership estimates by the ADL hold at a national estimate of five thousand.(Ex-Grand Wizard Duke has claimed that thousands of Party movement activists have urged him to run for president in 2012 () and he is seriously considering entering the Republican Party primaries.() Duke has also released a video detailing his platform.() In the video, he pledges that as president he would stop all immigration to the U.S., including legal immigration, and says that he will not let Israel or any nation dictate our foreign policy.(David Dukes presidential platform jHate.wordpress.com) He has also claimed that he would be willing to risk life and limb, endure the barbs of the media to mount the most honest campaign for president since the time of our Founding Fathers. ( ) However, Duke is legally disqualified from running for public office as part of his 2002 guilty plea for tax evasion.()Current Klan organizationsA list is maintained by the League (ADL):()* Bayou Knights of the Ku Klux Klan, prevalent in Texas, Oklahoma, Arkansas, Louisiana and other areas of the Southeastern U.S.* of the American Knights of the Ku Klux Klan(* Klans of America()* of the White Camelia()*Knights of the Ku Klux Klan, headed by national director and self-claimed pastor Robb, and based in Arkansas.() It claims to be the biggest Klan organization in America today. Spokesmen refer to it as a sixth era Klan, and it continues to be a racist group.VocabularyMembership in the Klan is secret. Like many fraternal organizations, the Klan has signs which members can use to recognize one another. A member may use the acronym AYAK (Are you a Klansman?) in conversation to surreptitiously identify himself to another potential member. The response AKIA (A Klansman I am) completes the greeting.()Throughout its varied history, the Klan has coined many words(Axelrod 1997, p. 160.) beginning with Kl including:* Klabee: treasurers* Klavern: local organization* Imperial Kleagle: recruiter* Klecktoken: initiation fee* Kligrapp: secretary* Klonvocation: gathering* Kloran: ritual book* Kloreroe: delegate* Imperial Kludd: chaplainAll of the above terminology was created by William Simmons, as part of his 1915 revival of the Klan.(Wade 1987, p. 142. It was rather difficult, sometimes, to make the two letters fit in, he recalled later, but I did it somehow.) The Reconstruction-era Klan used different titles; the only titles to carry over were  Wizard  for the overall leader of the Klan, Hawk  for the official in charge of security, and a few others, mostly for regional officers of the organization.The Imperial Kludd was the chaplain of the Imperial Klonvokation and he performed such other duties as may be required by the Imperial Wizard. The Imperial Kaliff was the second highest position after the Wizard.()See also* of Ku Klux Klan in New Jersey* of the United States (18651918)#Social Discontent* Crow laws* of the Golden Circle* Klux Klan in Inglewood, California* Klux Klan in Maine* Klux Klan members in United States politics* Klux Klan recruitment* of the Ku Klux Klan* of organizations designated by the Southern Poverty Law Center as hate groups* of white nationalist organizations* Order (group)* of racial tension in Omaha, Nebraska* race riot* Knights of the Ku Klux KlanNotesReferences* * * * Chalmers, David M. (2003) Backfire: How the Ku Klux Klan Helped the Civil Rights Movement. ISBN 0-7425-2310-1* * * * Fleming, Walter J., Ku Klux Klan: Its Origins, Growth and Disbandment, p. 27, 1905, Neale Publishing.* * Fox, Craig. Everyday Klansfolk: White Protestant Life and the KKK in 1920s Michigan (Michigan State University Press, 2011) 274 pp. isbn 978-0-87013-995-6* * * * * * McVeigh, Rory. The Rise of the Ku Klux Klan: Right-Wing Movements and National Politics, (2009), on 1920s* * * * * * * *  Winner of the 1918 Prize for history.* * * * * * Further reading* * * * External links* Civil Rights Greensboro* Ku Klux Klan, Poverty Law Center* KKK, League* Inside Todays KKK, multimedia, Life magazine, April 13, 2009* Interview with Stanley F. Horn, author of Invisible Empire: The Story of the Ku Klux Klan, 18661871 (1939), Forest History Society, Inc., May 1978 Klux KlanKluks Klanbe:--be-x-old:--Klux Klanbg:--Klux Klancs:Ku-klux-klanKlux KlanKlux Klande:Ku-Klux-KlanKlux Klan Klux Klaneo:Ku-Kluks-KlanoKlux KlanKlux KlanKlux KlanKlux Klan   Klux KlanKlux KlanKlux KlanKlux KlanKlux Klan  ka:--ky:--lv:Kukluksklanslt:KukluksklanasKlux Klan   Klux KlanKlux Klanja:Klux KlanKlux Klanuz:Ku-Kluks-KlanKlux KlanKlux KlanKlux Klanru:--Klux Klansk:Kukluxklansl:Kukluksklansr:--Klux KlanKlux KlanKlux Klan  Klux Klanuk:--Klux Klan zh:K
17268
Karlheinz_Stockhausen
1994 WDR.jpg|thumb|300px|Karlheinz Stockhausen in the Electronic Music Studio of the WDR, October 1994Karlheinz Stockhausen (; 22 August 1928  5 December 2007) was a German composer, widely acknowledged by critics as one of the most important (Barrett 1988, 45; Harvey 1975b, 705; Hopkins 1972, 33; Klein 1968, 117) but also controversial (Power 1990, 30) composers of the 20th and early 21st centuries. Another critic calls him one of the great visionaries of 20th-century music (Hewett 2007). He is known for his ground-breaking work in music, aleatory (controlled chance) in serial composition, and musical spatialization.He was educated at the fr Musik Kln and the of Cologne, and later studied with Messiaen in Paris, and with Meyer-Eppler at the of Bonn.One of the leading figures of the School, his compositions and theories were and remain widely influential, not only on composers of music, but also on jazz and popular-music artists. His works, composed over a period of nearly sixty years, eschew traditional forms. In addition to electronic musicboth with and without live performersthey range from miniatures for boxes through works for solo instruments, songs, music, choral and orchestral music, to a cycle of seven full-length operas. His theoretical and other writings comprise ten large volumes. He received numerous prizes and distinctions for his compositions, recordings, and for the scores produced by his publishing company.Some of his notable compositions include the series of nineteen Klavierstcke (Piano Pieces), Kontra-Punkte for ten instruments, the electronic/musique-concrte der Jnglinge, Gruppen for three orchestras, the percussion solo Zyklus, Kontakte, the cantata Momente, the live-electronic Mikrophonie I, Hymnen, Stimmung for six vocalists, den sieben Tagen, Mantra for two pianos and electronics, Tierkreis, Inori for soloists and orchestra, and the gigantic opera cycle Licht. He died of sudden heart failure at the age of 79, on 5 December 2007 at his home in Krten, Germany.BiographyChildhoodStockhausen was born in the Burg Mdrath, the so-called castle of the village of Mdrath, which served at the time as the maternity home of the Bergheim district. The village, located near Kerpen in the vicinity of Cologne, was displaced in 1956 by the strip mining of lignite in the region, although the castle itself still exists. His father, Simon Stockhausen, was a schoolteacher, and his mother Gertrud (ne Stupp) was the daughter of a prosperous family of farmers in Neurath in the Bight. A daughter, Katherina, was born the year after Karlheinz, and a second son, Hermann-Josef (Hermnnchen) followed in 1932. Gertrud played the piano and accompanied her own singing but, after three pregnancies in as many years, experienced a mental breakdown and was institutionalized in December 1932, followed a few months later by the death of her younger son, Hermann (Kurtz 1992, 8, 11, & 13).From the age of seven, Stockhausen grew up in Altenberg, where he received his first piano lessons from the Protestant organist of the Altenberg Cathedral, Franz-Josef Kloth (Kurtz 1992, 14). In 1938 his father remarried. His new wife, Luzia, had been the familys housekeeper. The couple had two daughters (Kurtz 1992, 18). Because his relationship with his new stepmother was less than happy, in January 1942 Karlheinz became a boarder at the teachers training college in Xanten, where he continued his piano training and also studied oboe and violin (Kurtz 1992, 18). In the first half of 1942, he learned that his mother had died, ostensibly from leukemia, although everyone at the same hospital had supposedly died of the same disease. It was generally understood that she had been a victim of the Nazi policy of killing useless eaters (Stockhausen 1989a, 2021; Kurtz 1992, 19). Stockhausen later dramatized his mothers death in hospital by lethal injection, in Act 1 scene 2 (Mondeva) of the opera aus Licht (Kurtz 1992, 213). According to one source, as a young teenager he worked as a cobbler (Prendergast 2000, 52). In the autumn of 1944, he was conscripted to serve as a stretcher bearer in Bedburg (Kurtz 1992, 18). In February 1945, he met his father for the last time in Altenberg. Simon, who was on leave from the front, told his son, Im not coming back. Look after things. By the end of the war, his father was regarded as missing in action, and may have been killed in Hungary (Kurtz 1992, 19). A comrade later reported to Karlheinz that he saw his father wounded in action (Maconie 2005, 19). Fifty-five years after the fact, a journalist writing for the Guardian newspaper stated unequivocally, though without offering any fresh evidence, that Simon Stockhausen was killed in Hungary in 1945 (OMahony 2001).EducationFrom 1947 to 1951, Stockhausen studied music pedagogy and piano at the fr Musik Kln (Cologne Conservatory of Music) and musicology, philosophy, and Germanics at the of Cologne. He had training in harmony and counterpoint, the latter with Schroeder, but he did not develop a real interest in composition until 1950. He was admitted at the end of that year to the class of Swiss composer Frank Martin, who had just begun a seven-year tenure in Cologne (Kurtz 1992, 28). At the Ferienkurse in 1951, Stockhausen met Belgian composer Goeyvaerts, who had just completed studies with Messiaen (analysis) and Milhaud (composition) in Paris, and Stockhausen resolved to do likewise (Kurtz 1992, 3436). He arrived in Paris on 8 January 1952 and began attending Messiaens courses in aesthetics and analysis, as well as Milhauds composition classes. He continued with Messiaen for a year, but he was disappointed with Milhaud and abandoned his lessons after a few weeks (Kurtz 1992, 4548). In March 1953, he left Paris to take up a position as assistant to Eimert at the newly established Electronic Music Studio of Rundfunk (NWDR) (from 1 January 1955, Rundfunk, or WDR) in Cologne (Kurtz 1992, 5657). In 1962, he succeeded Eimert as director of the studio (Morawska-Bngeler 1988, 19). From 1954 to 1956, he studied phonetics, acoustics, and information theory with Meyer-Eppler at the of Bonn (Kurtz 1992, 6872). Together with Eimert, Stockhausen edited the  journal  Reihe from 1955 to 1962 (Grant 2001, 12).Career and adult lifeFamily and homeOn 29 December 1951, in Hamburg, he married Doris Andreae (Kurtz 1992, 45; Maconie 2005, 47). Together they had four children: Suja (b. 1953), Christel (b. 1956), Markus (b. 1957), and Majella (b. 1961) (Kurtz 1992, 90; Tannenbaum 1987, 94). On 3 April 1967, in San Francisco, he married Bauermeister, with whom he had two children: Julika (b. 22 January 1966) and Simon (b. 1967) (Kurtz 1992, 141 & 149; Tannenbaum 1987, 95).Four of Stockhausens children became professional musicians (Kurtz 1992, 202), and he composed some of his works specifically for them. A large number of pieces for the trumpetfrom Sirius (197577) to the trumpet version of In Freundschaft (1997)were composed for and premired by his son Markus (Kurtz 1992, 208; Markus Stockhausen 1998, 1316; Tannenbaum 1987, 61). Markus, at the age of 4 years, had performed the part of The Child in the Cologne premire of Originale, alternating performances with his sister Christel (Maconie 2005, 220). Klavierstck XII and Klavierstck XIII (and their versions as scenes from the operas Donnerstag aus Licht and aus Licht) were written for his daughter Majella, and were first performed by her at the ages of 16 and 20, respectively (Maconie 2005, 430 & 443; Stockhausen Texte 5:190, 255, 274; Stockhausen Texte 6:64, 373). The saxophone duet in the second act of Donnerstag aus Licht, and a number of synthesizer parts in the Licht operas, including Klavierstck XV (Synthi-Fou) from Dienstag, were composed for his son Simon (Kurtz 1992, 222; Maconie 2005, 480 & 489; Stockhausen Texte 5:186, 529), who also assisted his father in the production of the electronic music from Freitag aus Licht. His daughter Christel is a flautist who performed and gave a course on interpretation of Tierkreis in 1977 (Stockhausen Texte 5:105), later published as an article (C. Stockhausen 1978).In 1961, Stockhausen acquired a parcel of land in the vicinity of Krten, a village east of Cologne, near Gladbach in the Land. He had a house built there, which was designed to his specifications by the architect Erich Schneider-Wessling, and he resided there since its completion in the autumn of 1965 (Kurtz 1992, 11617, 13738).TeachingB 145 Bild-F004566-0002, Darmstadt, Internationaler Kurs fr neue Musik.jpg|thumb|Stockhausen lecturing at the 12th International Summer Courses for New Music in Darmstadt, 1957After lecturing at the Internationale Ferienkurse fr Neue Musik at Darmstadt (first in 1953), Stockhausen gave lectures and concerts in Europe, North America, and Asia (Stockhausen-Verlag 2010, 2, 1415). He was guest professor of composition at the of Pennsylvania in 1965 and at the of California, Davis in 196667 (Kramer 1998; Stockhausen-Verlag 2010, 23). He founded and directed the Cologne Courses for New Music from 1963 to 1968, and was appointed Professor of Composition at the fr Musik Kln in 1971, where he taught until 1977 (Kurtz 1992, 12628 & 194; Stockhausen-Verlag 2010, 3). In 1998, he founded the Stockhausen Courses, which are held annually in Krten (Stockhausen-Verlag 2010, 69, 15).Publishing activitiesFrom the mid-1950s onward, Stockhausen designed (and in some cases had had printed) his own musical scores for his publisher, Edition, which often involved unconventional devices. The score for his piece Refrain, for instance, includes a rotatable (refrain) on a transparent plastic strip. Early in the 1970s, he ended his agreement with Universal Edition and began publishing his own scores under the Stockhausen-Verlag imprint (Kurtz 1992, 184). This arrangement allowed him to extend his notational innovations (for example, dynamics in Weltparlament the first scene of aus Licht are coded in colour) and resulted in eight German Music Publishers Society Awards between 1992 (Luzifers Tanz) and 2005 (Hoch-Zeiten, from Sonntag aus Licht) (Stockhausen-Verlag 2010, 1213). The score of Momente, published just before the composers death in 2007, won this prize for the ninth time (Deutscher Musikeditionspreis 2009) In the early 1990s, Stockhausen reacquired the licenses to most of the recordings of his music he had made to that point, and started his own record company to make this music permanently available on Compact Disc (Maconie 2005, 47778).DeathStockhausen died of sudden heart failure on the morning of 5 December 2007 in Krten, North Rhine-Westphalia. He had just the night before finished a work recently commissioned for performance by the Mozart Orchestra of Bologna (Bumer 2007).CompositionsStockhausen wrote 370 individual works. He often departs radically from musical tradition and his work is influenced by Messiaen, Varse, and Webern, as well as by film (Stockhausen 1996b) and by painters such as Mondrian (Stockhausen 1996a, 94; Texte 3, 9293; Toop 1998) and Klee (Maconie 2005, 187).1950sStockhausen began to compose in earnest only during his third year at the conservatory (Kurtz 1992, 2627). His early student compositions remained out of the public eye until, in 1971, he published Chre fr Doris, Drei Lieder for alto voice and chamber orchestra, Choral for a capella choir (all three from 1950), and a Sonatine for Violin and Piano (1951) (Maconie 1990, 56 and 11).In August 1951, just after his first Darmstadt visit, Stockhausen began working with a form of athematic serial composition that rejected the technique of Schoenberg (Felder 1977, 92). He characterized many of these earliest compositions (together with the music of other, like-minded composers of the period) as punktuelle (punctual or pointist music, commonly mistranslated as pointillist) Musik, though one critic concluded after analysing several of these early works that Stockhausen never really composed punctually (Sabbe 1981). Compositions from this phase include Kreuzspiel (1951), the Klavierstcke IIV (1952the fourth of this first set of four Klavierstcke, titled Klavierstck IV, is specifically cited by Stockhausen as an example of punctual music in Texte 2, 19), and the first (unpublished) versions of Punkte and Kontra-Punkte (1952) (Texte 2, 20). However, several works from these same years show Stockhausen formulating his first really ground-breaking contribution to the theory and, above all, practice of composition (Toop 2005, 3), that of group composition (Toop 2005, 3), found in Stockhausens works as early as 1952 and continuing to the present time (Toop 2005, 3). This principle was first publicly described by Stockhausen in a radio talk from December 1955, titled Gruppenkomposition: Klavierstck I (Texte 1, 6374).In December 1952, he composed a Konkrete Etde, realized in Schaeffers Paris concrte studio. In March 1953, he moved to the NWDR studio in Cologne and turned to music with two Electronic Studies (1953 and 1954), and then introducing spatial placements of sound sources with his mixed concrte and electronic work der Jnglinge (195556). Experiences gained from the Studies made plain that it was an unacceptable oversimplification to regard timbres as stable entities (Texte 1, 56). Reinforced by his studies with Meyer-Eppler, beginning in 1955, Stockhausen formulated new statistical criteria for composition, focussing attention on the aleatoric, directional tendencies of sound movement, the change from one state to another, with or without returning motion, as opposed to a fixed state (Decroupet and Ungeheuer 1998, 9899). Stockhausen later wrote, describing this period in his compositional work, The first revolution occurred from 1952/53 as musique concrte, electronic tape music, and space music, entailing composition with transformers, generators, modulators, magnetophones, etc; the integration of all concrete and abstract (synthetic) sound possibilities (also all noises), and the controlled projection of sound in space (Stockhausen 1989b, 127; reprinted in Schwartz & Childs 1998, 374). His position as the leading German composer of his generation (Toop 2001) was established with Gesang der Jnglinge and three concurrently composed pieces in different media: Zeitmae for five woodwinds, Gruppen for three orchestras, and Klavierstck XI (Kohl 1998a, 61). The principles underlying the latter three compositions are presented in Stockhausens best-known theoretical article, . . . wie die Zeit vergeht . . . (. . . How Time Passes . . .), first published in 1957 in vol. 3 of Reihe (Texte 1, 99139).His work with electronic music and its utter fixity led him to explore modes of instrumental and vocal music in which performers individual capabilities and the circumstances of a particular performance (e.g., hall acoustics) may determine certain aspects of a composition. He called this variable form (Wrner 1973, 101105). In other cases, a work may be presented from a number of different perspectives. In Zyklus (1959), for example, he began using notation for instrumental music. The score is written so that the performance can start on any page, and it may be read upside down, or from right to left, as the performer chooses (Stockhausen, Texte 2, 73100). Still other works permit different routes through the constituent parts. Stockhausen called both of these possibilities polyvalent form (Stockhausen, Texte 1, 24151), which may be either open form (essentially incomplete, pointing beyond its frame), as with Klavierstck XI (1956), or closed form (complete and self-contained) as with Momente (196264/69) (Kaletha 2004, 9798).In many of his works, elements are played off against one another, simultaneously and successively: in Kontra-Punkte (Against Points, 195253), which, in its revised form became his official opus 1, a process leading from an initial point texture of isolated notes toward a florid, ornamental ending is opposed by a tendency from diversity (six timbres, dynamics, and durations) toward uniformity (timbre of solo piano, a nearly constant soft dynamic, and fairly even durations). In Gruppen (195557), fanfares and passages of varying speed (superimposed durations based on the harmonic series) are occasionally flung between three full orchestras, giving the impression of movement in space (Maconie 2005, 486).In his Kontakte for electronic sounds (optionally with piano and percussion) (195860), he achieved for the first time an isomorphism of the four parameters of pitch, duration, dynamics, and timbre (Stockhausen 1962, 40).1960sIn 1960, Stockhausen returned to the composition of vocal music (for the first time since Gesang der Jnglinge) with Carr for four choirs and four orchestras (Stockhausen-Verlag 2010, 18). Two years later, he began an expansive cantata titled Momente (196264/69), for solo soprano, four choir groups and thirteen instrumentalists (Stockhausen-Verlag 2010, 18). In 1963, Stockhausen created Plus-Minus, 2  7 pages for realisation containing basic note materials and a complex system of transformations to which those materials are to be subjected in order to produce an unlimited number of different compositions (Stockhausen-Verlag 2010, 20; Toop 2005, 17578). Through the rest of the 1960s, he continued to explore such possibilities of process composition in works for live performance, such as Prozession (1967), Kurzwellen, and Spiral (both 1968), culminating in the verbally described intuitive music compositions of den sieben Tagen (1968) and Fr kommende Zeiten (196870) (Fritsch 1979; Kohl 1981, 19293, 22751; Kohl 1998b, 7; Toop 2005, 19192). Some of his later works, such as Ylem (1972) and the first three parts of Herbstmusik (1974), also fall under this rubric (Maconie 2005, 254 and 36668). Several of these process compositions were featured in the all-day programmes presented at Expo 70, for which Stockhausen composed two more similar pieces, Pole for two players, and Expo for three (Kohl 1981, 19293; Maconie 2005, 32324). In other compositions, such as Stop for orchestra (1965), Adieu for wind quintet (1966), and the Dr. K Sextett, which was written in 196869 in honour of Alfred Kalmus of Universal Edition, he presented his performers with more restricted improvisational possibilities (Maconie 2005, 262, 26768, 31920).He pioneered live electronics in Mixtur (1964/67/2003) for orchestra and electronics (Kohl 1981, 51163), Mikrophonie I (1964) for tam-tam, two microphones, two filters with potentiometers (6 players) (Maconie 1972; Maconie 2005, 25557), Mikrophonie II (1965) for choir, organ, and four ring modulators (Peters 1992), and Solo for a melody instrument with feedback (1966) (Maconie 2005, 26265). Improvisation also plays a part in all of these works, but especially in Solo (Maconie 2005, 264). He also composed two electronic works for tape, Telemusik (1966) and Hymnen (196667) (Kohl 2002; Stockhausen-Verlag 2010, 21). The latter also exists in a version with partially improvising soloists, and the third of its four regions in a version with orchestra (Stockhausen-Verlag 2010, 21). At this time, Stockhausen also began to incorporate pre-existent music from world traditions into his compositions (Kohl 1981, 9395; Texte 4, 46876). Telemusik was the first overt example of this trend (Kohl 2002, 96). In 1968, Stockhausen composed the vocal sextet Stimmung, for the Vocale Kln, an hour-long work based entirely on the overtones of a low B-flat (Toop 2005, 39). In the following year, he created Fresco for four orchestral groups, a Wandelmusik (foyer music) composition (Maconie 2005, 321). This was intended to be played for about five hours in the foyers and grounds of the Beethovenhalle auditorium complex in Bonn, before, after, and during a group of (in part simultaneous) concerts of his music in the auditoriums of the facility (Maconie 2005, 32123). The overall project was given the title Musik fr die Beethovenhalle (Maconie 2005, 296). This had precedents in two collective-composition seminar projects that Stockhausen gave at Darmstadt in 1967 and 1968: Ensemble and Musik fr ein Haus (Gehlhaar 1968; Ritzel 1970; Iddon 2004; Maconie 2005, 321), and would have successors in the park music composition for five spatially separated groups, Sternklang (Star Sounds) of 1971, the orchestral work Trans, composed in the same year and the thirteen simultaneous musical scenes for soloists and duets titled fr Lige (1972) (Maconie 2005, 33436, 338, 34143).Space music and Expo 70Since the mid-1950s, Stockhausen had been developing concepts of spatialization in his works, not only in electronic music, such as the 5-channel der Jnglinge (195556) and Telemusik (1966), and 4-channel Kontakte (195860) and Hymnen (196667). Instrumental/vocal works like Gruppen for three orchestras (195557) and Carr for four orchestras and choirs (195960) also exhibit this trait (Stockhausen Texte 2:7172, 4950, 102103; Stockhausen 1989, 105108; Cott 1973, 200201). In lectures such as Music in Space from 1958 (Stockhausen Texte 1:15275), he called for new kinds of concert halls to be built, suited to the requirements of spatial music. His idea was a spherical space which is fitted all around with loudspeakers. In the middle of this spherical space a sound-permeable, transparent platform would be suspended for the listeners. They could hear music composed for such standardized spaces coming from above, from below and from all points of the compass. (Stockhausen Texte 1:153) In 1968, the West German government invited Stockhausen to collaborate on the German Pavilion at the 1970 World Fair in Osaka and to create a joint multimedia project for it with artist Piene. Other collaborators on the project included the pavilions architect, Bornemann, Fritz Winckel, director of the Electronic Music Studio at the University of Berlin, and engineer Max Mengeringhausen. The pavilion theme was gardens of music, in keeping with which Bornemann intended planting the exhibition halls beneath a broad lawn, with a connected auditorium sprouting above ground. Initially, Bornemann conceived this auditorium in the form of an amphitheatre, with a central orchestra podium and surrounding audience space. In the summer of 1968, Stockhausen met with Bornemann and persuaded him to change this conception to a spherical space with the audience in the center, surrounded by loudspeaker groups in seven rings at different latitudes around the interior walls of the sphere (Kurtz 1992, 166; Fllmer 1996). Although Stockhausen and Pienes planned multimedia project, titled Hinab-Hinauf, was developed in detail (Stockhausen, Texte 3:15574), the World Fair committee rejected their concept as too extravagant and instead asked Stockhausen to present daily five-hour programs of his music (Kurtz 1992, 178). Stockhausens works were performed for 5 hours every day over a period of 183 days to a total audience of about a million listeners (Wrner 1973, 256). According to Stockhausens biographer, Michael Kurtz, Many visitors felt the spherical auditorium to be an oasis of calm amidst the general hubbub, and after a while it became one of the main attractions of Expo 1970 (Kurtz 1992, 179).1970sFile:Shiraz 38.jpg|thumb|Stockhausen (front right) at the mixing desk for a performance of Mantra, Arts Festival, Iran, 2 September 1972Beginning with Mantra for two pianos and electronics (1970), Stockhausen turned to composition, a technique which involves the projection and multiplication of a single, double, or triple melodic-line formula (Kohl 198384a; Kohl 1990; Kohl 2004). Sometimes, as in Mantra and the large orchestral composition with mime soloists, Inori, the simple formula is stated at the outset as an introduction. He continued to use this technique (e.g., in the two related solo-clarinet pieces, Harlekin Harlequin and Der kleine Harlekin Little Harlequin of 1975, and the orchestral Jubilum Jubilee of 1977) through the completion of the opera-cycle Licht in 2003 (Blumrder 1982; Conen 1991; Kohl 198384a; Kohl 1990; Kohl 1993; Kohl 2004; Stockhausen-Verlag 2010, 10). Some works from the 1970s did not employ formula techniquee.g., the vocal duet Am Himmel wandre ich (In the Sky I am Walking, one of the 13 components of the multimedia Alphabet fr Lige, 1972), Laub und Regen (Leaves and Rain, from the theatre piece Herbstmusik (1974), the unaccompanied-clarinet composition Amour, and the choral opera gibt das Leben (Breathing Gives Life, 1974/77)but nevertheless share its simpler, melodically oriented style (Conen 1991, 57). Two such pieces, Tierkreis (Zodiac, 197475) and Freundschaft (In Friendship, 1977, a solo piece with versions for virtually every orchestral instrument), have become Stockhausens most widely performed and recorded compositions (Anon. 2007a; Deruchie 2007; Nordin 2004).This dramatic simplification of style provided a model for a new generation of German composers, loosely associated under the label neue Einfachheit or Simplicity (Andraschke 1981). The best-known of these composers is Rihm, who studied with Stockhausen in 197273. His orchestral composition Sub-Kontur (197475) quotes the formula of Stockhausens Inori (197374), and he has also acknowledged the influence of Momente on this work (Frobenius 1981, 53 + note 5960). Other large works from this decade include the orchestral Trans (1971) and two music-theatre compositions utilizing the Tierkreis melodies: im Bauch (Music in the Belly) for six percussionists (1975), and the science-fiction opera Sirius (197577) for eight-channel electronic music with soprano, bass, trumpet, and bass clarinet, which has four different versions for the four seasons, each lasting over an hour and a half (Stockhausen-Verlag 2010, 2425).March 2004 excerpt.jpg|thumb|upright|Stockhausen on 7 March 2004 during the mix-down of the recording of Angel Processions from Sonntag aus Licht, in Sound Studio N, Cologne. (Photo: Kathinka Pasveer).19772003Between 1977 and 2003, he composed seven operas in a cycle titled Licht: Die sieben Tage der Woche (Light: The Seven Days of the Week) (Maconie 2005, 403544). The Licht cycle deals with the traits associated in various historical traditions with each weekday (Monday  birth and fertility, Tuesday  conflict and war, Wednesday  reconciliation and cooperation, Thursday  traveling and learning, etc.) and with the relationships between three archetypal characters: Michael, Lucifer, and Eve (Kohl 198384b, 489; Stockhausen Texte 6:15256, 175, 200201). Each of these characters dominates one of the operas (Donnerstag Thursday, Samstag Saturday, and Montag Monday, respectively), the three possible pairings are foregrounded in three others, and the equal combination of all three is featured in Mittwoch (Wednesday) (Kohl 1990, 274). Stockhausens conception of opera was based significantly on ceremony and ritual, with influence from the Japanese Noh theatre (Stockhausen, Conen, and Hennlich 1989, 282), as well as Judeo-Christian and Vedic traditions (Bruno 1999, 134). In 1968, at the time of the composition of Aus den sieben Tagen, Stockhausen had read a biography by Satprem about the Bengali guru Aurobindo (Guerreri 2009), and subsequently he also read many of the published writings by Aurobindo himself. The title of Licht owes something to Aurobindos theory of Agni (the Hindu and Vedic fire deity), developed from two basic premises of nuclear physics; Stockhausens definition of a formula and, especially, his conception of the Licht superformula, also owes a great deal to Sri Aurobindos category of the supramental (Peters 2003, 227). Similarly, his approach to voice and text sometimes departed from traditional usage: Characters were as likely to be portrayed by instrumentalists or dancers as by singers, and a few parts of Licht (e.g., Luzifers Traum from Samstag, Welt-Parlament from Mittwoch, Lichter-Wasser and Hoch-Zeiten from Sonntag) use written or improvised texts in simulated or invented languages (Kohl 198384b, 499; Moritz 2005; Stockhausen 1999, 1825; Stockhausen 2001b, 20; Stockhausen 2003, 20).The seven operas were not composed in weekday order but rather starting (apart from Jahreslauf in 1977, which became the first act of Dienstag) with the solo operas and working toward the more complex ones: Donnerstag (197880), Samstag (198183), Montag (198488), Dienstag (1977/198791), Freitag (199194), Mittwoch (199597), and finally Sonntag (19982003) (Stockhausen-Verlag 2010, 37, 2648).Stockhausen had dreams of flying throughout his life, and these dreams are reflected in the Helikopter-Streichquartett (the third scene of Mittwoch aus Licht), completed in 1993. In it, the four members of a quartet perform in four helicopters flying independent flight paths over the countryside near the concert hall. The sounds they play are mixed together with the sounds of the helicopters and played through speakers to the audience in the hall. Videos of the performers are also transmitted back to the concert hall. The performers are synchronized with the aid of a track, transmitted to them and heard over headphones (Stockhausen 1996c, 215). The first performance of the piece took place in Amsterdam on 26 June 1995, as part of the Festival (Stockhausen 1996c, 216). Despite its extremely unusual nature, the piece has been given several performances, including one on 22 August 2003 as part of the Festival to open the Hangar-7 venue (Stockhausen-Verlag 2010, 7), and the German premire on 17 June 2007 in Braunschweig as part of the Stadt der Wissenschaft 2007 Festival (Stockhausen-Stiftung 2007). The work has also been recorded by the Quartet.In 1999 he was Invited by Fink to be the ninth composer featured in the annual Komponistenportrt of the Musik Festival.In 1999, BBC producer Rodney Wilson asked Stockhausen to collaborate with Stephen and Timothy Quay on a film for the fourth series of Sound on Film International. Although Stockhausens music had been used for films previously (most notably, parts of Hymnen in Roegs Walkabout in 1971), this was the first time he had been asked to provide music specially for the purpose. He adapted 21 minutes of material taken from his electronic music for Freitag aus Licht, calling the result Zwei Paare (Two Couples), and the Brothers Quay created their animated film, which they titled In Absentia, based only on their reactions to the music and the simple suggestion that a window might be an idea to use (Anon. 2001). When, at a preview screening, Stockhausen saw the film, which shows a madwoman writing letters from a bleak asylum cell, he was moved to tears. The Brothers Quay were astonished to learn that his mother had been imprisoned by the Nazis in an asylum, where she later died.  This was a very moving moment for us as well, especially because we had made the film without knowing any of this (Aita 2001).20032007After completing Licht, Stockhausen embarked on a new cycle of compositions, based on the hours of the day, entitled Klang (Sound). Twenty-one of these pieces were completed before the composers death (Stockhausen-Verlag 2010, 4950). The works from this cycle performed to date are First Hour: Himmelfahrt (Ascension), for organ or synthesizer, soprano and tenor (20042005); Second Hour: Freude (Joy) for two harps (2005); Third Hour: Natrliche Dauern (Natural Durations) for piano (20052006); and Fourth Hour: Himmels-Tr (Heavens Door) for a percussionist and a little girl (2005) (Stockhausen-Verlag 2010, 49). The Fifth Hour, Harmonien (Harmonies), is a solo in three versions for flute, bass clarinet, and trumpet (2006) (Stockhausen-Verlag 2010, 49); the bass clarinet and flute versions were premired in Krten on 11 July 2007 and 13 July 2007, respectively (Stockhausen 2007b and Stockhausen 2007c), and the trumpet version was premired on 2 August 2008 in London at a BBC Proms concert (Stockhausen-Stiftung 2008, 7). The Sixth through Twelfth hours are chamber-music works based on the material from the Fifth Hour (Stockhausen-Verlag 2010, 49). Of these, the Seventh (Balance, for flute, English horn, and bass clarinet), Ninth (Hoffnung, for string trio), and Tenth, Glanz (commission of the Asko Ensemble and the Holland Festival), were premired on 22 August (Stockhausen-Stiftung 2008, 9), 31 August (Stockhausen-Stiftung 2008, 10), and 19 June (Beer 2008; Voermans 2008), respectively. The premire of the Sixth (Schnheit, for flute, trumpet, and bass clarinet) took place on 5 October 2009 at the Grande Auditrio of the Gulbenkian Foundation in Lisbon, and that of the Twelfth, Erwachen, on 13 October 2009 in Brussels. The Thirteenth Hour, Cosmic Pulsesan electronic work made by superimposing 24 layers of sound, each having its own spatial motion, among eight loudspeakers placed around the concert hallwas premired in Rome on 7 May 2007 at Auditorium Parco della Musica, (Sala Sinopoli) (Stockhausen 2007a). Hours 14 through 21 are solo pieces for bass voice, baritone voice, basset-horn, horn, tenor voice, soprano voice, soprano saxophone, and flute, respectively, each with electronic accompaniment of a different set of three layers from Cosmic Pulses (Stockhausen-Verlag 2010, 50). Of these, the Twentieth (Edentia for soprano saxophone and electronic music) was premired on 6 August 2008 (Mischke 2008), the Nineteenth (Urantia for soprano and electronic music) on 8 November 2008 in London, the Fourteenth (Havona for bass voice and electronic music) on 10 January 2009 in Paris (Stockhausen-Stiftung 2008, 15 and 13), and the Twenty-first (Paradies, for flute and electronic music) at the Musik Festival, at the Laeiszhalle in Hamburg on 24 August 2009. All of the remaining pieces were first performed in the context of the collective premiere of the cycle, at the Festival MusikTriennale Kln on 89 May 2010, in 176 individual concerts (Gimpel 2010).TheoriesIn the 1950s and early 1960s, Stockhausen published a series of articles that established his importance in the area of music theory. Although these include analyses of music by Mozart, Debussy, Bartk, Stravinsky, Goeyvaerts, Boulez, Nono, Fritsch, von Biel, and, especially, Webern (Texte 1:2431, 3944, 7585, 8698; Texte 2:13639, 14966, 170206; Texte 3:23638; Texte 4:66263), the items on compositional theory directly related to his own work are regarded as the most important generally. Indeed, the Texte come closer than anything else currently available to providing a general compositional theory for the postwar period (Morgan 1975, 16). His most celebrated article is ... wie die Zeit vergeht ... (. . . How Time Passes . . .), first published in the third volume of Reihe (1957). In it, he expounds a number of temporal conceptions underlying his instrumental compositions Zeitmae, Gruppen, and Klavierstck XI. In particular, this article develops (1) a scale of twelve tempos analogous to the chromatic pitch scale, (2) a technique of building progressively smaller, integral subdivisions over a basic (fundamental) duration, analogous to the overtone series, (3) musical application of the concept of the partial field (time fields and field sizes) in both successive and simultaneous proportions, (4) methods of projecting large-scale form from a series of proportions, (5) the concept of statistical composition, (6) the concept of action duration and the associated variable form, and (7) the notion of the directionless temporal field and with it, polyvalent form (Stockhausen Texte 1:99139). Other important articles from this period include Musik im Raum (Music in Space, 1958, Texte 1:15275), Musik und Graphik (Music and Graphics, 1959, Texte 1:17688), Momentform (1960, Texte 1:189210), Die Einheit der musikalischen Zeit (The Unity of Musical Time, 1961, Texte 1:21121; Stockhausen 1962), and Erfindung und Entdeckung (Invention and Discovery, 1961, Texte 1:22258), the last summing up the ideas developed up to 1961. Taken together, these temporal theories suggested that the entire compositional structure could be conceived as timbre: since the different experienced components such as color, harmony and melody, meter and rhythm, dynamics, and form correspond to the different segmental ranges of this unified time 1:120, the total musical result at any given compositional level is simply the spectrum of a more basic durationi.e., its timbre, perceived as the overall effect of the overtone structure of that duration, now taken to include not only the rhythmic subdivisions of the duration but also their relative dynamic strength, envelope, etc. Compositionally considered, this produced a change of focus from the individual tone to a whole complex of tones related to one another by virtue of their relation to a fundamentala change that was probably the most important compositional development of the latter part of the 1950s, not only for Stockhausens music but for advanced music in general. (Morgan 1975, 6) Some of these ideas, considered from a purely theoretical point of view (divorced from their context as explanations of particular compositions) drew significant critical fire (Backus 1962, Fokker 1968, Perle 1960). For this reason, Stockhausen ceased publishing such articles for a number of years, as he felt that many useless polemics about these texts had arisen, and he preferred to concentrate his attention on composing (Texte 4:13).Through the 1960s, although he taught and lectured publicly (Texte 3:196211), Stockhausen published little of an analytical or theoretical nature. Only in 1970 did he again begin publishing theoretical articles, with Kriterien, his six seminar lectures for the Ferienkurse (Texte 3:22229).ReceptionMusical influenceStockhausens two early Electronic Studies (especially the second) had a powerful influence on the subsequent development of electronic music in the 1950s and 1960s, particularly in the work of the Italian Evangelisti and the Poles Dobrowolski and Kotoski (Skowron 1981, 39). The influence of his Kontra-Punkte, Zeitmasse and Gruppen may be seen in the work of many composers, including Stravinskys Threni (195758) and Movements for piano and orchestra (195859) and other works up to the Variations: Aldous Huxley In Memoriam (196364), whose rhythms are likely to have been inspired, at least in part, by certain passages from Stockhausens Gruppen (Neidhffer 2005, 340). Though music of Stockhausens generation may seem an unlikely influence, Stravinsky said in a 1957 conversation: I have all around me the spectacle of composers who, after their generation has had its decade of influence and fashion, seal themselves off from further development and from the next generation (as I say this, exceptions come to mind, Krenek, for instance). Of course, it requires greater effort to learn from ones juniors, and their manners are not invariably good. But when you are seventy-five and your generation has overlapped with four younger ones, it behooves you not to decide in advance how far composers can go, but to try to discover whatever new thing it is makes the new generation new. (Stravinsky and Craft 1959, 133)Amongst British composers, Sir Harrison Birtwistle readily acknowledges the influence of Stockhausens Zeitmae (especially on his two wind quintets, Refrains and Choruses and Five Distances) and Gruppen on his work more generally (Cross 2000, 48; Cross 2001; Hall 1984, 3 and 78; Hall 1998, 99 and 108; Pace 1996, 27). Ferneyhough says that, although the technical and speculative innovations of Klavierstcke IIV, Kreuzspiel and Kontra-Punkte escaped him on first encounter (Ferneyhough 1988), they nevertheless produced a sharp emotion, the result of a beneficial shock engendered by their boldness (Ferneyhough 1988) and provided an important source of motivation (rather than of imitation) for my own investigations (Ferneyhough 1988). While still in school, he became fascinated upon hearing the British premire of Gruppen, and listened many times to the recording of this performance, while trying to penetrate its secretshow it always seemed to be about to explode, but managed nevertheless to escape unscathed in its corebut scarcely managed to grasp it. Retrospectively, it is clear that from this confusion was born my interest for the formal questions which remain until today. (Ferneyhough 1988) With respect to Stockhausens later work, he said, I have never subscribed (whatever the inevitable personal distance) to the thesis according to which the many transformations of vocabulary characterizing Stockhausens development are the obvious sign of his inability to carry out the early vision of strict order that he had in his youth. On the contrary, it seems to me that the constant reconsideration of his premises has led to the maintenance of a remarkably tough thread of historical consciousness which will become clearer with time. . . . I doubt that there has been a single composer of the intervening generation who, even if for a short time, did not see the world of music differently thanks to the work of Stockhausen. (Ferneyhough 1988) In a short essay describing Stockhausens influence on his own work, Richard Barrett concludes that Stockhausen remains the composer whose next work I look forward most to hearing, apart from myself of course and names as works that have had particular impact on his musical thinking Mantra, Gruppen, Carr, Klavierstck X, Inori, and Jubilum (Barrett 1998).French composer and conductor Pierre Boulez once declared, Stockhausen is the greatest living composer, and the only one whom I recognize as my peer (Anon. 1967; Anon. 1971). Boulez also acknowledged the influence of performing Stockhausens Zeitmae on his subsequent development as a conductor (Boulez 1976, 7980). Another French composer, loy, regards Stockhausen as the most important composer of the second half of the 20th century, and cites virtually all his catalog of works as a powerful discoveration sic, and a true revelation (loy 2008).Dutch composer Andriessen acknowledged the influence of Stockhausens Momente in his pivotal work Contra tempus of 1968 (Schnberger 2001). German composer Rihm, who studied with Stockhausen, was influenced by Momente, Hymnen, and Inori (Williams 2006, 382).At the Cologne ISCM Festival in 1960, the Danish composer Nrgrd heard Stockhausens Kontakte as well as pieces by Kagel, Boulez, and Berio. He was profoundly affected by what he heard and his music suddenly changed into a far more discontinuous and disjunct style, involving elements of strict organization in all parameters, some degree of aleatoricism and controlled improvisation, together with an interest in collage from other musics (Anderson 2001).Jazz musicians such as Davis (Bergstein 1992), Taylor, Mingus, Hancock, Lateef (Feather 1964; Tsahar 2006), and Braxton (Radano 1993, 110) cite Stockhausen as an influence.Stockhausen was influential within pop and rock music as well. Zappa acknowledges Stockhausen in the liner notes of Out!, his 1966 debut with Mothers of Invention. On the back of Whos second LP released in the US, Happy Jack, their primary composer and guitarist Townshend, is said to have an interest in Stockhausen. Rick Wright and Waters of Floyd also acknowledge Stockhausen as an influence (Macon 1997, 141; Bayles 1996, 222). San Francisco psychedelic groups Airplane and the Dead are said to have done the same (Prendergast 2000, 54); Stockhausen himself says the former band included students of Berio, and the Grateful Dead were well orientated toward new music (Texte 4, 505). Founding members of Cologne-based experimental band Can, Schmidt and Czukay, both claim they studied with Stockhausen (Irmin Schmidt biography; Holger Czukay biography), and Schmidt is confirmed to have attended the 196566 Cologne Courses for New Music, though Czukays name does not appear anywhere in the list of registrants (Texte 3, 196, 198, 200). German electronic pioneers Kraftwerk also say they studied with Stockhausen (Flur 2003, 228), and Icelandic vocalist Bjrk has acknowledged Stockhausens influence (Heuger 1998, 15; Bjrk 1996; Ross 2004, 53 & 55).  Wider cultural renown Stockhausen, along with Cage, is one of the few avant-garde composers to have succeeded in penetrating the popular consciousness (Anon. 2007b; Broyles 2004; Hewett 2007). Beatles  included his face on the cover of Peppers Lonely Hearts Club Band (Guy and Llewelyn-Jones 2004, 111). This reflects his influence on the bands own avant-garde experiments as well as the general fame and notoriety he had achieved by that time (1967). In particular, Day in the Life (1967) and 9 (1968) were influenced by Stockhausens electronic music (Aldgate, Chapman, and Marwick 2000, 146; MacDonald 1995, 23334). Stockhausens name, and the perceived strangeness and supposed unlistenability of his music, was even a punchline in cartoons, as documented on a page on the official Stockhausen web site (Stockhausen Cartoons). Perhaps the most caustic remark about Stockhausen was attributed to Sir Beecham. Asked Have you heard any Stockhausen?, he is alleged to have replied, No, but I believe I have trodden in some (Lebrecht 1983, 334, annotated on 366: Apocryphal; source unknown).Stockhausens fame is also reflected in works of literature. For example, he is mentioned in K. Dicks 1974 novel My Tears, the Policeman Said (Dick 1993, 101) and in Pynchons 1966 novel Crying of Lot 49. The Pynchon novel features The Scope, a bar with a strict electronic music policy. Protagonist Oedipa Maas asks a hip graybeard about a sudden chorus of whoops and yibbles coming out of a kind of jukebox. He replies, Thats by Stockhausen... the early crowd tends to dig your Radio Cologne sound. Later on we really swing (Pynchon 1999, 34).Later in his life, Stockhausen was portrayed by at least one journalist, John OMahony of the Guardian newspaper, as an eccentric, for example being alleged to live an effectively polygamous lifestyle with two women, to whom OMahoney referred as his wives, while at the same time stating he was not married to either of them (OMahoney 2001). In the same article, OMahony claims Stockhausen said he was born on a planet orbiting the star Sirius. In the German newspaper Zeit, Stockhausen unmistakably stated that he was educated at Sirius (see Controversy below).CriticismRobin Maconie finds that, Compared to the work of his contemporaries, Stockhausens music has a depth and rational integrity that is quite outstanding... His researches, initially guided by Meyer-Eppler, have a coherence unlike any other composer then or since (Maconie 1989, 17778). Maconie also compares Stockhausen to Beethoven: If a genius is someone whose ideas survive all attempts at explanation, then by that definition Stockhausen is the nearest thing to Beethoven this century has produced. Reason? His music lasts (Maconie 1988), and As Stravinsky said, one never thinks of Beethoven as a superb orchestrator because the quality of invention transcends mere craftsmanship. It is the same with Stockhausen: the intensity of imagination gives rise to musical impressions of an elemental and seemingly unfathomable beauty, arising from necessity rather than conscious design (Maconie 1989, 178).Christopher Ballantine, while comparing and contrasting the categories of experimental and music, concludes that Perhaps more than any other contemporary composer, Stockhausen exists at the point where the dialectic between experimental and avant-garde music becomes manifest; it is in him, more obviously than anywhere else, that these diverse approaches converge. This alone would seem to suggest his remarkable significance. (Ballantine 1977, 244)Stravinsky expressed great, but not uncritical, enthusiasm for Stockhausens music in the conversation books with Craft (e.g., Craft and Stravinsky 1960, 118) and for years organised private listening sessions with friends in his home where he played tapes of Stockhausens latest works (Stravinsky 1984, 356; Craft 2002, 141). In an interview published in March 1968, however, he says of an unidentified person, I have been listening all week to the piano music of a composer now greatly esteemed for his ability to stay an hour or so ahead of his time, but I find the alternation of note-clumps and silences of which it consists more monotonous than the foursquares of the dullest eighteenth-century music. (Craft 1968, 4) The following October, a report in Sovetskaia Muzyka (Anon. 1968) translated this sentence (and a few others from the same article) into Russian, substituting for the conjunction but the phrase Ia imeiu v vidu Karlkheintsa Shtokkhauzena (I am referring to Karlheinz Stockhausen). When this translation was quoted in Druskins Stravinsky biography, the field was widened to all of Stockhausens compositions and Druskin adds for good measure, indeed, works he calls unnecessary, useless and uninteresting, again quoting from the same Sovetskaia Muzyka article, even though it had made plain that the characterization was of American university composers (Druskin 1974, 207).Early in 1995, Radio 3 sent Stockhausen a package of recordings from contemporary artists Twin, Hawtin (Plastikman), Scanner and Pemberton, and asked him for his opinion on the music. In August of that year, Radio 3 reporter Dick Witts interviewed Stockhausen about these pieces for a broadcast in October, subsequently published in the November issue of the British publication The Wire asking what advice he would give these young musicians. Stockhausen made suggestions to each of the musicians, who were then invited to respond. All but Plastikman obliged (Witts 1995).ControversyScandal at the Fresco premiereAs reported in the German magazine Spiegel, the premire (and only performance to date) on 15 November 1969 of Stockhausens work Fresco for four orchestral groups (playing in four different locations) was the scene of a scandal. The rehearsals were already marked by objections from the orchestral musicians questioning such directions as glissandos no faster than one octave per minute and others phoning the artists union to clarify whether they really had to perform the Stockhausen work as part of the orchestra. In the backstage warm-up room at the premiere a hand-lettered sign could be seen saying: Were playing, otherwise we would be fired. During the premire the parts on some music stands suddenly were replaced by placards reading things like Stockhausen-Zoo. Please dont feed, that someone had planted. Some musicians, fed up with the monkeyshines, already left after an hour, though the performance was planned for four to five hours. Stockhausen fans protested, while Stockhausen foes were needling the musicians asking: How can you possibly participate in such crap? (Wie knnt ihr blo so eine Scheie machen!). At one point someone managed to switch off the stand lights, leaving the musicians in the dark. After 260 minutes the performance ended with nobody participating any more (Anon. 1969).Sirius star systemIn the German newspaper Zeit, Karlheinz Stockhausen stated that: I was educated at Sirius and want to return to there, although I am currently still living in Krten near Cologne. At Sirius, it is very intellectual. Almost no time passes between conception and realization. What is known here as the audience, passive bystanders, does not exist there. There everyone is creative. (Grauel 1998) The first sentence regarding his education also appears in a slightly different form in Reier 2007. On hearing about this, conductor Gielen stated: When he said he knew what was happening at Sirius, I turned away from him in horror. I havent listened to a note since, and called Stockhausens statements hubris and nonsense, while at the same time defending his own belief in astrology: Why should these large celestial bodies exist if they do not stand for something? I cannot imagine that there is anything senseless in the universe. There is much we do not understand (Hagedorn 2010).11 September attacksIn a press conference in Hamburg on 16 September 2001, Stockhausen was asked by a journalist whether the characters in Licht were for him merely some figures out of a common cultural history or rather material appearances. The composer replied, I pray daily to Michael, but not to Lucifer. I have renounced him. But he is very much present, like in New York recently (Stockhausen 2002, 76). The same journalist then asked how the events of 11 September had affected him, and how he viewed reports of the attack in connection with the harmony of humanity represented in Hymnen. He answered:Well, what happened there is, of coursenow all of you must adjust your brainsthe biggest work of art there has ever been. The fact that spirits achieve with one act something which we in music could never dream of, that people practise ten years madly, fanatically for a concert. And then die. Hesitantly. And that is the greatest work of art that exists for the whole Cosmos. Just imagine what happened there. There are people who are so concentrated on this single performance, and then five thousand people are driven to Resurrection. In one moment. I couldnt do that. Compared to that, we are nothing, as composers. ... It is a crime, you know of course, because the people did not agree to it. They did not come to the concert. That is obvious. And nobody had told them: You could be killed in the process. (Stockhausen 2002, 7677.)(To see how the excerpt appeared out of its context, and in English translation, see Tommasini 2001.)As a result of the reaction to the press report of Stockhausens comments, a four-day festival of his work in Hamburg was canceled. In addition, his pianist daughter announced to the press that she would no longer appear under the name Stockhausen (Lentricchia and McAuliffe 2003, 7).In a subsequent message, he stated that the press had published false, defamatory reports about his comments, and clarified as follows:At the press conference in Hamburg, I was asked if Michael, Eve and Lucifer were historical figures of the past and I answered that they exist now, for example Lucifer in New York. In my work, I have defined Lucifer as the cosmic spirit of rebellion, of anarchy. He uses his high degree of intelligence to destroy creation. He does not know love. After further questions about the events in America, I said that such a plan appeared to be Lucifers greatest work of art. Of course I used the designation work of art to mean the work of destruction personified in Lucifer. In the context of my other comments this was unequivocal. (Stockhausen 2001a)HonoursAmongst the numerous honors and distinctions that were bestowed upon Stockhausen are:*1964 German gramophone critics award;*1966 and 1972 SIMC award for orchestral works (Italy);*1968 Grand Art Prize for Music of the State of North Rhine-Westphalia; Prix du Disque (France); Member of the Free Academy of the Arts, Hamburg;*1968, 1969, and 1971 Edison Prize (Holland);*1970 Member of the Swedish Academy of Music;*1973 Member of the Academy of the Arts, Berlin;*1974 Cross of Merit, 1st class (Germany);*1977 Member of the Philharmonic Academy of Rome;*1979 Member of the American Academy and Institute of Arts and Letters;*1980 Member of the European Academy of Science, Arts and Letters;*1981 Prize of the Italian music critics for Donnerstag aus Licht;*1982 German gramophone prize (German Phonograph Academy);*1983 Diapason dor (France) for Donnerstag aus Licht;*1985 Commandeur de lOrdre des Arts et des Lettres (France);*1986 von Siemens Music Prize;*1987 Honorary Member of the Academy of Music, London;*1988 Honorary Citizen of the Kuerten community (Gemeinde Krten website);*1989 Honorary Member of the Academy of Arts and Sciences;*1990 Ars Electronica, Linz, Austria;*1991 Honorary Fellow of the Royal Irish Academy of Music; Accademico Onorario of the Accademia Nazionale di Santa Caecilia, Rome; Honorary Patron of Sound Projects Weimar;*1992 IMC-UNESCO Picasso Medal; Distinguished Service Medal of the German state North Rhine-Westphalia; German Music Publishers Society Award for the score of Luzifers Tanz (3rd scene of Saturday from Light);*1993 Patron of the European Flute Festival; Diapason dor for Klavierstcke IXI and Mikrophonie I and II;*1994 German Music Publishers Society Award for the score Jahreslauf (Act 1 of Tuesday from Light);*1995 Honorary Member of the German Society for Electro-Acoustic Music; Bach Award of the city of Hamburg;*1996 Honorary doctorate (Dr. phil. h. c.) of the University of Berlin; Composer of the European Cultural Capital Copenhagen; Edison Prize (Holland) for Mantra; Member of the Free Academy of the Arts Leipzig; Honorary Member of the Leipzig Opera; Cologne Culture Prize;*1997 German Music Publishers Society Award for the score of Weltparlament (1st scene of Wednesday from Light); Honorary member of the music ensemble LIM (Laboratorio de Interpretacin Musical), Madrid;*1999 Entry in the Golden Book of the city of Cologne;*2000 German Music Publishers Society Award for the score of Evas Erstgeburt (Act 1 of Monday from Light);*20002001 The film In Absentia made by the Quay Brothers (England) to concrete and electronic music by Karlheinz Stockhausen won the Golden Dove (first prize) at the International Festival for Animated Film in Leipzig. More awards: Special Jury Mention, Montreal, FCMM 2000; Special Jury Award, Tampere 2000; Special Mention, Golden Prague Awards 2001; Honorary Diploma Award, Cracow 2001; Best Animated Short Film, 50th Melbourne International Film Festival 2001; Grand Prix, Turku Finland 2001;*2001 German Music Publishers Society Award for the score Helicopter String Quartet (3rd scene of Wednesday from Light); Music Prize of the Royal Swedish Academy of the Arts;*2002 Honorary Patron of the Arts Network, England;*2003 German Music Publishers Society Award for the score of Michaelion (4th scene of Wednesday from Light);*2004 Associated member of the Academie Royale des Sciences, des Lettres & des Beaux-arts (Belgium); Honorary doctorate (Dr. phil. h. c.) of the Queens University in Belfast; German Music Publishers Society Award for the score of Stop and Start for 6 instrumental groups;*2005 German Music Publishers Society Award for the score of Hoch-Zeiten for choir (5th scene of Sunday from Light).*2006 Honorary member of the Accademia Filarmonica di Bologna*2008 On 22 August, Stockhausens birthday, the Rathausplatz in his home town of Krten was renamed Karlheinz-Stockhausen-Platz in his honour (Bumer 2008).*2009 German Music Publishers Society Award for the score of Momente for solo soprano, four choral groups, and 13 instrumentalists.*2010 The municipality of Krten adopts the designation Stockhausengemeinde in honour of the late composer (Landschoof 2010).Notable students*Ahern*Amacher*Amy*Bahk*Barlow*Gerald Barry*Bauermeister*von Biel*Boehmer*Bosseur*Gottfried Brunotte*Buckinx*Cardew*Chatman*Constanten*Czukay*Davies*Decoust*loy*Etvs*Estrada*Johannes G. Fritsch*Gagneux*Gehlhaar*Gilboa*Grisey*Hassell*Hller*Hovda*A. Huber*Jenks*C. Johnson*Will Johnson*Kramer*Lachenmann*Laporte*Lavista*Lohner*Lombardi*McDermott*John McGuire*Jennifer Helen McLeod*Maconie*Maiguashca*Maritan*Marco*Masson*Mfano*Miereanu*John Mizelle*Nunes*de Olavide*Peixinho*H.P. Platz*Pongrcz*Rdulescu*Rihm*Schmitt*Schmidt*Holger Schring*Schwertsik*Gerald Shapiro*Shinohara*Smalley*Smer*Souster*Heimir Sveinsson*Szathmry*Tcherepnin*Tcherepnin*Tremblay*Truelove*Vivier*Volans*Thomas Wells*Monte Young*ZenderSources* Adamenko, Victoria. 2007. Neo-mythologism in Music: From Scriabin and Schoenberg to Schnittke and Crumb. Interplay Series 5. Hillsdale, NY: Pendragon Press. ISBN 157647125X.* Aita, Roberto. 2001. Brothers Quay: In Absentia. OffScreen (30 September). English translation by Donato Totaro under the same title here.* Aldgate, Anthony, James Chapman, and Arthur Marwick. 2000. Windows on the Sixties: Exploring Key Texts of Media and Culture. London and New York: I. B. Taurus & Co. Ltd. ISBN 1-86064-383-3.* Anderson, Julian. 2001. Nrgrd, Per. The New Grove Dictionary of Music and Musicians, second edition, edited by Sadie and John Tyrrell. London: Macmillan Publishers.* Andraschke, Peter. 1981. Kompositorische Tendenzen bei Karlheinz Stockhausen seit 1965. In Zur Neuen Einfachheit in der Musik (Studien zur Wertungsforschung 14), edited by Otto Kolleritsch, 12643. Vienna and Graz: Universal Edition (for the Institut fr Wertungsforschung an der Hochschule fr Musik und darstellende Kunst in Graz). ISBN 3-7024-0153-9.* Anon. 1967. Composers: Flashes of a Mad Logic. Time 89, no. 6 (10 February): 75.* Anon. 1968. Interviu so Stravinskim. Sovetskaia Muzyka (October): 141.* Anon. 1969. Stockhausen: Zuviel verlangt. Der Spiegel, no. 49 (1 December): 218.* Anon. 1971. Stockhausen: Immer hher. Der Spiegel, 1971 no. 9 (22 February): 130, 132, 134.* Anon. 2001. Brief Liaisons Give Haunting Results: Visionary Fusion: In Absentia, Directed by Identical Twins Stephen and Timothy Quay with Music by Karlheinz Stockhausen. The Telegraph (17 February).* Anon. 2007a. Avant-garde Composer Karlheinz Stockhausen Dies at 79. CBCnews.ca (7 December). (Accessed 7 April 2008)* Anon. 2007b. Pioneer of Electronica Stockhausen Dead at 79. Sydney Morning Herald. 10 December.* Anon. 2008. Karlheinz Stockhausena Romantic Discovering the Universe transcript. In Talking to Kinky and Karlheinz170 musicians get vocal on The Music Show, edited by Anni Heino, 28391. Sydney: ABC Books. ISBN 9780733320088.* Backus, John. 1962. Die ReiheA Scientific Evaluation. Perspectives of New Music 1, no. 1:16071.* Barrett, Richard. 1988. First Performances: Montag aus LICHT at the Holland Festival. Tempo, new series, no. 166 (September): 4345.* Ballantine, Christopher. 1977. Towards an Aesthetic of Experimental Music. Musical Quarterly 63, no. 2 (April): 22446.* Barrett, Richard. 1998. Not Necessarily Anything to Do with Karlheinz Stockhausen (Excavated from Diary Entries 20 February  10 November 1994). Leonardo Music Journal 8 (Ghosts and Monsters: Technology and Personality in Contemporary Music): 1719.* Bauermeister, Mary. 2011. Ich hnge im Triolengitter: Mein Leben mit Karlheinz Stockhausen. Munich: Edition Elke Heidenreich bei C. Bertelsmann. ISBN 978-3-570-58024-0.* Bumer, Ingrid. 2007. Eine ganz neue Zeit fngt an: Karlheinz Stockhausen arbeitete bis zum letzten Atemzug. Stadt-Anzeiger (9 December).* Bumer, Ingrid. 2008. Ehrung von Karlheinz Stockhausen: Rathausvorplatz trgt seinen Namen. Klner Stadt-Anzeiger (19 June).* Bayles, Martha. 1996. Hole in Our Soul: The Loss of Beauty and Meaning in American Popular Music. Chicago: University of Chicago Press. ISBN 0226039595.* Beer, Roland de. 2008. Magistraal klinkend in memoriam. Volkskrant (21 June).* Bergstein, Barry. 1992. Miles Davis and Karlheinz Stockhausen: A Reciprocal Relationship. Musical Quarterly 76, no. 4. (Winter): 50225.* Bjrk. 1996. Compose Yourself Interview of Stockhausen by Bjrk Dazed and Confused 23 (August 1996).* Blumrder, Christoph von. 1982. Formel-KompositionMinimal MusicNeue Einfachheit: Musikalische Konzeptionen der siebziger Jahre. In Neuland Jahrbuch 2 (1981/82), edited by Herbert Henck, 16078. Bergisch Gladbach: Neuland Verlag.* Blumrder, Christoph von. 1993. Die Grundlegung der Musik Karlheinz Stockhausens. Beihefte zum Archiv fr Musikwissenschaft 32, ed. Hans Heinrich Eggebrecht. Stuttgart: Franz Steiner Verlag.* Boulez, Pierre. 1976. Conversations with Clestin Delige. London: Eulenburg Books.* Bridoux-Michel, Sverine. 2006. Architecture et musique: croisements de penses aprs 1950 (la collaboration de larchitecte et du musicien, de la conception  loeuvre). PhD diss., lUniversit Charles de GaulleLille. Abstract.* Broyles, Michael. 2004. Mavericks and Other Traditions in American Music. New Haven and London: Yale University Press. ISBN 0300100450* Brmmer, Ludger. 2008. Stockhausen on Electronics, 2004. Computer Music Journal 32, no. 4:1016.* Bruno, Pascal. 1999. Donnerstag aus Licht: A New Myth, or Simply an Updating of a Knowledge? Perspectives of New Music 37, no. 1 (Winter): 13356.* Cardew, Cornelius. 1974. Stockhausen Serves Imperialism. London: Latimer New Directions. (Reprinted in Prvost, E. (ed) (2006). Cornelius Cardew (19361981)  A Reader. Harlow: Copula.* Chaplygina, Marina. 1993.  : -    Stockhausen: Some Day Speech Will Become Singing (interview).   Life, nos. 1516:2426.* Conen, Hermann. 1991. Formel-Komposition: Zu Karlheinz Stockhausens Musik der siebziger Jahre. Klner Schriften zur Neuen Musik 1, ed. Johannes Fritsch and Dietrich Kmper. Mainz: Schotts Shne. ISBN 3795718902* Cott, Jonathan. 1973. Stockhausen: Conversations with the Composer. New York: Simon and Schuster. ISBN 0671214950.* Craft, Robert. 2002. An Improbable Life: Memoirs. Nashville: Vanderbilt University Press.* Robert. 1968. Side Effects: An Interview with Stravinsky. New York Review of Books (14 March): 38.* Craft, Robert, and Igor Stravinsky. 1960. Memories and Commentaries Garden City, NY: Doubleday.* Cross, Jonathan. 2000. Harrison Birtwistle: Man, Mind, Music. Ithaca: Cornell University Press. ISBN 0801486726.* Cross, Jonathan. 2001. Birtwistle, Sir Harrison. The New Grove Dictionary of Music and Musicians, ed. S. Sadie and J. Tyrrell. London: Macmillan.* Custodis, Michael. 2004. Die soziale Isolation der neuen Musik: Zum Klner Musikleben nach 1945. Beihefte zum Archiv fr Musikwissenschaft 54, edited by Albrecht Riethmller, with Reinhold Brinkmann, Ludwig Finscher, Hans-Joachim Hinrichsen, Wolfgang Osthoff, and Wolfram Steinbeck. Stuttgart: Franz Steiner Verlag. ISBN 3-515-08375-8* Davies, Hugh. 1968. Working with Stockhausen. The Composer no. 27:811.* Decroupet, Pascal, and Elena Ungeheuer. 1998. Through the Sensory Looking-Glass: The Aesthetic and Serial Foundations of Gesang der Jnglinge. Translated from the French by Jerome Kohl. Perspectives of New Music 36, no. 1 (Winter): 97142.* Deruchie, Andrew. 2007. Karlheinz Stockhausen: Tierkreis (Zodiac) (197475), (Karlheinz Stockhausen, arrangement). Programme-booklet note for the North American premire of Fnf Sternzeichen, 5 March 2007. Montral: Socit de musique contemporaine du Qubec.* Deutscher Musikeditionspreis. 2009. Elf Preistrger des Deutschen Musikeditionspreis BEST EDITION 2009. Deutscher Musikverleger-Verband. (Accessed 31 August 2009)* Dick, Philip K. 1993. My Tears, the Policeman Said. New York: Vintage Books. ISBN 067974066X* Dirmeikis, Paul. 1999. Le Souffle du temps: Quodlibet pour Karlheinz Stockhausen. Seyne-sur-Mer: ditions Telo Martius. ISBN 2-905023-37-6 http://www.dirmeikis.org* Druskin, Mikhail Semenovich. 1974. Igor Stravinskii: Lichnost, Tvorchestvo, Vzgliady Stravinsky: Personality, Works, Opinions. Leningrad, Moscow: Izdatelstvo Sovietska kompozitor.* loy, Jean-Claude. 2008. I Owe to Him . . .. In Gedenkschrift fr Stockhausen, edited by Stephens and Pasveer, 58. Krten: Stockhausen-Stiftung fr Musik.* Feather, Leonard. 1964. Blindfold Test: Yusef Lateef. Down Beat 31, no. 25 (10 September): 34.* Felder, David. 1977. An Interview with Karlheinz Stockhausen. Perspectives of New Music 16, no. 1 (Fall-Winter): 85101.* Ferneyhough, Brian. 1988. Tmoignage, translated by Jacques Demierre. In Karlheinz Stockhausen (Livre-programme), 1819. Paris: Edition Contrechamps/Festival dAutomne  Paris.* Fe, Eike. 2004. Die Wirkung der Informationstheorie auf das Werk Karlheinz Stockhausens. In Kompositorische Stationen des 20. Jahrhunderts. Debussy, Webern, Messiaen, Boulez, Cage, Ligeti, Stockhausen, Hller, Bayle Signale aus Kln. Beitrge zur Musik der Zeit 7, edited by Christoph von Blumrder, 11628. Mnster: Lit-Verlag, 2004. ISBN 3-8258-7212-2.* Flur, Wolfgang. 2003. Kraftwerk: I Was a Robot. Second Edition. London: Sanctuary Publishing, Ltd. ISBN 1860744176.* Fokker, Adriaan D. 1968. Wherefore, and Why? Die Reihe 8 ed., 6879.* Fllmer, Golo. 1996. Osaka: Technik fr das Kugelauditorium. In Musik, verwandelt. Das Elektronische Studio der TU Berlin 19531995, edited by Frank Gertich, Julia Gerlach, and Golo Fllmer, 195211. Hofheim: Wolke-Verlag. ISBN 3-923997-68-X.* Frisius, Rudolf. 1996. Karlheinz Stockhausen I: Einfhrung in das Gesamtwerk; Gesprche mit Karlheinz Stockhausen. Mainz: Schott Musik International. ISBN 3795702488* Frisius, Rudolf. 2008. Karlheinz Stockhausen II: Die Werke 19501977; Gesprch mit Karlheinz Stockhausen, Es geht aufwrts. Mainz, London, Berlin, Madrid, New York, Paris, Prague, Tokyo, Toronto: Schott Musik International. ISBN 9783795702496.* Fritsch, Johannes, with Richard Toop. 2008. Versuch, eine Grenze zu berschreiten  Johannes Fritsch im Gesprch ber die Auffhrungspraxis von Werken Karlheinz Stockhausens. MusikTexte: Zeitschrift fr neue Musik, no. 116 (February): 3140.* Frobenius, Wolf. 1981. Die Neue Einfachheit und der brgerliche Schnheitsbegriff, in Zur Neuen Einfachheit in der Musik, edited by Otto Kolleritsch, 4860. Studien zur Wertungsforschung 14. Vienna and Graz: Universal Edition (for the Institut fr Wertungsforschung an der Hochschule fr Musik und darstellende Kunst in Graz). ISBN 3-7024-0153-9.* Gather, John Philipp. 2003. The Origins of Synthetic Timbre Serialism and the Parisian Confluence, 194952. PhD diss., State University of New York, Buffalo.* Gehlhaar, Rolf. 1968. Zur Komposition Ensemble: Kompositionsstudio Karlheinz Stockhausen, International Ferienkurse Darmstadt 1967. Darmstdter Beitrge zur Neuen Musik 11, ed. Ernst Thomas. Mainz: Schott.* Gilmore, Bob. 2009. Claude Vivier and Karlheinz Stockhausen: Moments from a Double Portrait. Circuit: musiques contemporaines 19, no. 2:3549.* Gimpel, Othmar (ed.). 2010. Karlheinz Stockhausen, KLANG, 8. und. 9. Mai. Cologne: MusikTriennale Kln.* Grant, Morag Josephine. 2001. Serial Music Serial Aesthetics: Compositional Theory in Post-War Europe. Music in the Twentieth Century, Arnold Whitall, general editor. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 0521804582.* Grauel, Ralf. 1998. Lichtgestalten. Zeit Magazin, no. 15, 1998: 14. * Guerrieri, Matthew. 2009. At NEC, Six Hours of Stockhausen. The Boston Globe (27 February).* Guy, Alun and Iwan Llewelyn-Jones. 2004. Students Guide to Gcse Music for the Wjec Specification: English Language. London: Rhinegold Publishing. ISBN 1904226590.* Habib, Andr. 2002. Through a Glass Darkly: Interview with the Quay Brothers. Senses of Cinema (February). French translation previously published in the Montreal-based online journal Hors Champ (15 January 2002).* Hagedorn, Volker. 2010. Dirigent Michael Gielen: Der Unbeugsame Die Zeit no. 18 (29 April).* Hall, Michael. 1984. Harrison Birtwistle. The Contemporary Composers 4. Series editor, Nicholas Snowman. London: Robson Books. ISBN 0860512703.* Hall, Michael. 1998. Harrison Birtwistle in Recent Years. The Contemporary Composers. Series editor, Nicholas Snowman. London: Robson Books. ISBN 1861051794.* Harvey, Jonathan. 1975a. The Music of Stockhausen: An Introduction. Berkeley and Los Angeles: University of California Press. ISBN 0520023110.* Harvey, Jonathan. 1975b. Stockhausens Hymnen. The Musical Times, 116, no. 1590 (August): 705+707.* Heikinheimo, Seppo. 1972. The Electronic Music of Karlheinz Stockhausen: Studies on the Esthetical and Formal Problems of Its First Phase, translated by Brad Absetz. Acta Musicologica Fennica 6 (ISSN 0587-2448). Helsinki: Suomen Musiikkitieteellinen Seura / Musikvetenskapliga Sllskapet i Finland. (Edited from a doctoral thesis, Helsinki University.)* Heuger, Markus. 1998. Stockhausen Goes to Town: Der ffentliche Stockhausen. Neue Zeitschrift fr Musik 159, no. 4 (JulyAugust): 1015.* Hewett, Ivan. 2007. Karlheinz Stockhausen: Both a Rationalist and a Mystic, the Composers Influence Stretched from Boulez to the Beatles Guardian Unlimited (Friday 7 December).* Hollings, Ken. 1999.  Lost in the Stars: Karlheinz Stockhausen in Conversation with Ken Hollings, Kurten, Germany, 12 March 1999. The Wire, no. 184 (May).* Hopkins, Bill. 1972. Stockhausen and Others. Tempo, new series, no. 98:3234.* Hopp, Winrich. 1998. Kurzwellen von Karlheinz Stockhausen: Konzeption und musikalische Poiesis. Klner Schriften zur neuen Musik 6. With CD recording. Mainz and New York: Schott. ISBN 3795718953.* Iddon, Martin. 2004. The Haus that Karlheinz Built. Musical Quarterly 87, no. 1:87118.* Ingram, James, and Paul Roberts. 2008. ber das Unsichtbarsein: Ein E-mail Interview mit James Ingram zu seiner Ttigkeit als Stockhausens Notenkopist, translated by Gisela Gronemeyer. MusikTexte, no. 117 (May): 4352. Expanded English text, as On Being Invisible (April 2009). James Ingram: Act Two website. Accessed 27 July 2010.* Kaletha, Holger. 2004. Decomposition of the Sound Continuum: Serialism and Development from a Genetic-Phenomenological Perspective, translated by Jerome Kohl. Perspectives of New Music 42, no. 1 (Winter): 84128.* Kirchmeyer, Helmut. 2009. Stockhausens Elektronische Messe nebst einem Vorspann unverffentlichter Briefe aus seiner Pariser Zeit an Herbert Eimert. Archiv fr Musikwissenschaft 66, no. 3:23459.* Klein, Lothar. 1968. Twentieth-Century Analysis: Essays in Miniature. Music Educators Journal 54, no. 6 (February): 11719.* Kohl, Jerome. 1981. Serial and Non-Serial Techniques in the Music of Karlheinz Stockhausen from 19621968. PhD diss. Seattle: University of Washington.* Kohl, Jerome. 198384a. The Evolution of Macro- and Micro-Time Relations in Stockhausens Recent Music. Perspectives of New Music 22, nos. 1 and 2:14785.* Kohl, Jerome. 198384b. Stockhausen at La Scala: Semper idem sed non eodem modo. Perspectives of New Music 22, nos. 1 and 2:483501.* Kohl, Jerome. 1990. Into the Middleground: Formula Syntax in Stockhausens Licht. Perspectives of New Music 28, no. 2 (Summer): 26291.* Kohl, Jerome. 1993. Time and Light. Contemporary Music Review 7, no. 2:20319.* Kohl, Jerome. 1998a. A Seventieth-Birthday Festschrift for Karlheinz Stockhausen (Part One): Guest Editors Introduction. Perspectives of New Music 36, no. 1 (Winter): 5964.* Kohl, Jerome. 1998b. A Seventieth-Birthday Festschrift for Karlheinz Stockhausen (Part Two): Guest Editors Introduction. Perspectives of New Music 36, no. 2 (Summer): 510.* Kohl, Jerome. 2002. Serial Composition, Serial Form, and Process in Karlheinz Stockhausens Telemusik. In Electroacoustic Music: Analytical Perspectives, ed. Thomas Licata, 91118. Westport, Conn. and London: Greenwood Press.* Kohl, Jerome. 2004. Der Aspekt der Harmonik in Licht. In Internationales Stockhausen-Symposion 2000: LICHT: Musikwissenschaftliches Institut der Universitt zu Kln, 19. bis 22. Oktober 2000. Tagungsbericht. Signale aus Kln: Beitrge zur Musik der Zeit 10. Ed. Imke Misch and Christoph von Blumrder, 11632. Mnster, Berlin, London: LIT-Verlag. ISBN 3-8258-7944-5.* Kohl, Jerome. 2008. Programme notes in the programme booklet for the Klang Festival, (19 November), Southbank Centre, London: 1213, 1617, 2021, 2425.* Kohl, Jerome. 2009a. Klang/Som: Die 24 Stunden des Tages/As 24 horas do dia. Temporada Gulbenkian de Msica 20092010 (October): 1314.* Kohl, Jerome. 2009b. Hoffnung/Esperana, para violino, viola e violoncelo (2007): 9 hora de Klang, as 24 horas do dia. Temporada Gulbenkian de Msica 20092010 (October): 18.* Kohl, Jerome. 2009c. Schnheit/Beleza, para clarinete baixo, flauta e trompete (2006): 6 hora de Klang, as 24 horas do dia. Temporada Gulbenkian de Msica 20092010 (October): 22.* Kohl, Jerome. 2010. A Child of the Radio Age. In Cut & Splice: Transmission, edited by Daniela Cascella and Lucia Farinati, 13539. London: Sound and Music. ISBN 978-1-907378-03-4* Kramer, Jonathan. 1998. Karlheinz in California. Perspectives of New Music 36, no. 1 (Winter): 24761.* Krause, Peter. 2008. Elektro-Esoterik: Urauffhrung von Stockhausen-Klang. Welt-Online (8 August).* Kurtz, Michael. 1992. Stockhausen: A Biography, translated by Richard Toop. London and Boston: Faber and Faber. ISBN 0571143237 (cloth) ISBN 0-571-17146-X (pbk)* Landschoof, Elke. 2010. Stockhausen: Ehrenbrger knftig Teil des Namens. Klner Stadt-Anzeiger (30 November).* Lebrecht, Norman. 1985. The Book of Musical Anecdotes. New York: Simon and Schuster; London: Sphere Books. ISBN 0029187109.* Lentricchia, Frank and Jody McAuliffe. 2003. Crimes of Art and Terror. Chicago: University of Chicago Press. ISBN 0226472051.*MacDonald, Ian. 1995. Revolution in the Head: The Beatles Records and the Sixties. London: Pimlico. ISBN 0712662081.* Macon, Edward L. 1997. Rocking the Classics: English Progressive Rock and the Counterculture. New York: Oxford University Press. ISBN 0195098870.* Maconie, Robin. 1972. Stockhausens Mikrophonie I: Perception in Action. Perspectives of New Music 10, no. 2 (Spring-Summer): 92101.* Maconie, Robin. 1976. The Works of Karlheinz Stockhausen. London, New York, Toronto: Oxford University Press. second edition, see Maconie 1990.* Maconie, Robin. 1988. Great Vintages. Classic CD 5.* Maconie, Robin. 1989. Afterword: Beauty and Necessity. In Karlheinz Stockhausen, Stockhausen on Music: Lectures and Interviews, edited by Robin Maconie. London and New York: Marion Boyars.* Maconie, Robin. 1990. The Works of Karlheinz Stockhausen, 2nd edition. Oxford: Clarendon Press. ISBN 0-19-315477-3.* Maconie, Robin. 2005. Other Planets: The Music of Karlheinz Stockhausen. Lanham, Maryland, Toronto, Oxford: The Scarecrow Press, Inc. ISBN 0-8108-5356-6.* Miegang, Thomas, and Robert Baumanns. 1997. Schlagsahne, Irrengesang, Kirmesgeister: Karlheinz Stockhausen testet Krautrock. Die Zeit, 1997, no. 17 (18 April).* Miller, Paul. 2009. Stockhausen and the Serial Shaping of Space. PhD diss. Rochester: Eastman School of Music.* Misch, Imke, and Markus Bandur (eds.). 2001. Karlheinz Stockhausen bei den Internationalen Ferienkursen fr Neue Musik in Darmstadt 19511996: Dokumente und Briefe. Krten: Stockhausen-Verlag. ISBN 3-00-007290-X.* Mischke, Joachim. 2008. SHMF: Neue Musik, visionr, von heute und wie von gestern. Hamburger Abendblatt (8 August).* Morawska-Bngeler, Marietta. 1988. Schwingende Elektronen: Eine Dokumentation ber das Studio fr Elektronische Musik des Westdeutschen Rundfunks in Kln, 19511986. Kln-Rodenkirchen: P. J. Tonger Musikverlag.* Morgan, Robert. 1975. Stockhausens Writings on Music. Musical Quarterly 61, no. 1 (January): 116. Reprinted in the The Musical Quarterly 75, no. 4 (Winter 1991): 194206.* Moritz, Albrecht. 2005. Stockhausen: LICHTER-WASSER (LIGHTS-WATERS), 199899. (Record review)* Morreau, Annette. 2001. Where Herzog Met Portishead: Only Connect, Barbican, London. The Independent (6 March).* Mowitz, Michael. 2010. Die Form der Klnge. Stockhausens Konzeption einer einheitlichen musikalischen Zeit am Beispiel der Komposition Kontakte. Osnabrck: epOs-Music. ISBN 978-3-940255-08-2. * Neidhfer, Christoph. 2005. Joseph N. Strauss. Stravinskys Late Music. Music Theory Spectrum 27:33653.* Nordin, Ingvar Loco. 2004. George Crumb, Makrokosmos Books 1 and 2: 24 Fantasy Pieces after the Zodiac for Amplified Piano: Margaret Leng Tan (amplified piano)Alex Nowitz (whistling). Mode 142. (Accessed 7 April 2008) Also found at Mode Records website* OMahony, John. 2001. The Sound of Discord. The Guardian (29 September). (Accessed 8 May 2011)* Pace, Ian. 1996. Secret Theatres: The Harrison Birtwistle Retrospective, 12 April  4 May 1996. Tempo, new series, no. 197. (July): 2527.* Perle, George. 1960. Book Review: Die Reihe III: Musical Craftsmanship. Journal of Music Theory 4, no. 1 (April): 102104.* Peters, Gnter. 1992. Meditations Modulated: H. Heissenbttels Einfache Grammatische Meditationen in K. Stockhausens Mikrophonie II.  German Literature and MusicAn Aesthetic Fusion: 18901989, ed. C. Reschke and H. Pollock, Houston Germanic Studies 8, 24761. Munich: Wilhelm Fink Verlag. Revised German edition 1993: Die ringmodulierte Meditation: Helmut Heissenbttels Einfache grammatische Meditationen in Karlheinz Stockhausens Mikrophonie II. In Musik-Konzepte 81: Autoren-Musik. Sprache im Grenzbereich der Knste, 1640. Munich: Edition Text+Kritik. Reprinted in Peters 2003, 2762 (German) and 16398 (English).* Peters, Gnter. 2003. Heiliger Ernst im SpielTexte zur Musik von Karlheinz Stockhausen / Holy Seriousness in the PlayEssays on the Music of Karlheinz Stockhausen (bilingual edition, German and English). Krten: Stockhausen-Stiftung fr Musik. ISBN 9783000091827* Power, David. 1990. Book Reviews: Towards a Cosmic Music, Karlheinz Stockhausen; Tim Nevill. Tempo, new series, no. 175. (December): 3031.* Prendergast, Mark. 2000. The Ambient Century: From Mahler to TranceThe Evolution of Sound in the Electronic Age. New York: Bloomsbury Publishing. ISBN 1582341346.* Pynchon, Thomas. 1999. The Crying of Lot 49 New York: HarperPerennial.* Radano, Ronald M. 1993. New Musical Figurations: Anthony Braxtons Cultural Critique Chicago: University of Chicago Press.* Reier, Sebastian. 2007. Im Rhythmus der Sterne. Die Zeit (9 December).* Rigoni, Michel. 1998. Stockhausen: ... un vaisseau lanc vers le ciel, 2nd edition, revised, corrected, and enlarged. Lillebonne: Millnaire III Editions. ISBN 2911906020.* Rigoni, Michel. 2001. Le rve de Lucifer de Karlheinz Stockhausen. La trace des silences. Paris: M. de Maule. ISBN 9782876231030.* Ritzel, Fred. 1970. Musik fr ein Haus: Kompositionsstudio Karlheinz Stockhausen, Internationale Ferienkurse fr Neue Musik, Darmstadt 1968. Darmstdter Beitrge zur Neuen Musik 12, edited by Ernst Thomas. Mainz: B. Schotts Shne.* Roads, Curtis. 2001. Microsound. Cambridge: MIT Press. ISBN 0262182157.* Romney, Jonathan. 2001. The Barbicans Musical Jellyfish: Sound on Film Live. The Guardian (3 March).* Ross, Alex. 2004. Bjrks Saga. The New Yorker 80, no. 23 (23 August): 4953 +5559. http://www.therestisnoise.com/2004/10/alex_ross_bjrk.html.* Rudi, Jran (editor), Fl, Asbjrn Blokkum, Schaathun, Asbjrn. 2008. Karlheinz Stockhausen  A Pioneer in Utopia. Oslo: Notam. ISBN 978-82-996867-2-3.* Sabbe, Herman. 1981. Die Einheit der Stockhausen-Zeit ...: Neue Erkenntnismglichkeiten der seriellen Entwicklung anhand des frhen Wirkens von Stockhausen und Goeyvaerts. Dargestellt aufgrund der Briefe Stockhausens an Goevaerts. In Musik-Konzepte 19: Karlheinz Stockhausen: ... wie die Zeit verging ..., edited by Heinz-Klaus Metzger and Rainer Riehn, 596. Munich: Edition Text + Kritik.* Schnberger, Elmer. 2001. Andriessen: (4) Louis Andriessen. The New Grove Dictionary of Music and Musicians, ed. S. Sadie and J. Tyrrell. London: Macmillan.* Schwartz, Elliott, and Barney Childs, with Jim Fox. 1998. Contemporary Composers on Contemporary Music. Expanded edition. New York: Da Capo Press. ISBN 0306808196*Shimizu, Minoru. 1999. Stockhausen und Japan, Licht und Schatten. In Internationales Stockhausen-Symposion 1998: Musikwissenschaftliches Institut der Universitt zu Kln, 11. bis 14. November 1998. Tagungsbericht, edited by Imke Misch and Christoph von Blumrder, 8794. Signale aus Kln: Beitrge zur Musik der Zeit 4. Saarbrcken: PFAU-Verlag. ISBN 3-89727-050-1.* Sigel, Paul. 2000. Der deutsche Beitrag auf der Expo70 in Osaka. Arch plus no. 149150 (April): 11633. Reprinted online Thema 5, no. 1 (July 2000)* Skowron, Zbigniew. 1981. Muzyka elektroniczna Karlheinza Stockhausena. Okres prb i doswiadczen Stockhausens electronic music. A period of trials and experiences. Muzyka: Kwartalnik Instytutu Sztuki Polskiej Akademii Nauk 26, nos. 34:1740.* Stenzl, Jrg. 1991. York Hllers The Master and Margarita: A German Opera. Translated by Sue Rose. Tempo New Series, no. 179 (December): 815.* Stephens, Suzanne, and Kathinka Pasveer (eds.). 2008. Gedenkschrift fr Stockhausen. Krten: Stockhausen-Stiftung fr Musik. ISBN 978-3-00-023528-3.* Stockhausen, Christel. 1978. Stockhausens Tierkreis: Einfhrung und Hinweise zur praktischen Auffhrung. Melos 45/Neue Zeitschrift fr Musik 139 (July/August): 28387. Reprinted together with an English trans. as Stockhausens ZODIAC, Introduction and Instructions for Performance Practice, in a booklet now included with the score of Tierkreis.* Stockhausen, Karlheinz. Texte zur Musik. 10 vols. Vols. 13 edited by Dieter Schnebel; vols. 410 edited by Christoph von Blumrder. Vols. 13, Cologne: Verlag M. DuMont Schauberg (1963, 1964, 1971); vols. 46 DuMont Buchverlag (1978, 1989, 1989). Vols. 710 Krten: Stockhausen-Verlag (1998). English edition, as Texts on Music, edited by Jerome Kohl, with translations by Jerome Kohl, Richard Toop, Tim Nevill, Suzanne Stephens, et al. Krten: Stockhausen-Verlag, in preparation.* Stockhausen, Karlheinz. 1962. The Concept of Unity in Electronic Music. Translated by Elaine Barkin. Perspectives of New Music 1, no. 1 (Autumn): 3948.* Stockhausen, Karlheinz. 1989a. Stockhausen on Music: Lectures and Interviews, edited by Robin Maconie. London and New York: Marion Boyars. ISBN 0-7145-2887-0 (cloth) ISBN 0-7145-2918-4 (pbk).* Stockhausen, Karlheinz. 1989b. Towards a Cosmic Music. Texts selected and translated by Tim Nevill. Shaftsbury: Element Books. ISBN 1852300841.* Stockhausen, Karlheinz. 1996a. Electroacoustic Performance Practice. Perspectives of New Music 34, no. 1 (Fall): 74105.* Stockhausen, Karlheinz. 1996b. Kino-Bilder. In Bilder vom Kino: Literarische Kabinettstcke, edited by Wolfram Schtte, 13840. Frankfurt am Main: Suhrkamp Verlag.* Stockhausen, Karlheinz. 1996c. Helikopter-Streichquartett. Grand Street 14, no. 4 (Spring, Grand Street 56: Dreams):21325. ISBN 1-885490-07-0. Online Variant of this text (some omissions, some supplements, different illustrations).* Stockhausen, Karlheinz. 1998. Bildung ist groe Arbeit: Karlheinz Stockhausen im Gesprch mit Studierenden des Musikwissenschaftlichen Instituts der Universitt zu Kln am 5. Februar 1997. In Stockhausen 70: Das Programmbuch Kln 1998. Signale aus Kln: Musik der Zeit 1, edited by Imke Misch and Christoph von Blumrder, 136. Saarbrcken: Pfau-Verlag.* Stockhausen, Karlheinz. 1999. Stockhausen-Kurse Krten 1999: Kompositions-Kurs: Skizzen von Welt-Parlament (1995) fr Chor a capella (mit singenden Dirigenten/Klangregisseur (1. Szene vom Mittwoch aus Licht). Krten: Stockhausen-Verlag.* Stockhausen, Karlheinz. 2001a. Message from Professor Karlheinz Stockhausen (Accessed 27 December 2007).* Stockhausen, Karlheinz. 2001b. Stockhausen Courses Krten 2001: Composition Course on Lights-Waters (Sunday Greeting) for Soprano, Tenor, and orchestra with synthesizer (1999). Krten: Stockhausen-Verlag.* Stockhausen, Karlheinz. 2002. Huuuh! Das Pressegesprch am 16. September 2001 im Senatszimmer des Hotel Atlantic in Hamburg. MusikTexte no. 91:6977.* Stockhausen, Karlheinz. 2003. Stockhausen Courses Krten 2003: Composition Course on Hoch-Zeiten (of Sunday from Light) for Choir (2001/02). Krten: Stockhausen-Verlag.* Stockhausen, Karlheinz. 2007a. Cosmic Pulses: Electronic Music. (Accessed 30 March 2008) In programme book for the world premire. Rome (8 May). Slightly expanded version in 2007 Stockhausen-Kurse Krten: Programm zu den Interpretations- und Kompositionskursen und Konzerten der Musik von / Programme for the Interpretation and Composition Courses and Concerts of the Music of Karlheinz Stockhausen, 7. Juli bis 15. Juli 2007 in Krten / from July 7th to 15th 2007 in Kuerten, notes for the German premire on 13 July 2007, pp. 22 (German text) and 40 (English text), with illustrations divided between those pages and the programme cover. Krten: Stockhausen-Verlag.*Stockhausen, Karlheinz. 2007b. Harmonien/Harmonies for Bass Clarinet (2006). In 2007 Stockhausen-Kurse Krten: Programm zu den Interpretations- und Kompositionskursen und Konzerten der Musik von / Programme for the Interpretation and Composition Courses and Concerts of the Music of Karlheinz Stockhausen, 7. Juli bis 15. Juli 2007 in Krten / from July 7th to 15th 2007 in Kuerten, notes for the German premire on 11 July 2007, pp. 3334. Krten: Stockhausen-Verlag.* Stockhausen, Karlheinz. 2007c. Harmonien/Harmonies for Flute (2006): 5th Hour of Klang / Sound, The 24 Hours of the Day. In 2007 Stockhausen-Kurse Krten: Programm zu den Interpretations- und Kompositionskursen und Konzerten der Musik von / Programme for the Interpretation and Composition Courses and Concerts of the Music of Karlheinz Stockhausen, 7. Juli bis 15. Juli 2007 in Krten / from July 7th to 15th 2007 in Kuerten, notes for the German premire on 13 July 2007, p. 36. Krten: Stockhausen-Verlag.* Stockhausen, Karlheinz. 2009. Kompositorische Grundlagen Neuer Musik: Sechs Seminare fr die Darmstdter Ferienkurse 1970, edited by Imke Misch. Krten: Stockhausen-Stiftung fr Musik. ISBN 978-3-00-027313-1* Stockhausen, Karlheinz, Hermann Conen, and Jochen Hennlich. 1989. Before and After Samstag aus Licht: Conversation of 24 May 1984, in Milan. Translated by Karin von Abrams. Contemporary Music Review 5, no. 1:26797.* Stockhausen, Markus. 1998. Markus Stockhausen plays Karlheinz Stockhausen, notes on pp. 1317 of booklet to CD recording, Markus Stockhausen plays Karlheinz Stockhausen: Aries, In Freundschaft, Halt, Piet. EMI Classics 7243 5 56645 2 5.* Stockhausen-Stiftung. 2007. Stockhausen Auffhrungen/Performances 2007. Krten: Stockhausen-Stiftung.* Stockhausen-Stiftung. 2008. Stockhausen Auffhrungen/Performances 2008. Krten: Stockhausen-Stiftung.* Stockhausen-Verlag. 2010. Stockhausen August 22nd 1928  5 December 5th 2007, English edition of brochure with official worklist and list of CDs. Krten: Stockhausen-Verlag.* Straus, Joseph N. 1997. Babbitt and Stravinsky under the Serial Regime Perspectives of New Music 35, no. 2 (Summer): 1732.* Straus, Joseph N. 2001. Stravinskys Late Music. Cambridge Studies in Music Theory and Analysis 16. New York: Cambridge University Press 3335. ISBN 0521802202* Stravinsky, Igor. 1984. Selected Correspondence, vol. 2. Edited and with commentaries by Robert Craft. New York: Alfred A. Knopf.* Stravinsky, Igor, and Robert Craft. 1960. Memories and Commentaries. Berkeley and Los Angeles: University of California Press.* Stravinsky, Igor, and Robert Craft. 1980. Conversations with Stravinsky. Berkeley and Los Angeles: University of California Press. ISBN 0520040406 (Reprint of the 1959 Doubleday edition).* Tannenbaum, Mya. 1987. Conversations with Stockhausen, translated from the Italian by David Butchart. Oxford: Clarendon Press; New York: Oxford University Press. ISBN 0-19-315467-6.* Tommasini, Anthony. 2001. The Devil Made Him Do It. New York Times (30 September).* Tilbury, John. 2008. Cornelius Cardew (19361981)  A Life Unfinished. Harlow: Copula.* Toop, Richard. 1998. Mondrian, Fibonacci . . . und Stockausen: Mass und Zahl in Adieu. Neue Zeitschrift fr Musik 159, no. 4 (JulyAugust): 3135.* Toop, Richard. 2001. Karlheinz Stockhausen. The New Grove Dictionary of Music and Musicians ed. S. Sadie and J. Tyrrell. London: Macmillan.* Toop, Richard. 2005. Six Lectures from the Stockhausen Courses Krten 2002. Stockhausen-Verlag. ISBN 3000161856.* Toop, Richard. 2008. Kulturelle Dissidenten: Die Stockhausen-Klasse der Jahre 1973 und 1974. MusikTexte: Zeitschrift fr neue Musik, no. 116 (February): 4649.* Truelove, Stephen. 1984. Karlheinz Stockhausens Klavierstck XI: An Analysis of Its Composition via a Matrix System of Serial Polyphony and the Translation of Rhythm into Pitch. DMA diss. Norman: University of Oklahoma.* Truelove, Stephen. 1998. The Translation of Rhythm into Pitch in Stockhausens Klavierstck XI. Perspectives of New Music 36, no. 1 (Winter): 189220.* Tsahar, Assif. 2006. Gentle Giant. Haaretz Aviv (17 March).* Ulrich, Thomas. 2006. Neue Musik aus religisem Geist: theologisches Denken im Werk von Karlheinz Stockhausen und John Cage. Saarbrcken: Pfau. ISBN 9783897273283* Vermeil, Jean. 1996. Conversations with Boulez: Thoughts on Conducting, translated by Camille Nash, with a selection of programs conducted by Boulez and a discography by Paul Griffiths. Portland, Oregon: Amadeus Press.* Voermans, Erik. 2008. Besluit van een machtig oeuvre. Het Parool (20 June).* Wager, Gregg. 1998. Symbolism as a Compositional Method in the Works of Karlheinz Stockhausen. College Park, Maryland; diss. phil. Free University Berlin, 1996.* Williams, Alastair. 2006. Swaying with Schumann: Subjectivity and Tradition in Wolfgang Rihms Fremde Szenen IIII and Related Scores. Music and Letters 87, no. 3:37997.* Witts, Dick. 1995. Karlheinz Stockhausen: Advice to Clever Children .... The Wire, issue 141 (November).* Wolfson, Richard. 2001. Hit and mismatch The Telegraph (5 March).* Wrner, Karl Heinz. 1973. Stockhausen: Life and Work. Translated by Bill Hopkins. Berkeley: University of California Press.External links* Karlheinz Stockhausen official site* official site for the Stockhausen CD Edition * The Stockhausen Society (International)* Catalogues of works by Stockhausen (Stockhausen Verlag)* Comprehensive Stockhausen Discography* Ingvar Loco Nordins Stockhausen pages;Listening*Stockhausen website video and audio files*Epitonic.com: Karlheinz Stockhausen featuring tracks from Mantra*Excerpts from sound archives of Stockhausens works;Obituaries*Editor. 2007. Karlheinz Stockhausen. The Times (8 December). * Ircam-Centre Pompidou, and Franois Decarsin. 2007. Karlheinz Stockhausen: Compositeur allemand n le 22 aot 1928  Mdrath, prs de Cologne, et dcd le 5 dcembre 2007,  Krten, o il vivait. (10 December). *Nonnenmann, Rainer. 2007. In Krten zu Hause und im Universum. Stadt-Anzeiger (7 December). ;Interviews*Weasel, Gary. 2007. Looping the Loop: Karlheinz Stockhausen. Dazed Digital (31 May).;Further reading*Austin, Kevin. 2010. Kontakte by Karlheinz Stockhausen in Four Channels. eContact! 12.4 Perspectives on the Electroacoustic Work/ Perspectives sur luvre lectroacoustique (August). Montral: CEC.*Betsill, Daniel Joseph. 2007. The construction of Stockhausens Heavens Door.*Covell, Grant Chu. 2000. Stockhausen is Invisible. La Folia 3/1 (November).*Covell, Grant Chu. 2007. Ferneyhough & Stockhausen: Grubby and Gruppen. La Folia (April).*Essl, Karlheinz 1989. Aspekte des Seriellen bei Karlheinz Stockhausen. First appeared in Lothar Knessl (Ed.) WIEN MODERN 89, pp.9097. Vienna.*Fllmer, Golo. n.d. Karlheinz Stockhausen: Spherical Concert Hall (Osaka World Expo, 1970). Medien Kunst Net / Media Art Net.StockhausenStockhausenStockhausenStockhausenStockhausenStockhausenStockhausenStockhausen StockhausenStockhausenStockhausenStockhausenStockhausenStockhausenStockhausenHenricus StockhausentokhauzensStockhausenStockhausenStockhausenStockhausenja:StockhausenStockhausenStockhausenStockhausenStockhausenStockhausenStockhausenStockhausenStockhausenzh:
17752
Laos
calling_code              856Laos (, , or )(These same pronunciations using Wikipedias pronunciation respelling key: , , .)()() Lao:    Sathalanalat Paxathipatai Paxaxon Lao, officially the Lao Peoples Democratic Republic, is a country in Southeast Asia, bordered by Burma and the Republic of China to the northwest, Vietnam to the east, Cambodia to the south and Thailand to the west. Its population was estimated to be 6.8 million in 2009.(Laos traces its history to the Kingdom which existed from the 14th to the 18th century when it split into three separate kingdoms. In 1893, it became a French protectorate, with the three kingdoms, of Luang Phrabang, of Vientiane and of Champasak, uniting to form what is now known as Laos. It briefly gained independence in 1945 after Japanese occupation, but returned to French rule until it was granted autonomy in 1949. Laos became independent in 1954, with a constitutional monarchy under Vong. Shortly after independence, a long civil war ended the monarchy, when the Communist Lao movement came to power in 1975.Laos is a single-party republic. The capital city is Vientiane. Other large cities include Prabang, Savannakhet and Pakse. The official language is Lao. Most people are Lao with a significant proportion of indigenous religion as well. It is a rising power in providing electricity to neighboring countries such as Thailand, China and Vietnam and the economy is accelerating rapidly with the demands for its metals.()( It is a member of the Asia Pacific Trade Agreement (APTA), Association of Southeast Asian Nations (ASEAN), Asia Summit and Francophonie. Laos applied for membership of the Trade Organization (WTO) in 1997. Etymology In the language, the countrys name is Muang Lao () or Pathet Lao, both of which literally mean Lao Country.() The French, who united the three separate Lao kingdoms in Indochina in 1893, named the country as the plural of the ethnic group (in French, the final s at the end of a word is usually silent, thus it would be also be pronounced Lao).() History  Lan Xang 13531893 File:Pha That Luang, Vientiane, Laos.jpg|thumb|240px||That Luang in Vientiane, the national symbol of Laos|200pxLaos traces its history to the kingdom of Lan Xang (Million Elephants), founded in the 14th century, by a Lao warlord, Fa Ngum, who took over Vientiane with 10,000 Khmer troops. Ngum had been a descendent from a long line of Lao kings, tracking back to Khoun Boulom. He made Buddhism the state religion and Lan-Xang prospered. Within 20 years of its formation, the kingdom expanded eastward to Champa and along the Annamite mountains in Vietnam. His ministers, unable to tolerate his ruthlessness, forced him into exile to present day Thai province of Nan in 1373,() where he later died. Fa Ngums eldest son, Oun Heuan, (took the title Samsenthai) came to the throne and reigned for 43 years. During his reign, Lan Xang became an important trade centre. After his death in 1421, Lan Xang collapsed into warring factions for the next 100 years.In 1520, Photisarath came to the throne and moved the capital from Luang Phrabang to Vientiane to avoid Burmese invasion. Setthathirat became king in 1548, after his father was killed, and ordered the construction that would become the symbol of Laos, Luang. Setthathirat disappeared in the mountains on his way back from a military expedition into Cambodia and Lan Xang began to rapidly decline. It was not until 1637, when Vongsa ascended the throne that Lan Xang would further expand its frontiers. Under his reign, it is often regarded as Laoss golden age. When he died, left Lan Xang without an heir, the kingdom was divided into three principalities. Between 1763 and 1769, Burmese armies overran northern Laos and annexed Phrabang, while Champasak eventually came under Siamese suzerainty.Chao Anouvong was installed as a vassal king of Vientiane by the Siamese. He encouraged a renaissance of Lao fine arts and literature and improved relations with Luang Phrabang. Although he was being pressured to pay tribute to the Vietnamese, he rebelled against the Siamese. It resulted in failure and Vientiane was ransacked,() with Anouvong brought to Bangkok as a prisoner, where he later died. French Rule of Laos 18931954 In the late 19th century, Luang Prabang was ransacked by the Chinese Flag Army() and the French managed to rescue King Kham. In desperate need of protection, Luang Phrabang was incorporated into the Protectorate of Indochina. Shortly after, the of Champasak and the territory of Vientiane were also added to the protectorate. Under the French, King Vong of Luang Phrabang, became ruler of a unified Laos and Vientiane once again became the capital. Laos was never important to France,() except as a buffer state between British-influenced Thailand and the more economically important Annam and Tonkin.During their rule, the French introduced the corvee, a system where every male Lao were forced to contribute 10 days of manual labour per year to the colonial government. In spite of Laos producing tin, rubber and coffee, it never accounted for more than 1% of French Indochinas exports. By 1940, only 600 French citizens lived in Laos.()Following a brief Japanese occupation during World War II, the country declared its independence in 1945, but the French under de Gaulle re-asserted their control and only in 1950 was Laos granted semi-autonomy as an associated state within the Union. Moreover, the French remained in de facto control until 1954, when Laos gained full independence as a monarchy. Kingdom of Laos and war 195475 Coat of Arms of Laos.svg|thumb|Royal Arms of LaosKhoun - Laos - 01.JPG|thumb|right|240px|Buddha Statue in Muang KhounFile:Sisavang Vong.jpg|thumb|140px|King Vong of LaosUnder a special exemption to the Convention, a French military training mission continued to support the Lao Army. In 1955, the Department of Defense created a special Evaluation Office to replace French support of the Royal Lao Army against the communist Lao as part of the U.S. containment policy.Laos was dragged into the War and the eastern parts of the country followed North Vietnam and adopted North Vietnam as a fraternal country. Laos allowed North Vietnam to use its land as a supply route for its war against the South. In response, the United States initiated a bombing campaign against the North Vietnamese, supported regular and irregular anticommunist forces in Laos and supported a South Vietnamese invasion of Laos. The result of these actions were a series of coups dtat and, ultimately, the Civil War between the Royal Laotian government and the communist Pathet Lao.In the Civil War, the heavily armed and battle-hardened North Vietnamese Army was the real power behind the Pathet Lao insurgency. In 1968, the North Vietnamese Army launched a multi-division attack to help the communist Pathet Lao to fight against the Royal Lao Army. The attack resulted in the army largely demobilizing and leaving the conflict to irregular forces raised by the United States and Thailand. The attack resulted in many lost lives.Massive aerial bombardment was carried out by the United States. Guardian reported that Laos was hit by an average of one B-52 bombload every eight minutes, 24 hours a day, between 1964 and 1973. US bombers dropped more ordnance on Laos in this period than was dropped during the whole of the Second World War. Of the 260 million bombs that rained down, particularly on Province on the of Jars, 80 million failed to explode, leaving a deadly legacy.() It holds the distinction of being the most bombed country, per capita, in the world. Because it was particularly heavily affected by bombs during this war, Laos was a strong advocate of the on Cluster Munitions to ban the weapons and assist victims, and hosted the First Meeting of States Parties to the convention in November 2010.In 1975, the communist Lao, along with Peoples Army and backed by the Union, overthrew the royalist Lao government, forcing King Vatthana to abdicate on 2 December 1975. He later died in captivity. Communist Laos (1975present) On 2 December 1975, after taking control of the country, the Pathet Lao government under Phomvihane renamed the country as the Lao Peoples Democratic Republic and signed agreements giving Vietnam the right to station armed forces and to appoint advisers to assist in overseeing the country. Laos was requested in 1979 by the Socialist Republic of Vietnam to end relations with the Peoples Republic of China, leading to isolation in trade by China, the United States, and other countries. Geography File:Mekong River (Luang Prabang).jpg|thumb|240px|River flowing through Prabang|240px|rightFile:Laos ricefields.JPG|thumb|right|240px|fields in LaosLaos is a landlocked country in Southeast Asia, lying mostly between latitudes 14 and 23N (a small area is south of 14), and longitudes 100 and 108E. Its thickly forested landscape consists mostly of rugged mountains, the highest of which is Bia at , with some plains and plateaus. The Mekong River forms a large part of the western boundary with Thailand, whereas the mountains of the Annamite Chain form most of the eastern border with Vietnam. The climate is tropical and monsoon.()There is a distinct rainy season from May to November, followed by a dry season from December to April. Local tradition holds that there are three seasons (rainy, cold and hot) as the latter two months of the climatologically defined dry season are noticeably hotter than the earlier four months. The capital and largest city of Laos is Vientiane and other major cities include Prabang, Savannakhet and Pakse.In 1993, the Laos government set aside 21% of the nations land area for habitat conservation preservation.() The country is one of four in the opium poppy growing region known as the Golden Triangle. According to the October 2007 UNODC fact book Opium Poppy Cultivation in South East Asia, the poppy cultivation area was , down from  in 2006.Laos can be considered to consist of three geographical areas: north, central, and south.() Administrative divisions Laos is divided into 16 provinces (qwang) and one prefecture (Nakhonluang ViengChan) which includes Vientiane Capital (Na Kone Luang Vientiane).Provinces are further divided into districts (muang) and then villages (baan). An urban village is essentially a town.(){| stylebackground:none; cellspacing2px||} Government and politics Laos is a communist single-party republic. The only legal political party is the Peoples Revolutionary Party (LPRP). The head of state is President Sayasone, who is also the Secretary of the Lao Peoples Revolutionary Party. The head of government is Prime Minister Thammavong. Government policies are determined by the party through the all-powerful nine-member Politburo and the 49-member Central Committee. Important government decisions are vetted by the Council of Ministers.Laos first, French-written and monarchical constitution was promulgated on 11 May 1947 and declared Laos to be an independent state within the Union. The revised constitution of 11 May 1957 omitted reference to the French Union, though close educational, health and technical ties with the former colonial power persisted. The 1957 document was abrogated on 3 December 1975, when a communist Peoples Republic was proclaimed. A new constitution was adopted in 1991 and enshrined a leading role for the LPRP. In 1990, deputy minister for science & technology Saysangkhi resigned from the government and party, calling for political reform. He died in captivity in 1998.()In 1992, elections were held for a new 85-seat National Assembly with members elected by secret ballot to five-year terms. This National Assembly, which essentially acts as a rubber stamp for the LPRP, approves all new laws, although the executive branch retains authority to issue binding decrees. The most recent elections took place in April 2006. The assembly was expanded to 99 members in 1997 and in 2006 elections had 115. Hmong conflict The government of Laos has been accused of committing genocide against that countrys Hmong ethnic minority.()Some Hmong groups fought as CIA-backed units on the Royalist side in the Laos civil war. After the Pathet Lao took over the country in 1975, the conflict continued in isolated pockets. In 1977 a communist newspaper promised the party would hunt down the American collaborators and their families to the last root.As many as 200,000 Hmong went into exile in Thailand, with many ending up in the USA. A number of Hmong fighters hid out in mountains in Province for many years, with a remnant emerging from the jungle in 2003.()Human rightsThe Constitution that was promulgated in 1991 and amended in 2003 contains most key safeguards for human rights. For example, in Article 8 it makes it clear that Laos is a multiethnic state and is committed to equality between ethnic groups. The Constitution also has provisions for gender equality and freedom of religion, for freedom of speech, press and assembly. On 25 September 2009, Laos ratified the Covenant on Civil and Political Rights, nine years after signing the treaty. The policy objectives of both the Lao government and international donors remain focused toward achieving sustainable economic growth and poverty reduction.()()However, International has raised concerns about the ratification record of the Laos government on human rights standards and its lack of cooperation with the UN human rights mechanisms and legislative measures which impact negatively on human rights. It has also raised concerns in relation to freedom of expression, poor prison conditions, restrictions on freedom of religions, protection of refugees and asylum-seekers and the death penalty.()In October 1999, 30 young people were arrested for attempting to display posters calling for peaceful economic, political and social change in Laos. Five of them were arrested and subsequently sentenced to up to 10 years imprisonment on charges of treason. One has since died due to his treatment by prison guards, while one has been released. The surviving three men should have been released by October 2009, but their whereabouts remains unknown.(Laos and Vietnamese troops were reported to have raped and killed four Christian Hmong women in Khouang province in 2011, according to US campaign group Centre for Public Policy Analysis. CPPA also said other Christian and independent Buddhist and animist believers were being persecuted.()() Economy File:Wattay Intl Airport Vientiane Laos.jpg|thumb|right|International Airport in VientianeFile:March soir.JPG|thumb|right|Night Market in PrabangThe Lao economy depends heavily on investment and trade with its neighbours, Thailand, Vietnam, and, especially in the north, China. Pakxe has also experienced growth based on cross-border trade with Thailand and Vietnam. In 2011, the Securities Exchange began trading.agriculture still accounts for half of the GDP and provides 80 percent of employment. Only 4.01 percent of the country is arable land, and 0.34 percent used as permanent crop land,(Field Listing  Land use, CIA World Factbook) the lowest percentage in the Mekong Subregion.(About Greater Mekong Subregion at Asian Development Bank) Rice dominates agriculture, with about 80 percent of the arable land area used for growing rice.() Approximately 77 percent of Lao farm households are self-sufficient in rice.(Genuinely Lao, Rice Today, AprilJune 2006)Through the development, release and widespread adoption of improved rice varieties, and through economic reforms, production has increased by an annual rate of 5 percent between 1990 and 2005,(Fifteen years of support for rice research in Lao PDRAsia brief: Filling the rice basket in Lao PRD partnership resultsGenuinely Lao, Prepared by IRRIs International Programs Management Office) and Lao PDR achieved a net balance of rice imports and exports for the first time in 1999.()Lao PDR may have the greatest number of rice varieties in the Greater Mekong Subregion. Since 1995 the Lao government has been working with the Rice Research Institute to collect seed samples of each of the thousands of rice varieties found in Laos.( )The economy receives aid from the IMF, ADB and other international sources, and direct investment for development of the society, industry, hydropower and mining, most notably copper and gold. Tourism is the fastest-growing industry in the country. Economic development in Laos has been hampered by drain, with a skilled emigration rate of 37.4 percent in 2000.( )Laos is rich in mineral resources but imports petroleum and gas. Metallurgy is an important industry, and the government hopes to attract foreign investment to develop the substantial deposits of coal, gold, bauxite, tin, copper and other valuable metals. In addition, the countrys plentiful water resources and mountainous terrain enable it to produce and export large quantities of hydroelectric energy. Of the potential capacity of approximately 18,000 megawatts, around 8,000 megawatts have been committed for exporting to Thailand and Vietnam.()The countrys most widely recognised product may well be Beerlao which is exported to a number of countries including neighbours Cambodia and Vietnam. It is produced by the Brewery Company.TourismFile:ViewFromWatPhu.JPG|ViewFromWatPhu|thumb|right|View from near the sanctuary on the main upper level of Phu, looking back towards the Mekong RiverThe tourism sector has grown rapidly, from 80,000 international visitors in 1990, to 1.876 million in 2010.() Tourism is expected to contribute US$679.1 million to gross national product in 2010, rising to US$1,585.7 million by 2020. In 2010, one in every 10.9 jobs was in the tourism sector. Export earnings from international visitors and tourism goods are expected to generate 15.5% of total exports or US$270.3 million in 2010, growing in nominal terms to  US$484.2 million (12.5% of total) in 2020.()File:Plainofjars 1.jpg|Plainofjars 1.jpg|thumb|left|Hmong girls on the of JarsLaos has become popular with tourists for its relaxed style of living and reputation for having elements of the original Asia lost elsewhere. The official tourism slogan is Simply Beautiful. The main attractions for tourists include Buddhist culture and colonial architecture in Prabang; gastronomy and ancient temples in the capital of Vientiane; backpacking in Ngoi Neua and Vieng; ancient and modern culture and history in Plain of Jars region (main article: Phonsavan); trekking and visiting tribes in a number of areas including Phongsaly and Namtha; caves and waterfalls near Thakhek; relaxation, the dolphin and Phapheng Falls at Phan Don or as they are known in English, the Four Thousand Islands; Phu, an ancient Khmer temple complex; and the Plateau for waterfalls and coffee.Luang Prabang and Wat Phu are both World Heritage sites, with the Plain of Jars expected to join them once more work to clear UXO has been completed. Major festivals include Laos New Year which is celebrated around 1315 April and involves a festival similar but more subdued than that of Thailand and other South-East Asian countries.The Lao National Tourism Administration, related government agencies and the private sector are working together to realise the vision put forth in the countrys National Ecotourism Strategy and Action Plan. This includes decreasing the environmental and cultural impact of tourism; increasing awareness in the importance of ethnic groups and biological diversity; providing a source of income to conserve, sustain and manage the Lao protected area network and cultural heritage sites; and emphasising the need for tourism zoning and management plans for sites that will be developed as ecotourism destinations.()Laos is known for its silk and local handicraft products  both of which are on display in Luang Prabangs night market, among other places. Another speciality is tea. Environmental problems Laos is increasingly suffering from environmental problems, with deforestation a particular issue () as expanding commercial exploitation of the forests, plans for additional hydroelectric facilities, foreign demand for wild animals and nonwood forest products for food and traditional medicines, and a growing population put increasing pressure on the forests.The Nations Development Programme warns that: Protecting the environment and sustainable use of natural resources in Lao PDR is vital for poverty reduction and economic growth.()In April 2011, Independent newspaper reported that Laos had started work on the controversial Dam on the River without getting formal approval. Environmentalists say the dam will adversely affect 60 million people and Cambodia and Vietnam  concerned about the flow of water further downstream  are officially opposed to the project. The River Commission, a regional intergovernmental body designed to promote the sustainable management of the river, famed for its giant catfish, carried out a study that warned if Xayaburi and subsequent schemes went ahead, it would fundamentally undermine the abundance, productivity and diversity of the Mekong fish resources.() Neighbouring Vietnam has warned the dam will harm the Delta, which is the home to nearly 20 million people and supplies around 50 percent of rice output, over 70 percent of seafood and 70 percent of fruit output of Vietnam.()Osborne, Visiting Fellow at the Institute for International Policy who has written widely on the Mekong, warns: The future scenario is of the Mekong ceasing to be a bounteous source of fish and guarantor of agricultural richness, with the great river below China becoming little more than a series of unproductive lakes. ()Illegal logging is also a major problem  environmental groups estimate that 500,000 cubic meters of logs find their way from Laos to Vietnam every year  with most of the furniture eventually exported to western countries.()A government survey in 1992 indicated that forests occupied about 48% of Laos land areas then. That percentage was found to have decreased to 41% in a 2002 survey. Lao authorities have said that, in reality, forest density might be no more than 35% of the total national land areas because, in addition to widespread illegal logging, various development projects such as dams have considerably contributed to the destruction and decline of forests in Laos.() Infrastructure The main international airports are Vientianes International Airport and Prabang International Airport with International Airport also having a few international services. The national airline is Airlines with other carriers serving the country including Airways, Airlines, AirAsia, Airways International and Eastern Airlines.Much of the country lacks adequate infrastructure. Laos has no railways, except a short link to connect Vientiane with Thailand over the Friendship Bridge. A short railway, the Det  Don Khon narrow-gauge railway was built by the French in Province but has been closed since the 1940s. In the late 1920s, work began on the  Tan Ap railway, that would have run between Thakhek, Khammuan Province and Ap Railway Station, Binh Province, Vietnam through the Gia Pass. However, the scheme was eventually aborted in the 1930s. The major roads connecting the major urban centres, in particular Route 13, have been significantly upgraded in recent years, but villages far from major roads can be reached only through unpaved roads that may not be accessible year-round.There is limited external and internal telecommunication, but mobile phones have become widespread in urban centres. In many rural areas electricity is at least partly available. Songthaews (pick-up trucks with benches) are used in the country for long-distance and local public transport.Laos has made particularly noteworthy progress increasing access to sanitation and improved sanitation and has already met its 2015 Development Goal (MDG) target.(Simon OMeally 2010. Unsung progress in rural sanitation: Building the foundations in Lao PDR. London: Development Institute) Laos predominantly rural (84%) population makes investing in sanitation difficult, and in 1990 only 8% of the rural population had access to improved sanitation.( Access rose rapidly from 10% in 1995 to 38% in 2008, or in other words between 1995 and 2008 approximately 1,232,900 more people had access to improved sanitation in rural areas.( This is incredibly successful, especially when comparing it to other similarly poor developing countries.( Successes in water and sanitation have been achieved, over the past few years, in part due to small-scale independent providers emerging in a spontaneous manner or having been promoted by public authorities. The Laotian authorities have recently developed an innovative regulatory framework for Public-Private partnership contracts signed with small enterprises, in parallel with the more classic regulation of State-owned water enterprises.() Demographics The term Laotian does not necessarily refer to the Lao language, ethnic Lao people, language or customs, but is a political term that also includes the non-ethnic Lao groups within Laos and identifies them as Laotian because of their political citizenship. Laos has the youngest population of any country in Asia with a median age of 19.3 years.Laos population was estimated at 6.8 million in early 2009, dispersed unevenly across the country. Most people live in valleys of the Mekong River and its tributaries. Vientiane prefecture, the capital and largest city, had about 740,010 residents in 2008. The countrys population density was 27/km2.( Ethnicity The people of Laos are often considered by their altitudinal distribution (lowlands, midlands and highlands) as this approximates ethnic groups. Lao Loum (lowland people) 60% of the countrys people are ethnic Lao, the principal lowland inhabitants and the politically and culturally dominant group. The Lao belong to the Tai linguistic group who began migrating southward from China in the first millennium AD. 10% belong to other lowland groups, which together with the Lao people make up the Loum. Lao Theung (midland people) In the central and southern mountains, Mon-Khmer tribes, known as Theung or mid-slope Laotians, predominate. Other terms are Khmu, Khamu (Kammu) or Kha as the Lao Loum refer to them as indicating their Austro-Asiatic origins. However the latter is considered pejorative, meaning slave. They were the indigenous inhabitants of northern Laos. Some Vietnamese, Chinese and Thailand Thai minorities remain, particularly in the towns, but many left after independence in the late 1940s, many of whom relocated either to Vietnam, Hong Kong, or to France. Lao Theung constitute about 30% of the population.() Lao Soung (highland people) Hill people and minority cultures of Laos such as the Hmong (Miao), Yao (Mien), Dao, Shan, and several Tibeto-Burman speaking peoples have lived in isolated regions of Laos for many years. Mountain/hill tribes of mixed ethno/cultural-linguistic heritage are found in northern Laos which include the Lua (Lua) and Khmu people who are indigenous to Laos. Today, the Lua people are considered endangered. Collectively, they are known as Soung or highland Laotians. Lao Soung account for only about 10% of the population.() Languages File:Wat Sen.jpg|thumb|180px|right|Buddhist Monks in front of Sen, Luang PrabangFile:Vientiane Budda.jpg|right|180px|thumb|Buddhist shrine in VientianeThe official and dominant language is Lao, a tonal  language of the Tai linguistic  group. However only slightly more than half of the population can speak Lao, the remainder speaking various ethnic minority languages, particularly in rural  areas. The written  language is based on Khmer  writing script. Languages like Khmu and Hmong are spoken by minorities, particularly in the midland and highland areas.French, still common in government and commerce, is studied by many, while English, the language of the Association of Southeast Asian Nations (ASEAN), has become increasingly studied in recent years.() Health Male expectancy at birth was at 63.2 and female life expectancy was at 65.9 in 2007.() Healthy life expectancy was at 54 in 2006.(  In 2006, two fifths of the population were not using an improved water resource.( Government expenditure on health is at about 4 % of the GDP.( Its amount was at US$ 18 (PPP) in 2006.( Religion Of the people of Laos 67% are Buddhist, 1.5% are Christian, and 31.5% are other or unspecified according to the 2005 census.() Buddhism has long been one of the most important social forces in Laos.Theravada Buddhism along with the common animism practiced among the mountain tribes, coexists peacefully with spirit worship. Christians are mostly restricted to the Vientiane area, and Muslims to the Burmese-border region. Christian missionary work is regulated by the government. Education The adult literacy rate exceeds two thirds.() The male literacy rate exceeds the female literacy rate.( In 2004 the net primary enrollment rate was at 84%.( The University of Laos is the Laos states public university.The total literacy rate is 73% (2010 estimate). Culture Nagas Feast.jpg|thumb|150px|An example of Lao cuisine|right|180pxTheravada Buddhism is a dominant influence in Lao culture. It is reflected throughout the country from language to the temple and in art, literature, performing arts, etc. Many elements of Lao culture predate Buddhism, however. For example, Laotian music is dominated by its national instrument, the khaen, a type of bamboo pipe that has prehistoric origins. The khaen traditionally accompanied the singer in lam, the dominant style of music. Among the various lam styles, the saravane is probably the most popular.Rice is a characteristic staple food and has cultural and religious significance to the Lao people. Sticky rice is generally preferred over jasmine rice, and sticky rice cultivation and production is thought to have originated in Laos. There are many traditions and rituals associated with rice production in different environments, and among many ethnic groups. For example, Khammu farmers in Luang Prabang plant the rice variety Khao Kam in small quantities near the hut in memory of dead parents, or at the edge of the rice field to indicate that parents are still alive.()MarriagePolygamy is officially a crime in Laos, though the penalty is minor. The constitution and Family Code bars the legal recognition of polygamous marriages, stipulating that monogamy is to be the principle key of contracting a marriage in the country. While rare, there have been cases of polygamy practiced within the people.()MediaAll newspapers are published by the government, including two foreign language papers: the English-language daily Times and the French-language weekly Rnovateur. Additionally, the Khao San Pathet Lao, the countrys official news agency, publishes English and French versions of its eponymous paper. Laos currently has nine daily newspapers, 90 magazines, 43 radio stations and 32 TV stations operating throughout the country.(Vientiane Times, 18 February 2011) Internet cafes are now common in the major urban centres and are popular especially with the younger generation.See also* of Laos* colonial empire* policy in Laos* Peoples Army* of freedom indices* of Laos-related topics* Vietnamese invasion of Laos* LaoLeaders of ethnic minorities in Laos* Keo* Kommandam* Chay Vue Notes and references  External links * Lao PDR News* The National Portal of Laos* Lao National Tourism Administration* Chief of State and Cabinet Members* BBC News  Country Profile: Laos* Lao Voices* Lao Media* Tageo Laos* Lao Cooking and The Essence of Life; General information* * Laos from UCB Libraries GovPubs* * * list  list  ace:Laosaf:Laosals:Laosar:an:Laosfrp:Laosast:Laosaz:Laosbn:zh-min-nan:Lao-kokmap-bms:Laosbe:be-x-old:bcl:Laosbo:bs:Laosbr:Laosbg:ca:Laoscv:ceb:Laoscs:Laoscy:Laosda:Laosde:Laosdv:nv:Losdsb:Laoset:Laosel:es:Laoseo:Laosoext:Laoseu:Laosfa:hif:Laosfo:Laosfr:Laosfy:Laosga:LaosLaosgag:Laosgd:LthosDemocrtica Popular Lao -    gan:gu:hak:Liu-koet ko:haw:Laosahy:hi:hsb:Laoshr:Laosio:Laosilo:Laosbpy:id:Laosie:Laosos:is:Laosit:Laoshe:kn:pam:Laoska:ks:csb:Laskk:Laorw:Lawosisw:Laoskv:ht:Laosku:Laoslo:la:Laotialv:Laosalb:Laoslt:Laosaslij:Lasli:Laosln:Laosjbo:luaoslmo:Laoshu:Laoszmk:ml:mr:arz:mzn:ms:Laosmy:nah:Laona:Laosnl:Laosnew:ja:nap:Laospih:Layosno:Laosnn:Laosnov:Laosoc:Laosmhr:pnb:ps:km:pms:Losnds:Laospl:Laospt:Laoscrh:Laosro:Laossuyuru:sah:se:Laossa:sco:Laossq:Laosiscn:Laossi:simple:Laosss:ILawososk:Laossl:Laosszl:Laosso:Laosckb:sr:sh:Laossu:Laosfi:Laossv:Laos(bansa)ta:tt:te:th:tg:tr:Laostk:Laosudm:bug:Laosuk:ur:ug:vi:Lovo:Laosnfiu-vro:Laoszh-classical:war:LaosLawoswuu:yo:Lszh-yue:diq:Laosbat-smg:Lauososzh:
17965
Louis_Leakey
signature          thumb|right|260px|Map of Kenya.Louis Seymour Bazett Leakey (L.S.B. Leakey) (August 7, 1903  October 1, 1972) was a Kenyan archaeologist and naturalist whose work was important in establishing evolutionary development in Africa. He also played a major role in creating organizations for future research in Africa and for protecting wildlife there. Having been a prime mover in establishing a tradition of palaeoanthropological inquiry, he was able to motivate the next generation to continue it, notably within his own family, many of whom also became prominent.  Leakey participated in national events of East Africa and Kenya during the 1950s.In philosophy he asserted Darwins theory of evolution unswervingly and set about to prove Darwins hypothesis that man arose in Africa; he was also a devout Christian.(Reported in Ancestral Passions, Chapter 3.)BackgroundLouis parents, Harry and Mary Bazett Leakey (called May by her friends), were British missionaries of the Christian faith in then East Africa, now Kenya.(Harry: 1868-1940; Mary: ?-1948. Harry later became canon of the station and had a distinguished career. Louis reports in his memoirs, Chapter 6, that the Leakeys were of the of England, or Anglican) Harry had taken a previously established post of the Mission Society among the Kikuyu at Kabete. The station was at that time a hut and two tents in the highlands north of Nairobi. Louis earliest home had an earthen floor, a leaky thatched roof, rodents and insects, and no heating system except for charcoal braziers. The facilities improved but slowly. The mission, a center of activity, set up a clinic in one of the tents, and later a girls school for African women. Harry was working on a translation of the Bible into the Kenyan language, Kikuyu. Louis had a younger brother, Douglas, and two older sisters, Gladys Leakey Beecher and Julia Leakey Barham. Louis primary family came to contain also Miss Oakes (a governess) Miss Higgenbotham (another missionary), and Mariamu (a Kikuyu nurse). Inevitably, Louis grew up, played, and learned to hunt with Africans. He also learned to walk with the distinctive gait of the Kikuyu and speak their language fluently, as did his siblings. He was initiated into the Kikuyu ethnic group, an event of which he never spoke, as he was sworn to secrecy.(According to Blake Edgar in Louis Leakeys Legacy: Celebrating the Centennial of His Extraordinary Life and Finds in AnthroQuest Online for Fall, 2003, Louis received the Kikuyu name Wakuruigi, Son of the Sparrow Hawk. Harry also had a name, apparently not an initiation name, but rather descriptive: Giteru, Big beard.)Louis requested and was given permission to build and move into a hut, Kikuyu style, at the end of the garden. It was home to his personal collection of natural objects, such as birds eggs and skulls. All the children developed a keen interest in and appreciation of the pristine natural surroundings in which they found themselves. They raised baby animals, later turning them over to zoos. Louis read a gift book, Days Before History, by H. R. Hall (1907), a juvenile fictional work illustrating the prehistory of Britain. He began to collect tools and was further encouraged in this activity by a role model, Loveridge, first curator (1914) of the Natural History Museum in Nairobi, predecessor of the Coryndon Museum. This interest may have predisposed him toward a career in archaeology.(Canon Leakey also was a naturalist and must have been a significant model, as Louis wished originally to pattern his life after his fathers. Canon Leakey was one of the original founders of the East Africa and Uganda Natural History Society, according to Louis memoirs, Chapter 8)Neither Harry nor May were of strong constitution. From 1904-1906 the entire family lived at Mays mothers house in Berkshire, England, while Harry recovered from neurasthenia, and again in 1911-1913, while May recovered from general frailty and exhaustion. During the latter stay, Harry bought a house in Boscombe.(The facts for this section were gathered mainly from Ancestral Passions, Chapter 1, Kabete, and from the Publishers Prologue of the Harcourt Brace Jovanovich edition of By the Evidence.)The formative years His fathers example In Britain the Leakey children attended elementary school; in Africa they had a tutor, Miss Laing. They sat out World War I in Africa. When the sea lanes opened again, they returned to Boscombe, where Louis was sent to Weymouth Secondary School, a private boys school in 1919 at age 16. In three years there he did not do well, and complained of rules he considered an infringement on his freedom and hazing by the other boys. Advised by one teacher to seek employment in a bank, he appealed to his English teacher, Mr. Tunstall, who started him in the application process to Cambridge. His excellent scores on the entrance exams won him a scholarship.Louis matriculated at his fathers alma mater, Cambridge University, in 1922, intent on becoming a missionary to British East Africa. For the rest of his life he would dine out on the story of his finals. When he had arrived in Britain he had notified the register of people with a knowledge of rare languages that he was fluent in Swahili. When he came to his finals he asked to be examined in this and after some hesitation the authorities agreed. Then one day he received two letters. One instructed him to report at a certain time and place for a viva-voce examination in Swahili. The other asked if, at the same time and place, he would examine a candidate in Swahili.His son says:(Richard E. Leakey, The Making of Mankind, Chapter 1. The rest of the material comes from Morell, Chapter 2, From Cambridge to Olduvai..):Louis was in his early twenties when he decided to pursue a fossil-hunting career. Until then, he had intended to follow his fathers example and be a Christian missionary in Kenya.He preached Christian zeal to his fellow students and otherwise impressed Cambridge society with behavior that was considered eccentric.(For the details of eccentricity, read Bowman-Kruhm, Chapter 2. They include, for example, demonstrating talking drums from the roof of a building at Cambridge.) He was also an evolutionist and befriended some future naturalists.(Bateson, Barton Worthington) In 1923 his usual zeal led him into a severe concussion in a game of union. He was relieved of his academic duties. Rest and the outdoors were prescribed.Diversion from missionary workIn that year a position became available that pushed all thought of rest into the background. In 1922 the British had been awarded East Africa as part of the settlement of World War I, subsequently applying the name Tanganyika. Within its territory the Germans had discovered a site rich in dinosaur fossils, Tendaguru. Louis was told by C. W. Hobley, a friend of the family, that the Museum of Natural History was going to send a fossil-hunting expedition to it. Louis applied and was hired to locate the site and manage the administrative details. In 1924 the party under William E. Cutler departed for Africa. They never found a complete dinosaur skeleton. Louis was recalled from the site by Cambridge in 1925, while Cutler contracted fever and died nine months later.This critical experience changed Louis career decision. Switching courses to anthropology, he found a new mentor in Cort Haddon, head of the department. In 1926 he graduated with a first, or high honours, in anthropology and archaeology. He had used some of his preexisting qualifications; for example, Kikuyu was offered and accepted as the second modern language in which he was required to be proficient, even though no one there could test him on it. The university accepted an affidavit from a Kikuyu chief signed with a thumbprint.From 1925 on Louis lectured and wrote on African archaeological and palaeontological topics. On graduation he was such a respected figure that Cambridge sent him to East Africa to study prehistoric African humans. He excavated dozens of sites, undertaking for the first time a systematic study of the artifacts. Some of his culture names are still in use; for example, Elmenteitan.(This Mesolithic culture is described in The Elmenteitan by Peter Robertshaw in World Archaeology, Vol. 20, No. 1, Archaeology in Africa (Jun., 1988), pp. 57-69, of which the first page is displayed for free.)Research fellowthumb|left|St. Johns College, Cambridge.In 1927 Louis received a visit at a site called Gambles Cave, near Elmenteita, by two young ladies on a holiday, one of whom was Henrietta Wilfreda Frida Avern.(1902-1993) She had done some course work in archaeology. Louis and she talked the entire night. They continued the relationship on his return to Cambridge and in 1928 they were married and set off together for Elmenteita. At that time he discovered the Acheulean site of Kariandusi, which he excavated in 1928, after collecting a team of interested associates.(Douglas Leakey, Donald Macinnes, Tom Powys Cobb, John D. Solomon, Elisabeth Kitson, Cecily Creasy, Penelope Jenkin. For a description and history of the site see Kariandusi Museum at the National Museums of Kenya web site.)On the strength of his work there he obtained a research fellowship at St. Johns College and returned to Cambridge in 1929 to do post-graduate work and to classify and prepare the finds from Elmenteita. His patron and mentor at Cambridge was now Keith. While cleaning two skeletons he had found he noticed a similarity to one found in Olduvai Gorge by Professor Reck, a German national, whom Louis had met in 1925 in Germany while on business for Keith. thumb|right|Olduvai Gorge.The geology of Olduvai was known. In 1913 Reck had extricated a skeleton from Bed II in the gorge wall. He argued that it must have the date of the bed, which was believed to 600,000 years, in the mid-Pleistocene. The public was not ready for this news. Man must have evolved or have been created long after then, was the general belief. Reck became involved in a media uproar. He was barred from going back to settle the question by the war and then the terms of the transfer of Tanganyika from Germany to Britain.(For an account of the incident refer to Hans Reck and the Discovery of O.H.1 at the Always Something New site.) In 1929 Louis visited Berlin to talk to the now skeptical Reck. Noting an Acheulean tool in Recks collection of artifacts from Olduvai, he bet Reck he could find ancient stone tools at Olduvai within 24 hours.(The source for this subsection is Morell, Chapter 3, Laying Claim to the Earliest Man.)Meanwhile Frida worked on illustrations for The Stone Age Culture of Kenya Colony. Louis  was given the PhD in 1930 at age 27. His first child, a daughter, Priscilla Muthoni Leakey, was born in 1931. His headaches and epilepsy returned in the excitement and he was prescribed Luminal, which he took the rest of his life.Reversals of fortune The Defense of Reck In November, 1931, Louis led an expedition to Olduvai, including Reck,(Arthur Tindell Hopwood, Donald MacInnes, Fuchs, Captain Hewlitt, Frances Kenrick, Frida, Reck, and a number of African assistants.) whom he allowed to enter the gorge first. Louis did find Acheulean tools within the first 24 hours, costing Reck ten pounds on the bet. They verified the provenance of the 1913 find, now Olduvai Man. Non-humanoid fossils and tools were extracted from the ground in large numbers. Frida delayed joining him and was less enthusiastic about him on behalf of Priscilla. She did arrive eventually, however, and Louis put her to work. Fridas site became FLK, for Frida Leakeys karongo (gully).Back in Cambridge, the skeptics were not impressed. To find supporting evidence of the antiquity of Recks Olduvai Man, Louis returned to Africa, excavating at Kanam and Kanjera. He easily found more fossils, which he named kanamensis.(Read about these events in Recent Research into Oldowan Hominin Activities at Kanjera South, Western Kenya, by L. C. Bishop et al., published in the African Archaeological Review.) While he was gone, the opposition worked up some evidence of the intrusion of Olduvai Man into an earlier layer, evidence that seemed convincing at the time, but is missing and unverifiable now. On his return Louis finds were carefully examined by a committee of 26 scientists and were tentatively accepted as valid.ScandalWith Fridas dowry money, the Leakeys bought a large brick house in Girton near Cambridge, which they named the Close. She suffered from morning sickness most of the time and was unable to work on the illustrations for Louis second book, Adams Ancestors. At a dinner party given in his honor after a lecture of his at the Anthropological Institute, Caton-Thompson introduced him to her own illustrator, the twenty-year-old Mary Nicol.Louis convinced Mary to take on the illustration of his book. A few months later companionship turned                               to romance. Leakey was born in December, 1933, and in January, 1934, Louis asked Frida for a divorce. She would not sue for divorce until 1936.(This account is based on Morell, Chapter 4, Louis and Mary.)A panel at Cambridge investigated his morals. Grants dried up, but his mother raised enough money for another expedition to Olduvai, Kanam and Kanjera, the latter two on the Gulf.(The guest list is Peter Bell (zoologist), Sam White (surveyor), Peter Kent (geologist), Heselon Mukiri, Thairu Irumbi, Ndekei.) His previous work there was questioned by P. G. H. Boswell,(Head of the Department of Geology at the College of Science, London.) whom he invited to verify the sites for himself. Arriving at Kanam and Kanjera in 1935, they found that the iron markers Louis had used to mark the sites had been removed by the Luo tribe for use as harpoons and the sites could not now be located. To make matters worse, all the photos Louis took were ruined by a light leak in the camera. After an irritating and fruitless two-month search, Boswell left for England, promising, as Louis understood it, not to publish a word until Louis returned.Boswell immediately set out to publish as many words as he was able, beginning with an article in Nature dated March 9, 1935, destroying Recks and Louis dates of the fossils and questioning Louis competence. Louis on his return accused Boswell of treachery, but Boswell now had public opinion on his side. Louis was not only forced to retract the accusation but also to recant his support of Reck.(This account is based on Morell, Chapter 5, Disaster at Kanam, supplemented with detail from Louis account in By the Evidence, Chapter 2. Olduvai Man languished through World War II in a Berlin museum and then partially disappeared, but preservative applied to the bones took away any hope of an accurate C-14 date; however, neither can any evidence of intrusion be located. Kanjera Man is ancient, possibly habilis; Homo kanamensis is an intrusion.) Louis was through at Cambridge. Even his mentors turned on him.On the road in AfricaMeeting Mary in Africa, he proceeded to Olduvai with a small party. Mary joined him under a stigma but her skill and competence eventually won over the other participants. Louis parents continued to urge him to return to Frida, and would pay for everyone in the party, but not Mary. Louis and his associates did the groundwork for future excavation at Olduvai, uncovering dozens of sites for a broad sampling, as was his method. They were named after the excavator: SHK (Sam Howards karongo), BK (Peter Bells), SWK (Sam Whites), MNK (Mary Nicols). Louis and Mary conducted a temporary clinic for the Maasai, made preliminary investigations of Laetoli, and ended by studying the rock paintings at the Kisese/Cheke region.(The initial chapters of By the Evidence and Morell, Chapter 6, Olduvais Bounty, describe the explorations on which these few sentences are based.)The Village of NastyLouis and Mary returned to England in 1935 without positions or any place to stay except Marys mothers apartment. They soon leased Steen Cottage in Munden(This settlement was in Hertfordshire and had an unusual, more ancient name, which Louis, with his sense of humor noted in his memoirs, Chapter 5, as the village of Nasty. Nasty is a hamlet in Great Munden; however, Louis mood reflects that of the population of Hertfordshire, which delights in assigning unusual village names.) and lived without heat, electricity, or plumbing, fetching water from a well, huddling before a fireplace and writing by oil lantern. They lived happily in poverty for eighteen months at this low point of their fortunes, visited at first only by Marys relatives. Louis gardened for subsistence and exercise and improved the house and grounds. He appealed at last to the Society, who relented with a small grant to continue work on his collection.Our Man in British East Africa The Return of the Native Son Finally, Frida divorced Louis and he and Mary were married on Christmas Eve, 1936, in a civil ceremony at the registry office of Ware. The witness, Peter Koinange, the son of a Kikuyu chief, was in Britain doing postgraduate studies at St. Johns. Louis got some royalties and advances on books, and delivered the Munro lectures at University for 1936.(This subsection depends on Morell, Chapter 7, Consequences.)Louis had already involved himself in Kikuyu tribal affairs in 1928, taking a stand against genital cutting. He got into a shouting match in Kikuyu one evening with Kenyatta, who was lecturing on the topic. R. Copeland at Oxford recommended he apply to the Trust for a grant to write a study of the Kikuyu and it was given late in 1936 along with a salary for two years. In January 1937 the Leakeys shook the dust off their feet and travelled to Kenya. Colin would not see his father for 20 years.Louis returned to Kiambaa near Nairobi and persuaded Senior Chief Koinange, who designated a committee of chiefs, to help him describe the Kikuyu the way they had been. Mary excavated at Waterfall Cave.(According to Louis memoirs, Chapter 6, it was the chief who suggested she excavate. He knew artifacts were being washed from the cave. Louis and Mary had moved into a hut in his compound at his invitation.) She fell ill with double pneumonia and lay at deaths door for two weeks in the hospital in Nairobi, during which time her mother was sent for. Contrary to expectation she recovered and began another excavation at Hyrax Hill and then Ngoro River Cave. Louis got an extension of his grant, which he used partially for fossil-hunting. Leakey discoveries began to appear in the newspapers again.Tensions between the Kikuyu and the settlers increased alarmingly. Louis jumped into the fray as an exponent of the middle ground. In Kenya: Contrasts and Problems, he angered the settlers by proclaiming Kenya could never be a white mans country.The fossil policeThe government offered Louis work as a policeman in intelligence, which he could not afford to refuse. He traveled the country as a pedlar, reporting on the talk. When Britain went to war in September, 1939, the Kenyan government drafted Louis into its African intelligence service.(Louis describes this authority in Chapter 8 of his Memoirs as ...the CID... Special Branch, Section 6, concerned with civil intelligence. The drafting authority was the Kenya government and there is no indication in the Memoirs that the service was more directly British; in fact, he refers to my counterpart in military intelligence. However, Louis would not be revealing everything he knew. Morell portrays him as having been in police work before being drafted. She had personal access to the surviving Leakeys.) Apart from some bumbling around, during which he and some settlers stalked each other as possible saboteurs of the Sagana Railway Bridge,(Memoirs Chapter 8) his first task was to supply and arm Ethiopian guerrillas against the Italian invaders of their country. He created a clandestine network using his childhood friends among the Kikuyu. They also hunted fossils on the sly. Louis conducted interrogations, analyzed handwriting, wrote radio broadcasts and took on regular police investigations. He loved a good mystery of any sort. The white leadership of the Kings African Rifles used him extensively to clear up many cultural mysteries; for example, he helped an officer remove a curse he had inadvertently put on his men.(Memoirs, Chapter 9.)Mary continued to find and excavate sites. Leakey was born in 1940. She worked in the Coryndon Memorial Museum (later called the Museums of Kenya) where Louis joined her as an unpaid honorary curator in 1941. Their life was a menage of police work and archaeology. They investigated Island and Olorgesailie. At the latter site they were assisted by a team of Italian experts recruited from the prisoners of war and paroled for the purpose.(Memoirs Chapter 12)In 1942 the Italian menace ended, but the Japanese began to reconnoiter with a view toward landing in force. Louis found himself in counter-intelligence work, which he performed with zest and imagination. Deborah was born, but died at three months. They lived in a rundown and bug infested Nairobi home, provided by the museum. Jonathan was attacked by army ants in his crib.(This section is based on Morell, Chapter 8, Cloak-and-Dagger.)The turn of the tideIn 1944 Leakey was born. In 1945 the familys income from police work all but vanished. By now Louis was getting plenty of job offers but he chose to stay on in Kenya as Curator of the Coryndon Museum, with an annual salary and a house, but more importantly, to continue palaeoanthropological research.In January, 1947, Louis conducted the first Pan-African Congress of Prehistory at Nairobi. Sixty scientists from 26 countries attended, delivering papers and visiting the Leakey sites. The conference restored Louis to the scientific fold and made him a major figure in it. With the money that now poured in Louis undertook the famous expeditions of 1948 and beyond at Island in Victoria, where Mary discovered the most complete Proconsul fossil up to that time.Charles Boise donated money for a boat to be used for transport on Lake Victoria, The Miocene Lady. Its famous skipper, Hassan Salimu, was later to deliver Goodall to Gombe. Leakey was born in 1949. In 1950, Louis was awarded an honorary doctorate by University.Kenyan affairsWhile the Leakeys were at Lake Victoria, the Kikuyu struck at the European settlers of the Kenyan highlands, who seemed to have the upper hand and were insisting on a white government of a white Africa. In 1949 the Kikuyu formed a secret society, the Mau, which attacked settlers and especially loyalist Kikuyu. Louis had attempted to warn Sir Philip Mitchell, governor of the colony, that nocturnal meetings and forced oaths were not Kikuyu customs and forboded violence, but was ignored. Now he found himself pulled away from anthropology to investigate the Mau Mau. During this period his life was threatened and a reward placed on his head. The Leakeys began to pack pistols, termed European National Dress. The government placed him under 24-hour guard.In 1952, after a massacre of loyal chiefs, the government arrested Kenyatta, president of the African Union. Louis was summoned to be a court interpreter, but withdrew after an accusation of mistranslation because of prejudice against the defendant. He returned on request to translate documents only. Because of lack of evidence linking Kenyatta to the Mau Mau, although convicted, he did not receive the death penalty, but was sentenced to several years of hard labor and banned from Kenya. The government brought in British troops and formed a home guard of 20,000 Kikuyu. During this time Louis played a difficult and contradictory role. He sided with the settlers, serving as their spokesman and intelligence officer, helping to ferret out bands of guerrillas. On the other hand he continued to advocate for the Kikuyu in his book, Defeating Mau Mau and numerous talks and articles. He recommended a multi-racial government, land reform in the highlands, a wage hike for the Kikuyu, and many other reforms, most of which were eventually adopted.The British realized the rebellion was being directed from urban centers, instituted military law and rounded up the committees. Following Louis suggestion, thousands of Kikuyu were placed in re-education camps and resettled in new villages. The rebellion continued from bases under Mt. Kenya until 1956, when, deprived of its leadership and supplies, it had to disperse. The state of emergency lasted until 1960. In 1963 Kenya became independent, with Jomo Kenyatta as prime minister.(This subsection is based on Morells chapter 11, Louis and Kenyatta.)Work in Palaeoanthropology Vindication at Olduvai Louis and Mary spent all the time they could at Olduvai, starting in 1951. So far they had discovered only tools. A trial trench in Bed II at BK in 1951 was followed by a more extensive excavation in 1952. They found what Louis termed an Olduwan slaughter-house, an ancient bog where animals had been trapped and butchered. Louis was so carried away that he worked without his hat and his hair was bleached white from the sun. They stopped in 1953.In 1955 they excavated again with Jean Brown. She related that he preferred to be called Louis, was absent-minded, once had everyone looking for spectacles that were around his neck, wore pants with the buttons off and shoes with holes in them, charged about everywhere and once collapsed unconscious. He was completely happy.(This Olduvai period, including Jeans description of Louis, is from Morell, Chapter 12, Our Man.)In 1959 they decided to excavate Bed I. While Louis was sick in camp, Mary discovered the fossilized skull 5 at FLK, which Mary called Our Man, and became Dear Boy and Zinj. The question was whether it was a previous genus discovered by Broom, Paranthropus, which Broom had taken not to be in the human line, or a different one, in it. Louis opted for Zinj, a decision opposed by Le Gros Clark, but one which attracted the attention of Bell Grosvenor, president of the Geographic Society. That contact resulted in an article in National Geographic(September, 1960, Finding the Worlds Earliest Man.) and a hefty grant to continue work at Olduvai.Also in 1960 Evernden and Curtis, young geophysicists, dated Bed I to 1.75 mya. The world was stunned. Zinj was far older than anyone had imagined. Scientists swarmed to Africa. Reck and Louis were completely vindicated, too late for Reck, who had died in 1937. Louis had proved Darwin right.(The material on Zinjanthropus and the dating of Bed I is from Morell, Chapter 13, Fame, Fortune and Zinj.)The Leakey circusIn 1960, unable to leave the museum except on weekends, Louis appointed Mary director of excavation at Olduvai. She brought in a staff of Kamba tribesmen, instead of Kikuyu, who, she felt, took advantage of Louis. The first, Muteva Musomba, had kept her childrens ponies. He recruited Kimeu among others. Mary set up Camp 5 under Jonathans direction. He was 19. From then on she had her own staff and associates.Mary picked and sieved at the site from early morning dressed in old clothes, chain smoking cigarettes, always surrounded by her Dalmatian dogs. She and Louis communicated by radio. On weekends he drove non-stop at high speed the 357 miles between Olduvai and Nairobi. The teenage boys, Richard and Philip, were on site holidays and vacations. Louis invited them and DeVore to eat a raw rat so that he could compare the result to some Hominid coprolites. He said to DeVore, My dear boy, let me make you famous. DeVore and the boys demurred.(The anecdote about the rat is given in Morell, Chapter 14, Note 8.)Their home in Nairobi was a circus, figuratively speaking, when they were there. Dinner guests were frequent. Important guests stayed for weeks if they could stand it. They shared the quarters and the dinner table with the Dalmatians, hyraxes, a monkey, a cat, an African eagle owl, tropical fish, snakes, such as vipers, and a python. The extended families of twenty African staff lived in cinderblock huts in the yard. Mary had switched to cigars and the ashes often fell into the food. Both Louis and Mary cooked. Louis never stopped talking; his stories were endless.(This section is based on Morell, Chapter 5, Marys Dig. There was another side to the Leakey family, written about by Morell in Chapter 17, Chimpanzees and Other Loves. Louis was a notorious womanizer. He was faithful neither to Frida nor to Mary. Mary tolerated this behavior well until his relationship with Rosalie Osborn, 1954/55, threatened to break up her marriage. The two fought constantly, upsetting the boys. After Richard nearly died in a fall from a horse, Louis broke with Rosalie for the sake of the boys. In 1960 Louis and Mary were especially close, which lasted until the arrival of Vanne Goodall.) He literally ran through the day, making long lists of things to be done, which he never completed. He drove recklessly through the streets of Nairobi, often reading and writing as he drove.FloruitJonathan Leakey achieved some brief fame before he quit palaeoanthropology altogether. He started his own site, Jonnys site in the Leakey lingo, FLK-NN. There he discovered two skull fragments without the Australopithecine crest, which Mary connected with Brooms and Robinsons Telanthropus. The problem with it was its contemporaneity with Zinj. Mailed photographs, Le Gros Clark retorted casually Shades of Piltdown. Louis cabled him immediately and had some strong words at this suggestion of his incompetence. Clark apologized.(Morell, Chapter 14, Marys Dig.)Not long after in 1960 Louis, his son Philip and Ray Pickering discovered a fossil he termed Chellean Man, as it was in context with Olduwan tools, the first such find. After reconstruction Louis and Mary called it Pinhead. It was subsequently included with Homo erectus and was in fact contemporaneous with Paranthropus, which on that account cannot have been in the human line. For many years Louis believed erectus was the user of the tools and Australopithecus was not. It is now conceded that both Hominids used them.In 1961 Louis got a salary as well as a grant from Geographic and turned over the acting directorship of Coryndon to a subordinate. He created the Centre for Prehistory and Paleontology on the same grounds, moved his collections to it, and appointed himself director. This was his new operations center. He opened another excavation at Ternan on Lake Victoria. Shortly after, Heselon discovered wickeri, the species name from the owner of the property, which Louis promptly celebrated with Gaylord Simpson, who happened to be present, aboard the Miocene Lady with Leakey Safari Specials, a drink made of milk and cognac.In 1962 Louis was visiting Olduvai when Ndibo Mbuika discovered the first tooth of habilis at MNK. Louis and Mary thought it was female and named her Cinderella, or Cindy. Tobias identified Jonnys Child with it and Dart came up with the name Homo habilis at Louis request, which Tobias translated as handyman.(Morell Chapter 16, The Human with Ability. Leakey tells a different story about the name. See in the Notes section of habilis.) It was seen as intermediary between gracile Australopithecus and Homo.(These few paragraphs rely on Morell, Chapter 16, The Human with Ability.)Leakeys AngelsOne of Louiss greatest legacies stems from his role in fostering field research of primates in their natural habitats, which he understood as key to unraveling the mysteries of human evolution. He personally chose three female researchers, Goodall, Fossey, and Galdikas, who were later dubbed Angels and each went on to become important scholars in the field of primatology.The last yearsKenya became independent at noon on December 12, 1963, with Jomo Kenyatta as the first prime minister. The settlers were already leaving the country in large numbers. Kenyatta saw that he had to act swiftly to prevent a descent into chaos. He took a conciliatory view. There were a few deportations, but no reprisals. Louis had felt considerable trepidation about the future of palaeoanthropology in Kenya. A meeting was arranged between him and Jomo at the suggestion of the last colonial governor, MacDonald. He was introduced by his old friend, Koinange. They spoke in Kikuyu. The meeting ended with an embrace and reassurances.(Morell, Chaper 19, A Girl for the Gorillas.)During his final years Louis became famous as a lecturer in the United States and United Kingdom. He brought audiences cheering to their feet. He did not personally excavate any longer, as he was crippled with arthritis, for which he had a hip replacement in 1968. He raised funds and directed his family and associates. In Kenya he was an indispensable facilitator for the hundreds of scientists then exploring the African Rift system for fossils. Without his say-so, permits could not be obtained and access to museum collections was denied. Once he gave permission, his advice was invaluable.In 1963 he helped Ruth De Ette get started at a site in the Calico Hills of the Mojave Desert in California. The date then accepted for the arrival of humans in the Americas was about 12,000 BCE. On the basis of the time required for the evolution and distribution of native American languages, Louis hypothesized that the arrival must have been thousands of years previously. He encouraged Ruth to view the apparent artifacts she was finding as older than 100,000 years.Mary did not share his visionary view. She was increasingly disrespectful, viewing him as incompetent, from 1963 on. The old intimacy was gone. Her professional opposition began over Calico Man. Under the rationale of trying to stop Louis from making a mistake that would tarnish his reputation, she persuaded the National Geographic Society to refrain from publishing Calico and pull funding from the project, but Louis found other means. On March 26, 1968, Alan and Helen OBrien of Newport Beach, California, and some prominent Californians formed the Leakey Foundation. When Louis stayed with them when he was in California, the OBriens noticed that he was very much underpaid on the lecture circuit. From then on Louis worked with them in fund-raising.Marys opposition soon turned into a major schism in the palaeoanthropological village. For example, in 1968 Louis refused an honorary doctorate from the University of Witwatersrand in Johannesburg, primarily because of apartheid in South Africa. Mary accepted one. Now it was Louis turn to be concerned about her reputation. The two still cared about each other, but were apart and conducted different professional lives.( Morell Chapter 23, Mining Hominids at Olduvai.)In the last few years Louis health began to fail more seriously. He had his first heart attacks and spent six months in the hospital. An empathy over health brought him and Fossey together for a brief romance, which she broke off. Richard began to assume more and more of his fathers responsibilities, which Louis resisted, but in the end was forced to accept. Everything bad seemed to happen to him in a run of unfortunate luck: he had more heart problems, he was swarmed by bees and nearly killed, he had a stroke, he was involved in controversy over Calico man, and he had to brook Marys opposition. One good thing that happened is that he found increasing support and comfort in his friend, Vanne Goodall (mother of Goodall), whose London apartment Louis visited when he could.(These details and many more can be found in Morell, Chapters 27-30.)Death and legacy Death On October 1, 1972, Louis was stricken with a heart attack in Vanne Goodalls (Jane Goodalls mother) apartment in London. Vanne sat up all night with him in St. Stephens Hospital and left at 9:00 a.m and then 30 minutes following he died at the age of 69.Mary wanted to cremate Louis and fly the ashes back to Nairobi. Richard intervened. As Louis was a Kikuyu, he ought to be buried in Kikuyuland. He was flown home and interred at Limuru near the graves of his parents.In denial, the family did not face the question of a memorial marker for a year. When Richard went to place a stone on the grave he found one already there, courtesy of Rosalie Osborn. The inscription was signed with the letters, ILYFA, Ill love you forever always, which Rosalie used to place on her letters to him. Richard left it in place.(Morell Chapter 30, An End and a Beginning.)Prominent organizations*1958. Louis founded the Tigoni Primate research Center with Cynthia Booth on her farm north of Nairobi. Later it was the National Primate Research Center, currently the Institute of Primate Research, now in Nairobi. As the Tigoni center, it funded Leakeys Angels.*1961. Louis created the Centre for Prehistory and Paleontology on the same grounds as Coryndon Museum, appointing himself director.*1968. Louis assisted with the founding of The Leakey Foundation, to ensure the legacy of his lifes work in the study of human origins.  The Leakey Foundation exists today as the number one funder of human origins research in the United States.Prominent family membersLouis Leakey was married to Leakey, who made the noteworthy discovery of fossil footprints at Laetoli. Found preserved in volcanic ash in Tanzania, they are the earliest record of bipedal gait.He is also the father of paleoanthropologist Leakey and the botanist Leakey. Louis cousin, Gray Leakey, was a recipient of the Cross during War II.Books by Louis LeakeyLouiss books are listed below.(Most of them have many publishers in many editions.) The gaps between books are filled by too many articles to list. It was Louis who began the Leakey tradition of publishing in Nature.NotesSee also* Early Man Site* Leakey family* of fossil sites (with link directory)* List of hominina (hominid) fossils (with images)References*Virginia Morell, Ancestral Passions: The Leakey Family and the Quest for Humankinds Beginnings , Copyright 1995.*Mary Bowman-Kruhm, The Leakeys: a Biography, Copyright 2005, Greenwood Press, ISBN 0-313-32985-0External links* LeakeyFoundation.org  The Leakey Foundation: a non-profit organization committed to increasing scientific knowledge, education, and public understanding of human origins, evolution, behavior and survival. * http://www.talkorigins.org/faqs/homs/lleakey.html Archive  Louis Leakey* Louis S. B. Leakey, the leakey.com biography.*Louis Leakey, article by Brian M. Fagan in CD Groliers Encyclopedia.*Louis Seymour Bazett Leakey (1903-1972)LeakeyLeakeyLeakeyLeakeyLeakeyLeakeyLeakeyLeakeyLeakeyLeakeyLeakeyja:LeakeyLeakeyLeakeyLeakeyzh:
18568
List_of_algorithms
The following is a list of algorithms along with one-line descriptions for each.Combinatorial algorithmsGeneral combinatorial algorithms* Brents algorithm: finds cycles in iterations using only two iterators* cycle-finding algorithm: finds cycles in iterations* algorithm: solve the marriage problem* number generators (uniformly distributed):** Blum Shub** Fibonacci generator** congruential generator** twisterGraph algorithms* algorithm: Graph coloring algorithm.* algorithm: convert a bipartite graph to a cardinality matching* algorithm: algorithm for finding a matching* Prfer coding: conversion between a labeled tree and its sequence* off-line least common ancestors algorithm: compute common ancestors for pairs of nodes in a tree* Topological sort: finds linear order of nodes (e.g. jobs) based on their dependencies.Graph drawing* Force-based algorithms (also known as force-directed algorithms or spring-based algorithm)* layoutNetwork theory* Network analysis** Link analysis*** algorithm: detect communities in complex systems*** Web link analysis**** Topic Search (HITS) (also known as and authorities)**** PageRank**** TrustRank**** PRW, PFW* networks** algorithm: is a polynomial algorithm for computing the flow in a network.** algorithm: implementation of FordFulkerson** algorithm: computes the maximum flow in a graph** algorithm:  a Monte Carlo method to compute the cut of a connected graph** algorithm: computes a maximum flow in a graphRouting* algorithm (also known as ChuLiu/Edmondss algorithm): find maximum or minimum branchings* minimum spanning tree: algorithms for computing the minimum spanning tree of a set of points in the plane* path problem: find a simple path of maximum length in a given graph* spanning tree** algorithm** algorithm** algorithm** algorithm* Minimal Spanning Switch say, for a exchange* path problem** algorithm: computes shortest paths in a weighted graph (where some of the edge weights may be negative)** algorithm: computes shortest paths in a graph with non-negative edge weights** algorithm: solves the pairs shortest path problem in a weighted, directed graph** algorithm: All pairs shortest path algorithm in sparse weighted directed graph** methods: an algorithm that computes a locally shortest paths in a graph* salesman problem** algorithm** neighbour algorithm* Warnsdorffs algorithm: A heuristic method for solving the Tour problem.Search* A*: special case of best-first search that uses heuristics to improve speed* B*: a best-first graph search algorithm that finds the least-cost path from a given initial node to any goal node (out of one or more possible goals)* Backtracking: abandon partial solutions when they are found not to satisfy a complete solution* search: is a heuristic search algorithm that is an optimization of search that reduces its memory requirement* stack search: integrates backtracking with search* search: traverses a graph in the order of likely importance using a queue* search: find the shortest path from an initial vertex to a goal vertex in a directed graph* filter: a constant time and memory check to see whether a given element exists in a set. May return a false positive, but never a false negative.* search: traverses a graph level by level* D*: an heuristic search algorithm* search: traverses a graph branch by branch* algorithm: A special case of A* for which no heuristic function is used* Problem Solver: a seminal theorem-proving algorithm intended to work as a universal problem solver machine.* deepening depth-first search (IDDFS): a state space search strategy* breadth-first search (also known as Lex-BFS): a linear time algorithm for ordering the vertices of a graph* search: a tree search that finds the lowest cost route where costs vary* SSS*: state space search traversing a game tree in a best-first fashion similar to that of the A* search algorithmSubgraphs* algorithm: a technique for finding cliques in an undirected graph* connected components** CheriyanMehlhorn/Gabow algorithm** algorithm** algorithmSequence algorithmsApproximate matching* algorithm: fuzzy algorithm that determines if strings are approximately equal.* algorithms** Soundex: a Soundex refinement which allows matching of Slavic and Germanic surnames** Metaphone: an improvement on Metaphone** Rating Approach: a phonetic algorithm developed by Western Airlines** Metaphone: an algorithm for indexing words by their sound, when pronounced in English** NYSIIS: algorithm, improves on Soundex** Soundex: a phonetic algorithm for indexing names by sound, as pronounced in English* metrics: compute a similarity or dissimilarity (distance) score between two pairs of text strings** distance compute a distance measure between two strings, improves on distance** coefficient (also known as the Dice coefficient): a similarity measure related to the index** distance: sum number of positions which are different** distance:  is a measure of similarity between two strings** Levenshtein edit distance: compute a metric for the amount of difference between two sequences* search: search for text when the exact syntax or spelling of the target object is not precisely knownItem search* search: finds an item in an unsorted list* algorithm: finds the kth largest item in a list* lists** search algorithm: locates an item in a sorted list** search technique: search a sorted array using a divide and conquer algorithm that narrows down possible locations with the aid of numbers** search (also called block search)** Predictive search: binary-like search which factors in magnitude of search term versus the high and low values in the search.  Sometimes called dictionary search or interpolated search.** binary search: an optimization of the classic binary search algorithm* search: a technique for finding the minimum or maximum of a function that is either strictly increasing and then strictly decreasing or vice versaMerging* Simple Merge algorithm* k-way Merge algorithm* Union (merge, with elements on the output not repeated)Permutations* shuffle (also known as the Knuth shuffle): randomly shuffle a finite set* algorithm: constructs a pair of tableaux from a permutation* algorithm (also known as the JohnsonTrotter algorithm): generate permutations by transposing elementsSequence alignment* time warping: measure similarity between two sequences which may vary in time or speed* algorithm: finds the least cost alignment between two sequences, as measured by their distance* algorithm: find global alignment between two sequences* algorithm: find local sequence alignmentSorting* Exchange Sorts** sort: for each pair of indices, swap the items if out of order** sort** sort** sort** sort** Quicksort: divide list into two, with all items on the first list coming before all items on the second list.; then sort the two lists. Often the method of choice* Humorous or ineffective** Bogosort** sort* Hybrid** Flashsort** Introsort: begin with quicksort and switch to heapsort when the recursion depth exceeds a certain level** Timsort: adaptative algorithm derived from merge sort and insertion sort. Used in Python >2.3 and Java SE 7.* Insertion sorts** sort: determine where the current item belongs in the list of sorted ones, and insert it there** sort** sorting** sort: an attempt to improve insertion sort** sort (binary tree sort): build binary tree, then traverse it to create sorted list** sort: in-place with theoretically optimal number of writes* Merge sorts** sort: sort the first and second half of the list separately, then merge the sorted lists** sort* Non-comparison sorts** sort** sort** Burstsort: build a compact, cache efficient trie and then traverse it to create sorted output** sort** sort** sort: variant of Bucket sort which takes advantage of hierarchical structure** sort: sorts strings letter by letter* Selection sorts** Heapsort: convert the list into a heap, keep removing the largest element from the heap and adding it to the end of the list** sort: pick the smallest of the remaining elements, add it to the end of the sorted list** Smoothsort* Other** sorter** sorting** Topological sort* Unknown class** SamplesortSubsequences*algorithm: finds maximum sub-array of any size*common subsequence problem: Find the longest subsequence common to all sequences in a set of sequences*increasing subsequence problem: find the longest increasing subsequence of a given sequence*common supersequence problem: Find the shortest supersequence that contains two or more sequences as subsequencesSubstrings* common substring problem:  find the longest string (or strings) that is a substring (or are substrings) of two or more strings* search** string matching algorithm: trie based algorithm for finding all substring matches to any of a finite set of strings** string search algorithm: amortized linear (sublinear in most times) algorithm for substring search** algorithm: Simplification of BoyerMoore** algorithm: substring search which bypasses reexamination of matched characters** string search algorithm: searches multiple patterns efficiently** string matching algorithm: a variant of the BoyerMoore* algorithm: a linear-time, algorithm for constructing treesComputational mathematicsAbstract algebra* search: a recursive algorithm for determining roots of polynomials defined over a finite field* algorithm: computing a base and generating set (BSGS) of a group* algorithm: Procedure for generating cosets.Computer algebra* algorithm: finds a basis* algorithm: factor polynomials over finite fields* F4 algorithm: finds a Grbner basis (also mentions the F5 algorithm)* algorithm: find sums of hypergeometric terms that are themselves hypergeometric terms* completion algorithm: for rewriting rule systems* division algorithm: for polynomials in several indeterminates* kangaroo algorithm (also known as Pollards lambda algorithm ): an algorithm for solving the discrete logarithm problem* long division: an algorithm for dividing a polynomial by another polynomial of the same or lower degree* algorithm: an algorithm for the calculus operation of indefinite integration (i.e. finding antiderivatives)Geometry* pair problem:  find the pair of points (from a set of points) with the smallest distance between them* detection algorithms: check for the collision or intersection of two given solids* algorithm: identify surface points* hull algorithms: determining the hull of a set of points** algorithm** wrapping algorithm or Jarvis march** scan** algorithm* Euclidean Distance Transform - Computes the distance between every point in a grid and a discrete collection of points.* hashing: a method for efficiently finding two-dimensional objects represented by discrete points that have undergone an transformation* distance algorithm: determining the smallest distance between two convex shapes.* algorithm: an algorithm for point location in triangulations* smoothing: an algorithm to smooth a polygonal mesh* segment intersection: finding whether lines intersect, usually with a line algorithm** algorithm** algorithm* bounding box algorithms: find the oriented minimum bounding box enclosing a set of points* neighbor search:  find the nearest point or points to a query point* in polygon algorithms: tests whether a given point lies within a given polygon* calipers: determine all antipodal pairs of points and vertices on a polygon or hull.* algorithm: determine the area of a polygon whose vertices are described by ordered pairs in the plane* Triangulation** triangulation*** algorithm (also known as Delaunay refinement): create quality Delaunay triangulations*** second algorithm: create quality Delaunay triangulations** triangles: reconstruct two-dimensional surface geometry from an unstructured point cloud** triangulation algorithms: decompose a polygon into a set of triangles** diagrams, geometric dual of triangulation*** algorithm: create voronoi diagram in any number of dimensions*** Algorithm: create voronoi diagramNumber theoretic algorithms* GCD algorithm: Efficient way of calculating GCD.* multiplication algorithm* method: a cyclic algorithm to solve indeterminate quadratic equations, including equation* logarithm:** giant-step** calculus algorithm** rho algorithm for logarithms** algorithm* algorithm: computes the common divisor* Euclidean algorithm: Also solves the equation ax + by  c.* factorization: breaking an integer into its prime factors** of squares** algorithm** factorization method** number field sieve** elliptic curve factorization** Pollards p  1 algorithm** rho algorithm** factorization algorithm** sieve** algorithm** number field sieve** division* algorithms: fast multiplication of two numbers** algorithm** algorithm** multiplication* algorithm: calculates nontrivial zeroes of the zeta function* tests: determining whether a given number is prime** primality test** primality test** primality test** primality test** of Atkin** of Eratosthenes** of SundaramNumerical algorithms Differential equation solving  * methods (MG methods), a group of algorithms for solving differential equations using a hierarchy of discretizations* differential equation:** difference method* methods** integration* integration (): integrate Newtons equations of motion Elementary and special functions* Computation of :** algorithm: an algorithm to calculate the value of 1/** algorithm: computes the digits of pi** formula: (BBP formula) a spigot algorithm for the computation of the nth binary digit of * Hyperbolic and Trigonometric Functions:** algorithm:  compute elementary functions using a table of logarithms** CORDIC:  compute hyperbolic and trigonometric functions using a table of arctangents* Exponentiation:** exponentiation exponentiation by positive integer powers that requires a minimal number of multiplications** by squaring: an algorithm used for the fast computation of large integer powers of a number* reduction: an algorithm that allows arithmetic to be performed efficiently when the modulus is large* algorithms: fast multiplication of two numbers** multiplication algorithm: a multiplication algorithm that multiplies two signed binary numbers in twos complement notation** algorithm:  an integer multiplication algorithm for very large numbers possessing a very low asymptotic complexity** algorithm:  an efficient procedure for multiplying large numbers** algorithm: an asymptotically fast multiplication algorithm for large integers** multiplication: (Toom3) a multiplication algorithm for large integers* functions: the classic ways to round numbers* algorithm: A way to compute the value of a constant without knowing preceding digits* Square and Nth root of a number:** max plus beta min algorithm: an approximation of the square-root of the sum of two squares** of computing square roots** nth root algorithm** nth-root algorithm: digit by digit root extraction* Summation:** splitting:  a divide and conquer technique which speeds up the numerical evaluation of many types of series with rational terms** summation algorithm: a more accurate method of summing floating-point numbers Geometric * Filtered back-projection: efficiently compute the inverse 2-dimensional transform.* set method (LSM):  a numerical technique for tracking interfaces and shapes Interpolation and extrapolation * interpolation: an extension of polynomial interpolation* interpolation* interpolation* interpolation: a method of curve fitting using linear polynomials* cubic interpolation: a variant of cubic interpolation that preserves monotonicity of the data set being interpolated.* interpolation** interpolation, a generalization of interpolation to two dimensions** interpolation: an extension of interpolation for interpolating functions of two variables on a regular grid** resampling (Lanzosh): a multivariate interpolation method used to compute new values for any digitally sampled data** interpolation** interpolation, a generalization of interpolation to three dimensions* interpolation: a method of estimating the median and other properties of a population that follows a distribution.* interpolation** algorithm* interpolation: Reduces error with phenomenon.** Boor algorithm: B-splines** Casteljaus algorithm: splines* interpolation Linear algebra * algorithms** iteration** iteration** Jacobi method** iteration** iteration** algorithm** quotient iteration* process: orthogonalizes a set of vectors* multiplication** algorithm: a algorithm for multiplication especially suitable for computers laid out in an N  N mesh** algorithm: square multiplication** algorithm: a randomized algorithm used to verify matrix multiplication** algorithm: faster multiplication* Solving systems of linear equations** gradient method: solves systems of linear equations** gradient: an algorithm for the numerical solution of particular systems of linear equations** elimination** elimination: solves systems of linear equations** method: solves systems of linear equations iteratively** recursion: solves equation involving a matrix** method: also known as the strongly implicit procedure or SIP, is an algorithm for solving a sparse linear system of equations** over-relaxation (SOR): method used to speed up convergence of the method** matrix algorithm (Thomas algorithm): solves systems of tridiagonal equations* matrix algorithms** algorithm: reduce the bandwidth of sparse matrices** degree algorithm: permute the rows and columns of a symmetric sparse matrix before applying the decomposition** Cholesky decomposition: Efficient way of storing sparse matrix Monte Carlo * sampling: generate a sequence of samples from the joint probability distribution of two or more random variables* algorithm: used to generate a sequence of samples from the distribution of one or more variables* and Landau algorithm: an extension of algorithm sampling Numerical integration * algorithm: Monte Carlo simulation, integration Root finding * position method: approximates roots of a function* method: finds zeros of functions with calculus* method: approximates roots of a functionOptimization algorithms* pruning: search to reduce number of nodes in minimax algorithm* and bound* matrix multiplication* optimization: optimization problems where the set of feasible solutions is discrete** randomized adaptive search procedure (GRASP): successive constructions of a greedy randomized solution and subsequent iterative improvements of it through a local search** method: a combinatorial optimization algorithm which solves the problem in polynomial time* satisfaction** General algorithms for the constraint satisfaction*** algorithm*** map algorithm*** conflicts algorithm** algorithm: an algorithm for solving instances of the boolean satisfiability problem** algorithm: check the validity of a first-order logic formula** DavisPutnamLogemannLoveland algorithm (DPLL): an algorithm for deciding the satisfiability of propositional logic formula in conjunctive normal form, i.e. for solving the CNF-SAT problem** cover problem*** X: a algorithm*** Links: an efficient implementation of Algorithm X* method: a general Monte Carlo approach to combinatorial and continuous multi-extremal optimization and sampling* evolution* Programming: problems exhibiting the properties of subproblems and substructure* method: is an algorithm for solving convex optimization problems* computation: optimization inspired by biological mechanisms of evolution** strategy** algorithms*** proportionate selection - also known as roulette-wheel selection*** universal sampling*** selection*** selection** algorithm** intelligence*** colony optimization*** algorithm: a search algorithm which mimics the food foraging behavior of swarms of honey bees*** Particle swarm* descent* search (HS): a metaheuristic algorithm mimicking the improvisation process of musicians* point method* programming** decomposition: an algorithm for solving linear programming problems with special structure** column generation** linear programming: solve linear programming problems where some or all the unknowns are restricted to integer values*** and cut*** method** algorithm: The first reasonably efficient algorithm that solves the programming problem in time.** algorithm: An algorithm for solving the programming problem* search* Local search: a metaheuristic for solving computationally hard optimization problems** hill climbing** search* Minimax used in game programming* neighbor search (NNS): find closest points in a space** Bin First: find an approximate solution to the neighbor search problem in very high dimensional spaces* method in optimization* optimization** method: A optimization algorithm** algorithm: An algorithm for solving nonlinear squares problems.** algorithm: An algorithm for solving nonlinear squares problems.** method (downhill simplex method): A optimization algorithm* algorithm (Bruss algorithm) : Finds the optimal strategy to predict a last specific event in a random sequence event* annealing* tunneling* Subset sum algorithmComputational scienceAstronomy* algorithm: day of the week* congruence is an algorithm to calculate the day of the week for any Julian or Gregorian calendar date* various Easter algorithms are used to calculate the day of EasterBioinformatics* Local Alignment Search Tool also known as BLAST: an algorithm for comparing primary biological sequence information* algorithm: calculate the optimal alignment of two sets of points in order to compute the root mean squared deviation between two protein structures.* Velvet: a set of algorithms manipulating Bruijn graphs for genomic assemblyGeoscience* formulae: a fast algorithm to calculate the distance between two latitude/longitude points on an ellipsoidLinguistics* algorithm: word sense disambiguation* Stemming algorithm: a method of reducing words to their stem, base, or root form* algorithm: a statistical classification algorithm for classifying characters in a text as vowels or consonantsMedicine* algorithm for the diagnosis of heart failure* Criteria for irritable bowel syndrome* Pulmonary embolism diagnostic algorithms* Medication Algorithm ProjectPhysics* algorithm: a class of algorithms for satisfying constraints for bodies that obey Newtons equations of motion* algorithm:  a Carlo method for efficiently sampling members of a ensemble with a given energy* algorithm: compute the effects of forces applied to a structure of joints and links* state approximation** method*** method* problems** simulation: Solves the n-body problem in an approximate way that has the order  instead of  as in a direct-sum simulation.** multipole method (FMM): speeds up the calculation of long-ranged forces* algorithm: Reduces a complex stress history to a count of elementary stress-reversals for use in fatigue analysis* and prune: a broad phase algorithm used during detection to limit the number of pairs of solids that need to be checked for collision* algorithm: a method for reducing error in Carlo simulationsStatistics* for calculating variance: avoiding instability and numerical overflow* counting algorithm: Allows counting large number of events in a small register* statistics** sampling algorithm: a computational approach to the problem of comparing models in Bayesian statistics* Clustering Algorithms** Average-linkage clustering: a simple agglomerative clustering algorithm** clustering algorithm:  an unsupervised pre-clustering algorithm related to the K-means algorithm** clustering: a simple agglomerative clustering algorithm** DBSCAN: a density based clustering algorithm** algorithm** clustering: a class of clustering algorithms where each point has a degree of belonging to clusters*** Fuzzy c-means*** clustering (Fuzzy clustering by Local Approximation of MEmberships): define clusters in the dense parts of a dataset and perform cluster assignment solely based on the neighborhood relationships among objects** clustering: cluster objects based on attributes into partitions** k-means++: a variation of this, using modified random seeds** k-medoids: similar to k-means, but chooses datapoints or medoids as centers** algorithm: a vector quantization algorithm to derive a good codebook** algorithm (Voronoi iteration or relaxation): group data points into a given number of categories, a popular algorithm for clustering** OPTICS: a density based clustering algorithm with a visual evaluation method** clustering: a simple agglomerative clustering algorithm** SUBCLU: a subspace clustering algorithm* Estimation Theory** algorithm A class of related algorithms for finding maximum likelihood estimates of parameters in probabilistic models*** subset expectation maximization (OSEM): used in imaging for emission tomography, photon emission computed tomography and X-ray computed tomography.** algorithm (Bruss algorithm) Optimal online search for distinguished value in sequential random input** filter: estimate the state of a dynamic system from a series of noisy measurements* False nearest neighbor algorithm (FNN) estimates dimension* Markov model** algorithm: compute maximum likelihood estimates and posterior mode estimates for the parameters of a markov model** algorithm a dynamic programming algorithm for computing the probability of a particular observation sequence** algorithm: find the most likely sequence of hidden states in a markov model* least squares regression:  finds a linear model describing some predicted variables in terms of other observable variables* theory** algorithm: an algorithm for calculating the normalization constant G(K) in the theorem* RANSAC (an abbreviation for RANdom SAmple Consensus): an iterative method to estimate parameters of a mathematical model from a set of observed data which contains outliers* algorithm: is a form of method used to solve likelihood equations numerically* method: calculate an approximation to the standard deviation  of wind direction  during a single pass through the incoming data* algorithm: generate random numbers from a non-uniform distributionComputer scienceComputer architecture* algorithm: allows sequential instructions that would normally be stalled due to certain dependencies to execute non-sequentiallyComputer graphics* Clipping** clipping*** CohenSutherland*** CyrusBeck*** Fast-clipping*** LiangBarsky*** NichollLeeNicholl** Polygon clipping*** SutherlandHodgman*** Vatti*** WeilerAtherton* lines and Isosurfaces** cubes: extract a polygonal mesh of an isosurface from a three-dimensional scalar field (sometimes called voxels)** squares: generate contour lines for a two-dimensional scalar field** tetrahedrons: an alternative to cubes* Greens Theorem: is an algorithm for computing double integral over a generalized rectangular domain in constant time.  It is a natural extension to the summed area table algorithm* fill: fills a connected region of a multi-dimensional array with a specified symbol* illumination algorithms: Considers direct illumination and reflection from other objects.** occlusion** tracing** tracing** lighting** light transport** tracing** mapping** Radiosity** Ray tracing* Hidden surface removal or Visual surface determination** algorithm: eliminate polygon cycles in the depth sorting required in hidden surface removal** algorithm: detects visible parts of a 3-dimensional scenery** rendering: constructs an image by moving an imaginary line over the image** algorithm* Line Drawing: graphical algorithm for approximating a line segment on discrete graphical media.** line algorithm: plots points of a 2-dimensional array to form a straight line between 2 specified points (uses decision variables)** DDA line algorithm: plots points of a 2-dimensional array to form a straight line between 2 specified points (uses floating-point math)** Wus line algorithm: algorithm for line antialiasing.* circle algorithm: an algorithm used to determine the points needed for drawing a circle* algorithm: Given a curve composed of line segments to find a curve not too dissimilar but that has fewer points* Shading** shading: an algorithm to simulate the differing effects of light and colour across the surface of an object in 3D computer graphics** shading: an algorithm to interpolate surface normal-vectors for surface shading in 3D computer graphics* Slerp (spherical linear interpolation): quaternion interpolation for the purpose of animating 3D rotation* area table (also known as an integral image): an algorithm for computing the sum of values in a rectangular subset of a grid in constant timeCryptography* Asymmetric (public key) encryption:** DSA** ElGamal** curve cryptography** NTRUEncrypt** RSA* hash functions:** HMAC: keyed-hash message authentication** MD5  Note that there is now a method of generating collisions for MD5** RIPEMD-160** SHA-1** SHA-2 (SHA-224, SHA-256, SHA-384, SHA-512)** Tiger (TTH), usually used in Tiger tree hashes* secure pseudo-random number generators** Blum Shub - based on the hardness of factorization** Fortuna, intended as an improvement on algorithm** feedback shift register** algorithm* Key exchange** key exchange*sharing, Secret Splitting, Key Splitting, M of N algorithms** Blakeys Scheme** Shamirs Scheme* Symmetric (secret key) encryption:** Encryption Standard (AES), winner of NIST competition, also known as Rijndael** Blowfish** Encryption Standard (DES), sometimes DE Algorithm, winner of NBS selection competition, replaced by AES for most purposes** IDEA** (cipher)** Encryption AlgorithmDigital logic* Boolean minimization** algorithm: Also called as Q-M algorithm, programmable method for simplyfying the boolean equations.** method: Another algorithm for boolean simplification.** heuristic logic minimizer: Fast algorithm for boolean function minimization.Machine learning and statistical classification * ALOPEX: a correlation-based machine-learning algorithm* rule learning: discover interesting relations between variables, used in mining** algorithm** Eclat algorithm** FP-growth algorithm** rule** Zero-attribute rule* Boosting: Use many weak learners to boost effectiveness** AdaBoost: adaptive boosting** BrownBoost:a boosting algorithm that may be robust to noisy datasets** LogitBoost: regression boosting** LPBoost: programming boosting* aggregating (bagging): technique to improve stability and classification accuracy* Decision Trees** algorithm: an extension to ID3** algorithm (Iterative Dichotomiser 3):  Use heuristic to generate small decision trees* neighbors (k-NN): a method for classifying objects based on closest training examples in the space* algorithm: a vector quantization algorithm used to derive a good codebook* hashing (LSH): a method of performing probabilistic dimension reduction of high-dimensional data* Neural Network** Backpropagation: A learning method which requires a teacher that knows, or can calculate, the desired output for any given input** net:  a neural network in which all connections are symmetric** Perceptron: the simplest kind of feedforward neural network: a classifier.** neural networks (PCNN): neural models proposed by modeling a cats cortex and developed for high-performance biomimetic image processing.** basis function network: an artificial neural network that uses radial functions as activation functions** map: an unsupervised network that produces a low-dimensional representation of the input space of the training samples* forest: classify using many decision trees* multinomial logit: classify using repeated logit analyses* Learning:** Q-learning:  learn an action-value function that gives the expected utility of taking a given action in a given state and following a fixed policy thereafter** SARSA (State-Action-Reward-State-Action): learn a decision process policy** difference learning* Vector Machine (RVM): similar to SVM, but provides probabilistic classification* Vector Machines (SVM): a set of methods which divide multidimensional data by finding a dividing hyperplane with the maximum margin between the two sets** SVM: allows training of a classifier for general structured output labels.* algorithm: related to the perceptron, but uses a multiplicative weight-update schemeProgramming language theory* linearization: an algorithm used primarily to obtain a consistent linearization of a multiple inheritance hierarchy in object-oriented programming* algorithm: a bottom-up, graph coloring register allocation algorithm that uses cost/degree as its spill metric* HindleyMilner type inference algorithm* algorithm: an efficient pattern matching algorithm for implementing production rule systems* algorithm: generate optimal code for arithmetic expressionsParsing* algorithm: An O(n3) algorithm for parsing grammars in normal form* parser: Another O(n3) algorithm for parsing any grammar* parser:An algorithm for parsing any grammar by Tomita. It is tuned for deterministic grammars, on which it performs almost time and O(n3) in worst case.* algorithm: An O(n3) algorithm for re-estimating production probabilities in context-free grammars* parser: A relatively simple time parsing algorithm for a limited class of grammars* parser: A more complex time parsing algorithm for a larger class of grammars.  Variants:** LR parser** LALR (Look-ahead LR) parser** parser** SLR (Simple LR) parser** precedence parser* parser: A time parsing algorithm supporting some grammars and expression grammars* descent parser: A top-down parser suitable for LL(k) grammars* yard algorithm: convert an infix-notation math expression to postfixQuantum algorithms* algorithm: criterion of balance for Boolean function* algorithm: provides quadratic speedup for many search problems* algorithm: provides exponential speedup (relative to currently known non-quantum algorithms) for factoring a number* algorithm: provides a provably exponential speedup (relative to any non-quantum algorithm) for a black-box problemTheory of computation and automata* construction: Algorithm to convert nondeterministic automaton to automaton.* algorithm: a algorithm which provides an upper bound for the complexity of formulas in the hierarchy and hierarchyInformation theory and signal processingCoding theoryError detection and correction* Codes** algorithm** PetersonGorensteinZierler algorithm** error correction* algorithm: decoding of error correcting codes defined on trellises (principally convolutional codes)* error correction* code* codes** Hamming(7,4):  a code that encodes 4 bits of data into 7 bits by adding 3 parity bits** distance: sum number of positions which are different** weight (population count): find the number of 1 bits in a binary word* checks** Adler-32** redundancy check** checksum** redundancy check (LRC)** algorithm: a method of validating identification numbers** mod N algorithm: extension of Luhn to non-numeric characters** Parity: simple/fast error detection technique** algorithmLossless compression algorithms* transform: preprocessing useful for improving lossless compression* tree weighting* encoding: aid to compression of data in which sequential data occurs frequently* Markov compression: Compression using predictive arithmetic coding* coders** pair encoding (BPE)** DEFLATE** LempelZiv*** and LZ78*** LempelZiv Jeff Bonwick (LZJB)*** chain algorithm (LZMA)*** LempelZivOberhumer (LZO): speed oriented*** LempelZivStorerSzymanski (LZSS)*** LempelZivWelch (LZW)*** LZWL: syllable-based variant*** LZX*** LempelZiv Ross Williams (LZRW)* encoding: coding scheme that assigns codes to symbols so as to match code lengths with the probabilities of the symbols** coding: advanced entropy coding*** encoding: same as coding, but looked at in a slightly different way** coding: simple lossless compression taking advantage of relative character frequencies*** Huffman coding: coding technique based on Huffman coding*** algorithm: Optimizes Huffman coding subject to a length restriction on code strings** coding** coding: precursor to arithmetic encoding (http://www.ece.msstate.edu/~fowler/Classes/ECE8813/Handouts/shannon_fano_elias.pdf)* Entropy coding with known entropy characteristics** coding: form of entropy coding that is optimal for alphabets following geometric distributions** coding: form of entropy coding that is optimal for alphabets following geometric distributions** binary encoding** coding: code that represents a number n with n ones followed by a zero** Universal codes: encodes positive integers into binary code words*** Elias delta, gamma, and omega coding*** coding*** coding*** coding* Fast Efficient & Lossless Image Compression System (FELICS): a lossless image compression algorithm* encoding: delta encoding applied to sequences of strings* Prediction by partial matching (PPM): an adaptive statistical data compression technique based on context modeling and prediction* encoding: lossless data compression taking advantage of strings of repeated characters* algorithm: lossless compression by incremental grammar inference on a stringLossy compression algorithms* 3Dc: a lossy data compression algorithm for normal maps* Audio and Speech compression** algorithm: standard companding algorithm** linear prediction (CELP): low bit-rate speech compression** predictive coding (LPC): lossy compression by representing the envelope of a digital signal of speech in compressed form** algorithm: standard analog signal compression or companding algorithm** Linear Predictive Coding (WLPC)* Compression** Truncation Coding (BTC): a type of lossy image compression technique for greyscale images** Zerotree Wavelet (EZW)** Fast Cosine Transform algorithms (FCT algorithms): compute Discrete Cosine Transform (DCT) efficiently** compression: method used to compress images using fractals** Partitioning in Hierarchical Trees (SPIHT)** compression: form of data compression well suited for compression (sometimes also video compression and audio compression)* coding: type of data compression for natural data like audio signals or photographic images* quantization: technique often used in lossy data compressionDigital signal processing* algorithm (AA algorithm): find the spatial frequency phase of an observed wave source* Fourier transform: determines the frequencies contained in a (segment of a) signal** FFT algorithm** FFT algorithm** FFT algorithm** Fourier transform** FFT algorithm** FFT algorithm* folding algorithm: an efficient algorithm for the detection of approximately-periodic events within time series data* algorithm: Phase retrieval algorithm for optical planes* algorithm: identify a particular frequency component in a signal.  Can be used for DTMF digit decoding.* string synthesis: physical modelling synthesis to simulate the sound of a hammered or plucked string or some types of percussionImage processing* labeling: find and label disjoint regions* Dithering and half-toning** diffusion** dithering** dithering** dithering* Elser algorithm: a search algorithm for general constraint satisfaction problems.  Originally used for X-Ray diffraction microscopy* detection** edge detector: detect a wide range of edges in images** Hough transform** transform** algorithm: an early detection algorithm** SIFT (Scale-invariant feature transform): is an algorithm to detect and describe local features in images.* deconvolution: image de-blurring algorithm* carving: content-aware image resizing algorithm* Segmentation: partition a digital image into two or more regions** algorithm: an interactive segmentation algorithm** walker algorithm** growing** Watershed transformation: a class of algorithms based on the watershed analogySoftware engineering* algorithms* conversion: converting between disk addressing systems* dabble: Convert binary numbers to BCD* Function: convert a large, possibly variable-sized amount of data into a small datum, usually a single integer that may serve as an index into an array** hash function: fast with low collision rate** hashing: computes 8 bit value only, optimized for 8 bit computers** hashing: used in the implementation of tables* Collation Algorithm* swap algorithm: swaps the values of two variables without using a bufferDatabase algorithms* for Recovery and Isolation Exploiting Semantics (ARIES): transaction recovery* Join algorithms** nested loop** join** loop join** JoinDistributed systems algorithms* algorithm:  a method for dynamically selecting a coordinator* fault tolerance: good fault tolerance.* synchronization** algorithm** algorithm** algorithm** algorithm* Detection of Process Termination** algorithm** algorithm* ordering: a ordering of events based on the happened-before relation* exclusion** Distributed Mutual Exclusion Algorithm** Algorithm** Algorithm** Algorithm* algorithm: a family of protocols for solving consensus in a network of unreliable processors* algorithm: record a consistent global state for an asynchronous system* clocks: generate a ordering of events in a distributed system and detect causality violationsMemory allocation and deallocation algorithms* memory allocation: Algorithm to allocate memory such that fragmentation is less.* Garbage collectors** garbage collector: Conservative garbage collector** algorithm: An improvement on the collector** Generational garbage collector: Fast garbage collectors that segregate memory by age** algorithm:  a combination of the mark-sweep algorithm  and Cheneys copying algorithm** and sweep** collector: An early copying collector* countingOperating systems algorithms* algorithm: Algorithm used for deadlock avoidance.* replacement algorithms: Selecting the victim page under low memory conditions.** replacement cache: better performance than LRU** with Adaptive Replacement (CAR): is a page replacement algorithm that has performance comparable to replacement cacheDisk scheduling* algorithm: Disk scheduling algorithm that works like an elevator.* seek first: Disk scheduling algorithm to reduce time.Networking* Algorithm: addresses the problem of getting accurate estimates of the round-trip time for messages when using TCP* algorithm: a technique for storing and searching internet routing tables efficiently* congestion** backoff** algorithm: improve the efficiency of TCP/IP networks by coalescing packets** binary exponential backoff* shaping and limiting** bucket** bucketProcess synchronization* algorithm* Bakery algorithm* algorithmScheduling* deadline first scheduling* scheduling* slack time scheduling* scheduling* level feedback queue* scheduling* scheduling* job next* remaining time* algorithm: resource calendar managementSee also*of data structures* of machine learning algorithms* of algorithm general topics* of terms relating to algorithms and data structures*HeuristicReferencesvon Algorithmenloenddes algorithmes algoritmade algoritmoslistesi
18964
Madagascar
calling_code  +261(The Republic of Madagascar (older name Malagasy Republic,  , ) is an country located in the Ocean off the southeastern coast of Africa. The nation comprises the island of Madagascar (at , the fourth-largest island in the world), as well as numerous smaller peripheral islands, the largest of which include Be and Nosy Boraha (le Sainte-Marie).The prehistoric breakup of the Gondwana supercontinent separated the Madagascar-Antarctica-India landmass from the Africa-South America landmass around 135 million years ago. Madagascar later split from India around 88 million years ago, allowing plants and animals on the island to evolve in complete isolation. Consequently, Madagascar is a hotspot in which over 80% of its plant and animal species are found nowhere else on Earth. These are dispersed across a variety of ecoregions, broadly divided into eastern and south-central rain forest, western dry forests, southern desert and spiny forest. The islands diverse ecosystems and unique wildlife are severely threatened by human settlement and traditional slash-and-burn practices (tavy) which have denuded Madagascar of as much as 90% of its original forest cover. Under the administration of former President Marc Ravalomanana, the government of Madagascar partnered with the community to implement large-scale conservation measures tied to ecotourism as part of the national development strategy. However, under Rajoelinas caretaker government there has been a dramatic increase in illegal logging of precious woods and the poaching and sale of threatened species such as lemurs in Madagascars many national parks, several of which are classified as UNESCO World Heritage Sites.Most researchers believe Madagascar was first inhabited sometime between 300 BCE and 500 CE by peoples arriving on outrigger canoes from Borneo in the Indonesian archipelago who were later joined around 1000 CE by Bantu migrants crossing the Channel and establishing first on the North and West coasts. Arabs, African, later Malay and Javanese, Indians, Chinese and European (primarily French) migrants settled on Madagascar over time, each one making lasting contributions to Malagasy cultural life. The Malagasy ethnic group is often sub-divided into sixteen or more sub-groups of which the largest are the Merina of the central highlands around Antananarivo, and the people of the eastern coast around Toamasina. The Austronesian origins of the earliest population are evident everywhere not only in the language and  the physical appearance of many Malagasy people, but also in cultural practices related to the veneration of ancestors, the prevalence of : the valiha (a bamboo tube zither of East Asian origin) and the sodina flute in Malagasy musical traditions, the architectural methods and norms who share the same norms than in South East Asia (like the square foundations of habitations), and a cuisine based on rice that establishes the Malagasy people as the largest rice consumers per capita in the world. Bantu influences are evident - especially in the West coast and in the South - in the spiritual and monetary value placed on zebu. The first transcription of Malagasy using Arabic script (sorabe) and certain elements of Malagasy cosmology were introduced ca 1500 by Arabs, and islamised Indians and Indonesian people who were established on the Southeast coast (in the current Vohipeno and Manakara region). Malagasy, the language spoken in various forms by the vast majority of the population, is the national language and one of two current official languages alongside French and English. The majority of the population adheres to traditional beliefs or Christianity, but followers of other faiths such as Islam and Hinduism are found in smaller numbers throughout the country.Until the late 18th century, the island of Madagascar was populated by a fragmented assortment of shifting socio-political alliances of varying sizes. Beginning in the early 19th century, however, the majority of the island was united and ruled as the Kingdom of Madagascar by a series of nobles (andriana) of the Merina ethnic group. The monarchy collapsed when the island was conquered and absorbed into the colonial empire in 1896, from which the island gained independence in 1960. The autonomous state of Madagascar has since undergone four major constitutional periods, including a post-colonial First Republic under President Tsiranana (1960&ndash;1972), a Soviet-style socialist Second Republic under Admiral Ratsiraka (1975&ndash;1991), and a democratic Third Republic under successive presidents Zafy, Didier Ratsiraka and Ravalomanana (1992&ndash;2009). Since 1992 the nation has officially been governed as a constitutional democracy from its capital at Antananarivo by an elected president who serves a renewable five-year term and is supported by the prime minister he or she nominates. However, following a popular uprising in 2009 instigated by then-mayor of Antananarivo and TGV political party president Rajoelina, Ravalomanana was pressured to resign. Presidential power was then unconstitutionally transferred to Rajoelina with the support of a portion of the military. A 2010 constitutional referendum ushered in the Fourth Republic in which the nation continues to be managed by Rajoelinas unelected government known as the Transitional Authority (HAT). Rajoelina (b. 1974), currently the youngest head of state in Africa, has failed to secure recognition from the international community, which largely views the current administration as illegitimate and has widely characterized Rajoelinas seizure of power as a dtat.In 2010, the population of Madagascar was estimated at around 20 million, 85% of whom live on less than two dollars per day. Ecotourism, agriculture, expansion of international trade and greater investments in education, health and private enterprise are key elements of Madagascars development strategy. Under Ravalomanana, these investments produced substantive economic growth but the benefits were not evenly spread throughout the population, producing tensions over the increasing cost of living and declining living standards among the poor and some segments of the middle class. Current and future generations in Madagascar are faced with the challenge of striking a balance between economic growth, equitable development and natural conservation.EtymologyIn the language, the island of Madagascar is called Madagasikara  and its people are referred to as Malagasy.() However, the islands appellation Madagascar is not of local origin but rather was popularized in the Middle Ages by Europeans.(Cousins (1895), pp. 11&ndash;12) The name Madageiscar was first recorded in the memoirs of 13th-century Venetian explorer Polo as a corrupted form of the name Mogadishu, the Somalian port with which Polo had confused the island. On St. Laurences Day in 1500, Portuguese explorer Dias landed on the island and christened it So Loureno, but Polos name was preferred and popularized on Renaissance maps. No single Malagasy-language name predating Madagasikara appears to have been used by the local population to refer to the island, although some communities had their own name for part or all of the land they inhabited.(Room (2006), p. 230)GeographyAt ,() Madagascar is the worlds 47th-largest country() and the fourth-largest island.( The country lies mostly between latitudes 12S and 26S, and longitudes 43E and 51E.() The prehistoric breakup of the Gondwana supercontinent separated the Madagascar-Antarctica-India landmass from the Africa-South America landmass around 135 million years ago. Madagascar later split from India around 88 million years ago, allowing plants and animals on the island to evolve in complete isolation.()The island of Madagascar can be divided into three broad geographic zones.  These include the highlands, a plateau region in the center of the island ranging in altitude from  above sea level; a narrow and steep escarpment that runs the length of the eastern coast and contains much of the islands remaining tropical rain forest; and a wide, dry plain that gently slopes from the western boundaries of the highlands toward the Channel. The central highlands, traditionally the homeland of the Merina people (the islands most numerous ethnic group) and location of their historic capital at Antananarivo, is the most densely populated part of the island and is characterized by terraced, rice-growing valleys lying between grassy, deforested hills. Here, erosion has exposed the islands red laterite soil, source of the countrys sobriquet The Red Island. Madagascars highest peaks arise from three prominent highland massifs: Maromokotro () in the Tsaratanana Massif is the islands highest point, followed by Boby Peak () in the Andringitra Massif and Tsiafajavona () in the Ankaratra Massif. To the east, the des Pangalanes is a chain of man-made and natural lakes connected by French-built canals just inland from the east coast, running parallel to it for some . The western and southern sides, which lie in the shadow of the central highlands, are home to tropical dry forests, thorn forests, and and xeric shrublands. Presumably due to relatively lower population densities, Madagascars dry deciduous rain forest has been better preserved than the eastern rain forests or the original woodlands of the high central plateau. The western coast features many protected harbors, but silting is a major problem caused by sediment from the high levels of inland erosion carried by rivers crossing the vast western plains.()ClimateThe combination of southeastern winds and northwestern monsoon winds produce a hot rainy season (November&mdash;April) with frequently destructive cyclones, and a relatively cooler dry season (May&mdash;October). Broadly speaking, the climate is tropical along the coast, temperate inland, moderately dry in the west, and arid in the south. Rain clouds originating over the Indian Ocean discharge much of their moisture over the islands eastern coast where precipitation as heavy as 150 in (3,800 mm) per year supports the areas rain forest ecosystem.( The central highlands are both drier and cooler, while the west coast is drier still, with high aridity in the southwest and southern part of the island where a semi-desert climate prevails. Annual cyclones cause regular damage to infrastructure and local economies as well as loss of life. The most destructive since 1927 was Cyclone Geralda (February 2&ndash;4, 1994) which caused over 70 fatalities and left over 500,000 people homeless with the damage estimated at US$45 million.()EcologyAs a result of the islands long isolation from neighboring continents, Madagascar is home to a vast array of plants and animals, many found nowhere else on Earth.( Approximately 80% of all plant and animal species found in Madagascar are endemic, including the lemur infraorder of primates, the carnivorous fossa and three avian families.(Hobbes & Dolan (2008), p. 517) This distinctive ecology has led some ecologists to refer to Madagascar as the eighth continent,() and the island has been classified by Conservation International as a biodiversity hotspot.()Over 10,000 plant species are native to Madagascar, of which 90% are found nowhere else in the world.() Seven plant families are only found here, the highest number of any biodiversity hotspot in the world.( The plant family didiereaceae, composed of four genera and 11 species, is limited to the spiny forests of southwestern Madagascar. Four-fifths of the worlds pachypodium species are endemic to the island. Three-fourths of Madagascars 960 orchid species are found here alone, as are six of the worlds eight baobab species. The island is also home to around 170 palm species, three times as many as are found on mainland Africa; 165 of these are endemic. Many native plant species are used as effective herbal remedies for a variety of afflictions, including the Madagascar periwinkle, which has recently been established as the most effective treatment for leukemia and disease.(Bradt (2011), pp. 35&ndash;46) The travelers palm, endemic to the eastern rain forests,() is highly iconic of Madagascar and is featured in the national emblem as well as the Madagascar logo.()File:OaklandZooLemurs.jpg|thumb|upright|170px|right|altTwo ring-tailed lemurs curled up together|The lemur is one of around 100 known species and subspecies of lemur found only in Madagascar.()Lemurs have been characterized as Madagascars flagship mammal species by Conservation International.( In the absence of monkeys and other competitors, these primates have adapted to a wide range of habitats and diversified into numerous species. As of 2008, there are officially 99 species and subspecies of lemur, 39 of which have been described by zoologists between 2000 and 2008.() They are almost all classified as rare, vulnerable, or endangered.(Thornback & Harcourt (1990), p.) At least 17 species of lemur have become extinct since man arrived on Madagascar, all of which were larger than the surviving lemur species.()The biodiversity of fauna in Madagascar extends beyond prosimians to the wider animal population. A number of other mammals, including the cat-like fossa, are endemic to Madagascar. Over 300 species of bird have been recorded on the island, of which over 60% (including four families and 42 genera) are endemic.( The few families and genera of reptile that have reached Madagascar have diversified into more than 260 species, with over 90% of these being endemic( (including one endemic family).( The island is home to two-thirds of the worlds chameleon species,() and researchers have proposed that Madagascar may represent the origin of all chameleon species. Endemic fishes on Madagascar include two families, 14 genera and over 100 species primarily inhabiting the islands freshwater lakes and rivers. Although invertebrate species remain poorly studied on Madagascar relative to other wildlife, researchers have found high rates of endemism among known species. All 651 species of terrestrial snail are endemic, as are a majority of the islands butterflies, scarab beetles, lacewings, spiders and dragonflies.(Environmental challengesMadagascars varied fauna and flora are endangered by human activity.() Since the arrival of humans 2,000 years ago, Madagascar has lost more than 90% of its original forest,() of which one-third has disappeared since the 1970s.( A key contributor to the loss of forest cover is slash-and-burn activity, locally called tavy. This traditional practice was imported to Madagascar by the earliest settlers from Indonesia around 2,000 years ago and has strong cultural meaning in addition to its practical value as an agricultural technique.(Bradt (2011), p. 41)Habitat destruction and hunting have threatened many of Madagascars endemic species or driven them to extinction. This process is exemplified by the extinction of birds (Aepyornis), an endemic giant ratite that was formerly the worlds largest bird. This species, whose average height was over  tall, has been extinct since at least the 17th century, most likely due to human hunting of adult birds and poaching of their massive eggs for food.(Davies (2003), pp. 99&ndash;101)Numerous lemur species also vanished with the arrival of human settlers to the island, and today most extant lemurs are listed as endangered or threatened species due to habitat destruction. Many species have gone extinct over the course of the last centuries as a growing population has put greater pressures on lemur habitats and, among some populations, increased the rate of lemur hunting for food.()Under President Marc Ravalomanana, a vigorous effort was made to expand Madagascars protected natural areas. At the 2003 IUCN Parks Congress in Durban, Ravalomanana announced the Durban Vision, a bold initiative to more than triple the area under protection from approximately 17,000 km to over 60,000 km (from 3% to 10% of Madagascars area). As of 2011, areas protected by the state include five Strict Nature Reserves (Rserves Naturelles Intgrales), 21 Wildlife Reserves (Rserves Spciales) and 21 National Parks (Parcs Nationaux).() In 2007 six of the national parks were voted in as a joint Heritage Site under the name of the Atsinanana. These six are: Marojejy, Masoala, Ranomafana, Zahamena, Andohahela and National Park.() Local timber barons are harvesting scarce species of rosewood trees from protected rainforests such as National Park and exporting the wood to China for the production of luxury furniture and musical instruments.() To raise public awareness of Madagascars environmental challenges, the Wildlife Conservation Society opened an exhibit entitled Madagascar! in June 2008 at the Zoo in New York.()HistoryEarly historyMost archaeologists estimate that the earliest settlers arrived in canoes from southern Borneo between 200 BCE and 500 CE, making Madagascar one of the last major landmasses on Earth to be settled by people.(Diamond (1999), p. 50) Upon arrival, early settlers practiced tavy (swidden, slash-and-burn agriculture) to clear the virgin coastal rainforests for the cultivation of their crops. The first settlers encountered Madagascars wealth of megafauna, including giant lemurs, birds, fossa and the hippopotamus, which have since become extinct due to hunting and habitat destruction.() By 600 CE groups of these early settlers had moved inland and began clearing the forests of the central Highlands. Irrigated rice paddies emerged in highland Betsileo country by 1600 and were complemented with terraced paddies throughout Imerina a century later.(Campbell (1993), p. 116) Zebu were introduced around 1000 CE by Bantu-speaking East African migrants who maintained large herds. The rising intensity of land cultivation and the ever-increasing demand for zebu pasturage in the central highlands had largely transformed the region from a forest ecosystem to barren grassland by the 17th century.() Merina oral histories tell of migration from the southeast coast to the central highlands where the Merina encountered an established population called the Vazimba, who may have been the descendants of an earlier and less technologically advanced Austronesian settlement wave.() The Vazimba were vanquished by Merina kings Andriamanelo, Ralambo and Andrianjaka in the 16th and early 17th centuries.() Madagascar was an important transoceanic trading hub connecting ports of the Indian Ocean in the early centuries following human settlement. The written history of Madagascar begins in the 7th century when Arabs established trading posts along the northwest coast and introduced Islam, the Arabic script (used to transcribe the Malagasy language in a form of writing known as sorabe), Arab astrology and other cultural elements.( European contact began in 1500, when the Portuguese sea captain Dias sighted the island.( The French established trading posts along the east coast in the late 17th century. From about 1774 to 1824, it gained prominence among pirates and European traders, particularly those involved in the trans-Atlantic slave trade. The small island of Nosy Boroha off the northeastern coast of Madagascar has been proposed by some historians as the site of the legendary pirate utopia of Libertalia.(Oliver (1886), p. 16) Many European sailors were shipwrecked on the coasts of the island, among them Robert Drury, whose journal is one of the few written depictions of life in southern Madagascar during the 18th century.(From MADAGASCAR to the MALAGASY REPUBLIC, by Raymond K. Kent pg 6571) The wealth generated by maritime trade spurred the rise of organized kingdoms on the island, some of which had grown quite powerful by the 17th century.() Among these were the Betsimisaraka alliance of the eastern coast and the Sakalava chiefdoms of Menabe and Boina on the west coast. The Kingdom of Imerina, located in the central highlands with its capital at the royal palace of Antananarivo, likewise emerged at around the same time under the leadership of King Andriamanelo.(Ogot (1992), p. 418)File:Reine1.JPG|thumb|170px|Queen I of Madagascar (1828-1861)Kingdom of MadagascarUpon its emergence in the early 17th century, the highland kingdom of Imerina was initially a minor power relative to the larger coastal kingdoms( and grew even weaker in the early 18th century when King Andriamasinavalona divided it among his four sons. However, following a century of warring and famine, Imerina was reunited in 1793 by King Andrianampoinimerina (1787&ndash;1810).(Hodder (1982), p. 59) From his capital at Ambohimanga (a UNESCO World Heritage Site), this Merina king rapidly expanded his rule over neighboring principalities with the intent to bring the entire island under his control,() an ambition largely achieved by his son and successor, King I (1810&ndash;1828). Radama concluded a treaty with the British governor of Mauritius to abolish the lucrative trade in return for British military and financial assistance. Artisan missionary envoys from the Missionary Society began arriving in 1818. James Cameron and others established schools, transcribed the language using the Roman alphabet, translated the Bible, and introduced a variety of new technologies to the island.(Ade Ajayi (1998), pp. 392&ndash;396)Radamas successor, Queen I (1828&ndash;1861), responded to increasing political and cultural encroachment on the part of Britain and France by issuing a royal edict prohibiting the practice of Christianity in Madagascar and eventually expelling all foreigners from the territory. She managed to preserve the islands sovereignty, but at a great cost, as many early Christians were vigorously persecuted and killed under her reign.() Her son and successor, II (1861&ndash;1863), attempted to relax his mothers stringent policies but was overthrown two years later by Prime Minister Rainivoninahitriniony (1852&ndash;1865) and other courtiers.( The courtiers, seeking to end the absolute power of the monarch, offered Radamas queen Rasoherina (1863&ndash;1868) the opportunity to rule if she would accept a power sharing arrangement with the Prime Minister&mdash;a new social contract to be sealed by a political marriage between them.(Oliver (1886), pp. 124&ndash;126) Queen Rasoherina accepted, first wedding Rainivoninahitriniony, then later deposing him and wedding his brother, Prime Minister Rainilaiarivony (1864&ndash;1895), who would go on to marry Queen II (1868&ndash;1883) and Queen III) (1883&ndash;1897) in succession.(Bradt (2011), p. 7)French colonizationFrance invaded Madagascar in 1883 in what became known as the first War on the pretext of the non-respect of the Charter&mdash;a document granting lucrative concessions to French citizens&mdash;and a letter entreating the assistance of the French in ending the rule of Ranavalona I, both signed by former king Radama II.(Van Den Boogaerde (2008), p. 7) At the wars end, Madagascar ceded Antsiranana (Diego Suarez) on the northern coast to France and paid 560,000 francs to the heirs of Lambert.(Randier (2006), p. 400) In 1890, the British accepted the full formal imposition of a French protectorate. Ultimately, the French bombarded and occupied the harbor of Toamasina on the east coast, and Mahajanga on the west coast in December 1894 and January 1895 respectively.() The column proceeded to march toward Antananarivo but lost many to malaria and other diseases, necessitating reinforcements drawn from Algeria and Africa. Upon reaching the city in September 1895, the column bombarded the Rova palace with heavy artillery, causing heavy casualties and leading Queen Ranavalona III to surrender.(Oliver (1985), p. 529)  After the conclusion of hostilities, in 1896 France annexed Madagascar. The 103-year-old Merina monarchy ended with the royal family being sent into exile, first to Reunion Island and then to Algeria the following year.(Oliver (1985), p. 532) Slavery was abolished in 1896, but many of the 500,000 liberated slaves remained in their former masters homes as servants.() Under colonial rule, plantations were established for the production of a variety of export crops.(Campbell (2005), p. 107) Wide paved boulevards and gathering spaces were constructed in the capital city of Antananarivo(Fournet-Gurin (2007), pp. 45&ndash;54) and the Rova palace compound was turned into a museum.(Frmigacci (1999), pp. 421&ndash;444) Schools were built, particularly in rural and coastal areas where the schools of the Merina had not reached; education became mandatory between the ages of 6 to 13 and focused primarily on French language and practical skills.(Gallieni (1908), pp. 341&ndash;343) The Merina royal tradition of corvee&mdash;taxes paid in the form of labor&mdash;was continued under the French and used to construct a railway and roads linking the coastal cities to Antananarivo.(Reinsch (1905), p. 377) During War I, 46,000 Malagasy troops( fought in France, Morocco, and Syria.(Ellicott (2004), p. 1087) Some leaders in Germany proposed deporting all of Europes Jews to Madagascar (the Plan), but nothing came of this.(Browning (2004), pp. 81&ndash;89) After France fell to Germany, the Vichy government administered Madagascar. During the of Madagascar, British troops occupied the island in 1942 to preclude its seizure by the Japanese, after which the French took over.(Bradt (2011), p. 325) With French prestige at low ebb after the end of World War II, the Uprising of 1947 broke out. It was suppressed after over a year of bitter fighting, with death toll estimates ranging from 10,000 to over 80,000.(Lehoullier (2010), p. 107) The French later established reformed institutions in 1956 under the Cadre (Overseas Reform Act), and Madagascar moved peacefully towards independence. The Republic was proclaimed on October 14, 1958, as an autonomous state within the Community. A period of provisional government ended with the adoption of a constitution in 1959 and full independence on June 26, 1960.(Pryor (1990), pp. 209&ndash;210)GovernmentCapitalAntananarivo is the capital and the largest city of Madagascar.( It is located in the highlands region, very near to the geographic center of the island. King Andrianjaka founded Antananarivo around 1610 or 1625 upon the site of a captured Vazimba capital on the hilltop of Analamanga.( In 1793 it became the capital, under the Merina kings, of the whole island, and in 1895, after the French conquest of Madagascar, the center of the French colonial administration. In 1960, after independence, it became the capital of the Republic. In 2011, the capitals population was estimated at 903,000 inhabitants.Administrative divisionsthumb|right|Map of the regions and former provinces of MadagascarMadagascar was divided into six autonomous provinces (faritany mizakatena), and subdivided into 22 regions (faritra), the latter created in 2004. The regions became the highest subdivision level when the provinces were dissolved in accordance with the results of the 2007 referendum. The regions are further subdivided into 116 districts, 1,548 communes, and 16,969 fokontany. The major cities have a special status as commune urbaine, at the same level as the districts.MilitaryThe rise of centralized kingdoms among the Sakalava, Merina and other ethnic groups produced the islands first standing armies by the 16th century, initially equipped with spears but later with muskets, cannons and other firearms.(Barendse (2002), pp. 259&ndash;274) By the early 19th century, Kingdom of Imerina was able to bring much of the island under Merina control with an army ranging from 20,000 to 30,000 soldiers.(Freeman (1840), p.) French attacks on coastal towns in the later part of the century prompted British mercenaries to provide training to the queens army. However, the Malagasy military proved unable to withstand French weaponry and was declared a colony of France in 1897.(Bradt (2011), pp. 7&ndash;10)Madagascar regained political independence and sovereignty over its military in 1960.() Since this time the Malagasy military has never engaged in armed conflict with another state or within its own borders, but has occasionally intervened to restore order during periods of political unrest. Under the socialist Second Republic, Admiral Didier Ratsiraka declared mandatory national armed or civil service for all young citizens regardless of gender.(Strakes (2006), p. 86) Ratsiraka would furthermore mobilize elements of the military to pacify unarmed protesters, occasionally using violent means. His order to fire upon unarmed protesters in 1989 was the catalyst for transition to the democratic Third Republic in 1992. The military remained largely neutral during the protracted standoff between incumbent Ratsiraka and challenger Marc Ravalomanana in the disputed 2001 presidential elections. By contrast, in 2009 a segment of the army defected to the side of Andry Rajoelina, then-mayor of Antananarivo, in support of his attempt to force President Ravalomanana from power. It is widely believed that payoffs were involved in persuading these military personnel to change camps in support of the coup detat.(Bradt (2011), pp.)PoliticsAlthough the head of state since March 2009 is self-proclaimed, Madagascar is usually a semi-presidential representative democratic multi-party republic, wherein the popularly elected President is the head of state and selects a Prime Minister to form a government. In the Malagasy system, the word government refers collectively to the President, the Prime Minister and all the heads of government ministries (Ministers), the latter being selected by the Prime Minister but serving at the pleasure of the President. According to the constitution, power is exercised by the government while power is vested in both the government and the Senate and the National Assembly, although in reality these two latter bodies have very little power or legislative role. The constitution declares the judiciary to be independent of the executive and the legislature, but constitutional provisions empowering the Minister of Justice to interfere in operations of the judiciary branch effectively undermine intended separation of powers, consolidating the strength of the executive branch.The political situation in Madagascar has been marked by struggle for control. After Madagascar gained independence from France in 1960, political transitions have been marked by numerous popular protests, several disputed elections, two military coups and one assassination. Ratsiraka took power in a military coup in 1975 and ruled until 2001, with a short break when he was ousted in the early 1990s. When Ravalomanana and Ratsiraka both claimed victory after presidential elections in December 2001, Ratsirakas supporters tried to blockade the capital, Antananarivo, which was pro-Ravalomanana. After eight months of sporadic violence with considerable economic disruption, a recount in April 2002 led the High Constitutional Court to pronounce Ravalomanana president, but it was not until July that Ratsiraka fled to France and Ravalomanana gained control of the country.() Between 2002 and 2009, Ravalomanana and his party I Madagasikara (TIM) dominated political life. Ravalomananas re-election in December 2006 was met with some protests over worsening standards of living, despite an ongoing government drive to eradicate poverty.()A series of protests against then-President Ravalomanana in 2009, backed by Rajoelina, former mayor of Antananarivo, became violent, with more than 170 people killed.() Rajoelina mobilized his supporters to take to the streets of Antananarivo to demand Ravalomananas ousting on the grounds of his autocratic style of government. After losing support of the military and under intense pressure from Rajoelina, President Ravalomanana resigned on March 17, 2009. Ravalomanana assigned his powers to a military council loyal to himself headed by Vice-Admiral Hyppolite Ramaroson.() The military called the move by Ravalomanana a ploy( and said that it would support Rajoelina as leader.() Rajoelina had already declared himself the new leader a month earlier and assumed the role of acting President, appointing Roindefo as Prime Minister.() Rajoelina announced that elections would be held in two years and that the constitution would be amended.( The Union, amongst other international entities, refused to recognize the new government, due to it being installed by force.() The Union, which proceeded to suspend Madagascars membership on March 20,() and the Africa Development Community both criticized the forced resignation of Ravalomanana.(Foreign relationsMadagascar was historically perceived as being on the margin of mainstream African affairs despite being a founding member of the of African Unity, which was founded in 1963. France remained the countrys closest partner throughout the First Republic, stirring popular resentment and public protests that ultimately toppled the Tsiranana regime. Ratsirakas socialist Second Republic turned its attention to partnerships with the Soviet Union, China and other socialist states. The weakened political and economic position of these partner states was a contributing factor to the collapse of the Second Republic.The launch of the democratic Third Republic in 1993 marked a shift toward a capitalist economic growth model necessitating expanded diplomatic and economic ties within the global market. President Zafy, expressing desire for diplomatic relations with all countries, established formal ties with Korea and sent emissaries to Morocco. The pressures of globalisation obliged President Ratsiraka to adhere to market-oriented policies and to engage world markets when he was voted into office in 1997. External relations have since reflected this trend, although Madagascars physical isolation and strong traditional insular orientation have limited its activity in regional economic organizations and relations with its African neighbours. It enjoys closer and generally good relations with its Ocean neighbours  Mauritius, Runion and Comoros. Active relationships with Europe, especially France, Germany, and Switzerland, as well as with Britain, Russia, Japan, India and China have been strong since independence. More recently, President Ravalomanana has cultivated strong links with the States, and Madagascar was the first country to benefit from the Challenge Account. Madagascar is a member of the Criminal Court with a Bilateral Immunity Agreement of protection for the States military (as covered under Article 98). Numerous countries have established and maintain a diplomatic presence in Madagascar. During his presidency, Ravalomanana traveled widely promoting Madagascar abroad and consciously sought to strengthen relations with Anglophone countries as a means of balancing traditionally strong French influence. He also cultivated strong ties with China during his tenure.The Organisation of African Unity dissolved in 2002 and was replaced by the Union. Madagascar was not permitted to attend the first African Union summit because of a dispute over the results of the election in December 2001, but rejoined the African Union in July 2003 after a 14-month hiatus triggered by the 2002 political crisis. However, Madagascar was suspended again by the African Union in March 2009 because of ongoing political crisis.()In November 2004, after an absence of almost 30 years, Madagascar re-opened its embassy in London. On 15 December 2004 Secretary Straw announced the closure of the British embassy in Antananarivo to save 250,000 per year. He also announced an end to the governments aid to Madagascar. The embassy closed in August 2005. The British Embassy was previously closed (also for financial reasons) from 1975 to 1980. The Anglo-Malagasy Society are campaigning to have it re-opened.Human rightsHuman rights in Madagascar are protected under the constitution. However the extent to which such rights are reflected in practice, is subject to debate. The 2010 Human Rights Report by the States Department of State noted concerns regarding the suspension of democratic electoral processes as the result of recent political unrest.() Furthermore, reports of corruption, arbitrary arrest, widespread underage prostitution and labor highlight the prevalence of human rights issues in the country.(Lawson & Bertucci (1996), pp. 978&ndash;979) Accusations of media censorship have risen since 2009 due to the allegedly increasing restrictions on the coverage of government opposition.(EconomyFile:Antananarivo Street.JPG|thumb|upright|Antananarivo is the political and economic capital of MadagascarMadagascars sources of growth are tourism, textile and light manufacturing exports (notably through the EPZs), agricultural products, and mining. Madagascar is the worlds leading producer of vanilla and accounts for about half the worlds export market. Tourism targets the niche eco-tourism market, capitalizing on Madagascars unique biodiversity, unspoiled natural habitats, national parks and lemur species. Exports from the EPZs, located around Antananarivo and Antsirabe, comprise the majority of garment manufacture, targeting the US market under AGOA and the European markets under the But Arms (EBA) agreement. Agricultural exports consist of low-volume high-value products like vanilla, lychees and oils. A small but growing part of the economy is based on mining of ilmenite, with investments emerging in recent years, particularly near Tulear and Fort Dauphin.Natural resourcesmadagascar.JPG|thumb|left|Autoclave enters Madagascar, 2008, as part of new mining operationMadagascars natural resources include a variety of unprocessed agricultural and mineral resources. Key agricultural resources include vanilla, lychees and shrimp. Key mineral resources include various types of precious and semi-precious stones, ilmenite and petrol. Several major projects are underway in the mining and oil and gas sectors that, if successful, will give a significant boost to the Malagasy economy. In the mining sector, these include the development of coal at Sakoa and nickel near Tamatave. In oil, Oil is developing the massive onshore heavy oil field at Tsimiroro and ultra heavy oil field at Bemolanga. Mining corporation Tinto Group began operations near Fort Dauphin in 2008, following several years of infrastructure preparation. The mining project is highly controversial, with Friends of the Earth and other environmental organizations filing reports to detail their concerns about effects on the local environment and communities.()InfrastructureInternational tradeAgriculture, including fishing and forestry, is a mainstay of the economy. Major exports are coffee, vanilla (Madagascar is the worlds largest producer and exporter of vanilla), sugarcane, cloves, cocoa, rice, cassava (tapioca), beans, bananas, peanuts and livestock products. Vanilla has historically been of particular importance, and when in 1985 Coca-cola switched to Coke which involved less vanilla, Madagascars economy took a marked downturn but returned to previous levels after the return of Classic.()Domestic economyTourismEconomic developmentStructural reforms began in the late 1980s, initially under pressure from international financial institutions, notably the Bank. An initial privatization program (19881993) and the development of an processing zone regime in the early 1990s were key milestones in this effort. A period of significant stagnation from 1991 to 1996 was followed by five years of solid economic growth and accelerating foreign investment. Although structural reforms advanced, governance remained weak, and perceived corruption was high. During the period of solid growth from 1997 to 2001, poverty levels remained high, especially in rural areas.A six-month political crisis triggered by a dispute over the outcome of the presidential elections held in December 2001 virtually halted economic activity in much of the country in the first half of 2002. GDP dropped 12.7% for the year 2002, inflows of investment dropped sharply, and the crisis tarnished Madagascars budding reputation as an AGOA standout and a promising place to invest. After the crisis, the economy rebounded with GDP growth of over 10% in 2003. depreciation and rising inflation in 2004 have hampered economic performance, but growth for the year reached 5.3%, with inflation reaching around 25% at the end of the year. In 2005 inflation was brought under control by tight monetary policy of raising the Taux Directeur (central bank rate) to 16% and tightening reserve requirements for banks. Thus growth was expected to reach around 6.5% in 2005.Following the 2002 political crisis, the government attempted to set a new course and build confidence, in coordination with financial institutions and donors. Madagascar developed a recovery plan in collaboration with the private sector and donors and presented it at a Friends of Madagascar conference organized by the Bank in Paris in July 2002. Donor countries demonstrated their confidence in the new government by pledging $1 billion in assistance over five years. The Malagasy Government identified road infrastructure as its principle priority and underlined its commitment to public-private partnership by establishing a joint public-private sector steering committee.In 2000, Madagascar embarked on the preparation of a Reduction Strategy Paper (PRSP) under the Indebted Poor Countries (HIPC) Initiative. The boards of the IMF and World Bank agreed in December 2000 that the country had reached the decision point for debt relief under the HIPC Initiative and defined a set of conditions for Madagascar to reach the completion point. In October 2004, the boards of the IMF and the Bank determined that Madagascar had reached the completion point under the enhanced HIPC Initiative.()The Business Council was formed as a collaboration between the United States Agency for International Development (USAID) and Malagasy artisan producers in Madagascar in 2002. The U.S.-Madagascar Business Council was formed in the United States in May 2003, and the two organizations continue to explore ways to work for the benefit of both groups.()The government of President Ravalomanana aggressively sought foreign investment and attempted to tackle many of the obstacles to such investment, including combating corruption, reforming land-ownership laws, encouraging study of American and European business techniques, and active pursuit of foreign investors. President Ravalomanana rose to prominence through his agro-foods TIKO company, and attempted to apply many of the lessons learned in the world of business to running the government. In the latter half of his presidency, concerns arose about the conflict of interest between his policies and the activities of his firms. Most notable among them the preferential treatment for rice imports initiated by the government in late 2004 when responding to a production shortfall in the country.DemographicsFile:Antananarivo Rova-Palast.jpg|thumb|Antananarivo, MadagascarMadagascars population is predominantly of mixed Austronesian (i.e. Asian/Islander) and African origin.() Those who are visibly Austronesian in appearance and culture are the minority, found mostly in the highland regions. Recent DNA research shows that the Malagasy people are approximately of half Austronesian and half East African descent, although some Arab, Indian and European influence is present along the coast.(Adelaar (2006), pp. 205&ndash;235)Subsequent migrations from the East Indies and Africa consolidated this original mixture, and over a dozen distinct tribal groups emerged. Austronesian features are most predominant in the Merina (3 million); the coastal people (called ctiers) have relatively stronger African origins. The largest coastal groups are the Betsimisaraka (1.5 million) and the Tsimihety and Sakalava (700,000 each). The Vezo live in the southwest. Two of the southern tribes are the Antandroy and the Antanosy. Other tribes include Tankarana (northern tip), Sihanaka and Bezanozano (east), Tanala (south-east), Antaimoro, Tambahoaka, Zafisoro, Antaisaka and Timanambondro (south-east coast), and Mahafaly and Bara (south-west). Chinese and Indian minorities also exist, as well as Europeans, mostly French. In 1958, there were 68,430 European settlers living in Madagascar.(The educated African: a country-by-country survey of educational development in Africa. Helen A. Kitchen (1962). p.256.) The number of Comorans residing in Madagascar was drastically reduced after anti-Comoran rioting in Mahajanga in 1976.(During the French colonial administration (18951960) and some time after independence, people were officially classified in groups. This practice was abandoned in the first census (1975) after independence() so any recent classification and figures for ethnic groups is an unofficial estimate. There is for instance no mention of ethnicity or religion in the national identity cards. Also, territorial divisions (provinces, regions) do not follow any ethnic division lines, despite an attempt by the colonial administration in the early 20th century. Ethnic divisions continue, and may cause violence, but their role is limited in todays society. Political tensions between the highlanders and coastal population periodically flare up into limited violent conflict.(Ethnic strife rocks Madagascar. BBC News. May 14, 2002.) The population has grown from 2.2 million in 1900 to 7.6 million in 1975.(Madagascar - Population. of Congress Country Studies.) Only two general censuses, 1975 and 1993, have been carried out after independence. Figures for Madagascars foreign population in the early 1990s are lacking, but in 1988, such persons were estimated to include 25,000 Comorans, 18,000 French, 17,000 Indians, and 9,000 Chinese.( HealthMaternal and Child Health CareIn June 2011, the Nations Population Fund released a report on The State of the Worlds Midwifery. It contained new data on the midwifery workforce and policies relating to newborn and maternal mortality for 58 countries. The 2010 maternal mortality rate per 100,000 births for Madagascar is 440. This is compared with 373.1 in 2008 and 484.4 in 1990. The under 5 mortality rate, per 1,000 births is 61 and the neonatal mortality as a percentage of under 5s mortality is 37. The aim of this report is to highlight ways in which the Development Goals can be achieved, particularly Goal 4  Reduce child mortality and Goal 5  improve maternal death. In Madagascar the number of midwives per 1,000 live births is 4 and 1 in 45 shows us the lifetime risk of death for pregnant women.() Two-thirds of the population live below the international poverty line of US$1.25 per day.()EducationPrior to the 19th century, all learning in Madagascar was informal and typically served to teach practical skills as well as social and cultural norms, including respect for ancestors and elders.( The first formal European-style school was established in 1818 on the east coast of Madagascar at Toamasina by members of the Missionary Society (LMS). King Radama I (18101828) invited LMS missionaries to establish schools throughout Imerina to teach basic literacy and numeracy to the children of andriana (nobles) who would go on to serve as soldiers or royal aides. Because the missionaries insisted on using the Bible to teach literacy in support of their own agenda to spread Christianity, Radamas successor, Ranavalona I, expelled the missionaries and closed the schools in 1835.(Ralibera (1993), p. 196) This policy was reversed upon her death, and by the end of the 19th century Madagascar could boast the most developed and modern school system in pre-colonial Sub-Saharan Africa.(Direction de lenseignement (1931), p.)Limited access and poor quality have plagued the schools of Madagascar from the colonial period to the present. During the post-colonial First Republic, a continued reliance on French nationals as teachers and French as the language of instruction created tension among those desiring a complete separation from the former colonial power. Consequently, under the socialist Second Republic, French instructors and other nationals were expelled, Malagasy was declared the language of instruction and a large cadre of young Malagasy were rapidly trained to teach at remote rural schools under the mandatory two-year national service policy.( ) This policy, known as malgachization, coincided with a severe economic downturn and a dramatic decline in the quality of education; people schooled during this period generally failed to master the French language or many other subjects. Struggling in the competitive local employment market, most remained mired in deepening poverty as they were obliged to turn to low-paying jobs in the informal or black market. Excepting the brief presidency of Albert Zafy from 1992 to 1996, Ratsiraka remained in power from 1975 to 1999 and failed to achieve significant improvements in the sector throughout this time.()Education was prioritized under the Ravalomanana administration. During his first term, thousands of new schools and additional classrooms were constructed while many older buildings were renovated. Tens of thousands of new teachers were recruited and trained. The minimum education standard for the recruitment of primary teachers was raised from a middle school leaving certificate (BEPC) to a high school leaving certificate (BAC). School supplies and uniforms were provided at public schools and official school fees were eliminated, although fees are still commonly charged by parent-teacher associations to pay the salaries of teachers hired locally when demand for education exceeds official capacity. Public expenditure on education was at 16.4% of total government expenditure in the 2000&ndash;2007 period with per-pupil expenditure at the primary level at about US$57. As a result, primary school enrollment rates jumped from 63% in 2000 to 95% in 2005. Increased access has posed continuing challenges for quality, however, and Madagascar continues to have extremely high rates of grade repetition and student drop-out. Education policy in Ravalomananas second term focused on quality issues, including a reformed teacher training program to support the transition from traditional didactic instruction to student-centered teaching methods to boost student learning and participation in the classroom.( )SocietyEthnic diversityThe majority of the population of Madagascar is a mixture in varying degrees of Indonesian, Arab and Bantu settlers from Asia, the Peninsula and Africa, respectively.(Glenn Joseph Ames, Distant lands and diverse cultures: the French experience in Asia, 1600-1700, (Greenwood Publishing Group: 2003), p.101.) Years of intermarriages created the people, who primarily speak Malagasy, an Austronesian language with Bantu influences. Most of the genetic makeup of the average Malagasy, however, reflects an almost equal blend of Indonesian and Bantu influences.()LanguageThe language is of Malayo-Polynesian origin and is generally spoken throughout the island. The numerous dialects of Malagasy, which are generally mutually intelligible, can be clustered under one of two sub-groups: eastern Malagasy (spoken along the eastern forests and highlands, including the Merina dialect of Antananarivo) and western Malagasy, spoken across the western coastal plains.  French became the official language during the colonial period when Madagascar came under the authority of France. In the first national Constitution of 1958, Malagasy and French were named the official languages of the Malagasy Republic. Madagascar is a francophone country, and French is spoken among the educated population. English, although uncommon, has gradually become more widely spoken.No official languages were recorded in the Constitution of 1992, although Malagasy was identified as the national language. Nonetheless, many sources still claimed that Malagasy and French were official languages, eventually leading a citizen to initiate a legal case against the state in April 2000 on the grounds that the publication of official documents in the French language only was unconstitutional. The High Constitutional Court observed in its decision that, in the absence of a language law, French still had the character of an official language.() In the Constitution of 2007, Malagasy remained the national language while official languages were reintroduced: Malagasy, French, and English. English was removed as an official language from the constitution approved by voters in the November referendum 2010. The outcome of the referendum and its consequences for official and national language policy are not recognized by the political opposition or by the community, who cite lack of transparency and inclusiveness in the organization of the election by the Transitional Authority.()ReligionApproximately 50% of the countrys population practice traditional religion, which tends to emphasize links between the living and the dead. The Merina in the highlands particularly tend to hold tightly to this practice. A powerful individual may establish a fady (taboo) in his or her lifetime that all their descendents or those of community members will be required to respect well after their death, meaning that when traveling in Madagascar it is advisable to seek out village elders or authorities and inquire into local fady in order not to inadvertently transgress and offend the local population. This veneration of ancestors has also led to the tradition of tomb building and the famadihana, a practice whereby a deceased family members remains may be taken from the tomb to be periodically re-wrapped in fresh silk shrouds known as lamba before being replaced in the tomb.  The event is an occasion to celebrate the loved ones memory, reunite with family and community, and enjoy a festive atmosphere.  Residents of surrounding villages are often invited to attend the party, where food and rum are often served and a hiragasy troupe or other musical entertainment is typically present.File:Antsirabe - glise.JPG|thumb|Roman Catholic cathedral in AntsirabeAbout 45% of the Malagasy are Christian, divided almost evenly between Catholics and Protestants. In 1818 the Missionary Society sent the first Christian missionaries to successfully install themselves on the island, building churches, translating the Bible into Malagasy language and winning over numerous converts. Beginning in 1835 Queen I vigorously persecuted early converts to Christianity in an attempt to halt European cultural and political influence on the island.  In 1869 a successor, Queen II, converted the court to Christianity and encouraged Christian missionary activity, burning the sampy (royal idols) in a symbolic break with traditional beliefs.(Ade Ajayi (1989), p. 437) Today, many Christians integrate their religious beliefs with traditional ones relating to honoring the ancestors.  For instance, they may bless their dead at church before proceeding with traditional burial rites or invite a Christian minister to consecrate a famadihana reburial. Many of the Christian churches are influential in politics. The best example of this is the Malagasy Council of Churches comprising the four oldest and most prominent Christian denominations (Roman Catholic, of Jesus Christ in Madagascar, Lutheran, and Anglican).Eastern religions are also present on the island. Islam was first brought to the island in the Middle Ages by Arab and Somali Muslim traders who established several Islamic schools along the eastern coast. While the use of Arabic script and loan words and the adoption of Islamic astrology would spread across the island, the Islamic religion failed to take hold in all but a handful of southeastern coastal communities. Today, Muslims constitute 7% of the population of Madagascar and are largely concentrated in the northwestern provinces of Mahajanga and Antsiranana (Diego Suarez). Muslims are divided between those of Malagasy ethnicity, Indians, Pakistanis and Comorians. More recently, Hinduism was introduced to Madagascar through Gujarati people immigrating from the Saurashtra region of India in the late 19th century. Most Hindus in Madagascar speak Gujarati or Hindi.CultureMalagasy culture reflects a blend of Southeast Asian, Arab, African and European influences. Houses in Madagascar are typically four-sided with a peaked roof similar to those commonly seen in Asia, rather than the circular style of hut more commonly found in Eastern Africa. Malagasy architecture varies widely depending on locally available materials and practical needs. Most traditionally, homes are built from plant materials; this form of construction remains prevalent outside of the central Highlands and major urban areas.  In the Highlands, houses are most often two-story brick structures, occasionally with pillars supporting a front veranda. The orientation and interior layout of homes in traditional communities often followed certain cosmological norms.  This tradition has been increasingly abandoned over the past century, as has the use of traditional building materials among the upper classes for whom imported materials and foreign construction styles are associated with modernity and prestige.() Tombs are culturally significant in many regions and tend to utilize stone in their construction.(Acquier (1997), p.)The zebu (humped cattle), introduced to Madagascar by Bantu-speaking East African migrants around 1,000 years ago, have come to occupy an important place in traditional Malagasy culture. The animal can take on sacred importance and constitutes the wealth of the owner, a tradition originating on the African mainland.(Campbell (1993), pp. 111&ndash;148) Cattle rustling, originally a rite of passage for young men in the plains areas of Madagascar where the largest herds of cattle are kept, has become a dangerous and sometimes deadly criminal enterprise as herdsmen in the southwest attempt to defend their cattle with traditional spears against increasingly armed professional rustlers. Where African influences are strongest, as in the southern region around Tulear, wealth and social status are traditionally measured in cattle.(The Malagasy names for seasons, months, days, and coins are Arabic in origin, as is the practice of circumcision, the communal grain pool, and different forms of salutation. The Antaimoro people of southeastern Madagascar claim to be direct descendants of early Arab immigrants, and over at least the past five hundred years, the acclaimed ombiasy (astrologers) of this ethnic group have served as privileged counselors to the nobles of various communities across the island.The cuisine of Madagascar likewise reflects diverse influences from around the world. Rice forms the basis of every meal in most parts of Madagascar,(Sibree (1915), p.) which has the highest per capita rate of rice consumption in the world.(Yamagishi (2005), p. 32) The dishes prepared to accompany the rice vary depending on local availability of food products and are known as laoka. Many of these dishes reflect the culinary influences of Indian, Chinese, French and other arrivals to the island. A wide variety of snacks and street foods are eaten, particularly mofo (fritter or cake-like treats).(Espagne-Ravo (1997), p.) In the arid south and west, rice may be supplanted by cassava (yuca), sweet potatoes and corn and supplemented with curdled or fresh zebu milk.() Rum (toaka gasy) and betsabetsa are two forms of traditional spirits produced on the island. Wine and beer are also locally produced, as are cocoa, tea and coffee, the latter widely consumed throughout the island. Herbal teas, sodas and fruit juices are also popular drinks.(ArtsArtistic traditions on the island of Madagascar are highly diverse and distinctive. One of the islands foremost artistic traditions is that of its oratory as expressed in the forms of hainteny (poetry), kabary (public discourse) and ohabolana (proverbs).  An epic poem showcasing these traditions, the Ibonia, has been handed down over the centuries in several different forms across the island and offers insight into the diverse mythologies and beliefs of traditional Malagasy communities.() Storytelling and proverbs enabled traditional communities to express and preserve their histories and worldview and transmit it to future generations.  The supernatural is featured in many of these stories, including witchcraft, the intercession of god or the ancestors, and the existence of a variety of fantastical creatures. Chief among these are the vazimba, the supposed first inhabitants of Madagascar who have in popular memory been transformed into capricious spirits that, if angered, will interfere in the lives of the living.( )Madagascar has also developed a distinctive and rich musical heritage. The early Austronesian settlers brought with them the predecessor to the bamboo tube zither known as the valiha&mdash;considered the national instrument of Madagascar&mdash;as well as numerous other instruments that constitute the foundation of traditional music.() The influence of African musical tradition manifests in certain drumming and polyharmonic singing styles, particularly among the western and southern coastal communities, while the tendency toward minor chords in these regions reflects an Arab musical influence.(Randrianary (2001), p.) Europeans likewise contributed to Malagasy musical traditions, importing the guitar, accordion, piano and the instruments used in hiragasy performance including the violin, trumpet and clarinet.(McLeod (1977), pp. 189&ndash;215)Sport and recreationA number of traditional pastimes have emerged in Madagascar. Moraingy or lutte malgache, a type of hand-to-hand combat, is a popular spectator sport in coastal regions. It is traditionally practiced by men, but women have recently begun to participate. The wrestling of zebu is also practiced in many regions. In addition to sports, a wide variety of games are played. Fanorona is a board game that is associated with the Merina sovereigns and is widespread throughout the Highland regions. According to folk legend, the succession of King Andrianjaka after his father Ralambo was partially due to the unhealthy obsession that Andrianjakas older brother may have had with playing fanorona to the detriment of his other responsibilities.Western sports were introduced to Madagascar over the past two centuries. Football and rugby are especially popular. Ptanque, a French game similar to lawn bowling, is also widely played in urban areas and particularly throughout the Highlands. Madagascar has produced a world champion in ptanque.Scouting is popular among boys and girls alike and is represented in Madagascar by its own local association.See alsoNotesReferences* ************ ** ** * ** * ****** url  http://books.google.com/books?idglUjCHaOwyIC&printsecfrontcover&sourcegbs_ge_summary_r&cad0#vonepage&q&ffalse*** ***** * ****** **External links;Government*The Madagascar Government*Haute Autorite de Transition HAT of Madagascar*National Assembly of Madagascar*Ministry of Foreign Affairs of Madagascar*Embassies and Consulates**Canada Hungary Washington DC*Chief of State and Cabinet Members, from CIA;General information*Country Profile from News**Madagascar from UCB Libraries GovPubs***;News media*Madagascar Humanitarian news and analysis from IRIN United Nations*Madagascar news headline links from allAfrica.com;Ecology*Madagascars National Parks and Reserves official park website*Trouble in Lemur Land a professional 50 minute HD film about illegal rosewood logging in Madagascar and the impact on the silky sifaka lemur*Conservation International  Madagascar overview pages*Madagascar Wildlife Conservation (MWC) a Malagasy non-profit association that organises and pursues community-based conservations projects*New York Academy of Sciences Conserving Madagascar  Podcast by Helen Crowley*Madagascar conservation story*Journal Madagascar Conservation & Development*BBC Nature Madagascan wildlife: Discover what makes Madagascars wildlife so different from the rest of the world, and how evolution ran wild there. Facts, sounds and video.;Miscellaneous*The Madagascar Project, Project set up to help Malagasy communities tackle the causes and effects of poverty*Old maps of Madagascar by CEGET library (CNRS, France)*Azafady UK charity and Malagasy NGO working in southeast Madagascar to alleviate poverty, improve well-being and protect beautiful unique environments with the help of its award winning volunteering programmes.*Shama Foundation of Madagascar charitable organization providing scholarships for underprivileged students in Madagascar*Opinions of La Haute Cour Constitutionelle du Madagascar*Blue Ventures award winning not-for-profit organisation dedicated to facilitating projects and expeditions that enhance global marine conservation and research. Based in Andavadoaka, South West coast of Madagascar.*Foko-madagascar not-for-profit organization and Rising Voices grantee project dedicated to the use of ICT as a tool to promote sustainable development, especially combining human development and the protection of the environment.*The Palmarium reserve, is situated on the East coast of Madagascar.*Keelonga, keelonga is an organisation dedicated to assisting rural primary schools with infrastructures and teachers*The State of the Worlds Midwifery - Madagascar Country ProfileLat. and Long.  (Antananarivo)list  list  }}af:Madagaskarals:Madagaskaram:ang:Madaascarar:an:Madagascarfrp:Madagascrast:Madagascaraz:Madaqaskarbm:Madagaskarbn:bjn:Madagaskarzh-min-nan:Madagasikarabe:be-x-old:bcl:Madagaskarbo:bs:Madagaskarbr:Madagaskarbg:ca:Madagascarceb:Madagascarcs:Madagaskarcy:Madagascarda:Madagaskarde:Madagaskardv:nv:Madagsget:Madagaskarel:es:Madagascareo:Madagaskaroext:Madagascaleu:Madagaskarfa:hif:Madagascarfo:Madagaskarfr:Madagascarfy:Madagaskarga:Madagascargv:Madagascargag:Madagaskargd:Madagascargl:Madagascargu:hak:M-that-k-s-kko:hy:hi:hr:Madagaskario:Madagaskarilo:Madagascarbpy:id:Madagaskaria:Madagascarie:Madagascaros:is:Madagaskarit:Madagascarhe:jv:Madagaskarkn:pam:Madagascarka:ks:kk:kw:Madagaskarrw:Madagasikarisw:Madagaskakg:Malagasiht:Madagaskarku:Madagaskarmrj:ltg:Madagaskarsla:Madagascarialv:Madagaskaralb:Madagaskarlt:Madagaskaraslij:Madagascarli:Madagaskarln:Madagasikarilmo:Madagascarhu:Madagaszkrmk:mg:Madagasikaraml:mt:Madagaskarmr:arz:ms:Madagaskarmy:nah:Madagascarnl:Madagaskarnds-nl:Madagaskarja:pih:Madagascarno:Madagaskarnn:Madagaskarnov:Madagaskaroc:Madagascarom:Madagascaruz:Madagaskarpnb:pap:Madagascarps:pms:Madagascarnds:Madagaskarpl:Madagaskarpnt:pt:Madagscarcrh:Madagaskarty:Madagascarro:Madagascarqu:Madagaskarru:sah:se:Madagaskarsm:Madagascarsa:sg:Madagaskrasc:Madagascrsco:Madagascarstq:Madagaskarsq:Madagaskariscn:Madagascarsi:simple:Madagascarss:IMadagasikhask:Madagaskarsl:Madagaskarszl:Madagaskarso:Madagaskarckb:sr:sh:Madagaskarsu:Madagaskarfi:Madagaskarsv:Madagaskartl:Madagaskarta:tt:te:th:ti:tg:tr:Madagaskaruk:ur:ug:vec:Madagascarvi:Madagascarvo:Malagasenfiu-vro:Madagaskarzh-classical:war:Madagascarwo:Madagaskaarts:Madagascaryo:Madagskrzh-yue:diq:Madagaskarzea:Madahaskarbat-smg:Madagaskarszh:
19127
Mali
footnotes                Mali , officially the Republic of Mali (, ), is a country in Western Africa. Mali borders Algeria on the north, Niger on the east, Faso and the dIvoire on the south, Guinea on the south-west, and Senegal and Mauritania on the west. Its size is just over 1,240,000 km with a population of 14.5 million. Its capital is Bamako.Mali consists of eight regions and its borders on the north reach deep into the middle of the Sahara, while the countrys southern region, where the majority of inhabitants live, features the Niger and Sngal rivers. The countrys economic structure centers around agriculture and fishing. Some of Malis natural resources include gold, uranium, and salt.Present-day Mali was once part of three West African empires that controlled trade: the Empire, the Empire (from which Mali is named), and the Empire. In the late 19th century, during the for Africa, France seized control of Mali making it a part of Sudan. French Sudan (then known as the Sudanese Republic) joined with Senegal in 1959, achieving independence in 1960 as the Federation. Shortly thereafter, following Senegals withdrawal from the federation, the Sudanese Republic declared itself the independent Republic of Mali. After a long period of one-party rule, a 1991 coup led to the writing of a new constitution and the establishment of Mali as a democratic, multi-party state. About half the population live below the international poverty line of US$1.25 a day.(Human Development Indices, Table 3: Human and income poverty, p. 35. Retrieved on 1 June 2009)HistoryMali was once part of three famed West African empires which controlled trade in gold, salt, slaves, and other precious commodities.(Mali country profile, p. 1.) These kingdoms had neither rigid geopolitical boundaries nor rigid ethnic identities.( The earliest of these empires was the Empire, which was dominated by the Soninke, a Mande-speaking people.( The nation expanded throughout West Africa from the 8th century until 1078, when it was conquered by the Almoravids.(Mali country profile, p. 2.)File:MALI empire map.PNG|The extent of the Empires peak|thumb|leftFile:Timbuktu-manuscripts-astronomy-mathematics.jpg| The pages above are from Manuscripts written in Sudani script (a form of Arabic) from the Empire showing established knowledge of astronomy and mathematics. Today there are close to a million of these manuscripts found in Timbuktu alone.|thumb|leftThe Empire later formed on the upper River, and reached the height of power in the 14th century.( Under the Mali Empire, the ancient cities of Djenn and Timbuktu were centers of both trade and Islamic learning.(  The empire later declined as a result of internal intrigue, ultimately being supplanted by the Empire.( The Songhai people originated in current northwestern Nigeria. The Songhai had long been a major power in West Africa subject to the Mali Empires rule.(In the late 14th century, the Songhai gradually gained independence from the Mali Empire and expanded, ultimately subsuming the entire eastern portion of the Mali Empire.( The Songhai Empires eventual collapse was largely the result of a Moroccan invasion in 1591, under the command of Pasha.( The fall of the Songhai Empire marked the end of the regions role as a trading crossroads.( Following the establishment of sea routes by the European powers, the trans-Saharan trade routes lost significance.(One of the worst famines in the regions recorded history occurred in the 18th century. According to John Iliffe, The worst crises were in the 1680s, when famine extended from the Senegambian coast to the Upper Nile and many sold themselves for slaves, only to get a sustenance, and especially in 173856, when West Africas greatest recorded subsistence crisis, due to drought and locusts, reportedly killed half the population of Timbuktu.(John Iliffe (2007) Africans: the history of a continent. Cambridge University Press. p.69. ISBN 0521682975)In the colonial era, Mali fell under the control of the French beginning in the late 19th century.( By 1905, most of the area was under firm French control as a part of Sudan.( In early 1959, French Sudan (which changed its name to the Sudanese Republic) and Senegal united to become the Federation. The Mali Federation gained independence from France on 20 June 1960.( Senegal withdrew from the federation in August 1960, which allowed the Sudanese Republic to become the independent Republic of Mali on 22 September 1960. Keta was elected the first president.( Keta quickly established a one-party state, adopted an independent African and socialist orientation with close ties to the East, and implemented extensive nationalization of economic resources.(In November 1968, following progressive economic decline, the Keta regime was overthrown in a bloodless military coup led by Traor.(Mali country profile, p. 3.) The subsequent military-led regime, with Traor as president, attempted to reform the economy. However, his efforts were frustrated by political turmoil and a devastating drought between 1968 to 1974,( which killed thousands of people from famine.(Malis nomads face famine. BBC News. 9 August 2005.) The Traor regime faced student unrest beginning in the late 1970s and three coup attempts. However, the Traor regime repressed all dissenters until the late 1980s.(The government continued to attempt economic reforms, and the populace became increasingly dissatisfied.( In response to growing demands for multi-party democracy, the Traor regime allowed some limited political liberalization, but refused to usher in a full-fledged democratic system.( In 1990, cohesive opposition movements began to emerge, and was complicated by the turbulent rise of ethnic violence in the north following the return of many Tuaregs to Mali.(Anti-government protests in 1991 led to a coup, a transitional government, and a new constitution.( In 1992, Oumar Konar won Malis first democratic, multi-party presidential election. Upon his reelection in 1997, President Konar pushed through political and economic reforms and fought corruption. In 2002, he was succeeded in democratic elections by Toumani Tour, a retired general, who had been the leader of the military aspect of the 1991 democratic uprising.(Mali country profile, p. 4.)  Today, Mali is one of the most politically and socially stable countries in Africa.(USAID Africa: Mali. USAID. Last accessed: 15 May 2008. Retrieved on: 3 June 2008.)GeographyFile:Hand der Fatima.jpg|left|Landscape in Hombori|thumbMali is a landlocked nation in West Africa, located southwest of Algeria. It lies between latitudes 10 and 25N, and longitudes 13W and 5E.At , Mali is the worlds 24th-largest country and is comparable in size to South Africa or Angola. Most of the country lies in the southern Sahara, which produces a hot, dust-laden Sudanian savanna zone.(Mali country profile, p. 5.) Mali is mostly flat, rising to rolling northern plains covered by sand. The des Ifoghas lies in the northeast.The countrys climate ranges from tropical in the south to arid in the north.( Most of the country receives negligible rainfall; droughts are frequent.( Late June to early December is the rainy season. During this time, flooding of the Niger River is common, creating the Niger Delta.( The nation has considerable natural resources, with gold, uranium, phosphates, kaolinite, salt and limestone being most widely exploited. Mali faces numerous environmental challenges, including desertification, deforestation, erosion, and inadequate supplies of water.(Regions and cerclesMali is divided into eight regions (rgions) and one district.(Martin, p. 134.) Each region has a governor.(DiPiazza, p. 37.) Since Malis regions are very large, the country is subdivided into 49 cercles, 288 arrondissements and 703 communes.() Mayors and elected members of the city councils officiate the arrondissements.(The regions and districts are:*Gao*Kayes*Kidal*Koulikoro*Mopti*Sgou*Sikasso*Tombouctou (Timbuktu)*Bamako (capital district)Politics and governmentMali is a democracy governed by the Constitution of 12 January 1992, which was amended in 1999.( The constitution provides for a separation of powers among the executive, legislative, and judicial branches of government.(Mali country profile, p. 14.) The system of government can be described as semi-presidential.(Executive power is vested in a president, who is elected to a five-year term by suffrage and is limited to two terms.((Constitution of Mali, Art. 30.) The president serves as a of state and in chief of the armed forces.((Constitution of Mali, Art. 29 & 46.) A prime minister appointed by the president serves as head of government and in turn appoints the Council of Ministers.((Constitution of Mali, Art. 38.) The unicameral National Assembly is Malis sole legislative body, consisting of deputies elected to five-year terms.(Mali country profile, p. 15.)(Constitution of Mali, Art. 59 & 61.) Following the 2007 elections, the Alliance for Democracy and Progress held 113 of 160 seats in the assembly.( Kon, Denis. Mali: Rsultats dfinitifs des Lgislatives. Les Echos (Bamako) (13 August 2007). Retrieved on 24 June 2008.) The assembly holds two regular sessions each year, during which it debates and votes on legislation that has been submitted by a member or by the government.((Constitution of Mali, Art. 65.) Democracy-wise things looked positive after the local elections at the end of April 2009, though significant shortcomings and attempts at manipulation still existed. Malis constitution provides for an independent judiciary,((Constitution of Mali, Art. 81.) but the executive continues to exercise influence over the judiciary by virtue of power to appoint judges and oversee both judicial functions and law enforcement.( Malis highest courts are the Supreme Court, which has both judicial and administrative powers, and a separate Constitutional Court that provides judicial review of legislative acts and serves as an election arbiter.((Constitution of Mali, Art. 8394.) Various lower courts exist, though village chiefs and elders resolve most local disputes in rural areas.(Foreign relations and militaryFile:George Bush and Amadou Toumani Toure.jpg|Malian President Amadou Toumani Tour with former U.S. President W. Bush|thumbMalis foreign policy orientation has become increasingly pragmatic and pro-Western over time.(Mali country profile, p. 17.) Since the institution of a democratic form of government in 2002, Malis relations with the West in general and with the United States in particular have improved significantly.( Mali has a longstanding yet ambivalent relationship with France, a former colonial ruler.( Mali is active in regional organizations such as the Union.( Working to control and resolve regional conflicts, such as in dIvoire, Liberia, and Leone, is one of Malis major foreign policy goals.( Mali feels threatened by the potential for the spillover of conflicts in neighboring states, and relations with those neighbors are often uneasy.( General insecurity along borders in the north, including cross-border banditry and terrorism, remain troubling issues in regional relations.(Malis military forces consist of an army, which includes land forces and air force,(CIA  The World Factbook  Mali)  as well as the paramilitary Gendarmerie and Republican Guard, all of which are under the control of Malis Ministry of Defense and Veterans, headed by a civilian.(Mali country profile, p. 18.) The military is underpaid, poorly equipped, and in need of rationalization.( Organization has suffered from the incorporation of Tuareg irregular forces into the regular military following a 1992 agreement between the government and Tuareg rebel forces.( The military has generally kept a low profile since the democratic transition of 1992. The incumbent president, Toumani Tour, is a former army general and as such reportedly enjoys widespread military support.( In the annual human rights report for 2003, the U.S. Department of State rated civilian control of security forces as generally effective but noted a few instances in which elements of the security forces acted independently of government authority..( Western powers such as the United States have also helped Malis military with training and equipment.()()EconomyFile:Kati market street (and Amadu).jpg|thumb|left|Market scene in KatiMali is one of the poorest countries in the world.() The average workers annual salary is approximately US$1,500.( Between 1992 and 1995, Mali implemented an economic adjustment program that resulted in economic growth and a reduction in financial imbalances. The program increased social and economic conditions, and led to Mali joining the Trade Organization on 31 May 1995.() The gross domestic product (GDP) has risen since. In 2002, the GDP amounted to US$3.4 billion,(Mali country profile, p. 9.) and increased to US$5.8 billion in 2005,() which amounts to an approximately 17.6% annual growth rate.Malis key industry is agriculture. Cotton is the countrys largest crop export and is exported west throughout Senegal and the Ivory Coast.()(Cavendish, p. 1367.) During 2002, 620,000 tons of cotton were produced in Mali but cotton prices declined significantly in 2003.((  In addition to cotton, Mali produces rice, millet, corn, vegetables, tobacco, and tree crops. Gold, livestock and agriculture amount to eighty percent of Malis exports.( Eighty percent of Malian workers are employed in agriculture while fifteen percent work in the service sector.( However, seasonal variations lead to regular temporary unemployment of agricultural workers.(May, p. 291.) Malis resource in livestock consists of millions of cattle, sheep, and goats. Approximately 40% of Malis herds were lost during the drought in 197274.(Mali. U.S. Department of State.)In 1991, with the assistance of the Development Association, Mali relaxed the enforcement of mining codes which led to renewed foreign interest and investment in the mining industry.(Campbell, p. 43.) Gold is mined in the southern region and Mali has the third highest gold production in Africa (after South Africa and Ghana).(  The emergence of gold as Malis leading export product since 1999 has helped mitigate some of the negative impact of the cotton and Cte dIvoire crises.(African Development Bank, p. 186.) Other natural resources include kaolin, salt, phosphate, and limestone.(Electricity and water are maintained by the Energie du Mali, or EDM, and textiles are generated by Industry Textile du Mali, or ITEMA.(  Mali has made efficient use of hydroelectricity, consisting of over half of Malis electrical power. In 2002, 700 GWh of hydroelectric power were produced in Mali.(The Malian government participates in foreign involvement, concerning commerce and privatization. Mali underwent economic reform, beginning in 1988 by signing agreements with the Bank and the Monetary Fund.( During 1988 to 1996, Malis government largely reformed public enterprises. Since the agreement, sixteen enterprises were privatized, twelve partially privatized, and twenty liquidated.( In 2005, the Malian government conceded a railroad company to the Savage Corporation.( Two major companies, Societ de Telecommunications du Mali (SOTELMA) and the Cotton Ginning Company (CMDT), are expected to be privatized in 2008.(Mali is a member of the for the Harmonization of Business Law in Africa (OHADA).()Demographics- Bozo girl in Bamako.jpg|thumb|right|upright|A Bozo girl in BamakoIn July 2009, Malis population was an estimated 14.5 million. The population is predominantly rural (68% in 2002), and 510% of Malians are nomadic.(Mali country profile, p. 6.) More than 90% of the population lives in the southern part of the country, especially in Bamako, which has over 1 million residents.(In 2007, about 48% of Malians were less than fifteen years old, 49% were 1564 years old, and 3% were 65 and older.( The median age was 15.9 years.( The rate in 2007 was 49.6 births per 1,000, and the fertility rate was 7.4 children per woman.( The rate in 2007 was 16.5 deaths per 1,000.( expectancy at birth was 49.5 years total (47.6 for males and 51.5 for females).( Mali has one of the worlds highest rates of mortality,( with 106 deaths per 1,000 live births in 2007.(Malis population encompasses a number of sub-Saharan ethnic groups, most of which have historical, cultural, linguistic, and religious commonalities.( The Bambara () are by far the largest single ethnic group, making up 36.5% of the population.( Collectively, the Bambara, Sonink, Khassonk, and Malink, all part of the broader Mand group, constitute 50% of Malis population.( Other significant groups are the Fula (; ) (17%), Voltaic (12%), Songhai (6%), and Tuareg and Moor (10%).( Mali historically has enjoyed reasonably good inter-ethnic relations; however, some hereditary servitude relationships exist,(Kayaking to Timbuktu, Writer Sees Slave Trade. National Geographic News. 5 December 2002.)(Kayaking to Timbuktu, Original National Geographic Adventure Article discussing Slavery in Mali. National Geographic Adventure. December 2002/January 2003.) as do ethnic tensions between the Songhai and the Tuareg.( Over the past 40 years, persistent drought has forced many Tuareg to give up their nomadic way of life.(Drought Forces Desert Nomads to Settle Down. NPR: National Public Radio. 2 July 2007.)Malis official language is French, but numerous (40 or more) languages also are widely used by the various ethnic groups.( About 80% of Malis population can communicate in Bambara, which is the countrys principal franca and marketplace language.(ReligionbarsAn estimated 90% of Malians are Muslim (mostly Sunni and Sufi), approximately 5% are Christian (about two-thirds Roman Catholic and one-third Protestant) and the remaining 5% adhere to indigenous or traditional animist beliefs.(International Religious Freedom Report 2008: Mali) Atheism and agnosticism are believed to be rare among Malians, most of whom practice their religion on a daily basis.( Islam as practiced in Mali is moderate, tolerant, and adapted to local conditions; relations between Muslims and practitioners of minority religious faiths are generally amicable.( The constitution establishes a state and provides for of religion, and the government largely respects this right.(Health and educationMali faces numerous health challenges related to poverty, malnutrition, and inadequate hygiene and sanitation.(http://lcweb2.loc.gov/frd/cs/profiles/Mali.pdf, p. 7.) Malis health and development indicators rank among the worst in the world.( In 2000, only 6265 percent of the population was estimated to have access to safe drinking water and only 69 percent to sanitation services of some kind.(  In 2001, the general government expenditures on health totaled about US$4 per capita at an average exchange rate.(http://lcweb2.loc.gov/frd/cs/profiles/Mali.pdf Mali country profile, p. 8.) Medical facilities in Mali are very limited, and medicines are in short supply.( Malaria and other arthropod-borne diseases are prevalent in Mali, as are a number of diseases such as cholera and tuberculosis.( Malis population also suffers from a high rate of child malnutrition and a low rate of immunization.(  An estimated 1.9 percent of the adult and children population was afflicted with HIV/AIDS that year, among the lowest rates in Africa.(File:Lycens kati.jpg|High school students in Kati, Mali|thumbPublic education in Mali is in principle provided free of charge and is compulsory for nine years between the ages of seven and sixteen.( The system encompasses six years of primary education beginning at age seven, followed by six years of secondary education.( However, Malis actual primary school enrollment rate is low, in large part because families are unable to cover the cost of uniforms, books, supplies, and other fees required to attend.( In the 200001 school year, the primary school enrollment rate was 61% (71% of males and 51% of females); in the late 1990s, the secondary school enrollment rate was 15% percent (20% of males and 10% of females).( The education system is plagued by a lack of schools in rural areas, as well as shortages of teachers and materials.( Estimates of literacy rates in Mali range from 2730% to 46.4%, with literacy rates significantly lower among women than men.(According to the World Health Organization in 2001 an estimated 91.6% of Malis girls and women have had some form of genital cutting performed on them.(http://www.who.int/reproductivehealth/topics/fgm/prevalence/en/index.html)CultureFile:Amadou & Mariam.jpg|Malian musical duo et Mariam are known internationally for their music combining Malian and international influences.|thumbMalian musical traditions are derived from the griots, who are known as Keeper of Memories.(Michelle Crabill and Bruce Tiso. Mali Resource Website. Fairfax County Public Schools. January 2003. Retrieved on 4 June 2008.)Malian music is diverse and has several different genres. Some famous Malian influences in music are kora virtouso musician Diabat, the late roots and blues guitarist Farka Tour, the Tuareg band Tinariwen, and several Afro-pop artists such as Keita, the duo et Mariam, Sangare, and Koit.Though Malis literature is less famous than its music,(Velton, p. 29.) Mali has always been one of Africas liveliest intellectual centers.(  Malis literary tradition is passed mainly by word of mouth, with jalis reciting or singing histories and stories known by heart.(Milet & Manaud, p. 128.)(Velton, p. 28.)  Hampt B, Malis best-known historian, spent much of his life writing these oral traditions down for the world to remember.( The best-known novel by a Malian writer is Ouologuems Le devoir de violence, which won the 1968 Renaudot but whose legacy was marred by accusations of plagiarism.((  Other well-known Malian writers include Baba Traor, Modibo Sounkalo Keita, Makan Diabat, Konat, and Dabo Sissoko.((The varied everyday culture of Malians reflects the countrys ethnic and geographic diversity.(Pye-Smith & Drisdelle, p. 13.)  Most Malians wear flowing, colorful robes called boubous that are typical of West Africa. Malians frequently participate in traditional festivals, dances, and ceremonies.( Rice and millet are the staples of Malian cuisine, which is heavily based on cereal grains.(Velton, p. 30.)( Grains are generally prepared with sauces made from leaves such spinach or baobab leaves, with tomato, or with peanut sauce, and may be accompanied by pieces of grilled meat (typically chicken, mutton, beef, or goat).((Milet & Manaud, p. 146.) Malian cuisine varies regionally.((Sportsfootball.jpg|thumb|right|Malian children playing football in a Dogon village. Modibo Keita2.JPG|thumb|A football stadium in Bamako. The most popular sport in Mali is football (soccer),(Milet & Manaud, p. 151.)(DiPiazza, p. 55.) which became more prominent after Mali hosted the African Cup of Nations.((Hudgens et al., p. 320.) Most towns have regular games;( the most popular teams nationally are AC, Malien, and Bamako, all based in the capital.( Informal games are often played by youths using a bundle of rags as a ball.(The country has produced notable players for French teams, including Salif Keita and Tigana. Frdric Fredi Kanout, named 2007 African Footballer of the Year, currently plays for FC in Spains Liga. Diarra, the captain of the Mali national team, played for Real Madrid for four seasons before moving to Monaco FC and Seydou Keita plays for Barcelona. Other notable players currently on European squads include, Sidibe (City), Sissoko (Juventus), Traore (Paris Saint-Germain), Coulibaly (AJ Auxerre), Cisse, Kebe (F.C.), Traor (Lokomotiv Moscow),(( Garra Dembele (Levski Sofia) and others.Basketball is another major sport;((Malian Men Basketball. Africabasket.com. Retrieved 3 June 2008.) the womens national basketball team, led by Maiga, competed at the 2008 Olympics.(Chitunda, Julio. Ruiz looks to strengthen Mali roster ahead of Beijing. FIBA.com (13 March 2008). Retrieved 24 June 2008.) Traditional wrestling (la lutte) is also somewhat common, though popularity has declined in recent years.(  The game wari, a mancala variant, is a common pastime.(FashionMali launched its first ever Fashion Week in 2011.  On July 28, 2011 at a press conference(Video footage from Mali Fashion Week press conference held at the United Nations (28 July 2011) - http://www.societyhae.com/profiles/blogs/mali-fashion-week) held at the United Nations representatives from Mali and fashion label BEBENOIR announced the inaugural Mali Fashion Week will take place December 12, 2011 through December 18, 2011 at the Musee Du Mali in Bamako, the capital city of Mali.  Mali Fashion Week showcases the lines of international fashion designers.See also*passport*rights in MaliNotesFurther reading* *** Constitution of Mali.  A student-translated English version is also available.** Hudgens, Jim, Richard Trillo, and Nathalie Calonnec. The Rough Guide to West Africa. Guides (2003). ISBN 1-84353-118-6.* Mali country profile. of Congress Research Division (January 2005). This article incorporates text from this source, which is in the domain.* **Mwakikagile, Godfrey. Military Coups in West Africa Since The Sixties, Huntington, New York: Nova Science Publishers, 2001.* Milet, Eric & Jean-Luc Manaud. Mali. Editions Olizane (2007). ISBN 2-88086-351-1. * Moseley, W.G. 2007.  Mali. Encyclopedia of Environment and Society. Edited by Paul Robbins. Sage Publications. Volume 3, pgs 10851086.* Pye-Smith, Charlie & Rhal Drisdelle. Mali: A Prospect of Peace? Oxfam (1997). ISBN 0-85598-334-5.* Velton, Ross. Mali. Bradt Travel Guides (2004). ISBN 1-84162-077-7.External links******Mali Fashion Week Press Conference at United Nations.list ace:Maliaf:Malials:Maliam:ar:an:Maliarc:frp:Maliast:Malaz:Malibjn:Malibm:Malibn:zh-min-nan:Malibe:be-x-old:bcl:Malibo:bs:Malibr:Malibg:ca:Malicv:ceb:Malics:Malicy:Malida:Malide:Malidv:dsb:Maliet:Maliel:es:Maleo:Malioext:Malieu:Maliee:Malifa:hif:Malifo:Malifr:Malify:Malyff:Maaliga:Mailgv:Maleegag:Maligd:Mili- Maliko:ha:Malihy:hi:hsb:Malihr:Maliio:Maliilo:Malibpy:id:Maliia:Maliie:Malios:is:Malit:Malihe:jv:Malipam:Malika:kk:kw:Malirw:Malisw:Malikg:Maliht:Maliku:Malla:Maliumlv:Malilb:Malilt:Malislij:Malili:Maliln:Malilmo:Malihu:Malimk:ml:mt:Malimr:arz:ms:Malimy:nah:Malimrj:nl:Mali,  ja:pih:Maalino:Malinn:Malinov:Malioc:Maliuz:Malipnb:pap:Malips:pms:Malinds:Malipl:Malipt:Malicrh:Maliro:Maliqu:Maliru:sah:se:Malisa:sg:Malisc:Malisco:Malistq:Malist:Malisq:Maliscn:Malisi:simple:Maliss:IMalisk:Malisl:Maliszl:Maliso:Maalickb:sr:sh:Malifi:Malisv:Mali(bansa)ta:kab:Malitt:th:ti:tg:tr:Malitk:Maliuk:ur:ug:vec:Mavi:Malivo:Maliynfiu-vro:Maliwar:Maliwo:Maliwuu:ts:Maliyo:Mlzh-yue:diq:Malibat-smg:Maliszh:
19276
Economy_of_Mongolia
cianame          mgEconomic activity in Mongolia has traditionally been based on agriculture and the breeding of livestock. Mongolia also has extensive mineral deposits: copper, coal, molybdenum, tin, tungsten, and gold account for a large part of industrial production. Soviet assistance, at its height one-third of GDP, disappeared almost overnight in 199091, at the time of the of the Soviet Union (19851991). Mongolia was driven into deep recession, which was prolonged by the Peoples Revolutionary Partys (MPRP) reluctance to undertake serious reform. The Union Coalition (DUC) government, 19962000, has embraced free-market economics, easing controls, liberalizing domestic and trade, and attempting to restructure the system and the energy sector. Major domestic privatization programs have been undertaken, as well as fostering of direct investment through international tender of the oil distribution company, a leading wool company, and banks. Reform has been held back by the ex-communist MPRP opposition and by the political instability brought about through four successive governments under the DUC. growth picked up in 199799 after stalling in 1996 due to a series of disasters and increases in world prices of copper and cashmere. Public revenues and exports collapsed in 1998 and 1999 due to the repercussions of the financial crisis. In August and September 1999, the economy suffered from a temporary Russian ban on exports of oil and oil products. Mongolia joined the Trade Organization (WTO) in 1997.(Montsame News Agency.  Mongolia.  2006, Foreign Service Office of News Agency, ISBN 9992906278, p. 72) The international donor community pledged over $300 million per year at the last Consultative Group Meeting, held in Ulaanbaatar in June 1999.Communist eraThe rapid political changes of 199091 marked the beginning of Mongolias efforts to develop a economy, but these efforts have been complicated and disrupted by the dissolution and continuing deterioration of the economy of the former Union. Prior to 1991, 80% of Mongolias trade was with the Soviet Union, and 15% was with other for Mutual Economic Assistance (CMEA) countries. Mongolia was heavily dependent upon the former Soviet Union for fuel, medicine, and spare parts for its factories and power plants.The former Soviet Union served as the primary market for Mongolian industry. In the 1980s, Mongolias industrial sector became increasingly important. By 1989, it accounted for an estimated 34% of material products, compared to 18% from agriculture. However, minerals, animals, and animal-derived products still constitute a large proportion of the countrys exports. Principal imports included machinery, petroleum, cloth, and building materials.In the late 1980s, the government began to improve links with non-communist Asia and the West, and  in Mongolia developed. As of January 1, 1991, Mongolia and the former Soviet Union agreed to conduct bilateral trade in currency at world prices.Despite its external trade difficulties, Mongolia has continued to press ahead with reform. Privatization of small shops and enterprises has largely been completed in the 1990s, and most prices have been freed. Privatization of large state enterprises has begun. reforms also have begun, and the barter and official exchange rates were unified in late 1991.Transition to a market economyBetween 1990 and 1993, Mongolia suffered triple-digit inflation, rising unemployment, shortages of basic goods, and food rationing. During that period, economic output contracted by one-third. As market reforms and private enterprise took hold, economic growth began again in 199495. Unfortunately, since this growth was fueled in part by over-allocation of bank credit, especially to the remaining state-owned enterprises, economic growth was accompanied by a severe weakening of the banking sector. GDP grew by about 6% in 1995, thanks largely to a boom in copper prices. Average real economic growth leveled off to about 3.5% in 199699 due to the financial crisis, the Russian financial crisis, and worsening commodity prices, especially copper and gold.Mongolias domestic product (GDP) growth fell from 3.2% in 1999 to 1.3% in 2000. The decline can be attributed to the loss of 2.4 million livestock in bad weather and natural disasters in 2000. Prospects for development outside the traditional reliance on nomadic, livestock-based agriculture are constrained by Mongolias landlocked location and lack of basic infrastructure. Mongolias best hope for accelerated growth is to attract more foreign investment. Since 1990, more than 1,500 foreign companies from 61 countries have invested a total of $338.3 million in Mongolia. By 2003 private companies made up 70% of Mongolian GDP and 80% of exports.(Montsame News Agency.  Mongolia.  2006, Foreign Service Office of News Agency, ISBN 9992906278, p. 67)Crisis to present dayMongolias reliance on trade with China meant that the worldwide financial crisis hit hard,(  ) severely stunting the growth of its economy. With the sharp decrease in metal prices, especially copper (down 65% from July 2008-February 2009,( exports of its raw materials withered and by 2009 the market MSE Top-20 registered an all-time low since its dramatic spike in mid-2007.(  ) Just as the economy started to recover, Mongolia was hit by a Dzud over the winter period of 2009-2010, causing many livestock to perish and thus severely affecting cashmere production which accounts for a further 7% of the countrys export revenues.( According to the World Bank and International Monetary Fund estimates, real GDP growth reduced from 8% to 2.7% in 2009, and exports shrunk 26% from $2.5Bn to $1.9Bn after a promisingly steady increase up until 2008.(  Because of this, it was projected that between 20,000 and 40,000 fewer Mongolians (0.7% and 1.4% of the population respectively) will be lifted out of poverty, than would have been the case without the global financial crisis. In late 2009 and the beginning of 2010, however, the market has begun to recover once again. Having identified and learnt from its previous economic instabilities, legislative reform and a tightened fiscal policy promises to guide the country onwards and upwards. In February 2010, foreign assets were recorded at USD1,569,449 million.(  ) New trade agreements are being formed and foreign investors are keeping a close eye on the Asian Wolf.Mining is the principal industrial activity in Mongolia, making up 30% of all Mongolian industry.(Montsame News Agency.  Mongolia.  2006, Foreign Service Office of News Agency, ISBN 9992906278, p. 82)  Another important industry is the production of cashmere.  Mongolia is the worlds second largest producer of cashmere, with the main company, Gobi Cashmere, accounting for 21% of world cashmere production as of 2006.(Montsame News Agency.  Mongolia.  2006, Foreign Service Office of News Agency, ISBN 9992906278, p. 86)The Wolf EconomyThe term was notably coined by Renaissance Capital  in their report - Mongolias Blue Sky Opportunity. They state that Mongolia is set to become the new Tiger, or Mongolian Wolf as they prefer, and are unstoppable.(  ) With the recent developments in the mining industry and foreign interest increasing at an astonishing rate, it is claimed their Wolf Economy looks ready to pounce. The terms aggressive title mirrors the countrys attitude in the capital market environment, and with newfound mineral prospects it has the chance to retain its title as the fastest growing economy in the region.BanksThe banking sector is highly concentrated, with four banks holding a significant majority market share:*XacBank - XacBank is a community development bank and microfinance institution headquartered in Ulaanbaatar, with a nation-wide network of 78 offices and 969 staff as of Jan 2010.*Bank - Khan Bank has 21 regional branch offices throughout the country, each of which supervises an additional 15 to 25 smaller branches in its area.*Bank - Golomt Bank started in 1995 and now manages around 23% of the assets in the domestic banking system.*Trade and Development Bank - TDB was formed in 1990 and is thus the oldest bank in Mongolia. It has a network of 28 branches and settlement centers, 60 ATMs, 1300 POS terminals, and Internet/SMS banking throughout the country.(  )Investment banksWith a strengthening capital market environment, many foreign and local investment institutions have begun to establish themselves in Mongolia. The most prominent local agencies include: Investment Bank, BDSEC, MICC, and Frontier, with many other international players taking a keen interest.EnvironmentAs a result of rapid urbanization and industrial growth policies under the communist regime, Mongolias deteriorating environment has become a major concern. The burning of soft coal coupled with thousands of factories in Ulaanbaatar and a sharp increase in individual motorization has resulted in severe pollution. Deforestation, overgrazed pastures, and, less recently, efforts to increase grain and hay production by plowing up more virgin land have increased soil erosion from wind and rain.Other statisticsHousehold income or consumption by percentage share:* lowest 10%: 2.1%* highest 10%: 37% (1995)Distribution of family income - index:44 (1998)Agriculture - products:wheat, barley, vegetables, forage crops, sheep, goats, cattle, camels, horsesIndustries:construction and construction materials; mining (coal, copper, molybdenum, fluorspar, and gold); food and beverages; processing of animal products, cashmere and natural fiber manufacturingIndustrial production growth rate:3% (2006 est.)Electricity:* production: 3.43 TWh (2006 est.)* consumption: 2.94 TWh (2006 est.)* exports: 15.95 GWh (2006 est.)* imports: 125 GWh (2006 est.)Electricity - production by source:* fossil fuel: 100%* hydro: 0%* other: 0% (2001)* nuclear: 0%Oil:* production:  (2006 est.)* consumption:  (2006 est.)* exports:  (2006 est.)* imports:  (2006 est.)Exports - commodities:copper, apparel, livestock, animal products, cashmere, wool, hides, fluorspar, other metalsImports - commodities:machinery and equipment, fuel, cars, food products, industrial consumer goods, chemicals, building materials, sugar, teaExchange rates:tgrgs/tugriks per US dollar: 1,179.6 (2006), 1,205 (2005), 1,187.17 (2004), 1,171 (2003), 1,110.31 (2002), 1,097.7 (2001), 1,076.67 (2000)See also* in MongoliaReferences  External links *   Official site of the Ministry of Finance*    Official government site of the Bank of Mongolia - the central bank* Mongolia World Factbookde MongliaMongolskade Mongoliade la Mongoliede Mongoliadi Mongoliagazdasgade Mongoliada MongliaMongoliei
19574
Monitor
Monitor may refer to:Computers* monitor, a screen that displays output from a computer.* (synchronization), an approach to synchronize two or more computer tasks that use a shared resource* code monitor, programming allowing users to view or change memory locations on a computer* Virtual Machine Monitor, software which virtualizes a computer hardware platform, allowing multiple system images to run simultaneously.Medical applications* monitor, an electronic device that measures the heart rate* Oxygen monitor, an electronic device that measures the amount of oxygen in the blood* monitor, automated medical device that senses and displays a patients vital signs Place names* Indiana, town in the United States* Oregon, unincorporated community in the United States* California, formerly MonitorMedia* Monitor (TV series), a BBC arts programme which aired from 1958 to 1965* Monitor (NBC Radio), an NBC Radio program which aired from 1955 to 1975* Monitor (Polish newspaper), an 18th-century Polish newspaper* Monitor (magazine), a weekly newsmagazine published in Podgorica, Montenegro* Monitor, a daily newspaper in New Hampshire, USA* (comics), a DC comics character Audio and music production * monitors, loudspeakers designed specifically for audio production and engineering* Stage monitors or (sound engineering), loudspeakers for performers on stage* monitors, earpieces for performers on stage or in a studioOther meanings* Group, a management consulting firm* (warship), a heavily armed warship design preceding the battleship* USS Monitor, a monitor of the United States Navy* Water jet used in mining* monitor, a water jet used for firefighting* (NHS), a United Kingdom government agency also known as the Independent Regulator for NHS Foundation Trusts* lizard, any lizard of the family Varanidae* monitor, a student who supervises the corridors of a schoolSee also* * * Monitor (disambiguation)* Monitors (disambiguation)* (disambiguation)be:ca:Monitorcs:Monitorda:Monitorde:Monitoret:Monitores:Monitoreo:Monitorofr:Moniteurko:hsb:Monitorhr:Monitorid:Monitorit:Monitorhe:la:Monitorms:Monitornl:Monitorja:no:Monitorpl:Monitor(desambiguao)ru:simple:Monitorsk:Monitor(razvrstavanje)sv:Monitortl:Monitorth:()ur:vo:Monitor
19978
Montana
 Website              www.mt.govMontana  is a state in the United States. The western third of Montana contains numerous mountain ranges. Smaller, ranges are found in the central third of the state, for a total of 77 named ranges of the Mountains. This geographical fact is reflected in the states name, derived from the Spanish word  (mountain). Montana has several nicknames, none official,() including: The Treasure State and Big Sky Country, and slogans that include Land of the Shining Mountains and more recently, The Last Best Place.()()  The state ranks fourth in area, but 44th in population, and accordingly has the third-lowest density in the United States.() The economy is primarily based on services, with ranching, wheat farming, oil and coal mining in the east, and lumber, tourism, and hard rock mining in the west.() Millions of tourists annually visit Glacier National Park, the Bighorn Battlefield National Monument, and three of the five entrances to National Park.()GeographyWith a land area of  Montana is slightly larger than Japan and slightly smaller than Paraguay. It is the fourth largest state in the United States (after Alaska, Texas, and California), the largest landlocked U.S. state, and the 56th largest national state/province subdivision in the world. To the north, Montana shares a  border with three Canadian provinces: Columbia, Alberta, and Saskatchewan. To the east, the state borders Dakota and Dakota. To the south lies Wyoming and to the west and southwest is Idaho.The topography of the state is diverse, and roughly defined by the Divide, which runs on an approximate diagonal line through the state from northwest to south-central, splitting it into two distinct eastern and western regions.  Montana is well known for its mountainous western region, most of which is geologically and geographically part of the Northern Mountains.  The Absaroka and Beartooth ranges in the south are technically part of the Central Rocky Mountains. About 60% of the state is prairie, part of the northern Plains. Nonetheless, even east of the Divide and the Mountain Front, there are a number of isolated island ranges that dot the prairie landscape. This island range region covers most of the central third of the state.The Mountainsone of the longest continuous ranges in the entire Rocky Mountain chain from Alaska to Mexicodivide the state from Idaho to the west, with the southern third of the range blending into the Continental Divide. Mountain ranges between the Bitterroots and the top of the Continental Divide include the Mountains, the Range (informally called the Pintlars), the Missions, the Range, Mountains, and Creek Range.The northern section of the Divide, where the mountains give way rapidly to prairie, is known collectively as the Mountain Front. The front is most pronounced in the Range, located primarily in Glacier National Park. Due to the configuration of mountain ranges in Glacier National Park, the Divide (which begins in Alaskas Peninsula) crosses this region and turns east in Montana at Triple Divide Peak. It causes the River, Belly, and Saint Mary rivers to flow north into Alberta, Canada. There they join the River, which ultimately empties into Bay.East of the divide, several parallel ranges march across the southern half of the state, including the Range, the Tobacco Roots, the Range, Range, Belt Mountains, Bridger Mountains, Mountains, and the Mountains. The Beartooth Plateau is the largest continuous land mass over  high in the continental United States.  It contains the highest point in the state, Granite Peak,  high.File:Glacier np.jpg|thumb|left|300px|Mary Lake in Glacier National ParkBetween the mountain ranges are many scenic valleys, rich in agricultural resources and rivers, and possessing multiple opportunities for tourism and recreation. Among the best-known areas are the Big Hole Valley, Valley, Valley, Flathead Valley, and Paradise Valley.East and north of this transition zone are expansive, sparsely populated Northern Plains, with rolling tableland prairies, island mountain ranges, and scenic badlands extending into the Dakotas and Wyoming, as well as Alberta and Saskatchewan, Canada. The isolated island ranges east of the Divide include the Bear Paw Mountains, Castle Mountains, Mountains, Highwood Mountains, Judith Mountains, Belt Mountains, Little Rocky Mountains, Mountains, Grass Hills, Mountains, the Mountains south of Billings, andin the southeastern corner of the state near Ekalakathe Pines.The area east of the divide in the north-central portion of the state is known for the Missouri Breaks and other significant formations. Three stately buttes south of Great Falls are familiar landmarks. The three: Square, Shaw, and Crown buttes, are made of rock, which is dense and has withstood weathering for many years. The underlying surface consists of shale. Many areas around these buttes are covered with clay surface soils, which have been derived from the weathering of the Formation. Farther east, areas such as State Park near Glendive and Rocks State Park near Ekalaka also highlight some of the most scenic badlands regions in the state.The Creek Formation is a major source of dinosaur fossils. Paleontologist Jack Horner, of the of the Rockies in Bozeman, brought this formation to the worlds attention with several major finds.RiversMontana also contains numerous rivers, many of which are known for blue-ribbon trout fishing, while also providing most of the water needed by residents of the state, and hydropower.  Montana is one of few geographic areas in the world whose rivers form parts of three major watersheds (i.e. where two divides intersect). Its rivers feed the Ocean, the of Mexico, and Bay, and the watershed areas are divided atop Triple Divide Peak in Glacier National Park.River breaks.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Missouri Breaks region in central MontanaWest of the divide, the Clark Fork of the Columbia (not to be confused with the Clarks Fork of the Yellowstone River) rises in the Rocky Mountains near Butte and flows northwest to Missoula, where it is joined by the Blackfoot River and River, and further downstream by the River, before entering Idaho near Pend Oreille. There it meets the River, which flows to the Ocean. The Clark Fork discharges the greatest volume of water of any river exiting the state. The Flathead and Kootenai rivers also drain major portions of the western half of the state.East of the divide, the Riverformed by the confluence of the Jefferson, Madison, and Gallatin riverscrosses the central part of the state, flows through the Missouri breaks and enters Dakota. The River rises in Yellowstone Park in Wyoming, flows north to Montana, where it then turns east and flows through Billings, continuing across the state until it joins the Missouri River a few miles east of the North Dakota boundary. The Yellowstone River is the longest undammed, free-flowing river in the contiguous United States. Other major Montana tributaries of the Missouri include the Milk, Marias, Tongue, and Musselshell rivers. Montana claims the disputed title of possessing the worlds shortest river, the River, just outside Falls, Montana. Through the Missouri, these rivers ultimately join the River and flow into the of Mexico.The Divide turns east in Montana at Triple Divide Peak. It causes the River, Belly, and Saint Mary rivers to flow north into Alberta, Canada. There they join the River, which ultimately empties into Bay.In addition to its rivers, the state is home to Lake, the largest natural fresh-water lake in the western United States. Man-made reservoirs dot Montanas rivers, the largest of which is Peck Reservoir, on the Missouri river, contained by the largest earthen dam in the world.File:Popi ownpillar.jpg|left|300px|thumb|Pillar National MonumentFloraVegetation of the state includes pine, pine; fir, larch, spruce; aspen, birch, red cedar, hemlock, ash, alder; rocky mountain maple and cottonwood trees. Forests cover approximately 25 percent of the state. Flowers native to Montana include asters, bitterroots, daisies, lupins, poppies, primroses, columbine, lilies, orchids, and dryads. Several species of sagebrush and cactus and many species of grasses are common. Many species of mushrooms and lichens are also found in the state.FaunaMontana is home to a diverse array of fauna that includes 15 amphibian, 85 fish, 110 mammal, 17 reptile and 420 bird species.()  Additionally, there are over 10,000 invertebrate species, including 180 mollusks and 30 crustaceans.ParksMontana contains Glacier National Park, The Crown of the Continent; and portions of National Park, including three of the Parks five entrances.  Other federally recognized sites include the Little Bighorn National Monument, Canyon National Recreation Area, Hole National Battlefield, and Clark Caverns, and the Bison Range. Montana has ten National Forests and more than 20 Wildlife Refuges. The Federal government administers .  are administered as parks and forests.File:Quakelakemontana.jpg|thumb|right|Lake was created by a landslide during the 1959 Yellowstone EarthquakeAreas managed by the Park Service include:()* Hole National Battlefield near Wisdom* Canyon National Recreation Area near Fort Smith* Glacier National Park* Ranch National Historic Site at Lodge, Montana* & Clark National Historic Trail* Bighorn Battlefield National Monument near Crow Agency* Perce National Historical Park* National ParkIn March 2011, Montana ranked as a bottom-ten Worst state (tied with Dakota and Texas) in the American State Litter Scorecard. Montana suffers from poor effectiveness and quality of its statewide public space cleanliness, due to overall state and related eradication standards and performance indicators.(S. Spacek, 2011 American State Litter Scorecard: New Rankings for an Increasingly Environmentally Concerned Populous.)Indian reservationsSeven American Indian reservations are located in Montana: Peck Indian Reservation, Belknap Indian Reservation, Cheyenne Indian Reservation, Indian Reservation, Rocky Boys Indian Reservation, Indian Reservation, and the Indian Reservation.ClimateMontana 1961-1990 Climate data.gif|thumb|300px|Left|Temperature and precipitation for Montanas capital city, HelenaMontana is a large state with considerable variation in geography, and the climate is, therefore, equally varied. The state spans from below the 45th parallel (the halfway line between the equator and the north pole) to the 49th parallel, and elevations range from under  to nearly  above sea level. The western half is mountainous, interrupted by numerous large valleys. Eastern Montana comprises plains and badlands, broken by hills and isolated mountain ranges, and has a semi-arid, continental climate (climate classification BSk). The Divide runs north-south through the western mountainous half, and has a great effect on the climate. It restricts the flow of warmer air from the Pacific from moving east, and cooler, drier continental moving west. West of the divide, the climate is described as modified northern Pacific coast climate, with milder winters, cooler summers, less wind, and a longer growing season.() In the winter, valley fog and low clouds often form in the valleys west of the divide, but this is rarely seen in the east.()Average daytime temperatures vary from  in January to  in July.() The variation in geography leads to great variation in temperature. Hot weather occurs in the eastern plains on occasion, the highest observed being  at Glendive on July 20, 1893, and Medicine Lake on July 5, 1937. Throughout the state, summer nights are generally cool and pleasant. Temperatures decrease as altitude increases, and hot weather is unknown above .  Snowfall is not unknown in any month of the year in the central part of Montana, but is rare in July and August.(File:Big Drift.jpg|right|thumb|270px|The Drift covering the Road in Glacier National Park as photographed on March 23, 2006.The coldest temperature on record for Montana is also the coldest temperature for the entire continental U.S. On January 20, 1954,  was recorded at a gold mining camp near Rogers Pass. Temperatures vary greatly on such cold nights, and Helena,  to the southeast had a low of only .(  Winter cold spells last a week or so, and are usually the result of cold continental air coming south from Canada. The front is often well defined, causing a large temperature drop in a 24-hour period. Conversely, air flow from the southwest results in Chinooks. These steady 2550 mph (or more) winds can suddenly warm parts of Montana, especially areas just to the east of the mountains, where temperatures sometimes rise up to 50F (10C)  60F (15C).(Montana is the location of the most extreme recorded temperature change in a 24-hour period in the United States. On January 15, 1972, the temperature rose from  to .(Andrew H. Horvitz, et al. A National Temperature Record at Loma, Montana, National Weather Service, 2002. Retrieved 2008-11-02.)File:Grinnell overlook.jpg|thumb|left|300px|The Glacier gets  of precipitation per year.Average annual precipitation is , but great variations are seen. The mountain ranges block the moist Pacific air, holding moisture in the western valleys, and creating shadows to the east. Heron, in the west, receives the most precipitation, . On the eastern (leeward) side of a mountain range, the valleys are much drier; Lonepine averages , and Deer Lodge  of precipitation. The mountains themselves can receive over , for example the Glacier in Glacier National Park gets .(  Perhaps the driest is an area southwest of Belfry that averaged only  over a sixteen-year period. Most of the larger cities get  of snow each year. Mountain ranges themselves can accumulate  of snow during a winter. Heavy snowstorms may occur as early as September or as late as May, though most snow falls from November to March.(The climate has become warmer in Montana and continues to do so.()  The glaciers in Glacier National Park have receded and are predicted to melt away completely in a few decades.()  Many Montana cities set heat records during July 2007, the hottest month ever recorded in Montana.(() Winters are warmer, too, and have fewer cold spells. Previously these cold spells had killed off beetles which are now attacking the forests of western Montana.()()  The combination of warmer weather, attack by beetles, and mismanagement during past years has led to a substantial increase in the severity of fires in Montana.((  According to a study done for the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency by the Harvard School of Engineering and Applied Science, portions of Montana will experience a 200% increase in area burned by wildland fires, and an 80% increase in air pollution from those fires.()()Historyfamily, Montana, 189091Image:SunRiver.JPG|thumb|200px|The headwaters of the River, just below ReservoirVarious peoples lived in the territory of the present-day state of Montana for thousands of years.  Historic tribes encountered by Europeans and settlers from the United States included the Crow in the south-central area; the Cheyenne in the southeast; the Blackfeet, Assiniboine and Ventres in the central and north-central area; and the Kootenai and Salish in the west.  The smaller dOreille and Kalispel tribes lived near Lake and the western mountains, respectively.The land in Montana east of the divide was part of the Purchase in 1803. Subsequent to the and Clark Expedition and after the finding of gold and copper (see the Kings) in the area in the late 1850s, Montana became a United States territory (Territory) on May 26, 1864. Prior to the creation of Territory (18641889), various parts of what is now Montana were parts of Territory (18481859), Territory (18531863), Territory (18631864), and Territory (18611864).The Army established a series of posts in the late 1860s, including Fort Shaw, Camp Cooke on the River and Fort C.F. Smith on the Trail.Montana was the scene of warfare as the Native Americans struggled to maintain control of their land. The stand of Army Lieutenant Colonel Armstrong Custer was fought near the present-day town of Hardin. Montana was also the location of the final battles of the Perce Wars.A series of major mining discoveries in the western third of the state starting in 1862 found gold, silver, copper lead, coal (and later oil) that attracted tens of thousands of miners to the area. The richest of all gold placer diggings was discovered at Alder Gulch, where the town of Virginia City was established. Other rich placer deposits were found at Last Chance Gulch, where the city of Helena now stands, Confederate Gulch, Silver Bow, Emigrant Gulch, and Cooke City. Gold output from 1862 through 1876 reached $144 million; silver then became even more important. The largest mining operations were in the city of Butte, which had important silver deposits and gigantic copper deposits.Cattle ranching has been central to Montanas history and economy since the late-19th century. The Ranch National Historic Site in Deer Lodge Valley is maintained as a link to the ranching style of the late 19th century. Operated by the Park Service, it is a  working ranch.The railroads arrived in the 1880s, including the Great Northern Railroad (1889) and its rival, the Northern Pacific Railroad (1883) from Minneapolis, and the Pacific Railroad (1881) from Denver. Montana railroading, with two transcontinentals to the Pacific coast and extensive operations to the mines, became a major industry, with centers in Billings and Havre. Montana became a state in 1889 in an omnibus package together with North Dakota, South Dakota and Washington.The revised Act of 1909 greatly affected the settlement of Montana. This act expanded the amount of free land from  to  per family. Tens of thousands of inexperienced homesteaders arrived, lured by free land and high wheat prices, but they were unprepared for the climate, which usually had little rainfall and required special dry farming techniques. The droughts of 1917-1919 proved devastating, as many left, and half the banks in the state went bankrupt after providing mortgages that could not be repaid. The Great Depression caused further hardship for farmers and ranchers and miners, but the economy bounced back in the 1940s. The wheat farms in eastern Montana make the state a major producer; the wheat has a relatively high protein content and thus commands premium prices. After 1940 tourism became the states third largest industry with Yellowstone and Glacier national parks as the largest tourist attractions.Politics in the state has been competitive, with the Democrats usually holding an edge, thanks to the support among unionized miners and railroad workers. Large scale battles revolved around the giant Copper company, based in Butte and controlled by Rockefeller interests, until it closed in the 1970s. Until 1959, the company owned five of the states six largest newspapers.DemographicsMontana ranks 44th in population; only six states (Alaska, Wyoming, Dakota, Dakota, Vermont and Delaware) have fewer people. The 2010 census put Montanas population at 989,415 which is an increase of 87,220 people, or 9.7 percent, since the year 2000. Growth is mainly concentrated in Montanas seven largest counties, with the heaviest percentile growth in Gallatin County, which saw a 32%(2010.census.gov) increase in its population since 2000. The city seeing the largest percentile growth was Kalispell with 40.1%.(bloximages.chicago2.vip.townnews.com) The city with the largest actual growth was Billings with an increase in population of 14,323 since 2000.(According to the 2010 Census, 89.4% of the population was White (87.8% Non-Hispanic White Alone), 0.4% Black or African American, 6.3% American Indian and Alaska Native, 0.6% Asian, 0.1% Native Hawaiian and Other Pacific Islander, 0.6% from Some Other Race, and 2.5% from Two or More Races. Hispanics and Latinos of any race made up 2.9% of the population.(factfinder2.census.gov)The largest European ancestry groups in Montana are: German (29.3%), Irish (16.4%), English (13.1%), Norwegian (10%) and American (5.9%).(factfinder2.census.gov)According to 2010 U.S. Census the population of Montanas seven most populous areas is:((bloximages.chicago2.vip.townnews.com)According to the U.S. Census, 94.8 percent of the population aged 5 and older speak English at home.(Language Map Data Center)The of population of Montana is located in Meagher County, in the city of White Sulphur Springs.()While German ancestry is the largest reported European-American ancestry in Montana as a whole, residents of Scandinavian ancestry are prevalent in some of the farming-dominated northern and eastern prairie regions, parallel to nearby regions of North Dakota and Minnesota. Irish and English are the second and third largest European ancestral groups in the state. There are also several predominantly Native American counties, mainly around each of the seven Indian reservations. The state has a larger Native American population (and percentage) than most US states. The seven reservations are actually made of more than twelve distinct Native American ethnolinguistic groups. The historically mining-oriented communities of western Montana such as Butte have a wider range of ethnic groups, and are particularly rich in European-American ethnicity; Finns, Europeans and especially Irish settlers left an indelible mark on the city, as well as people originally from English mining regions such as Cornwall, Devon, and Wales.  The nearby city of Helena, also founded as a mining camp, had a similar mix in addition to a small Chinatown, and the Chinese in Montana, while a low percentage today, have historically been an important presence.  Throughout the nineteenth century, many farmers of German, Scandinavian, Irish, Scots, and English roots settled in Montana.  In addition, the Hutterites, originally from Central Europe, settled here, and today Montana is second only to Dakota in U.S. Hutterite population with several colonies spread across the state.  Many of Montanas historic logging communities originally attracted people of Scottish, Scandinavian, Slavic, English  and Scots-Irish descent. Montanas Hispanic population is concentrated around the Billings area in south-central Montana, where many of Montanas Mexican-Americans have been in the state for generations. The highest density of African-Americans is located in Great Falls.ReligionThe religious affiliations of the people of Montana* Christian: 82%** Protestant: 55%*** Lutheran: 15%*** Methodist: 8%*** Baptist: 5%*** Presbyterian: 4%*** Church of Christ: 2%*** Other Protestant or general Protestant: 21%** Roman Catholic: 24%** Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints (Mormon): 5%* Other Religions: * Billings* Bozeman* Butte* Great Falls* * Helena* Kalispell* MissoulaSome of the major towns in Montana are:* Anaconda* Belgrade* Colstrip* Columbia Falls* Conrad* Cut Bank* Deer Lodge* Dillon* East Helena* Glasgow* Glendive* Hamilton* Hardin* Havre* Laurel* Lewistown* Libby* Livingston* Miles City* Polson* Red Lodge* Shelby* Sidney* West Yellowstone* Whitefish* Wolf PointCountiesThe state of Montana has 56 counties.Education Colleges and universities The state-funded University System consists of:* Valley Community College* Community College* Community College* State University  Bozeman** State University Billings** State University  NorthernHavre** State University College of Technology  Great Falls* of Montana  Missoula** Tech of the University of MontanaButte** of Montana WesternDillon** of Montana  Helena College of TechnologyMajor Tribal Colleges in Montana include:* Peck Community College or Peck Community College* Big Horn College* Kootenai College* Child College* Community College- BrowningThere are three small private colleges based in Montana, in addition to branch campuses of out-of-state schools:* Carroll College* Mountain College* of Great FallsSports Professional sports There are no major league sports franchises in Montana due to the states relatively small and dispersed population, but a number of league teams play in the state. Baseball is the minor-league sport with the longest heritage in the state, and Montana is currently home to four Minor League baseball teams, all members of the Baseball League:* Mustangs* Falls Voyagers* Brewers* OspreyThe Phoenix and the Falls Gladiators are semi-pro football teams in the Rocky Mountain Football League (RMFL).Collegiate and amateur sportsAll of Montanas four-year colleges and universities field a variety of intercollegiate sports teams. The two largest schools, the University of Montana and Montana State University, are members of the Sky Conference and have enjoyed a strong athletic rivalry since the early twentieth century. Most of the smaller four-year schools in the state belong to the Conference.Football and basketball are the two most popular sports at the high school level. Montana is one of the few states where the smallest high schools participate in football leagues.Numerous other sports are played at the club and amateur level, including softball, rugby, and soccer.  In 2011, Big Sky Little League won the Northwest Region, advancing to the League World Series in Williamsport, PA for the first time in state history.From 1988-2010, the Montana High School All Class Wrestling Tournament was held in Billings at MetraPark. This event remains one of the most popular high school events each year in Montana.  The 2011 event was relocated to three different cities due to a freak tornado that tore the roof of of the MetraPark building on June 20, 2011.(youtube.com)  The MetraPark has been repaired and expects to host the all class tournament again.There are six junior hockey teams in Montana, all affiliated with the West Hockey League:* Bulls* Icedogs* Roughriders* Falls Americans* Bighorns* MaulersFt. ShawIn 1904 a group of young Native American women, after playing undefeated during their last season, went to the Purchase Exposition held in St. Louis and defeated all challenging teams and were declared to be world champions. For this they received a large silver trophy with the inscription Worlds Fair  St. Louis, 1904  Basket Ball  Won by Fort Shaw Team.(Full Court Quest. Linda Peavy and Ursula Smith. Norman, OK: University of Oklahoma Press: 2008.)Montana in popular culture* The protagonist in Hemingways Whom the Bell Tolls (1940), Robert Jordan, is a native Montanan. The 1943 film adaptation starred Cooper, a native Montanan himself. Hemingway traveled to Montana extensively, and much of his family still lives in the state.* In McMurtrys 1985 Prize-winning novel Dove, the protagonists drive a herd of cattle from Texas to Montana, with the latter state being described as a cattlemans paradise. The 1989 TV miniseries of the same name, Lonesome Dove, was filmed partly in the state.*The 1989 film Always is a romantic drama directed by Spielberg, and starring Dreyfuss, Hunter, Goodman and Brad Johnson. This is also Hepburns final film appearance.* the 1990 film Silence of the Lambs with Foster, Hopkins, and Glenn, Clarice Starling (Foster) lived in Montana before joining the FBI.* The 1992 film River Runs Through It takes place in and around Montana, although much of the filming was done on the Gallatin and Madison rivers south of Bozeman. The film is about the Prohibition era of the 1920s. It stars Pitt, Sheffer and Skerritt. Directed by Redford.* The 1994 film River Wild is a thriller directed by Hanson and starring Streep, Bacon, Strathairn, C. Reilly, and Mazzello. The story involves a family on a whitewater rafting trip who encounter violent criminals.* The 1994 film of the Fall which stars Pitt, Hopkins and Quinn is set (though was not filmed) in Montana, including Helena. It is about a familys struggle to live through War I, the Prohibition 1920s and the 1930s. Directed by Zwick.* In the 1996 movie Trek: First Contact, Montana is the location of the fictitious first contact between humans and an alien race, the Vulcans. Star Trek producer Braga is originally from Montana. However, no Montana locations were used in the shooting of the film. Other Montana references occasionally dot various Star Trek films and television episodes, including one starship named the Bozeman.* Montanais the final track off of Zappas 1973 album Sensation.* In the TV series Big Bang Theory, Sheldon moves to Bozeman, Montana due to its low criminal rate, after being robbed in Pasadena. He returns immediately after being robbed again at Bozemans bus station upon arrival.Miscellaneous topics* The planned battleship USS Montana was named in honor of the state. However, the battleship was never completed, making Montana the only one of the 48 states during World War II not to have a battleship named after it. Additionally, Alaska and Hawaii have both had nuclear submarines named after them. As such Montana is the only state in the union without a modern naval ship named in its honor. However, in August 2007 Senator Tester made a request to the Navy that a submarine be christened USS Montana.(Press Release Detail)* Montana has the largest bear population in the lower 48 states.* Montanas triple divide allows water to flow into three oceans: the Ocean, the Ocean (of Mexico), and the Ocean (Bay). This phenomenon occurs at Triple Divide Peak in Glacier National Park.* In 1888, Helena (the current state capital) had more millionaires per capita than any other city in the world.State symbols* State flower: Bitterroot (Lewisia rediviva), since 1895* State tree: Pine, since 1949* State animal: Bear (Ursus arctos horribilis), since 1862* State bird: Meadowlark (Sturnella neglecta), since 1931* fish: trout Oncorhynchus clarkii, since 1977()* State Song: Montana, since 1945* State Ballad: Montana Melody, since 1983* State Gemstones: Yogo Sapphire & Agate* Fossil: Maiasaur (Duck-billed Dinosaur) (Maiasaura peeblesorum), since 1985* State Butterfly: cloak (Nymphalis antiopa), since 2001* State Grass: wheatgrass, since 1973* State Motto: Oro y Plata (Spanish: Gold and Silver)Ski areasFile:Big Sky resort.jpg|thumb|300px|The Sky ResortFile:Red Lodge Palisades.jpg|thumb|300px|The Palisades area on the north end of the ski area at Lodge Mountain ResortMontana has several ski areas including:* Bear Paw Ski Bowl near Montana* Sky Resort near Sky, Montana* Blacktail near Lakeside* Bowl Ski Area near Bozeman* Discovery Basin near Philipsburg* Great Divide near Montana* Pass near St. Regis, Montana* Lost Trail near Montana* Mountain near Dillon, Montana* Basin near Sky, Montana* Red Lodge Mountain near Red Lodge* Ski Area near Sulphur Springs, Montana* Snowbowl Ski Area near Missoula* Pass Ski Area near Choteau* Mountain Ski Resort near Libby* Mountain Resort near WhitefishSee also*List of National Register of Historic Places in Montana*of people from Montana*of places in Montana*River*Mountains*stateReferencesFurther reading* Axline, Jon, et al. Still Speaking Ill of the Dead: More Jerks in Montana History. Falcon Press, 2005. ISBN 1-58592-032-0* Bennion, Jon. Big Sky Politics. Five Valleys Publishing, April 2004. ISBN 1-888550-13-9* Doig, Ivan, Dancing at the Rascal Fair. Scribner: 1987. ISBN 0-689-11764-7.* Doig, Ivan, English Creek. Peter Smith Publisher Inc: 1992. ISBN 0-8446-6608-4.* Howard, Joseph Kinsey. Montana: High, Wide, and Handsome. Bison Books: 2003. ISBN 0-8032-7339-8.* Howard, Joseph Kinsey. Montana Margins: A State Anthology. Yale University Press,: 1946. ISBN 0-8369-2652-8.* Kittredge, William. The Last Best Place: A Montana Anthology. (From the back cover: ...over 230 stories, poems, reminiscences, and reports written by 140 men and women. The book is divided into eight sections with introductory essays by Bevis, Clearman Blew, Kittredge, William Lang, Roeder, Smith, and James Welch.) of Washington Press: 1990. 1158 pages.  ISBN 0-295-96974-1. * Lopach, James. We the People of Montana: The Workings of a Popular Government. Falcon Press, 1983 ISBN 0-87842-159-9* MacLean, Norman, A River Runs Through It. of Chicago Press: 1976. ISBN 0-226-50060-8.* MacLean, Norman, Young Men and Fire. University of Chicago Press: 1992. ISBN 0-226-50061-6.* Malone, Michael P., Richard B. Roeder and William L. Lang. Montana: A History of Two Centuries. University of Washington: 1991. ISBN 0-295-97129-0.* Toole, K. Ross. Montana: An Uncommon Land. of Oklahoma Press: 1984. ISBN 0-8061-1890-3.* Walter, Dave, et al. Speaking Ill of the Dead: Jerks in Montana History. Falcon Press, 2000. ISBN 1-58592-032-0* Walker, Mildred. Winter Wheat. Harcourt: 1967. ISBN 0-15-197223-0.External links* State of Montana Website* Official State Travel Information Site* * Montana energy data & statistics  From the U.S. Department of Energy* Montana Historical Society* Everything you need to know about Montana.* Montana History* Montana State Capitol Information* Montana state facts from the U.S. Department of Agriculture* Census of Montana* List of searchable databases produced by Montana state agencies hosted by the American Library Association Government Documents Roundtable.* USGS real-time, geographic, and other scientific resources of Montana* Famous and infamous Montanans* Fly Fishing in Montana*  Southeast  af:Montanaang:Montnaar:an:Montanaarc:frp:Montanaast:Montanaaz:Montanabn:zh-min-nan:Montanabe-x-old:bcl:Montanabi:Montanabo:bs:Montanabr:Montana()ca:Montanacv:cs:Montanacy:Montanada:Montanapdc:Montanade:MontanaHahoodzoet:Montanael:es:Montanaeo:Montanoeu:Montana()hif:Montanafo:Montanafr:Montanafy:Montanaga:Montanagv:Montanagag:Montanagd:Montanagl:Montanahak:Mng-thai-nxal:haw:Monekanahy:hr:Montanaio:Montanaig:Montanabpy:id:Montanaie:Montanaik:Montanaos:is:Montanait:Montanahe:jv:Montanapam:Montanaka:ks:Mnn()kw:Montanasw:Montanaht:Montanaku:Montanalad:Montanala:Montanalv:Montnalt:Montanalij:Montann-ali:Montanalmo:Montanahu:Montanamk:mg:Montanaml:mi:Montanamr:arz:ms:Montanamy:nah:Montanamrj:(staat)new:ja:frr:Montanano:Montanann:Montanaoc:Montanauz:Montanapnb:pap:Montanapms:Montan-ands:Montanapl:Montanapt:Montanaro:Montana(stadi)suyuru:sah:sq:Montanascn:Montanasimple:Montanask:Montanasl:Montanaszl:Mntanackb:sr:sh:Montanafi:Montanasv:Montanatl:Montanata:tt:th:chy:Montana(eyalet)()ur:Shitativi:Montanavo:Montanawar:Montanayi:yo:Montanadiq:Montanabat-smg:Montanazh:
20487
Mohamed_Atta
 religion  IslamMohamed Mohamed el-Amir Awad el-Sayed Atta (, ) (September 1, 1968  September 11, 2001) was one of the masterminds and the ringleader of the 11 attacks who served as the hijacker-pilot of Airlines Flight 11, crashing the plane into the North Tower of the Trade Center as part of the coordinated attacks.()( )()()() Born in 1968 in a small town in Egypts Delta, Atta moved with his family to the Abdeen section of Cairo at the age of 10. Atta studied architecture at University, graduating in 1990, and continued his studies in Hamburg, Germany at the University of Hamburg.  In Hamburg, Atta became involved with the al-Quds Mosque, where he met al-Shehhi, bin al-Shibh, and Jarrah, together forming the cell.  Atta disappeared from Germany for periods of time, spending some time in Afghanistan, including several months in late 1999 and early 2000 when he met bin Laden and other top al-Qaeda leaders.  Atta and the other Hamburg cell members were recruited by bin Laden and Sheikh Mohammed for the planes operation in the United States.  Atta returned to Hamburg in February 2000, and began inquiring about flight training in the United States.Atta arrived in the United States, together with Marwan al-Shehhi, in June 2000.  Both ended up in south Florida at Aviation where they entered the Accelerated Pilot Program.  Atta and Shehhi obtained ratings in November 2000, and continued training on simulators and flight training.  Beginning in May 2001, Atta assisted with the arrival of the muscle hijackers.  In July 2001, Atta traveled to Spain where he met with bin al-Shibh to exchange information and finalize the plot.  In August, Atta traveled on surveillance flights to determine details on how the attacks could be carried out.In early September 2001, Atta traveled to Maryland, where fellow hijacker Hanjour was at the time.  Atta then traveled to Boston, and on September 10, with al-Omari to Maine.  On the morning of September 11, Atta and Omari traveled on Air back to Boston, where they boarded Airlines Flight 11.  Fifteen minutes into the flight, the team of hijackers attacked and Atta took over control of the aircraft. At 8:46 a.m., Atta crashed the 767 into the North Tower of the World Trade Center.() Aliases Mohamed Atta varied his name on documents, also using Mehan Atta, Mohammad El Amir, Muhammad Atta, Mohamed El Sayed, Mohamed Elsayed, Muhammad al-Amir, Awag Al Sayyid Atta, Muhammad al-Amir, and Awad Al Sayad.()  In Germany, he registered his name as Mohamed el-Amir Awad el-Sayed Atta, and went by the name, Mohamed el-Amir at the University of Hamburg.()  In his will, written in 1996, Atta gives his name as Mohamed the son of Mohamed Elamir awad Elsayed.()  When he came to the United States, he used the name Mohamed Atta.  Atta also claimed different nationalities, sometimes Egyptian and other times told people that he was from the Arab Emirates.( Early life Atta was born on September 1, 1968 in Kafr el-Sheikh, located in Egypts Nile delta region.() His father, Mohamed el-Amir Awad el-Sayed Atta, was a lawyer, educated in both sharia and civil law.  His mother, Bouthayna Mohamed Mustapha Sheraqi, came from a wealthy farming and trading family and was also educated.  Bouthayna and Mohamed married when she was 14, via an arranged marriage. The family had few relatives on the fathers side and kept a distance from Bouthaynas family.  In-laws characterized Attas father as austere, strict, and private, and neighbors considered the family reclusive.(McDermott (2005), p. 9-11)  Atta was the only son, but he had two older sisters who are both well-educated and successful in their careersone as a medical doctor and the other as a professor.()When Atta was ten, his family moved to the Cairo neighborhood of Abdeen, located near the center of the city.  Attas father continued to keep the family private, and did not allow Atta to socialize with other neighborhood kids.  Atta spent most of his time at home studying, excelling in school.(McDermott (2005), p. 12-14)()  In 1985, Atta entered University, where he studied engineering.  As one of the highest-scoring students, Atta was admitted into the very selective architecture program during his senior year.  In addition to his regular courses, Atta studied English at the University in Cairo.(Fouda and Fielding (2003), p. 77)  In 1990, Atta graduated with a degree in architecture,() and joined the Brotherhood-affiliated Engineers Syndicate organization.(  For several months after graduating, Atta worked at the Urban Development Center in Cairo, where he worked on architectural, planning, and building design.()  In 1990, Attas family moved into an 11th floor apartment in Giza.(() Germany Upon graduating from Cairo University, Attas marks were average and insufficient to be accepted into the Universitys graduate program.  His father insisted he go abroad for graduate studies, and had Atta enroll in a German language program at the Goethe Institute in Cairo.(Fouda and Fielding (2003), p. 78)  In 1992, Attas father invited a German couple over for dinner while they were visiting Cairo.  The German couple ran an exchange program between Germany and Egypt, and suggested that Atta continue his studies in Germany.  They offered him a temporary place to live at their house in the city.  Mohamed Atta ended up in Germany two weeks later, in July 1992.   In Germany, Atta enrolled in the urban planning graduate program at the Technical University of Hamburg-Harburg.(  Atta initially stayed with the two high school teachers, but they found Atta frustrating due to his closed-mindedness and intensely introverted personality.  As well, Atta began adhering to a strict Islamic diet, frequented the mosque,  seldom socialized, and was unfriendly towards the couples unmarried daughter who had a young child.  After six months, they asked him to move out.()()(McDermott (2005), pp. 22-23)  By early 1993, Atta moved into university housing, sharing an apartment in Centrumshaus with two roommates.  Atta remained at Centrumshaus until 1998.  During that time, his roommates became aggravated with Atta, who seldom cleaned, and kept to himself to the extent that he would walk in and out of a room without acknowledging others.  Beyond anything else, they could not deal with Attas personality, described as complete, almost aggressive insularity.(McDermott (2005), p. 25)Academic studiesAt the Technical University of Hamburg-Harburg, Atta studied under guidance of the department chair, Dittmar Machule, who specialized in the Middle East.(McDermott (2005), p. 24)  Atta was concerned about modern development and construction of high-rise buildings in Cairo and other ancient cities in the Middle East.  He believed that the large, impersonal, and often ugly apartment blocks built in the 1960s and 1970s had ruined old neighborhoods, and took away privacy and dignity from people.  Attas own family moved into such an apartment block in 1990, which to him was a shabby symbol of Egypts haphazard attempts to modernize and its shameless embrace of the West.(  For his thesis, Atta focused his studies on the ancient city of Aleppo in Syria.  He explored the history of Aleppos urban landscapes and the general themes of the conflict between Arab civilization and modernity.  Atta criticized how the modern skyscrapers and development projects in Aleppo were disrupting the fabric of that city by blocking community streets and altering the skyline.In 1994, Attas professor, Dittmar Machule, invited him to Aleppo for a three-day archaeological visit.()  Atta ended up spending several weeks in Aleppo during August 1994, and visited again that December.()  While in Syria, he met Amal, a young Palestinian woman, who worked there in the planning bureau.  Volker Hauth, who was traveling with Atta, described Amal as attractive and self-confident. She observed the Muslim niceties, taking taxis to and from the office so as not to come into close physical contact with men on the buses. But, she was emancipated and challenging.  They both appeared to be attracted to one another, but Atta regretfully explained to Hauth that, she had a quite different orientation and that the emancipation of the young lady did not fit.  This was the closest thing to romance for Atta.( During the summer of 1995, Atta spent three months with co-students Volker Hauth and Ralph Bodenstein in Cairo, on a grant from the Carl Duisberg Society.  They looked at the effects of redevelopment in the Cairo old quarter which the government wanted to develop for tourism.  Atta remained in Cairo to stay with his family, after Hauth and Bodenstein returned to Germany.(McDermott (2005), p. 29-31)(Corbin (2003), p. 122)File:Marienstrae 54.JPG|thumb|200px|The apartment Atta, Bahaji, and bin al-Shibh shared from 1998 until 2001 in Marienstrae, Hamburg, Germany. (The door is visible on the left side - No. 54)While in Hamburg, Atta held a number of jobs, including a part-time position at Plankontor, an urban planning firm, from 1992 until the summer of 1997 when he was laid off.  The firms business had declined, and having bought a CAD system, his draughtsmanship was not needed.((McDermott (2005), p. 47)  Atta also worked at a cleaning firm, and buying and selling cars to earn extra money.()  After studying in Hamburg, Atta wanted to return to Cairo to work, but there were few job prospects, as his family did not have the right connections.()()  Atta was also concerned about actions of the Egyptian government in arresting political activists, and feared that he too would be a target due to his social and political beliefs.(Corbin (2003), p. 123)Islamic revivalAfter coming to Hamburg in 1992, Atta became more religious, frequently attending the mosque.()  Attas friends in Germany described him as an intelligent man with religious beliefs, along with political motivations, including anger at U.S. policy toward the Middle East, particularly the Accords and the War.()() Atta was also enraged by Egypts ruling elite, and the Egyptian governments crackdown on Brotherhood members.()Atta went back to Egypt on August 1, 1995, for three months of study.(Fouda and Fielding (2003), p. 82)  Before going to Egypt, he grew a beard, which is a sign of a devout Muslim, but was also seen as a political gesture.(()  Atta returned to Hamburg on October 31, 1995,( and joined the pilgrimage to Mecca that fall.(In Hamburg, Atta was drawn to al-Quds Mosque, which adhered to a harsh, uncompromisingly fundamentalist, and resoundingly militant version of Sunni Islam.(McDermott (2005), p. 2-3)  He made acquaintances at al-Quds, some who came over to visit him at Centrumshaus.  Atta also began teaching classes at Al-Quds, as well as at a Turkish mosque near Harburg.  Atta also formed a prayer group, which Ahmed Maklat and El Motassadeq joined.  bin al-Shibh was also there teaching occasional classes, and became a good friend of Attas.(McDermott (2005), p. 34-37)On April 11, 1996, Atta signed his last will and testament at the mosque, officially declaring his Muslim beliefs and giving 18 instructions regarding his burial.((  This was the day that Israel attacked Lebanon in Operation Grapes of Wrath, which outraged Atta.  Signing the will, offering his life was Attas response.(  The instructions in his last will and testament reflect both Sunni funeral practices, along with some more puritanical demands from Wahhabism, including asking people not to weep and cry or show emotion. The will was signed by el-Motassadeq and a second individual at the mosque.()After leaving Plankontor in the summer of 1997, Atta disappeared again and did not return until 1998.  Atta phoned his graduate advisor in 1998, after a year of doing nothing for his thesis, telling Machule that he had family problems at home and said, Please understand, I dont want to talk about this.()(McDermott (2005), Chapter 5)  At the winter break in 1997, Atta left and did not return to Hamburg for three months.  He said that he went on pilgrimage to Mecca again, just 18 months after his first time. Terry McDermott explained in Perfect Soldiers that it is highly unusual and unlikely for someone, especially a young student, to go on Hajj again that soon. Also, three months is an exceptionally long time, much longer than what Hajj requires.  When Atta returned, he claimed that his passport was lost and got a new one, which is a common tactic to erase evidence of travel to places such as Afghanistan.(McDermott (2005), p. 57)  When he returned in spring 1998, after disappearing for several months, he had grown a thick long beard, and seemed more serious and aloof to those who knew him.(By mid-1998, Atta was no longer eligible for university housing in Centrumshaus.  He left and moved into a nearby apartment in Wilhelmsburg, where he lived with Bahaji and bin al-Shibh. By early 1999, Atta had completed his thesis, and formally defended it in August 1999.( In mid-1998, Atta worked alongside Shehhi, bin al-Shibh, and Belfas, at a warehouse, packing computers in crates for shipping.(McDermott (2005), p. 58)  The Hamburg group did not stay in Wilhelmsburg for long.  The next winter, they moved into an apartment at Marienstrasse 54, near the university in Harburg.(McDermott (2005), p. 63)  It was here that the cell developed and acted more as a group.( ) They met three or four times a week to discuss their anti-American feelings and to plot possible attacks. Many al-Qaeda members lived in this apartment at various times, including hijacker al-Shehhi, Essabar, and others.In late 1999, Atta, Shehhi, Jarrah, Bahaji, and bin al-Shibh decided to travel to Chechnya to fight against the Russians, but were convinced by al-Masri and Ould Slahi at the last minute to change their plans. They instead traveled to Afghanistan over a two-week period in late November.  On November 29, 1999, Mohamed Atta boarded Airlines Flight TK1662 from Hamburg to Istanbul, where he changed to flight TK1056 to Karachi, Pakistan.(  When they arrived, they were spotted by Al Qaeda leader Abu Hafs as suitable candidates for the planes operation plot.  They were all well-educated, had experience living in western society, along with some English skills, and would be able to obtain visas.()  Even before bin al-Shibh had arrived, Atta, Shehhi, and Jarrah were sent to the House of Ghamdi near bin Ladens home in Kandahar, where he was waiting to meet them.  Bin Laden asked them to pledge loyalty and commit to suicide missions, which Atta and the other three Hamburg men all accepted.  Bin Laden sent them to see Atef to get a general overview of the mission, then they were sent to Karachi to see Sheikh Mohammed to go over specifics.(McDermott (2005), p. 180)German investigators said that they had evidence that Mohamed Atta trained at al-Qaeda camps in Afghanistan from late 1999 to early 2000. The timing of the Afghanistan training was outlined on August 23, 2002 by a senior investigator. The investigator, Klaus Ulrich Kersten, director of Germanys federal anticrime agency, the Bundeskriminalamt, provided the first official confirmation that Atta and two other pilots had been in Afghanistan and the first dates of the training.  Kersten said in an interview at the agencys headquarters in Wiesbaden, Germany, that Atta was in Afghanistan from late 1999 until early 2000,()() and evidence that Atta met with bin Laden while there.( )A video surfaced in October 2006, which showed bin Laden at Tarnak Farms on January 8, 2000, and showing Atta together with Jarrah reading their wills ten days later on January 18, 2000.(()  On his return journey, Atta left Karachi on February 24, 2000 by flight TK1057 to Istanbul where he changed to flight TK1661 to Hamburg.(  Immediately after returning to Germany, Atta, Shehhi, and Jarrah reported their passports stolen, possibly to erase travel visas to Afghanistan.() In the United States On March 22, 2000, while still in Germany, Mohamed Atta sent an e-mail to the Academy of Lakeland in Florida, inquiring about flight training, Dear sir, we are a small group of young men from different Arab countries.  Now we are living in Germany since a while for study purposes.  We would like to start training for the career of airline professional pilots.  In this field we havent yet any knowledge but we are ready to undergo an intensive training program (up to ATP and eventually higher).  Atta sent 5060 similar e-mails to other flight training schools in the United States.()On May 17, Mohamed Atta applied for a United States visa, receiving a five-year B-1/B-2 (tourist/business) visa the next day from the United States embassy in Berlin.  Because Atta had lived in Germany for approximately five years, along with his strong record as a student, he was treated more leniently and not scrutinized.()  After obtaining his visa, Atta took a bus on June 2 from Germany to Prague where he stayed overnight before traveling on to the United States the next day.  Bin al-Shibh later explained that they believed it would contribute to operational security for Atta to fly out of Prague instead of Hamburg, where he traveled from previously.  Likewise, Shehhi traveled from a different location, in his case via Brussels.()(McDermott (2005), p. 194)On June 6, 2002,  ABC World News Tonight broadcast an interview with Johnelle Bryant, former loan officer at the U.S. Department of Agriculture in South Florida, who told about her strange encounter with Mohamed Atta. This encounter took place around the third week of April to the third week of May of 2000, that is before Attas official entry date into the United States (see below).  According to Ms. Bryant, Atta wanted to finance the purchase of a crop-duster. He wanted to finance a twin-engine, six-passenger aircraft and remove the seats, Bryant told ABCs World News Tonight. He insisted that she write his name as ATTA, that he originally was from Egypt but had actually moved to Afghanistan, that he was an engineer and that his dream was to go to a flight school.  He asked about the Pentagon and the White House.  He said he wanted to visit the World Trade Center and asked Ms. Bryant about the security there. He mentioned Al Qaeda and said the organisation could use memberships from Americans. He mentioned Osama bin Laden and said this man would someday be known as the worlds greatest leader. Ms. Bryant said the picture that came out in the newspaper, thats exactly what that man looked like. ()() Ms. Bryant contacted the authorities after recognising Atta in news reports.() Law-enforcement officials said Bryant passed a lie-detector exam.()According to official reports, Atta arrived on June 3, 2000 at Newark International Airport from Prague.  That month, Atta and Shehhi stayed in hotels and rented rooms in New York City on a short-term basis.  They continued to inquire about flight schools and personally visited some, including Airman Flight School in Oklahoma, which they visited on July 3, 2000.  Days later, Shehhi and Atta ended up in south Florida.(  Atta and Shehhi established accounts at SunTrust Bank and received wire transfers from Ali Abdul Aziz Ali, Khalid Sheikh Mohammeds nephew in the Arab Emirates.((  On July 6, 2000, Atta and Shehhi enrolled at Aviation in Florida, where they entered the Accelerated Pilot Program, while Ziad Jarrah took flight training from a different school also based out of Venice.(  When Atta and Shehhi arrived in Florida, they initially stayed with Huffmans bookkeeper and his wife in a spare room of their house.  After a week, they were asked to leave because they were rude.  Atta and Shehhi then moved into a small house nearby in Nokomis where they stayed for six months.()()Atta began flight training on July 7, 2000 and continued training nearly every day.  By the end of July 2000, both Atta and Shehhi did solo flights.  Atta earned his private pilot certificate in September, and then he and Shehhi decided to switch flight schools.  Both enrolled at Jones Aviation in Sarasota and took training there for a brief time. They had problems following instructions and were both very upset when they failed their Stage 1 exam at Jones Aviation.  They inquired about multi-engine planes and told the instructor that they wanted to move quickly, because they had a job waiting in their country upon completion of their training in the U.S.  In mid-October, Atta and Shehhi returned to Huffman Aviation to continue training.  In November 2000, Atta earned his instrument rating, and then a commercial pilots license in December from the Aviation Administration.(Atta continued with flight training, including solo flights and simulator time.  On December 22, Atta and Shehhi applied to Eagle International for large jet and simulator training for Douglas DC-9 and Boeing 737300 models.  On December 26, Atta and Shehhi abandoned a Cherokee on the runway of International Airport.  On December 29 and 30, Atta and Marwan went to the Airport where they practiced on a 727 simulator, and they obtained 767 simulator training from Pan Am International on December 31.  Atta purchased deck videos for Boeing 747200, Boeing 757200, A320 and Boeing 767-300ER models via mail-order from Sportys Pilot Shop in Ohio in November and December 2000.(Attas cellphone was recorded phoning the Moroccan embassy in Washington on January 2, just before Shehhi flew to the country. Atta flew to Spain on January 4, 2001 to coordinate with bin al-Shibh and returned to the United States on January 10.  While in the United States he traveled to Georgia, where he and Shehhi attended a LA Fitness Health Club. During that time Atta flew out of Briscoe Field in Lawrenceville with a pilot, and Atta and either the pilot or Shehhi flew around the Atlanta area. They lived in the area for several months. On April 3, Atta and Shehhi rented a postal box in Beach, Virginia.On April 11, Atta and Shehhi rented an apartment at 10001 Atlantic Blvd, Apt. 122 in Springs, Florida for $840 per month,(http://www.coralsprings.com/frontpage2/attacoralsprings.htm) and assisted with the arrival of the muscle hijackers.  On April 16 Atta was given a citation for not having a valid drivers license, and began steps to get one. On May 2, Atta received his drivers license in Lakes, Florida.  While in the United States, Atta owned a red 1989 Pontiac Grand Prix.()On June 27, Atta flew from Fort Lauderdale to Boston, Massachusetts, where he spent a day, and then continued to San Francisco for a short time, and from there to Las Vegas.  On June 28, Atta arrived at International Airport in Las Vegas to meet with the three other pilots. He rented a Malibu from an Rent A Car agency.  It is not known where he stayed that night, but on the 29th he registered at the EconoLodge at 1150 South Vegas Boulevard. Here he presented an AAA membership for a discount, and paid cash for the $49.50/night room.  During his trip to Las Vegas, he is thought to have used a video camera that he had rented from a Select Photo outlet back in Beach, Florida.() July 2001 summit in Spain Atta left again in July 2001 for Spain to meet with bin al-Shibh for the last time. On July 7, 2001, Atta flew on Swissair Flight 117 from Miami to Zrich, where he had a stopover.()  On July 8, Atta was recorded withdrawing 1700 francs from an ATM, and using his credit card to purchase two Swiss Army knives and some chocolate in an airport shop in Zurich.()  After the stopover in Zurich, he arrived in Madrid at 4:45 pm on Swissair Flight 656, and spent several hours at the airport.  Then at 8:50 pm, he checked into the Hotel Diana Cazadora in Barajas, a town near the airport.  That night and twice the next morning, he called Ahmad Ali Musleh, a Jordanian student in Hamburg who served as a liaison for bin al-Shibh.()On the morning of July 9, Mohamed Atta rented a silver Accent, which he booked from SIXT Rent-A-Car for July 9 to 16, and later extended to the 19th.(()  He drove east out of Madrid towards the Mediterranean beach area of Tarragona.  On the way, Atta stopped in Reus to pick up Ramzi bin al-Shibh at the airport.  They drove to Cambrils, where they spent a night at the Hotel Monica.  They checked out the next morning, and spent the next few days at an unknown location in Tarragona.(  The absence of other hotel stays, signed receipts or credit card stubs has led investigators to believe that the men may have met in a safe house provided by other al-Qaeda operatives in Spain.  There, Atta and bin al-Shibh held a meeting to complete the planning of the attacks.  Several clues have been found to link their stay in Spain to Syrian-born Imad Eddin Barakat Yarkas (Abu Dahdah), and el Azizi, a Moroccan in Spain.  They may have helped arrange and host the meeting in Tarragona.()  Fouda, who interviewed bin al-Shibh and Sheikh Mohammed (KSM) before the arrest, believes that Bahaji and KSM may have also been present at the meeting. Spanish investigators have said that Marwan al-Shehhi and two others later joined the meeting.  Bin al-Shibh would not discuss this meeting with Fouda.(Fouda and Fielding (2003), p. 216)During the Spain meetings, Atta and bin al-Shibh had coordinated the details of the attacks.  The Commission obtained details about the meeting, based on interrogations of bin al-Shibh in the weeks after his arrest in September 2002.  Bin al-Shibh explained that he passed along instructions from Osama bin Laden, including his desire for the attacks to be carried out as soon as possible.  Bin Laden was concerned about having so many operatives in the United States.  Atta confirmed that all the muscle hijackers had arrived in the United States, without any problems, but said that he needed five to six more weeks to work out details.  Bin Laden also asked that other operatives not be informed of the specific data until the last minute.  During the meeting, Atta and bin al-Shibh also decided on the targets to be hit, ruling out a strike on a nuclear plant.  Bin al-Shibh passed along bin Ladens list of targets; bin Laden wanted the U.S. Congress, the Pentagon, and the World Trade Center to be attacked, as they were deemed symbols of America.  They also discussed the personal difficulties Atta was having with fellow hijacker Jarrah.  Bin al-Shibh was worried that Jarrah might even abandon the plan. The Commission Report speculated that the now-convicted terrorist conspirator Moussaoui was being trained as a possible replacement for Jarrah.((From July 13 to 16, Atta stayed at the Hotel Sant Jordi in Tarragona.((  After bin al-Shibh returned to Germany on July 16, 2001, Atta had three more days in Spain.  He spent two nights in Salou at the beachside Casablanca Playa Hotel, then spent the last two nights at the Hotel Residencia Montsant.()  On July 19, Atta returned to the United States, flying on Air Lines from Madrid to Fort Lauderdale, via Atlanta.( August 2001 final plans in U.S. On July 22, 2001, Mohamed Atta rented a Galant from Rent A Car, putting 3,836 miles on the vehicle before returning it on July 26.  On July 25, Atta dropped Ziad Jarrah off at International Airport for a flight back to Germany.  On July 26, Atta traveled via Airlines to New Jersey and checked into the Kings Inn Hotel in New Jersey and stayed there until July 30 when he took a flight from Newark back to Fort Lauderdale.(On August 4, Atta is believed to have been at International Airport waiting to pick up suspected 20th Hijacker al-Qahtani from Dubai, who ended up being held by immigration as suspicious.  Atta was believed to have used a payphone at the airport to phone a number linked to al-Qaeda after Qahtani was denied entry.( )On August 6, Atta and Shehhi rented a 1995 white,  four door Ford Escort from Warricks Rent-A-Car, which was returned on August 13.  On August 6, Atta booked a flight on Spirit Airlines from Fort Lauderdale to Newark, leaving on August 7 and returning on August 9.  The reservation was not used and canceled on August 9 with the reason Family Medical Emergency.  Instead, he went to Central Office & Travel in Pompano Beach to purchase a ticket for a flight to Newark, leaving on the evening of August 7 and schedule to return in the evening on August 9.  Atta did not take the return flight.  On August 7, Atta checked into the Wayne Inn in Wayne, New Jersey and checked out on August 9.  The same day, he booked a one-way first class ticket via the Internet on America West Flight 244 from Reagan Washington National Airport to Vegas, Nevada.(  Atta traveled twice to Las Vegas on surveillance flights rehearsing how the 9/11 attacks would be carried out. Other hijackers traveled to Las Vegas at different times in the summer of 2001.Throughout the summer, Atta met with al-Hazmi to discuss the status of the operation on a monthly basis.(Los Angeles Times, Document links al Qaeda paymaster, 9/11 plotter, September 27, 2002)On August 23, Attas driver license was revoked absentia after he failed to show up in court to answer the earlier citation for driving without a license.(NewsMine.org  hijackers traced to huffman aviation.txt) On the same day, Israeli Mossad reportedly gave his name to the CIA as part of a list of 19 names they said were planning an attack in the near future.  Only four of the names are known for certain including Atta; Marwan al-Shehhi, Khalid al-Mihdhar and Nawaf al-Hazmi.() On August 30 he was recorded purchasing a utility knife from a Wal-Mart store near the hotel where he stayed prior to 9/11. Attacks File:Atta in airport.jpg|right|thumb|Atta (blue shirt) and Omari in the International Jetport in Maine on the morning of 9/11On September 10, 2001, Atta picked up Omari from the Milner Hotel in Boston, Massachusetts, and the two drove their rented Altima to a Comfort Inn in Portland, Maine; on the way they were seen getting gasoline at an Exxon Gas Station.  They arrived at 5:43 p.m. and spent the night in room 232.  While in South Portland, they were seen making two ATM withdrawals, and stopping at Wal-Mart.  FBI also reported that two middle-eastern men were seen in the parking lot of a Hut.()Atta and Omari arrived early the next morning, at 5:40 a.m., at the International Jetport, where they left their rental car in the parking lot and boarded a 6:00 a.m. Air (Airways Express) BE-1900C flight to Bostons International Airport.()  In Portland, Mohamed Atta was selected by the Assisted Passenger Prescreening System (CAPPS), which required his checked bags to undergo extra screening for explosives but involved no extra screening at the passenger security checkpoint.()The connection between the two flights at International Airport was within Terminal B, but the two gates were not connected within security.  One must leave the secured area, go outdoors, cross a covered roadway, and enter another building before going through security once again.  There are two separate concourses in Terminal B; the south concourse is mainly used by US Airways and the north one is mostly used by Airlines.  It had been overlooked that there would still be a security screen to pass in Boston because of this distinct detail of the terminals arrangement.  At 6:45 a.m., while at the Boston airport, Atta took a call from al-Shehhi, another hijacker. This call was apparently to confirm that the attacks were ready to begin.  Atta checked in for Airlines Flight 11, passed through security again, and boarded the flight.  Atta was seated in business class, in seat 8D.  At 7:59 a.m., the plane departed from Boston, carrying 81 passengers.(The hijacking began at 8:14 a.m.15 minutes after the flight departedwhen beverage service would be starting.  At this time, the pilots stopped responding to air traffic control, and the aircraft began deviating from the planned route.()  At 8:18 a.m., flight attendants Ong and Amy Sweeney began making phone calls to American Airlines to report what was happening.  Ong provided information about lack of communication with the cockpit, lack of access to the cockpit, and passenger injuries.(( ) At 8:24:38 a.m., a voice believed to be Attas was heard by air traffic controllers, saying: We have some planes. Just stay quiet and you will be OK. We are returning to the airport. Nobody move, everything will be OK. If you try to make any moves youll endanger yourself and the airplane. Just stay quiet... Nobody move please. We are going back to the airport. Dont try to make any stupid moves. The planes transponder was turned off at 8:28 a.m.  At 8:46:40 a.m., Atta crashed the 767 into the North Tower of the Trade Center.  This was the first aircraft to hit the Twin Towers on the morning of September 11, 2001.(Because the flight from Portland to Boston had been delayed,(http://multimedia.belointeractive.com/attack/investigation/1005hijackercar.html (ap news reporter)) his bags did not make it onto Flight 11. Attas bags were later recovered in Logan International Airport, and they contained airline uniforms, flight manuals, and other items.  The luggage included a copy of Attas will, written in Arabic, as well as a list of instructions, also in Arabic, such as make an oath to die and renew your intentions, you should feel complete tranquility, because the time between you and your marriage in heaven is very short, and check your weapon before you leave and long before you leave. You must make your knife sharp and you must not discomfort your animal during the slaughter.() Martyrdom video On October 1, 2006, Sunday Times released a video it had obtained through a previously tested channel, purporting to show Mohamed Atta and Jarrah recording a martyrdom message six and a half years earlier at a training camp in Afghanistan.  The video, bearing the date of January 18, 2000, is of high quality resolution  but contains no sound track. Lip readers have failed to decipher it. Atta and Jarrah appear in high spirits, laughing and smiling in front of the camera.  They have never been pictured together before.  Unidentified sources from both Al-Qaeda and the United States confirmed to The Times the videos authenticity. A separate section of the video shows bin Laden addressing his followers at a complex near Kandahar.  bin al-Shibh is also identified in the video.  According to The Sunday Times, American and German investigators have struggled to find evidence of Attas whereabouts in January 2000 after he disappeared from Hamburg. The hour-long tape places him in Afghanistan at a decisive moment in the development of the conspiracy when he was given operational command. Months later both he and Jarrah enrolled at flying schools in America.(() Mistaken identity In the aftermath of the September 11, 2001 attacks, names of the hijackers were released.  There was some confusion regarding who Mohamed Atta was, and cases of mistaken identity.  Initially, Mohamed Attas identity was confused with that of a native Jordanian, Mahmoud Atta, who bombed a bus in 1986 on the Israeli-occupied Bank, killing one and severely injuring three. Mahmoud Atta was 14 years older than Atta.(). Mahmoud Atta, a naturalized U.S. citizen, was subsequently deported from Venezuela to the United States, extradited to Israel, tried and sentenced to life in prison. The Israeli Supreme Court later overturned his extradition and set him free.()  After 9/11, there also were reports stating that Mohamed Atta had attended International Officers School at Air Force Base in Alabama.  Washington Post quoted a States Air Force official who explained, discrepancies in their biographical data, such as birth dates 20 years off, indicate we are probably not talking about the same people.()There were numerous reports in the media of Atta and Shehhi going to Shuckums Oyster Pub and Seafood Grill, a sports bar in Florida, on September 8, 2001.  Atta, Shehhi, and a third unidentified man reportedly drank heavily and played the Golden Tee 97 arcade game there.(Williams, Paul L. Al Qaeda: Brotherhood of Terror, 2002)  The bartender said Atta drank vodka and orange juice, while Shehhi preferred rum and cokes, five drinks apiece. They were wasted intoxicated.()  Manager Tony Amos described, The guy Mohamed was drunk, his voice was slurred and he had a thick accent.  Bartender Patricia Idrissi said the men argued over the bill, and when she asked if there was a problem, Mohamed said he worked for American Airlines and he could pay his bill.() Atta said, I have plenty of money. Im a pilot. And he hauled a wad of $50 and $100 bills from his pocket, eventually leaving a $3 tip.( However, Atta flew on Airways Flight 2719 to Baltimore on September 7 from Fort Lauderdale.()  On September 8, Atta was in Maryland, where he went to a Safeway grocery store to wire $2850 to Muhammad Ahmad in Dubai, and sent another $5000 to Ahmed from a Giant Food store in Laurel on the same day.()()  On September 9, Atta flew on to Boston.( Prague controversy In the months following the September 11 attacks, officials at the Czech Interior Ministry asserted that Atta made a trip to Prague on April 8, 2001 to meet with an Iraqi intelligence agent named Ahmed Khalil Ibrahim Samir al-Ani.  This piece of information was passed on to the FBI as unevaluated raw intelligence.()  Intelligence officials have concluded that such a meeting did not occur.  A Pakistani businessman named Mohammed had come to Prague from Saudi Arabia on May 31, 2000, with this second Atta possibly contributing to confusion.  The Egyptian Mohamed Atta arrived at the Florenc bus terminal in Prague, from Germany, on June 2, 2000.  He left Prague the next day, flying on Airlines to New Jersey.  In the Czech Republic, some intelligence officials say the source of the purported meeting was an Arab informant who approached the Czech intelligence service with his sighting of Atta only after Attas photograph had appeared in newspapers all over the world.  U.S. and Czech intelligence officials have since concluded that the person seen with Ani, was mistakenly identified as Atta, and the consensus of investigators has concluded that Atta never attended a meeting in Prague.()()(Burke (2005), p. 17.) Able Danger In 2005, Army Lt. Col. Anthony Shaffer and Congressman Weldon alleged that the Defense Department data mining project Danger produced a chart that identified Atta, along with al-Hazmi, al-Mihdhar, and al-Shehhi, as members of a Brooklyn-based al-Qaeda cell in early 2000.() Shaffer largely based his allegations on the recollections of Navy Captain Scott Phillpott,() who later recanted his recollection, telling investigators that he was convinced that Atta was not on the chart that we had. Phillpott said that Shaffer was relying on my recollection 100 percent, and the Defense Department Inspector Generals report indicated that Philpott may have exaggerated knowing Attas identity because he supported using Able Dangers techniques to fight terrorism.()() Family reaction Attas father, Mohamed el-Amir Awad el-Sayed Atta, a retired lawyer in Egypt vehemently rejected allegations his son was involved in the September 11 attacks and instead accuses Mossad and the U.S. government of having a hand in framing his son.(  Atta Sr. vehemently rejected media reports his son was drinking wildly, and instead described his son as a quiet boy uninvolved in politics, shy and devoted to studying architecture.()  The elder Mr. Atta claimed to have spoken with Mohamed by phone two days after the air crashes of the September 11, although there is no evidence to support Mr. Attas claim. He held interviews with the German news magazine Bild am Sonntag in late 2002 claiming his son is alive and in hiding in fear for his life, and claimed American Christians were responsible for the September 11 attacks.() However in 2005, in another interview, Atta Sr. has stated My son is gone. He is now with God. The Mossad killed him.(Alan Zarembo. He Never Even Had a Kite Mohamed Attas father talks about his son, the alleged hijacker) In all of the interviews, Mr. Atta usually does not answer questions and rambles angrily claiming that from Israels Mossad, to the FBI, to the CIA, and American religious groups, were responsible for the 9/11 attacks and that his son was not involved at all. Motivation There are multiple, conflicting explanations for Attas behavior and motivation.  Political psychologist Jerrold Post has suggested that Atta and his fellow hijackers were just following orders from Al Qaeda leadership, and whatever their destructive, charismatic leader, Osama bin Laden said was the right thing to do for the sake of the cause was what they would do. (Weaver, Carolyn. (2004, October 6). New video shows 9/11 hijackers Mohammed Atta, Ziad Jarrah at Al-Qaida meeting. Voice of America News. http://www.militaryinfo.com/news_story.cfm?textnewsid2149 )  In turn, political scientist Robert Pape has claimed that Atta was motivated by his commitment to the political cause, that he was psychologically normal, and that he was not readily characterized as depressed, not unable to enjoy life, not detached from friends and society. ( Pape, Robert. (2005). Dying to Win: The Strategic Logic of Suicide Terrorism, New York: Random House, p. 220 ) By contrast, criminal justice professor Adam Lankford has found evidence that Atta was clinically suicidal, and that his struggles with social isolation, depression, guilt, shame, hopelessness, and rage were extraordinarily similar to the struggles of those who commit conventional suicide and murder-suicide.  By this view, Attas political and religious beliefs affected the method of his suicide and his choice of target, but they were not the underlying causes of his behavior. (Kix, Paul. (2010, December 5). The truth about suicide bombers. Boston Globe. http://www.boston.com/bostonglobe/ideas/articles/2010/12/05/the_truth_about_suicide_bombers/?pagefull ; Lankford, Adam. (2011). Could Suicide Terrorists Actually Be Suicidal? Studies in Conflict & Terrorism, 34, pp. 337-366. )  Notes  References * **** Four Corners, Australian Broadcasting Corporation, broadcast November 12, 2001** The 9/11 Commission Report, (W.W. Norton & Company) ISBN 0-393-32671-3 External links * Interviews with those who interacted with Atta prior to 9/11 from Australian ABC TVs A Mission To Die For TV programme* October 2001 interview with Dittmar Machule  Machule was Attas thesis supervisor at the University of Hamburg-Harburg* Attas will, written in 1996* Attas Odyssey  October 2001 biography of Atta printed in Time MagazineAttaAttaAttaAttaAttaAttaAttaAtAttaAttaAttaja:AttaAttaAttaAttaAttaAtt as-SajjidAttaAttaAttazh:
21216
Nevada
Website  www.nv.govNevada  is a state located in the western, mountain west, and southwestern regions of the States. With an area of  and a population of about 2.7million, it is the 7th-largest and 35th-most populous state. Over two-thirds of Nevadas people live in the Las Vegas metropolitan area,() which contains its three largest incorporated cities.(http://www.census.gov/popest/cities/tables/SUB-EST2009-04-32.csv) Nevadas capital is Carson City.Nevada is largely desert and semiarid, with much of it located within the Basin. Areas south of the Great Basin are located within the Desert, while Tahoe and the Sierra Nevada mountains lie on the western edge. Approximately 86% of the states land is owned by the government under various jurisdictions, both civilian and military.()The name Nevada is derived from the nearby Sierra Nevada mountains, which means snow-capped mountain range in Spanish. The land comprising the modern state was inhabited by Native Americans of the Paiute, Shoshone, and Washoe tribes prior to European contact.(Early Native Americans, nevada-history.org, accessed Dec27,2010) It was subsequently claimed by Spain as a part of California until the War of Independence brought it under Mexican control. The United States gained the territory in 1848 following its victory in the War and the area was eventually incorporated as part of Territory in 1850. The discovery of silver at the Lode in 1859 led to a population boom that was an impetus to the creation of Territory out of western Utah Territory in 1861. Nevada became the 36thstate on October31,1864.(Rocha, Guy Myth #12  Why Did Nevada Become a State?, Nevada State Library and Archives, accessed Jan9,2011)The establishment of legalized gambling and lenient marriage and divorce proceedings in the 20thcentury transformed Nevada into a major tourist destination.(Bible, Bill Protect Gamings Legacy, Las Vegas Sun, August11,2000, accessed Jan9,2011)(Jain, Priya Betty Goes Reno, Slate, July21,2010, accessed January9,2011)The tourism industry remains Nevadas largest employer,(Nevada Employment & Unemployment Estimates for November 2010, Nevada Department of Employment, Training, and Rehabilitation) with mining continuing to be a substantial sector of the economy as Nevada is the fourth largest producer of gold in the world.(Frequently Asked Questions, Nevada Mining Association, accessed January7,2011)Nevada is officially known as the Silver State due to the importance of silver to its history and economy. It is also known as the Battle Born State because it achieved statehood during the Civil War and the Sagebrush State for the native eponymous plant.Nevada is the largest landlocked U.S. state that does not border Canada or Mexico.Etymology and pronunciationquartzite of the Prospect Mountain Formation on top of Wheeler Peak, the highest peak entirely within Nevada.The name Nevada comes from the Spanish Nevada , meaning snow-covered,() after the Sierra Nevada (snow-covered mountains) mountain range.Nevadans normally pronounce the second syllable of their state name using the  vowel of bad. Many from outside the United States pronounce it with the  vowel of father . Although the latter pronunciation is closer to the Spanish pronunciation, it is not the pronunciation preferred by locals. Notably, W. Bush made this faux pas during his campaign for the US Presidential Election. Vindication later came when President Bush campaigned at the Convention Center on June 18, 2004. The president opened his talk by proclaiming that Its great to be here in , emphasizing the correct a  the crowd roared its approval when he light-heartedly noted, You didnt think Id get it right, did ya?() Bush subsequently carried the state in the election.Assemblyman Mortenson has proposed a bill to recognize the alternate (quasi-Spanish) pronunciation of Nevada.()Geographythumb|upright|Digitally colored elevation map of NevadaNevada is almost entirely within the and Range Province, and is broken up by many north-south mountain ranges. Most of these ranges have endorheic valleys between them, which belies the image portrayed by the term Basin.Basin National Park 102007 015.JPG|left|thumb|Pinyon/Juniper woodlands cover most of the mountain ranges in the northeastern and central portions of the state.left|thumb|Sunrise over Renoand Range Nevada.JPG|thumb|left|Basin and Range scenery near RachelMuch of the northern part of the state is within the Basin, a mild desert that experiences hot temperatures in the summer and cold temperatures in the winter. Occasionally, moisture from the Monsoon will cause summer thunderstorms; Pacific storms may blanket the area with snow. The states highest recorded temperature was  in Laughlin (elevation of ) on June 29, 1994.(National Climatic Data Center, Asheville, N.C., and Storm Phillips, Stormfax, Inc.) The coldest recorded temperature was  set in San Jacinto in 1972, in the northeastern portion of the state.(The River crosses from east to west across the northern part of the state, draining into the Sink near Lovelock. Several rivers drain from the Sierra Nevada eastward, including the Walker, Truckee and Carson rivers.Image:CCF12262007 00003.jpg|thumb|upright|Mountains west of Las Vegas in the DesertThe mountain ranges, some of which have peaks above , harbor lush forests high above desert plains, creating islands for endemic species. The valleys are often no lower in elevation than .The southern third of the state, where the Las Vegas area is situated, is within the Desert. The area receives less rain in the winter but is closer to the Monsoon in the summer. The terrain is also lower, mostly below , creating conditions for hot summer days and cool to chilly winter nights (due to temperature inversion).Image:Fly geyser in nevada.jpg|thumb|left|GeyserNevada and California have by far the longest diagonal line (in respect to the cardinal directions) as a state boundary at just over . This line begins in Lake Tahoe nearly  offshore (in the direction of the boundary), and continues to the River where the Nevada, California, and Arizona boundaries merge  southwest of the Laughlin Bridge.The largest mountain range in the southern portion of the state is the Spring Mountain Range, just west of Las Vegas. The states lowest point is along the Colorado River, south of Laughlin.Nevada has 172 mountain summits with  of prominence. Nevada ranks second in the US, behind Alaska, and ahead of California, Montana, and Washington. This makes Nevada the Most Mountainous state in the country, at least by this measure.ClimateNevada is made up of mostly desert and semiarid climate regions, daytime summer temperatures sometimes may rise as high as  and nighttime winter temperatures may reach as low as . The winter season in the southern part of the state, however, tends to be of short duration and mild. Most parts of Nevada receive scarce precipitation during the year. Most rain falls on the lee side (east and northeast slopes) of the Sierra Nevada. The average annual rainfall per year is about ; the wettest parts get around . Nevadas highest recorded temperature is  at Laughlin on June 29, 1994 and the lowest recorded temperature is  at San Jacinto on January 8, 1937. Nevadas  reading is the third highest temperature recorded in the U.S. just behind Arizonas  reading and Californias  reading.VegetationNevada contains six zones: alpine, sub-alpine, pine, pinion-juniper, sagebrush and creosotebush.()CountiesNevada is divided into political jurisdictions designated as counties. Carson City is officially a consolidated municipality; however, for many purposes under state law it is considered to be a county. As of 1919 there were 17 counties in the state, ranging from . In 1969 Ormsby County was dissolved and the consolidated municipality of Carson City was created by the Legislature in its place co-terminous with the old boundaries of Ormsby County.*Humboldt was designated as a County in 1856 by Territorial Legislature and again in 1861 by the new Nevada Legislature.HistoryBefore 1861thumb|Sculpture representing a steam locomotive, in Ely, Nevada. Early locomotives played an important part in Nevadas mining industrySee of Utah, of Las Vegas, and the discovery of the first major U.S. deposit of ore in Lode under City, Nevada in 1859.Separation from Utah Territorythumb|Nevada territory 1861On March 2, 1861, the Territory separated from the Territory and adopted its current name, shortened from Sierra Nevada (Spanish for snowy range).The 1861 southern boundary is commemorated by Historical Markers 57 and 58 in Lincoln and Nye counties.StatehoodEight days prior to the presidential election of 1864, Nevada became the 36th state in the union. Statehood was rushed to the date of October 31 to help ensure Lincolns reelection on November 8 and post-Civil War Republican dominance in Congress,(Rocha Guy, Historical Myth a Month: Why Did Nevada Become A State?) as Nevadas mining-based economy tied it to the more industrialized Union.Nevada is notable for being one of only two states to significantly expand its borders after admission to the Union.  Nevada achieved its current southern boundaries on May 5, 1866, when it absorbed the portion of Pah-Ute County in the Territory west of the Colorado River, essentially all of present day Nevada south of the 37th parallel. The transfer was prompted by the discovery of gold in the area, and it was thought by officials that Nevada would be better able to oversee the expected population boom. This area includes most of what is now Clark County.  In 1868 another part of the western Utah Territory, whose population was seeking to avoid Mormon dominance, was added to Nevada in the eastern part of the state, setting the current eastern boundary.Mining shaped Nevadas economy for many years (see mining in Nevada). When Twain lived in Nevada during the period described in It, mining had led to an industry of speculation and immense wealth. However, both mining and population declined in the late 19th century. However, the rich silver strike at Tonopah in 1900, followed by strikes in Goldfield and Rhyolite, again put Nevadas population on an upward trend.Gambling and laborthumb|right|Gambling erupted once more following a recession in the early 20th century, helping to build the city of Las VegasUnregulated gambling was commonplace in the early Nevada mining towns but was outlawed in 1909 as part of a nation-wide anti-gambling crusade. Because of subsequent declines in mining output and the decline of the agricultural sector during the Depression, Nevada again legalized gambling on March 19, 1931, with approval from the legislature. At the time, the leading proponents of gambling expected that it would be a short-term fix until the states economic base widened to include less cyclical industries. However, re-outlawing gambling has never been seriously considered since the industry has become Nevadas primary source of revenue today.Nuclear testingThe Test Site,  northwest of the city of Las Vegas, was founded on January 11, 1951, for the testing of weapons. The site is composed of approximately  of desert and mountainous terrain. testing at the Nevada Test Site began with a  bomb dropped on Flat on January 27, 1951. The last atmospheric test was conducted on July 17, 1962, and the underground testing of weapons continued until September 23, 1992. The location is known for having the highest concentration of nuclear-detonated weapons in the U.S.Over 80% of the states area is owned by the federal government. The primary reason for this is that homesteads were not permitted in large enough sizes to be viable in the arid conditions that prevail throughout desert Nevada. Instead, early settlers would homestead land surrounding a water source, and then graze livestock on the adjacent public land, which is useless for agriculture without access to water (this pattern of ranching still prevails).DemographicsGrowthAccording to the Census Bureaus 2007 estimate, Nevada has an estimated population of 2,565,382 which is an increase of 92,909, or 3.5%, from the prior year and an increase of 516,550, or 20.8%, since the year 2000. This includes a natural increase since the last census of 81,661 people (that is 170,451 births minus 88,790 deaths) and an increase due to net migration of 337,043 people into the state. Immigration from outside the United States resulted in a net increase of 66,098 people, and migration within the country produced a net increase of 270,945 people. According to the 2006 census estimate, Nevada is the eighth fastest growing state in the nation.()The of population of Nevada is located in southern Nye County.() In this county, the unincorporated town of Pahrump, located  west of Las Vegas on the California state line, has grown 26 times in size from 1980 to 2000. In the year 2006, the town may have over 50,000 permanent residents. Las Vegas was Americas fastest-growing city and metropolitan area from 1960 to 2000, but has grown from a gulch of 100 people in 1900 to 10,000 by 1950 to 100,000 by 1970 to have 2.5 million in the metropolitan area in 2010.thumb|400px|Nevada Population Density MapFrom about the 1940s until 2003, Nevada was the fastest-growing state in the US percentage-wise. Between 1990 and 2000, Nevadas population increased 66.3%, while the USAs population increased 13.1%. Over two thirds of the population of the state live in the Clark County Vegas metropolitan area.Henderson and North Las Vegas are among the USAs top 20 fastest-growing cities of over 100,000.The rural community of Mesquite located  northeast of Las Vegas was an example of micropolitan growth in the 1990s and 2000s. Other desert towns like Mercury and Searchlight on the outskirts of Las Vegas has grown tremendously as well.Large numbers of new residents in the state originate from California, which led some locals to feel that their state is being Californicated.()Human diversityAccording to the 2008 census estimates, racial distribution was as follows: 65% American, 7.1% American, 6% American (estimates placed them at 10%), 2% others (American Indians and Pacific Islanders) and the remaining 20% were Hispanics or Latinos of any race.In terms of diversity, Nevada is home to many cultures and nationalities. Las Vegas and Reno or Washoe County have evolved to become majority cities and counties. Nevada also has a sizable Basque ancestry population. In Douglas, Mineral and Pershing counties, a plurality of residents are of Mexican ancestry, with Clark County (Las Vegas) being home to over 200,000 Americans alone; Nye County and Humboldt County have a plurality of Germans; and Washoe County has many Americans. Americans of English descent form pluralities in Lincoln County, Churchill County, Lyon County, White Pine County and Eureka County.  Las Vegas is home to rapid-growing ethnic communities like Scandinavians, Italians, Poles, Greeks, Spaniards and Armenians.Largely African American sections of Las Vegas (the Meadows) and Reno can be found. Many current African-American Nevadans are newly transplanted residents from California, the Midwest, or the East Coast.Since the California Gold Rush of the 1850s brought thousands of Chinese miners to Washoe county, Asian Americans lived in the state. They were followed by a few hundred of Japanese farm workers in the late 19th century. By the late 20th century, many immigrants from China, Japan, Korea, the Philippines and recently from India and Vietnam came to the Las Vegas metropolitan area. The city now has one of Americas most prolific Asian American communities, with a mostly Chinese and Taiwanese area known as Chinatown west of I-15 on Spring Mountain Boulevard, and an Asiatown shopping mall for Asian customers located at Charleston Avenue and Paradise Boulevard. Americans form the largest Asian American group in the state, with a population of more than 113,000. They comprise 56.5% of the Asian American population in Nevada and constitute about 4.3% of the entire states population.(Nevada  Selected Population Profile in the United States)According to the 2000 U.S. Census, 16.19% of Nevadas population aged 5 and older speak Spanish at home, while 1.59% speak Filipino() and 1% speak languages.6.8% of the states population were reported as under 5, 26.3% were under 18, and 13.6% were 65 or older. Females made up approximately 50.7% of the population. Las Vegas was a major destination for immigrants from Asia and America seeking employment in the gaming and hospitality industries during the 1990s and first decade of the 21st century, but farming and construction are the biggest employers of immigrant labor.Senior citizens (over age 65) and young children or teenagers (under age 18) form large sections of the Nevada population. The religious makeup of Nevadans includes large communities of Mormons, Catholics and Evangelicals; each is known for higher birth rates and a younger than national average age. Jews represent a large proportion of the active adult retirement community.In 2010, illegal immigrants constituted an estimated 8.8% of the population. This was the highest percentage of any state in the country.()The principal ancestries of Nevadas residents in 2008 have been surveyed to be the following:(Nevada  Selected Social Characteristics in the United States, 2008 American Community Survey 1-year Estimates, U.S. Census Bureau, 2008. Retrieved 2010-06-23.)* 13.2% German* 10.7% Irish* 9.4% English* 6.4% Italian* 4.1% American* 4.0% Scandinavian (1.7% Norwegian, 1.5% Swedish, and 0.8% Danish).ReligionMajor religious affiliations of the people of Nevada are:()*Roman Catholic  27%*Protestant**Mainline  11%**Evangelical  13%**Other Protestant  2%*Saint/ Mormon  11%*Muslim  2%*Jewish  1%*Other Religions  3%*Unaffiliated  20%The largest denominations by number of adherents in 2000 were the Roman Catholic Church with 331,844; Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints with 116,925; and the Baptist Convention with 40,233. 77,100 Nevadans belong to Jewish congregations.()Economythumb|Nevada quarterthumb|Lake Tahoe on the Nevada, California borderThe economy of Nevada has long been tied to vice industries. was founded on mining and refounded on sin-beginning with prizefighting and easy divorce a century ago and later extending to gaming and prostitution, said the August 21, 2010 issue of The Economist.(The Economist, August 21, 2010, p. 35)The Bureau of Economic Analysis(Bureau of Economic Analysis)() estimates that Nevadas total state product in 2010 was $126 billion. Resort areas such as Las Vegas, Reno, Tahoe, and Laughlin attract visitors from around the nation and world. In FY08 the total of 266 casinos with gaming revenue over $1m for the year, brought in revenue of $12 billion in gaming revenue, and $13 billion in non-gaming revenue. A review of gaming statistics can be found at gaming area.The states Per capita personal income in 2009 was $38,578, ranking nineteenth in the nation.()As of August 2011, the states unemployment rate is the worst in the nation at 13.4%.() Its agricultural outputs are cattle, hay, alfalfa, dairy products, onions, and potatoes. Its industrial outputs are tourism, mining, machinery, printing and publishing, food processing, and electric equipment.In portions of the state outside of the Las Vegas and Reno metropolitan areas, mining and cattle ranching are the major economic activities. By value, gold is by far the most important mineral mined. In 2004,  of gold worth $2.84 billion were mined in Nevada, and the state accounted for 8.7% of world gold production (see mining in Nevada). Silver is a distant second, with  worth $69 million mined in 2004 (see mining in Nevada).(Nevada Mining Association, Economic Overview of the Nevada Mining Industry 2004) Other minerals mined in Nevada include construction aggregates, copper, gypsum, diatomite and lithium. Despite its rich deposits, the cost of mining in Nevada is generally high, and output is very sensitive to world commodity prices.As of January 1, 2006, there were an estimated 500,000 head of cattle and 70,000 head of sheep in Nevada.(United States Department of Agriculture Nevada State Agriculture Overview  2005) Most of these animals forage on rangeland in the summer, with supplemental feed in the winter. Calves are generally shipped to out-of-state feedlots in the fall to be fattened for market. Over 90% of Nevadas  of cropland is used to grow hay, mostly alfalfa, for livestock feed.The state tax in Nevada is variable depending upon the county. The minimum statewide tax rate is 6.85%, with five counties (Elko, Esmeralda, Eureka, Humboldt, and Mineral) charging this minimum amount. All other counties assess various taxes, making the combined state/county sales taxes rate in one county as high as 8.1%, which is the amount charged in Clark County. Sales tax in the other major counties: Carson at 7.475%, Washoe at 7.725%. The minimum Nevada sales tax rate changed on 1 July 2009.()Nevada has by far the most hotel rooms per capita in the United States. According to the American Hotel and Lodging Association, there were 187,301 rooms in 584 hotels (of 15 or more rooms). The state is ranked just below California, Texas, Florida, and New York in total number of rooms, but those states have much larger populations. Nevada has one hotel room for every 14 residents, far above the national average of one hotel room per 67 residents.()Prostitution is legal in parts of Nevada in licensed brothels, but only counties with populations under 400,000 residents have the option to legalize it. Although prostitution employs roughly 300 women as independent contractors, and not a major part of the Nevada economy, it is a very visible endeavor. Of the 14 counties that are permitted to legalize prostitution under state law, about 8 have chosen to legalize brothels. State law prohibits prostitution in Clark County (which contains Las Vegas), and Washoe County (which contains Reno). However, prostitution is legal in Storey County, which is part of the metropolitan area.Transportationthumb|upright|State Route shieldThe 2011 American State Litter Scorecard ranked Nevada (tied with Mississippi) as a bottom-three, Worst jurisdiction in the U.S., for overall effectiveness and quality of statewide public space cleanlinessfrom state and related litter/debris removal efforts.(S. Spacek, 2011 American State Litter Scorecard: New Rankings for An Increasingly Concerned Populace)Amtraks Zephyr train uses the Union Pacifics original railroad line in daily service from Chicago to California, serving Elko, Winnemucca, Sparks, and Reno. Thruway Motorcoaches also provide connecting service from Las Vegas to trains at California, Angeles, and California; and from Nevada, to California. Las Vegas has had no passenger train service since Amtraks Wind was discontinued in 1997, although there have been a number of proposals to re-introduce service to either Los Angeles or Southern California.The Pacific Railroad has some railroads in the north and in the south. Lines provides some bus service.Road.jpg|thumb|U.S. Route 50, also known as The Loneliest Road in America.Interstate 15 passes through the southern tip of the state, serving Las Vegas and other communities. I-215 and spur route I-515 also serve the Las Vegas metropolitan area. Interstate 80 crosses through the northern part of Nevada, roughly following the path of the Humboldt River from Utah in the east and passing westward through Reno and into California. It has a spur route, I-580. Nevada also is served by several federal highways: US 6, US 50, US 93, US 95 and US 395. There are also 189 Nevada state highways. Nevada is one of a few states in the U.S. that does not have a continuous highway linking its two major population centers. Even the non-interstate federal highways arent contiguous between the Las Vegas and Reno areas.The state is one of just a few in the country that allow trucks with three trailerswhat might be called a train in Australia. However, American versions are usually smaller, in part because they must ascend and descend some fairly steep mountain passes.Transit is the public transit system in the Las Vegas metropolitan area. The agency is the largest transit agency in the state and operates a network of bus service across the Vegas Valley, including the use of Deuce, buses, on the Vegas Strip and several outlying routes. RTC RIDE operates a system of local transit bus service throughout the Reno-Sparks metropolitan area. Other transit systems in the state include Carson Citys JAC. Most other counties in the state do not have public transportation at all.Additionally, a four mile (6 km) monorail system provides public transportation in the Las Vegas area. The Vegas Monorail line services several casino properties and the Vegas Convention Center on the east side of the Las Vegas Strip, running near Paradise Road, with a possible future extension to International Airport. Several hotels also run their own monorail lines between each other, which are typically several blocks in length.McCarran International Airport in Las Vegas is the busiest airport serving Nevada. The International Airport (formerly known as the Reno Cannon International Airport) is the other major airport in the state.Law and governmentThe current of Nevada is Sandoval, a Republican; the governor of Nevada is limited by the Nevada Constitution to two four-year terms in office, by election or succession (lifetime limit). Nevadas two U.S. senators are Reid (Democrat) and Heller (Republican), who, by the United States Constitution, have no term limits. Reid is also the current Leader in the US Senate.  Nevadas U.S. Representatives are Republican Heck, Democrat Berkley, and Republican Amodei.Legislatureview of the Nevada State Legislative Building in Carson CityThe Legislature is a bicameral body divided into an house Senate and a house Assembly. Members of the Senate serve for four years, and members of the Assembly serve for two years. Both houses of the Nevada Legislature will be impacted by term limits starting in 2010, as Senators and Assemblymen/women will be limited to a maximum of 12 years service in each house (by appointment or election which is a lifetime limit)  this provision in the constitution was recently upheld for legislators by the Supreme Court of Nevada in a unanimous decision (70), so term limits will be in effect starting in 2010. Each session of the Legislature meets for a constitutionally mandated 120 days in every odd-numbered year, or longer if the Governor calls a special session. Currently, the Senate is controlled by the Democratic Party (12 to 9 majority) and the Assembly is controlled by the Democratic Party (28 to 14 majority).JudiciaryNevada is one of the few U.S. states without a system of intermediate appellate courts.The supreme court is the Court of Nevada.Original jurisdiction is divided between the District Courts (with general jurisdiction), and Justice Courts and Municipal Courts (both of limited jurisdiction).Libertarian lawsImage:Supremecourtofnevada.jpg|thumb|right|The courthouse of the Court of NevadaIn 1900, Nevadas population was the smallest of all states and was shrinking, as the difficulties of living in a barren desert began to outweigh the lure of silver for many early settlers. Historian Friedman has explained what happened next::Nevada, in a burst of ingenuity, built an economy by exploiting its sovereignty. Its strategy was to legalize all sorts of things that were illegal in California ... after easy divorce came easy marriage and casino gaming. Even prostitution is legal in Nevada, in any county that decides to allow it. Quite a few of them do.(Lawrence M. Friedman, American Law in the Twentieth Century (New Haven: Yale University Press, 2002), 596597.) With the advent of air conditioning for summertime use and Southern Nevadas mild winters, the fortunes of the state began to turn around, as it did for Arizona, making these two states the fastest growing in the Union.Prostitution lawsNevada is the only state where prostitution is legal (under the form of licensed brothels).Prostitution is specifically illegal by state law in the states larger jurisdictions, which include Clark County (which contains Las Vegas), Washoe County (which contains Reno), and the independent city of City.  Otherwise, it is legal in those counties which specifically vote to permit it.Divorce lawsNevadas early reputation as a divorce haven arose from the fact that, prior to the divorce revolution in the 1970s, divorces were quite difficult to obtain in the United States. Already having legalized gaming and prostitution, Nevada continued the trend of boosting its profile by adopting one of the most liberal divorce statutes in the nation. This resulted in Williams v. North Carolina, , in which the Supreme Court ruled that Carolina had to give full faith and credit to a Nevada divorce.Nevadas divorce rate tops the national average.(http://www.lvrj.com/news/nevada-s-divorce-rate-exceeds-national-average-128391943.html)Tax lawsNevadas tax laws also draw new residents and businesses to the state. Nevada has no income tax or income tax.() Since Nevada does not collect income data it cannot share such information with the federal government, the IRS. (Nicholas Shaxson:  Treasure Islands, Tax Havens and the Men Who Stole the World; The Bodley Head, London, 2011)Nevadas state sales tax rate is 6.85 percent. Counties may impose additional rates via voter approval or through approval of the Legislature; therefore, the applicable sales tax will vary by county from 6.85 percent to 8.1 percent in Clark County.Clark County, which includes Las Vegas, imposes four separate county option taxes in addition to the statewide rate  0.25 percent for flood control, 0.50 percent for mass transit, 0.25 percent to fund the Southern Nevada Water Authority, and 0.25 percent for the addition of police officers in that county. In Washoe County (which includes Reno), the sales tax rate is 7.725 percent, due to county option rates for flood control, the ReTRAC train trench project, mass transit, and an additional county rate approved under the Local Government Tax Act of 1991.(http://tax.state.nv.us/documents/Sales_Tax_Map.pdf)The lodging tax rate in unincorporated Clark County, which includes the Las Vegas Strip, is 12%. Within the boundaries of the cities of Las Vegas and Henderson, the lodging tax rate is 13%.Incorporation lawsNevada also provides friendly environment for the formation of corporations, and many (especially California) businesspeople have incorporated their businesses in Nevada to take advantage of the benefits of the Nevada statute. corporations offer great flexibility to the of Directors and simplify or avoid many of the rules that are cumbersome to business managers in some other states. In addition, Nevada has no tax.Financial institutionsSimilarly, many U.S. states have usury laws limiting the amount of interest a lender can charge, but federal law allows corporations to import these laws from their home state.Drug and alcohol lawsNon-alcohol drug laws are a notable exception to Nevadas otherwise libertarian principles. It is notable for having the harshest penalties for drug offenders in the country. Nevada remains the only state to still use minimum sentencing guidelines for marijuana possession. However, it is now a misdemeanor for possession of less than one ounce but only for persons age 21 and older. In 2006, voters in Nevada defeated attempts to allow possession of 1 ounce of marijuana (for personal use) without being criminally prosecuted, (55% against legalization, 45% in favor of legalization). However, Nevada is one of the states that allows for use of marijuana for medical reasons (though this remains illegal under federal law).Nevada has very liberal alcohol laws. Bars are permitted to remain open 24 hours, with no last call. stores, stores and supermarkets may also sell alcohol 24 hours per day, and may sell beer, wine and spirits.SmokingNevada voters enacted a smoking ban (the Nevada Clean Indoor Air Act) in November 2006 that became effective on December 8, 2006. It outlaws smoking in most workplaces and public places. Smoking is permitted in bars, but only if the bar serves no food, or the bar is inside a larger casino. Smoking is also permitted in casinos, hotel rooms, tobacco shops, and brothels.() However, some businesses do not obey this law and the government tends not to enforce it.() Yet, in one case, they did prosecute an establishment called Bilbos. As of 2008, the trial was still pending.()CrimeNevada has been ranked as the most dangerous state in the U.S. for five years in a row, just ahead of Louisiana()() In 2006, the rate in Nevada was approximately 24% higher than the national average rate. crimes accounted for approximately 84.6% of the crime rate in Nevada which was 21% higher than the national rate. The remaining 20.3% were crimes and were approximately 45% higher than other states.() In 2008, Nevada had the third highest rate, and the highest rate of robbery and vehicle theft.( It should be noted that many of these statistics may not totally be attributed to the citizens of Nevada themselves, but partially to the high rate of visitors entering and leaving the state as well. In addition, the states most populous county, Clark (accounting for 75% of the states total population), skews the crime rate for the balance of the state.PoliticsState politicsDue to heavy growth in the southern portion of the state, there is a noticeable divide between politics of northern and southern Nevada. The north has long maintained control of key positions in state government, even while the population of southern Nevada is larger than the rest of the state combined. The north sees the high population south becoming more influential and perhaps commanding majority rule. The south sees the north as the old guard trying to rule as an oligarchy. This has fostered some resentment, however, due to a term limit amendment passed by Nevada voters in 1994, and again in 1996, some of the norths hold over key positions will soon be forfeited to the south, leaving Northern Nevada with less power.Clark and Washoe countieshome to Las Vegas and Reno, respectivelyhave long dominated the states politics. Between them, they cast 87 percent of Nevadas vote, and elect a substantial majority of the state legislature. The great majority of the states elected officials are either from Las Vegas or Reno.National politicsNevada has voted for the winner in every presidential election since 1912, except in 1976 when it voted for Ford over Carter. This gives the state status as a political bellwether.Nevada supported Democrat Clinton in the 1992 and presidential elections, Republican George W. Bush won in 2000 and 2004, and Democrat Obama won the state in 2008.The states U. S. Senators are Democrat Harry Reid, the Majority Leader, and Republican Heller. The Governorship is held by Sandoval, a Republican from Reno.State governmentState departments and agencies:* Attorney General* Department of Business & Industry* Department of Conservation & Natural Resources* Consumer Health Assistance* Controllers Office* Department of Correction* Department of Cultural Affairs* Nevada Commission on Economic Development* Department of Education* Nevada Secretary of State, Election Division* Department of Employment, Training & Rehabilitation* Gaming Control Board* Governors Office* Department of Health and Human Services* Department of Information Technology* Department of Justice* Lieutenant Governor* Nevada Military Department* Division of Minerals, Commission on Mineral Resources* Department of Motor Vehicles* National Guard* Department of Personnel* Advisory Council for Prosecuting Attorneys* Public Employees Benefit Program* Public Employees Retirement System* Department of Public Safety* Utilities Commission(http://puc.state.nv.us)* Department of Secretary of State* Department of Taxation* Commission on Tourism* Department of Transportation* State Treasurer* Universities and Community Colleges of Nevada* Nevada Office of Veterans Services* Western Interstate Commission for Higher Education* Department of WildlifeLocal governmenttowns in Nevada, known as cities, are given the authority to legislate anything not prohibited by law. A recent movement has begun to permit rule in incorporated Nevada cities to give them more flexibility and fewer restrictions from the Legislature.Unincorporated towns are settlements eminently governed by the county in which they are located, but who, by local referendum or by the act of the county commission, can form limited local governments in the form of a Town Advisory Board (TAB)/ Citizens Advisory Council (CAC), or a Town Board.Town Advisory Boards and Citizens Advisory Councils are formed purely by act of the county commission. Consisting of three to five members, these elected boards form a purely advisory role, and in no way diminish the responsibilities of the county commission that creates them. Members of advisory councils and boards are elected to two year terms, and serve without compensation. The councils and boards, themselves, are provided no revenue, and oversee no budget.Town Boards are limited local governments created by either the local county commission, or by referendum. The board consists of five members elected to four-year terms. Half the board is required to be up for election in each election. The board elects from within its ranks a town chairperson and town clerk. While more powerful than Town Advisory Boards and Citizens Advisory Councils, they also serve a largely advisory role, with their funding provided by their local county commission. The local county commission has the power to put before residents of the town a vote on whether to keep or dissolve a town board at any general election. Town boards have the ability to appoint a town manager if they choose to do so.Significant cities and townsImage:Las Vegas 89.jpg|thumb|Vegas Strip in Paradise and WinchesterImage:Reno2002.jpg|thumb|RenoNV-750px.JPG|thumb|ElkoBuilding, 2007.jpg|thumb|Carson City{||-|valigntop||}Paradise, Sunrise Manor, and Spring Valley are unincorporated towns in the Las Vegas metropolitan area.Note: table was compiled using Nevada State estimates from 2004 for population and Census 2000 for area and density10 richest places in NevadaRanked by capita incomeEducationColleges and universities*System of Higher Education**of Nevada, Las Vegas (UNLV)**of Nevada, Reno (UNR)**State College**Meadows Community College (TMCC)**Basin College**of Southern Nevada (CSN)**Nevada College  (WNC)*Nevada College*University Nevada*of Southern NevadaResearch institutes*Research InstituteParks and recreation areasImage:05-26-2008 0130 edited-1.jpg|thumb|right|of Fire State ParkRecreation areas maintained by the National Park ServiceNorthern Nevadaright|thumb|Great Basin National Park*National Historic Trail*Valley National Park*Basin National Park near Baker*Spanish National Historic Trail*Express National Historic TrailSouthern NevadaImage:Charleston peak.JPG|right|thumb|Charleston* Meadows National Wildlife Preserve* Canyon Mountain Bike Park* National Forest* Charleston and the Charleston Wilderness* Mountains and the Mountains National Recreation Area* Mead National Recreation AreaWildernessThere are 68 designated areas in Nevada, protecting some  under the jurisdiction of the Park Service, Forest Service, and of Land Management.()State parksSee: of Nevada state parks.SportsNevada is not well known for its professional sports, but the state takes pride in college sports, most notably the Wolf Pack (representing the University of Nevada, Reno) of the Athletic Conference and the Rebels of the West Conference. In 2012, Nevada will join its cross-state rival in the MWC.UNLV is most remembered for its mens basketball program, which experienced its height of supremacy in the late 1980s and early 1990s. Coached by Tarkanian, the Runnin Rebels became one of the most elite programs in the country. In 1990, UNLV won the Mens Division I Championship by defeating Duke 10373, which set tournament records for most points scored by a team and largest margin of victory in the national title game. In 1991, UNLV finished the regular season undefeated. Forward Larry Johnson won several awards, including the Naismith Award. UNLV reached the Final Four yet again, but lost their national semifinal against Duke 7977, and is referred to as one of the biggest upsets in the NCAA Tournament. The Runnin Rebels were the Associated Press pre-season #1 back to back (198990, 199091). North Carolina is the only other team to accomplish that (200708, 200809).The state is also home to one of the most famous tennis players of all time, Agassi.Nevada sports teamsProfessional*Vegas Locomotives, United Football League*Vegas 51s, League Baseball (AAA)*Vegas Wranglers, ECHL*Aces, League Baseball (AAA)*Bighorns, D-League* Nevada Pumas, QuickHit Football LeagueCollege*Wolf Pack, UNR*RebelsThe state is also home to the Vegas Motor Speedway and NASCAR event and the National Rodeo.MilitarySeveral States Navy ships have been named USS Nevada in honor of the state. They include:*USS Nevada*Nevada (BM-8)*Nevada (BB-36)*Nevada (SSBN-733)Area 51 is located near Lake, a dry salt lake bed. The much smaller Air Force Base is located in Springs, Nevada; Air Station Fallon in Fallon; Army Depot in Hawthorne; and the Test Range near Tonopah.These bases host a number of activities including the Unmanned Aerial Systems Center of Excellence, the Strike and Air Warfare Center, Test and Training Range, Red Flag, the Air Force Thunderbirds, the States Air Force Warfare Center, the States Air Force Weapons School, and the States Navy Fighter Weapons School.Songs about Nevada* Silver State Fanfare  the Official State March by Gerald G. Willis.  Codified by the Nevada Legislature in 2001 at NRS 235.035* Sands of Nevada from Knopflers 2000 release to Philadelphia* Sin City from Limbecks 2005 release Me Come Home* Means Nevada, the state song of Nevada, by Bertha Rafetto* Nevada by Riders in the Sky from the album Best of the West* Night Time In Nevada by Dulmage/Clint/Pascoe, 1931* Nevadas Grace by Atreyu, twelfth track off 2004s The CurseFuture issuesNevada enjoys many economic advantages, and the southern portion of the state enjoys mild winter weather, but rapid growth has led to some overcrowded roads and schools. Nevada has the nations 5th largest school district in the Clark County School District (projected fall 2007 enrollment is 314,000 students grades K-12).()  While the state was recently one of the fastest growing in the country, population growth slowed down to a halt in 2008.(http://www.bloomberg.com/news/2011-02-25/fastest-growing-nevada-now-booms-with-unemployment-stranded-homeowners.html)In 2008, the American State Litter Scorecard, presented at the Society for Public Administration national conference, positioned Nevada next to Mississippi and Louisiana as one of the worst states for removing litter from public roadways and properties.(S. Spacek, The American State Litter Scorecard March 2008)In August 2008, it was announced that Gaming would halt construction on a 4.2 billion dollar project called Echelon, which was to replace the old Resort & Casino. The reason cited for this is lack of funding/credit from banks.Coyote Springs is a proposed community for 240,000 inhabitants in Clark and Lincoln counties.  It would be  Nevadas largest city.  The town is being developed by Whittemore and has generated some controversy because of environmental concerns and allegations of political favoritism.()State symbolsplaya USGS.png|thumb|upright||Playa areas of Nevada*State animal: Bighorn Sheep*State artifact: Tule Duck Decoy*State bird: Bluebird*State colors: silver and blue*fish: cutthroat trout*State flower: Sagebrush (tridentata)*fossil: Ichthyosaur*grass: ricegrass*State march: Silver State Fanfare by Gerald Willis*State metal: Silver (Ag)*State mottos: Battle Born and All For Our Country*precious gemstone: Virgin Valley black fire opal*semiprecious gemstone: Nevada turquoise* slogan: The Battle Born State*song: Means Nevada by Bertha Raffetto*reptile: Tortoise*rock: Sandstone*soil: (soil) series*State tartan: A particular tartan designed for Nevada by Richard Zygmunt Pawlowski*State trees: Pinyon pine and pine (Pinus longaeva)See also*Basin*List of National Register of Historic Places in Nevada*of people from Nevada*stateReferencesExternal links*Official state website*Nevada State Databases  Annotated list of searchable databases produced by Nevada state agencies and compiled by the Government Documents Roundtable of the American Library Association.*State Tourism website*Nevada state symbols*Secretary of State of Nevada*Nevada Classifieds*Nevada State Library and Archives*Energy Profile for Nevada*USGS real-time, geographic, and other scientific resources of Nevada*US Census Bureau*County Maps of Nevada Full color maps. List of cities, towns and county seats*Nevada State Facts*Pronunciation Guide: Nevada*Forgotten Nevada  Ghost Towns and Mining Camps of Nevada*Nevadas Historical Markers** Southeast  af:Nevadaang:Nevadaar:an:Nevadaarc:frp:Nevadaast:Nevadagn:Nevadaaz:Nevadabn:zh-min-nan:Nevadabe-x-old:bcl:Nevadabi:Nevadabo:bs:Nevadabr:Nevadabg:ca:Nevadacv:cs:Nevadaco:Nevadacy:Nevadada:Nevadade:NevadaHahoodzoet:Nevadael:es:Nevadaeo:Nevadoeu:Nevadafa:hif:Nevadafo:Nevadafr:Nevadafy:Nevadaga:Nevadagv:Nevadagag:Nevadagd:Nevadagl:Nevadahak:Nui-f-thatxal:hy:hi:hr:Nevadaio:Nevadaig:Nevadilo:Nevadabpy:id:Nevadaie:Nevadaiu:/nivaataaik:Nevadaos:is:Nevadait:Nevadahe:jv:Nevadakn:pam:Nevadaka:kw:Nevadasw:Nevadaht:Nevadaku:Nevadalad:Nevadala:Nivatalv:Nevadalt:Nevadalij:Nevadd-ali:Nevadalmo:Nevadahu:Nevadamk:mg:Nevadaml:mi:Nevadamr:arz:ms:Nevadamn:nah:Nevadamrj:(staat)ja:frr:Nevadano:Nevadann:Nevadaoc:Nevadauz:Nevadapnb:pap:Nevadapms:Nevadands:Nevadapl:Nevadapt:Nevadaro:Nevadarm:Nevadasuyuru:sah:sq:Nevadascn:Nevadasimple:Nevada(tt USA)sl:Nevadaszl:Newadackb:sr:sh:Nevadafi:Nevadasv:Nevadatl:Nebadata:()th:chy:Nevadatr:Nevadauk:ur:shitativi:Nevadavo:Nevadawar:Nevadayi:yo:Nevadadiq:Nevadabat-smg:Nevadazh:
21276
Neodymium
Neodymium ( ) is a element with the symbol Nd and number 60. It is a soft silvery metal that tarnishes in air. Neodymium was discovered in 1885 by the Austrian chemist Auer von Welsbach. It is present in significant quantities in the ore minerals monazite and bastnsite. Neodymium is not found naturally in metallic form or unmixed with other lanthanides, and it is usually refined for general use. Although neodymium is classed as a rare earth, it is no rarer than cobalt, nickel, and copper ore, and is widely distributed in the Earths crust.(See of the elements (data page)) Most of the worlds neodymium is mined in China.Neodymium compounds were first commercially used as glass dyes in 1927, and they remain a popular additive in glasses. The color of neodymium compoundsdue to the Nd(III) ionis often a reddish-purple but it changes with the type of lighting, due to fluorescent effects. Some neodymium-doped glasses are also used in lasers that emit light with wavelengths between 1047 and 1062 nanometers. These have been used in extremely high power applications, such as experiments in confinement fusion.Neodymium is also used with various other substrate crystals, such as aluminum garnet in the laser. This laser usually emits infrared waves at a wavelength of about 1064 nanometers. The Nd:YAG laser is one of the most commonly used lasers. Another chief use of neodymium is as the free pure element. It is used as a component in the alloys used to make high-strength magnets  the most powerful permanent magnets known. These magnets are widely used in such products as microphones, professional loudspeakers, in-ear headphones, and computer hard disks, where low magnet mass or volume, or strong magnetic fields are required. Larger neodymium magnets are used in high power versus weight motors (for example in cars) and generators (for example aircraft and turbine generators).(As hybrid cars gobble rare metals, shortage looms, Reuters, August 31, 2009.)CharacteristicsPhysical propertiesNeodymium, a rare earth metal, was present in the classical mischmetal at a concentration of about 18%. Metallic neodymium has a bright, silvery metallic luster, but as one of the more reactive lanthanide rare-earth metals, it quickly oxidizes in ordinary air. The oxide layer that forms then peels off, and this exposes the metal to further oxidation. Thus a centimeter-sized sample of neodymium completely oxidizes within a year.()Neodymium exists in two allotropic forms, with a transformation from a double hexagonal to a cubic structure taking place at about 863 C.()Chemical propertiesNeodymium metal tarnishes slowly in air and it burns readily at about 150 C to form the oxide::4 Nd + 3 O2  2 Nd2O3Neodymium is a quite electropositive element, and it reacts slowly with cold water, but quite quickly with hot water to form hydroxide::2 Nd (s) + 6 H2O (l)  2 Nd(OH)3 (aq) + 3 H2 (g)Neodymium metal reacts enthusiastically with all the halogens::2 Nd (s) + 3 F2 (g)  2 NdF3 (s) violet substance:2 Nd (s) + 3 Cl2 (g)  2 NdCl3 (s) mauve substance:2 Nd (s) + 3 Br2 (g)  2 NdBr3 (s) violet substance:2 Nd (s) + 3 I2 (g)  2 NdI3 (s) green substanceNeodymium dissolves readily in dilute acid to form solutions that contain the lilac Nd(III) ion. These exist as a Nd(OH2)93+ complexes:():2 Nd (s) + 3 H2SO4 (aq)  2 Nd3+ (aq) + 3 SO (aq) + 3 H2 (g)CompoundsNeodymium compounds include*halides: neodymium(III) fluoride  NdF3;neodymium(III) chloride  NdCl3; neodymium(III) bromide  NdBr3; neodymium(III) iodide  NdI3*oxides: Nd2O3*sulfides: neodymium(II) sulfide  NdS, neodymium(III) sulfide  Nd2S3*nitrides: neodymium(III) nitride  NdN*hydroxide: hydroxide Nd(OH)3*phosphide: neodymium phosphide NdP*carbide: neodymium carbide Nd4C3*nitrate: neodymium nitrate Nd(NO3)3And many more, since neodymium is a quite reactive elementSome neodymium compounds have colors which vary based upon the type of lighting.File:Neodymium tl1.jpg|Neodymium compounds in tube lighting (TL)File:Neodymium fluorescent1.jpg|Neodymium compounds in energy-saving fluorescent lightingFile:Neodymium daylight1.jpg|Neodymium compounds in normal daylightIsotopesNaturally occurring neodymium is a mixture of five stable isotopes, 142Nd, 143Nd, 145Nd, 146Nd and 148Nd, with 142Nd being the most abundant (27.2% of the abundance), and two radioisotopes, 144Nd and 150Nd. In all, 31 radioisotopes of neodymium have been detected , with the most stable radioisotopes being the naturally occurring ones: 144Nd (decay with a half-life (T) of 2.291015 years) and 150Nd (beta decay, T  71018 years, approximately). All of the remaining radioactive isotopes have half-lives that are shorter than eleven days, and the majority of these have half-lives that are shorter than 70 seconds. Neodymium also has 13 known states, with the most stable one being 139mNd (T  5.5 hours), 135mNd (T  5.5 minutes) and 133m1Nd (T ~ 70 seconds).The primary modes before the most abundant stable isotope, 142Nd, are capture and decay, and the primary mode after is minus decay. The primary products before 142Nd are element Pr (praseodymium) isotopes and the primary products after are element Pm (promethium) isotopes.HistoryNeodymium was discovered by Baron Auer von Welsbach, an Austrian chemist, in Vienna in 1885. He separated neodymium, as well as the element praseodymium, from a material known as didymium by means of fractional crystallization of the double ammonium nitrate tetrahydrates from nitric acid, while following the separation by spectroscopic analysis; however, it was not isolated in relatively pure form until 1925. The name neodymium is derived from the Greek words neos (), new, and didymos (), twin.()Double nitrate crystallization was the means of commercial neodymium purification until the 1950s. Lindsay Chemical Division was the first to commercialize large-scale ion-exchange purification of neodymium. Starting in the 1950s, high purity (above 99%) neodymium was primarily obtained through an exchange process from monazite, a mineral rich in rare earth elements. The metal itself is obtained through electrolysis of its halide salts. Currently, most neodymium is extracted from bastnsite, (Ce,La,Nd,Pr)CO3F, and purified by solvent extraction. Ion-exchange purification is reserved for preparing the highest purities (typically >99.99 %). The evolving technology, and improved purity of commercially available neodymium oxide, was reflected in the appearance of neodymium glass that resides in collections today. Early neodymium glasses made in the 1930s have a more reddish or orange tinge than modern versions which are more cleanly purple, due to the difficulties in removing the last traces of praseodymium in the era when fractional crystallization technology had to be relied on.Occurrence and productionNeodymium is never found in nature as the free element, but rather it occurs in ores such as monazite and bastnsite that contain small amounts of all the rare earth metals. The main mining areas are in China, the United States, Brazil, India, Ceylon, and Australia. The reserves of neodymium are estimated at about eight million tonnes. Although it belongs to the earth metals, neodymium is not rare at all. Its abundance in the Earth crust is about 38 mg/kg, which is the second highest among rare-earth elements, following cerium. The worlds production of neodymium was about 7,000 tonnes per year in 2004.( The bulk of current production is from China, whose government has recently imposed strategic materials controls on the element, raising some concerns in consuming countries.(Concern as China clamps down on rare earth exports (The Independent, UK news site))Neodymium is typically 10% to 18% of the rare earth content of commercial deposits of the light rare earth element minerals bastnasite and monazite. With neodymium compounds being the most strongly colored for the trivalent lanthanides, that percentage of neodymium can occasionally dominate the coloration of rare earth mineralswhen competing chromophores are absent. It usually gives a pink coloration. Outstanding examples of this include monazite crystals from the tin deposits in Llallagua, Bolivia, ancylite from Mont Saint-Hilaire, Quebec, or lanthanite from the Saucon Valley, Pennsylvania. As with neodymium glasses, such minerals change their colors under the differing lighting conditions. The absorption bands of neodymium interact with the visible spectrum of vapor, with the unfiltered shortwave UV light causing neodymium-containing minerals to reflect a distinctive green color. This can be observed with monazite-containing sands or bastnasite-containing ore.Applications*Neodymium has an unusually large specific capacity at liquid-helium temperatures, so is useful in cryocoolers*Probably because of similarities to Ca2+, Nd3+ has been reported(Y. Wei et al. The Effect of Neodymium (Nd3+) on Some Physiological Activities in Oilseed Rape during Calcium (Ca2+) Starvation 10th International Rapeseed Congress) to promote plant growth. Rare earth element compounds are frequently used in China as fertilizer.*dating is useful for determining the age relationships of rocks() and meteorites.*Size and strength of volcanic eruption can be predicted by scanning for neodymium isotopes. Small and large volcanic eruptions produce lava with different neodymium isotope composition. From the composition of isotopes, scientists predict how big the coming eruption will be, and use this information to warn residents of the intensity of the eruption.MagnetsFile:Neodymag.jpg|thumb|Neodymium magnet on a bracket from a drivemagnets are the strongest permanent magnets known  Nd2Fe14B. A neodymium magnet of a few grams can lift a thousand times its own weight. These magnets are cheaper, lighter, and stronger than magnets. However, neodymium magnets lose their magnetism at high temperatures while Samarium magnets do not. Neodymium magnets appear in products such as microphones, professional loudspeakers, in-ear headphones, guitar and guitar pick-ups and computer disks where low mass, small volume, or strong magnetic fields are required. Neodymium magnet electric motors have also been responsible for the development of purely electrical model aircraft within the first decade of the 21st century, to the point that these are displacing internal combustion powered models internationally. Likewise, due to this high magnetic capacity per weight, neodymium is used in the electric motors of hybrid and electric automobiles and in the electricity generators of some designs of commercial wind turbines (Note that only wind turbines with permanent magnet generators use Neodymium). For example, drive electric motors of each Prius require one kilogram (2.2 pounds) of neodymium per vehicle.(Neodymium doped lasersFile:Laser glass slabs.jpg|thumb|left|300px|Neodymium doped glass slabs used in extremely powerful lasers for confinement fusion.Certain transparent materials with a small concentration of neodymium ions can be used in lasers as gain media for infrared wavelengths (10541064 nm), e.g. Nd:YAG (yttrium aluminium garnet), Nd:YLF (yttrium lithium fluoride), Nd:YVO4 (yttrium orthovanadate), and Nd:glass. Neodymium-doped crystals (typically Nd:YVO4) generate high-powered infrared laser beams which are converted to green laser light in commercial DPSS hand-held lasers and pointers.The current laser at the UK Weapons Establishment (AWE), the HELEN (High Energy Laser Embodying Neodymium) 1-terawatt neodymium-glass laser, can access the midpoints of pressure and temperature regions and is used to acquire data for modeling on how density, temperature and pressure interact inside warheads. HELEN can create plasmas of around 106 K, from which opacity and transmission of radiation are measured.()Neodymium glass lasers are used in extremely high power (terawatt scale), high energy (megajoules) multiple beam systems for confinement fusion. Nd:glass lasers are usually frequency tripled to the third harmonic at 351 nm in laser fusion devices.Neodymium glass for other applicationsFile:Neodymium glass light bulb under fluorescent and incandescent light.jpg|thumb|A neodymium glass bulb, with the base and inner coating removed, under two different types of light: fluorescent on the left, and incandescent on the right.Neodymium glass (Nd:glass) is produced by the inclusion of neodymium oxide (Nd2O3) in the glass melt. Usually in daylight or incandescent light neodymium glass appears lavender, but it appears pale blue under fluorescent lighting. Neodymium may be used to color glass in delicate shades ranging from pure violet through wine-red and warm gray. The first commercial use of purified neodymium was in glass coloration, starting with experiments by Leo Moser in November 1927. The resulting Alexandrite glass remains a signature color of the Moser glassworks to this day. Neodymium glass was widely emulated in the early 1930s by American glasshouses, most notably Heisey, Fostoria (wisteria), Cambridge (heatherbloom), and Steuben (wisteria), and elsewhere (e.g. Lalique, in France, or Murano). Tiffins twilight remained in production from about 1950 to 1980.( ) Current sources include glassmakers in the Czech Republic, the United States, and China.The sharp absorption bands of neodymium cause the glass color to change under different lighting conditions, being reddish-purple under daylight or yellow light, but blue under white lighting, or greenish under trichromatic lighting. This color-change phenomenon is highly prized by collectors. In combination with gold or selenium, beautiful red colors result. Since neodymium coloration depends upon forbidden f-f transitions deep within the atom, there is relatively little influence on the color from the chemical environment, so the color is impervious to the thermal history of the glass. However, for the best color, iron-containing impurities need to be minimized in the silica used to make the glass. The same forbidden nature of the f-f transitions makes rare-earth colorants less intense than those provided by most d-transition elements, so more has to be used in a glass to achieve the desired color intensity. The original Moser recipe used about 5% of neodymium oxide in the glass melt, a sufficient quantity such that Moser referred to these as being rare earth doped glasses. Being a strong base, that level of neodymium would have affected the melting properties of the glass, and the lime content of the glass might have had to be adjusted accordingly.()Light transmitted through neodymium glasses shows unusually sharp bands; the glass is used in astronomical work to produce sharp bands by which lines may be calibrated. Neodymium is also used to remove the green color caused by iron contaminants from glass. Neodymium is a component of didymium used for coloring glass to make welders and glass-blowers goggles; the sharp absorption bands obliterate the strong sodium emission at 589 nm. Neodymium and didymium glass are used in color-enhancing filters in indoor photography, particularly in filtering out the yellow hues from incandescent lighting. Similarly, neodymium glass is becoming widely used more directly in light bulbs. These lamps contain neodymium in the glass to filter out yellow light, resulting in a whiter light which is more like sunlight.() Neodymium has been patented for use in automobile rear-view mirrors, to reduce the glare at night.Similar to its use in glasses, neodymium salts are used as a colorant for enamels.PrecautionsNeodymium metal dust is a combustion and explosion hazard. Neodymium compounds, as with all rare earth metals, are of low to moderate toxicity; however its toxicity has not been thoroughly investigated. Neodymium dust and salts are very irritating to the eyes and membranes, and moderately irritating to skin. Breathing the dust can cause lung embolisms, and accumulated exposure damages the liver. Neodymium also acts as an anticoagulant, especially when given intravenously.(Neodymium magnets have been tested for medical uses such as magnetic braces and bone repair, but biocompatibility issues have prevented widespread application. Commercially available magnets made from neodymium are exceptionally strong, and can attract each other from large distances. If not handled carefully, they come together very quickly and forcefully, causing injuries. For example, there is at least one documented case of a person losing a fingertip when two magnets he was using snapped together from 50 cm away.()ReferencesBooks*The Industrial Chemistry of the Lanthanons, Yttrium, Thorium and Uranium, by R.J. Callow, Pergamon Press 1967.*Lindsay Chemical Division, American Potash and Chemical Corporation, Price List, 1960.*Chemistry of the Lanthanons, by R.C. Vickery, Butterworths 1953.External links*USGS Rare Earth Commodity Summary 2006*WebElements.com 	 Neodymium*Its Elemental 	 Neodymiumar:az:Neodimbn:be:bs:Neodijumbg:ca:Neodimicv:cs:Neodymco:Neodimiucy:Neodymiwmda:Neodymde:Neodymet:Neodmel:es:Neodimioeo:Neodimoeu:Neodimiofa:hif:Neodymiumfr:Nodymefur:Neodimiga:Neoidimiamgv:Niodymiumgl:Neodimiohak:gxal:ko:hy:hi:hr:Neodimijio:Neodimioid:Neodimiumit:Neodimiohe:jv:Neodimiumkv:ht:Neyodimla:Neodymiumlv:Neodmslb:Neodymlt:Neodimislij:Neodimiojbo:jinmrne,odimihu:Neodmiumml:mr:ms:Neodimiummy:mrj:nl:Neodymiumja:no:Neodymnn:Neodympnb:pl:Neodympt:Neodmioro:Neodimqu:Neodimyuru:sah:stq:Neodymiumscn:Neodimiusimple:Neodymiumsk:Neodmsl:Neodimsr:sh:Neodijumfi:Neodyymisv:Neodymta:th:tr:Neodimyumuk:ur:Neodymiumug:vi:Neodymiwar:Neodimyoyo:Neodymiumzh-yue:zh:
21306
Politics_of_Nauru
Politics of Nauru takes place in a framework of a parliamentary representative democratic republic, whereby the of Nauru is the of government of the branch. power is vested in both the government and the parliament. The Judiciary is independent of the executive and the legislature.Political conditionsBackgroundNaurus economic viability has historically rested on its phosphate reserves. Phosphate  in actuality a resource derived from a 1,000-year cycle of bird droppingshas been mined on the island since 1906. In the 20th century, the small Pacific nation generated healthy revenues from this lucrativebut finiteresource.The phosphate supply has virtually all been exhausted in recent years and as such, the future of the people of Nauru is uncertain, and the challenge for the countrys policy makers will be to determine a path of continued economic prosperity, without the benefits of this resource.Offshore bankingIn this regard, the government has tried to develop the island into an offshore financial center, imitating the success of the Bahamas and other island nations around the world that have emerged as major banking centers. The government has also invested in property on other islands and the United States through its Phosphate Royalties Trust.Over the course of recent years, however, offshore banking institutions and instruments have come under increasing scrunity by international bodies seeking to make international finance a more transparent system. Nauru, as a result, has been a casualty of this movement.Image:Ludwig Scotty.jpg|thumb|left|Scotty, former president (2004-2007)In December 1999, four major United States banks banned dollar transactions with four Pacific island states, including Nauru. The States Department of State issued a report identifying Nauru as a major money laundering center, used by narcotics traffickers and organized crime figures.Shifting governmentsThe last few years has seen repeated changes of government. Naurus unsettled political situation never led to civil disturbances; the transitions were always sanctioned by parliament and occurred peacefully.President Dowiyogo took office in April 2000 for his fourth and, after a minimal hiatus, fifth stints as Naurus top executive. Dowiyogo first served as president from 1976 to 1978. He returned to that office in 1989, and was re-elected in 1992. A vote in parliament, however, forced him to yield power to Clodumar in 1995. Dowiyogo regained the presidency when the Clodumar government fell in mid-1998.In April 2000, Harris, former chairman of the Phosphate Corporation, became president as he briefly assembled support in parliament. Harris attempt to put together an administration lasted for only a few days of parliamentary maneuvering. In the end, Harris proved unable to secure parliaments confidence, and Dowiyogo returned yet again to the presidency by the end of the month.Rene Harris was finally able to claim power as the president of Nauru in March 2001 when he was elected to the presidency by the parliament; his term was to last three years, presumably ending in 2004.Environmental concernsPhosphate depletion will likely be one of the most important considerations for the government in the next few years as the supply is forecast to be exhausted by 2003. Since Nauru imports almost everything it consumes (including food, water and fuel) the need to diversify the economy and to generate other sources of revenue is of paramount importance.As noted above, offshore banking has been one arena into which Nauru has traversed, however, the rewards are limited by growing concern about the ethical parameters of this business. Tourism is another industry that is also being gradually built.Yet another concern is the ecological damage that resulted from a century of phosphate mining.  Along with the United Kingdom, Australia and New Zealand were responsible for the large scale and indiscriminate mining of phosphate on the tiny island for most of the 20th century.The mining left an ecological and economic disaster for Nauru to handle when the country achieved independence in 1968. Not only was the countrys principal resource and employment generating activity almost entirely depleted by the rapid mining done by the three countries, the mining companies had also failed to follow the basic principles of restoring and regenerating the lands where mining had been completed. Thus, Nauru was left to handle the immense and expensive task of restoring large chunks of land which were destroyed by the mining.Nauru demanded compensation from the three nations, but was refused. Finally, in 1993, Nauru was forced to turn to the International Court of Justice at The Hague in The Netherlands. It filed a claim of $73 million against the three countries. The case was soon afterwards settled out of court by Australia, with Britain and New Zealand also contributing to the reparations sought by Nauru.Today, Nauru is almost totally dependent on trade with New Zealand, Australia and Fiji. Arable land is very limited as are all other natural resources, now that its long-time economic base of phosphate mines has been almost completely depleted.Foreign policyOn the international front, in late July 2002, Taiwan cut its diplomatic ties with Nauru. Taiwan and Nauru had shared diplomatic ties for 22 years; Taiwan has enjoyed diplomatic ties with several Pacific countries even in the face of the China policy by Beijing. Nevertheless, this particular 22-year long legacy was broken when Naurus president decided to change its allegiance and establish formal relations with China. The move effectively shifted diplomatic recognition from Taipei to Beijing, thus angering the government of Taiwan, which described the shift in policy as reckless.Naurus decision to recognize Beijing via the signing of diplomatic papers and a joint commuique ultimately resulted in the cessation of Taiwanese aid. Nauru instead received a US$150 million aid package from Beijing.In April 2005, during a state visit to the Marshall Islands, ROC President Chen Shui-bian met and spoke with the Nauruan President Ludwig Scotty. On May 14, 2005, the two countries signed the necessary documents to restore formal ties and reopen embassies.6 The Peoples Republic of China consequently severed ties two weeks later on May 31.Internal disputesIn early 2003, a fight for power emerged between President Rene Harris and former President Bernard Dowiyogo. The power struggle occurred following a non-confidence vote in parliament, which effectively ejected Harris from the position of president. Reports suggested that Harris was ousted because of rising anxieties regarding economic mismanagement. At the time, Dowiyogo referred to Naurus political scenario as being critical.It was reported that Dowiyogo became the president replacing Harris, however, information surrounding the shift in power was sparse. There was very little international coverage of the matter. Regardless, Dowiyogos tenure did not last for long. In March 2003, Dowiyogo had heart surgery in the United States and died.2003 - presentIn May 2003, elections were held within the parliament to select a new president. In those elections, Ludwig Scotty gained the most support and became the new president. The actual results of the parliamentary vote were as follows: Ludwig Scotty10 parliamentary votes, Kinza Clodumar7 parliamentary votes. President Scotty became president on May 29, 2003.  He served only until August 2003 when he was ousted in a non-confidence measure.  Rene Harris was elected as president.Meanwhile, in parliamentary elections held in May 2003, Nauru First Party won 3 seats and independents garnered 15 in total.In late June 2004,  Naurus former parliament speaker Ludwig Scotty became the countrys new president.  His presidency followed the exit of outgoing President Rene Harris following yet another non-confidence measure.For his part, Scotty had resigned as parliamentary speaker in April 2004 in protest of the Naurus financial crisis which included the commencement of receivership proceedings by corporate giant, General Electric.  During that period, Nauru faced the seizure of its assets if the country  failed to honor its debt payments.Since Scottys resignation as parliamentary speaker, the parliament was unable to convene as members of parliament could not decide whom to appoint as his replacement.  The scenario led to a political crisis, the financial crisis notwithstanding.In mid-2004, the government of Australia sent envoys to help Nauru deal with its  financial crisis.  By August 2004, a report by the Australian Center for Independent Studies suggested that Nauru might consider relinquishing its independent status in favor of becoming an Australian territory.  The report called for radical economic reform as well as the restructuring of both governmental instruments and public service.  The author of the report has offered Nauru economic advice in the past.(http://www.countrywatch.com/cw_topic.aspx?typetext&vcountry122&topicPOPCO)Executive branch|of Nauru|Stephen||19 December 2007|}The Parliament elects a president from amongst its members, who appoints a Cabinet of 5-6 people. The President is both the of state and of government.A series of no-confidence votes, resignations and elections between 1999 and 2003 saw Harris and Dowiyogo as President for numerous short periods during a period of political instability. Dowigoyo died in office on March 10, 2003, in Washington, D.C., after heart surgery. Scotty was elected President on May 29, 2003, but this did not bring to an end the years of political uncertainty as he was replaced by Harris a few months later. Scotty regained the presidency in 2004, only to be ousted in a of no confidence in 2007.(MPs oust Naurus president, Sydney Morning Herald, December 19, 2007-12-19.)Legislative branchthumb|right|Nauru parliamentParliament has 18 members, elected for a three year term in multi-seat constituencies. Each constituency returns 2 members to the Nauruan Parliament, except for Ubenide which returns 4.Voting is compulsory for all citizens aged 20 or more.Political parties and electionsNauru does not have a formal structure for political parties; candidates typically stand as independents. 15 of the 18 members of the current parliament are independents, and alliances within the government are often formed on the basis of extended family ties.(Australian Department of Foreign Affairs and Trade. Republic of Nauru Country Brief -  November  2005. Retrieved 2006-05-02.) Three parties that have been active in Nauruan politics are the Democratic Party, First and the Centre Party.Judicial branchFor its size, Nauru has a complex legal system.(http://www.state.gov/r/pa/ei/bgn/16447.htm#gov) The Supreme Court, headed by the Chief Justice, is paramount on constitutional issues. Other cases can be appealed to the two-judge Appellate Court. Parliament cannot overturn court decisions, but Appellate Court rulings can be appealed to the Court of Australia; in practice, this rarely happens. Lower courts consist of the District Court and the Family Court, both of which are headed by a Resident Magistrate, who also is the Registrar of the Supreme Court. Finally, there also are two quasi-courts: the Public Service Appeal Board and the Police Appeal Board, both of which are presided over by the Chief Justice.(State Department Bureau of East Asian and Pacific Affairs September 2005. Retrieved 2006-05-11.)Local governmentSince 1992, local government has been the responsibility of the Nauru Island Council (NIC). The NIC has limited powers and functions as an advisor to the national government on local matters. The role of the NIC is to concentrate its efforts on local activities relevant to Nauruans. An elected member of the Nauru Island Council cannot simultaneously be a member of parliament.(Ogden, M.R. Republic of Nauru. Retrieved 2006-05-02.) tenure in Nauru is unusual: all Naurans have certain rights to all land on the island, which is owned by individuals and family groups; government and corporate entities do not own land and must enter into a lease arrangement with the landowners to use land. Non-Nauruans cannot own lands.(Nauru Department of Economic Development and Environment. 2003. First National Report To the United Nations Convention to Combat Desertification (UNCCD). Retrieved 2006-05-03.)Armed forcesNauru has no armed forces; under an informal agreement, defence is the responsibility of Australia. There is a small police force under civilian control.(CIA World Fact Book. Retrieved 2006-05-02.)See also* Amo* Commonwealth* diplomatic missionsReferencesExternal links* Nauru laws and case lawde:Nauru#Politik de Naurude Naurude Nauru
21378
Economy_of_Niger
spelling        The economy of Niger is based largely upon internal markets, subsistence agriculture, and the export of raw commodities: food stuffs to neighbors and raw minerals to world markets.  Niger, is a landlocked Sub-Sahara African nation, and over the past two decades has consistently been ranked near or at the bottom of worldwide indexes of the development index, GDP, and percapita income.  Economic activity centres on subsistence agriculture, animal husbandry, re-export trade, and export of uranium. The 50% devaluation of the African CFA franc in January 1994 boosted exports of livestock, cowpeas, onions, and the products of Nigers small cotton industry.  Exports of cattle to neighboring Nigeria, as well as Groundnuts and their oil remain the primary non-mineral exports. The government relies on bilateral and multilateral aid - which was suspended briefly following coup dtats in 1996 and 1999 - for operating expenses and public investment. Short-term prospects depend continued Bank and IMF relief and extended aid. The post 1999 government has broadly adhered to privatisation and market deregulation plans instituted by these funders.Macro-economic trendThis is a chart of trend of gross domestic product of Niger at market prices estimated by the International Monetary Fund(IMF, 2006 estimates) with figures in millions of CFA Francs.Mean wages were $0.37 per manhour in 2009.OverallNigers economy is based largely on crops, livestock, and some of the worlds largest uranium deposits. Drought cycles, desertification, a 3.4% population growth rate and the drop in world demand for uranium have undercut an already marginal economy. Traditional subsistence farming, herding, small trading, and informal markets dominate an economy that generates few formal sector jobs.  Between 1988 and 1995 28% to 30% of the total economy of Niger was in the unregulated sector, including small and even large scale rural and urban production, transport and services.(C. Maldonado & J. Gasarian. SECTEUR INFORMEL: FONCTIONS MACRO-ECONOMIQUES ET POLITIQUES GOUVERNEMENTALES: LE CAS DU NIGER. Document de recherche S-INF-1-20. Dpartement du dveloppement des entreprises et des coopratives, Organisation internationale du Travail -- OIT (1998).)GDP per capitaCurrent GDP per capita(earthtrends.wri.org) of Niger grew 10% in the Sixties reaching a peak growth of 187% in the Seventies. But this proved unsustainable and it consequently shrank by 27% in the Eighties and a further 48% in the Nineties. Much of this GDP is explained through the exploitation of uranium at Arlit in the far north of the country.  Ore is partially processed on site by foreign mining corporations and transported by truck to Benin.  Fluctuation of GDP can be mapped to changes in international uranium price, as well as price negations with the main mining company, Frances NC. Price rises in the mid 1970s were followed by a collapse in the market price through much of the 1980s and 1990s. Thus the GDP per capita has little direct impact on the average Nigerien, although uranium funds much government operation. The 2006 Development Index ranked Niger sixth from worst in the world, with a HDI of 0.370: 174 of 179 nations.(Human Development Report 2007/2008.  United Nations Development Program.)AgricultureImage:Niger sorghum map and season .png|thumb|left|200px|Map and growing season for the Nigerien Sorghum crop.  Chart shows Difference Vegetation Index against Long Rains Dry Season (July - Feb), measuring normal years crop growth in the major Sorghum producing areas of Niger.(www.pecad.fas.usda.gov/cropexplorer/)Image:Niger rice map and season.png|thumb|right|200px|Map and growing season for the Nigerien  Rice crop.  Chart shows Difference Vegetation Index against Long Rains Dry Season (July - Feb), measuring normal years crop growth in the major Rice producing areas of Niger.(Nigers agricultural and livestock sectors are the mainstay of all but 18% of the population. Fourteen percent of Nigers GDP is generated by livestock production (camels, goats, sheep and cattle), said to support 29% of the population. The 15% of Nigers land that is arable is found mainly along its southern border with Nigeria. Rainfall varies and when insufficient, Niger has difficulty feeding its population and must rely on grain purchases and food aid to meet food requirements. Although the rains in 2000 were not good, those in 2001 were plentiful and well distributed. millet, sorghum, and cassava are Nigers principal rain-fed subsistence crops. Irrigated rice for internal consumption, while expensive, has, since the devaluation of the CFA franc, sold for below the price of imported rice, encouraging additional production. Cowpeas and onions are grown for commercial export, as are small quantities of garlic, peppers, potatoes, and wheat. Groundnuts, and to a lesser degree Cotton, introduced by former colonial power France in in the 1930s and 1950s respectively, account for most of the world market for Nigerien industrial agriculture. Prior to the mass exploitation of uranium in the early 1970s, groundnut oil was the largest Nigerien export by worth.()The majority of Nigers population are rural residents engaged in agriculture, mostly in the south centre and south west of the nation. While these people are dependent on the agricultural market portions of their production and consumption, much of Nigerien farming is agriculture outside of the marketplace.(External trade and investmentthumb|left|300px|Nigers exports in 2006Of Nigers exports, foreign exchange earnings from livestock, although impossible to quantify, are second only to those from uranium. Actual exports far exceed official statistics, which often fail to detect large herds of animals informally crossing into Nigeria. Some hides and skins are exported and some are transformed into handicrafts.MiningThe persistent uranium price slump has brought lower revenues for Nigers uranium sector, although uranium still provides 72% of national export proceeds. The nation enjoyed substantial export earnings and rapid economic growth during the 1960s and 1970s after the opening of two large uranium mines near the northern town of Arlit. When the uranium-led boom ended in the early 1980s, however, the economy stagnated and new investment since then has been limited. Nigers two uranium mines (SOMAIRs open pit mine and COMINAKs underground mine) are owned by a French-led consortium and operated by French interests.Image:MineArlit1.jpg|thumb|right|The open pit COMINAK uranium mine at Arlit.Exploitable deposits of gold are known to exist in Niger in the region between the River and the border with Faso. Substantial deposits of phosphates, coal, iron, limestone, and gypsum also have been found. Numerous foreign companies, including American firms, have taken out exploration licenses for concessions in the gold seam in western Niger, which also contains deposits of other minerals.Several oil companies explored for petroleum since 1992 in the Djado plateau in north-eastern Niger and the Agadem basin, north of Lake Chad but made no discoveries worth developing at the time. In June 2007, however, National Petroleum Corporation (state-owned by the Peoples Republic of China) signed a US$5 billion agreement to extract oil in the Agadem block, as well as build a  per day refinery and a 2,000 km oil pipeline in the country; production is expected to start in 2009.()Nigers known coal reserves, with low energy and high ash content, cannot compete against higher quality coal on the world market. However, the parastatal SONICHAR (nigrienne de charbon) in Tchirozerine (north of Agadez) extracts coal from an open pit and fuels an electricity generating plant that supplies energy to the uranium mines.Image:Niger 2008 oilrig.jpg|thumb|right|A test well in the Desert, January 2008.Economic growth contributed to an annual average economic growth of 3.5% throughout the mid-1990s, the economy stagnated due the sharp reduction in foreign aid in 1999, which gradually resumed in 2000, and poor rains in 2000. Reflecting the importance of the agricultural sector, the return of good rains was the primary factor underlying a projected growth of 4.5% for 2001.Foreign investmentIn recent years, the Government of Niger promulgated revisions to the investment code (1997 and 2000), petroleum code (1992), and mining code (1993), all with attractive terms for investors. The present government actively seeks foreign private investment and considers it key to restoring economic growth and development. With the assistance of the Nations Development Programme (UNDP), it has undertaken a concerted effort to revitalize the private sector.CurrencyNiger shares a common currency, the franc, and a common central bank, the Bank of West African States (BCEAO), with six other members of the African Monetary Union. The of the Government of France supplements the BCEAOs international reserves in order to maintain a fixed rate of 100 CFA (financire africaine) to the French franc (to the euro as of January 1, 2002).Government restructuringIn January 2000, Nigers newly elected government inherited serious financial and economic problems including a virtually empty treasury, past-due salaries (11 months of arrears) and scholarship payments, increased debt, reduced revenue performance, and lower public investment. In December 2000, Niger qualified for enhanced debt relief under the Monetary Fund program for Indebted Poor Countries and concluded an agreement with the Fund on a Reduction and Growth Facility (PRGF).In addition to changes in the budgetary process and public finances, the new government has pursued economic restructuring towards the IMF promoted privatization model.  This has included the privatization of water distribution and telecommunications and the removal of price protections for petroleum products, allowing prices to be set by world market prices. Further privatizations of public enterprises are in the works. In its effort comply with the IMFs Reduction and Growth Facility plan, the government also is taking actions to reduce corruption and, as the result of a participatory process encompassing civil society, has devised a Reduction Strategy Plan that focuses on improving health, primary education, rural infrastructure, and judicial restructuring.Foreign AidThe most important donors in Niger are France, the Union, the Bank, the IMF and other United Nations agencies (UNDP, UNICEF, FAO, WFP, and UNFPA). Other principal donors include the States, Belgium, Germany, Switzerland, Canada, and Arabia. While USAID does not have an office in Niger, the United States is a major donor, contributing nearly $10 million each year to Nigers development. The U.S. also is a major partner in policy coordination in such areas as food security and HIV/AIDS. The importance of external support for Nigers development is demonstrated by the fact that about 45% of the governments FY 2002 budget, including 80% of its capital budget, derives from donor resources.In 2005 the UN drew attention to the increased need for foreign  aid given severe problems with drought and locusts resulting in a famine endangering the lives around a million people.StatisticsGDP:purchasing power parity - $9.6 billion (9.6 G$) (1999 est.)GDP - real growth rate:2% (1999 est.)GDP - per capita:purchasing power parity - $1,000 (1999 est.)GDP - composition by sector:agriculture:40%industry:18%services:42% (1998)Population below poverty line:NA%Household income or consumption by percentage share:lowest 10%:3%highest 10%:29.3% (1992)Inflation rate (consumer prices):4.8% (1999)Labour force:70,000 receive regular wages or salariesLabour force - by occupation:agriculture 90%, industry and commerce 6%, government 4%Unemployment rate:NA%Budget:revenues:$377 million, including $146 million from foreign sourcesexpenditures:$377 million, including capital expenditures of $105 million (1999 est.)Industries:uranium mining, cement, brick, textiles, food processing, chemicals, slaughterhousesIndustrial production growth rate:5.1% (2003 est.)Electricity - production:180 GWh (1998)Electricity - production by source:fossil fuel:100%hydro:0%nuclear:0%other:0% (1998)Electricity - consumption:363 GWh (1998)Electricity - exports:0 kWh (1998)Electricity - imports:196 GWh (1998)Agriculture - products:cowpeas, cotton, peanuts, millet, sorghum, cassava (tapioca), rice; cattle, sheep, goats, camels, donkeys, horses, poultryExports:$269 million (f.o.b., 1997)Exports - commodities:uranium ore 65%, livestock products, cowpeas, onions (1998 est.)Exports - partners:US, Greece, Japan, France, Nigeria, BeninImports:$295 million (c.i.f., 1997)Imports - commodities:consumer goods, primary materials, machinery, vehicles and parts, petroleum, cerealsImports - partners:France, dIvoire, US, Benelux, NigeriaDebt - external:$1.3 billion (1999 est.)Economic aid - recipient:$222 million (1995)Currency:1 financire africaine franc (CFAF)  100 centimesExchange rates:Communaut financire africaine francs (CFAF) per US$1  670 (January 2000), 560.01 (January 1999), 589.95 (1998), 583.67 (1997), 511.55 (1996), 499.15 (1995)note:since 1 January 1999, the CFAF is pegged to the euro at a rate of 655.957 CFA francs per euroFiscal year:calendar yearSee also*of countries by percentage of population living in poverty*of countries by Human Development Index*of countries by GDP (nominal)*of countries by GDP (nominal) per capita*of countries by GDP (PPP)*of countries by GDP (PPP) per capita*of countries by GNI (nominal) per capita*of countries by GDP growth*of countries by industrial production growth rateReferences*OECD/  AEO 2007 Niger country study.External links**Invest in Niger: Centre de Promotion des Investissements Sis  la Chambre de Commerce dAgriculture, dIndustrie et dAtisanat du Niger.*http://www.niger-tourisme.com: Ministre du tourisme et de lartisanat nigrien.*Niger latest trade data on ITC Trade Map*The MBendi website, Niger: A South Africa based business research group.  Is especially useful for tracking government mining consessions.* LA MAISON DE LAFRIQUE: Niger.  Franco-African business group.*Institut de Recherche pour le Dveloppement au Niger: French government development office in Niger.*United Kingdom Department of International Development:Niger.*Canadian International Development Agency:Niger.*World Trade Organization  MEMBER INFORMATION: Niger.*The World Bank, Niger overview and resources.*International Monetary Fund: Article IV Executive Board Consultation reports regarding Niger.*IMF. Niger: Financial Position in the Fund as of January 31, 2008.*IMF. Niger: Transactions with the Fund from May 01, 1984 to January 31, 2008.*Estruscan Mining (Canada): corporate report on their Samira Hill Gold Mine, on the Benin border.*West African Agricultural Market Observer/Observatoire du March Agricole  (RESIMAO), a project of the West-African Market Information Network (WAMIS-NET),  provides live market and commodity prices from fifty seven regional and local public agricultural markets across Benin, Burkina Faso, Cte dIvoire, Guinea, Niger, Mali, Senegal, Togo, and Nigeria.  Sixty commodities are tracked weekly. The project is run by the Benin Ministry of Agriculture, and a number of European, African, and United Nations agencies.del Ngerde Ngerdu Nigerde Nxerdi Nijerekonomikade Nigrdo Nger
21648
New_Jersey
Website  www.nj.gov Route Marker  Circle sign 33.svgNew Jersey  is a state in the Northeastern and Middle Atlantic regions of the States. , its population was 8,791,894.() It is bordered on the north and east by the state of York, on the southeast and south by the Ocean, on the west by Pennsylvania and on the southwest by Delaware. New Jersey lies mostly within the sprawling areas of York City and Philadelphia and is the most densely populated state in the United States. It is also the third wealthiest by 2009-2010 median household income.()The area was inhabited by Native Americans for more than 2,800 years, with historical tribes such as the Lenape along the coast. In the early 17th century, the Dutch and the Swedes made the first European settlements.() The British later seized control of the region,() naming it the of New Jersey. It was granted as a colony to Sir Carteret and Berkeley, 1st Baron Berkeley of Stratton. At this time, it was named after the largest of the British Islands, Jersey, where Carteret had been born.() New Jersey was the site of several decisive battles during the Revolutionary War.In the 19th century, factories in cities such as Elizabeth, Paterson, and Trenton helped to drive the Revolution. New Jerseys position at the center of the megalopolis, between Boston, York City, Philadelphia, Baltimore, and D.C., fueled its rapid growth through the suburban boom of the 1950s and beyond.The Governor of New Jersey is Republican Christie, who assumed office in 2010.Image:Skylands3.jpg|thumb|right|250px|The New Jersey Botanical Garden at Skylands in State Park, Passaic and Bergen Counties.Image:High Point Monument and Lake Marcia framed.jpg|thumb|right|250px|Point Monument as seen from Lake Marcia at High Point, Sussex County, the highest elevation in New Jersey at 1803 feet above sea level.()GeographyNew Jersey is bordered on the north and northeast by New York (parts of which are across the River, New York Bay, the Van Kull, Bay, and the Kill); on the east by the Atlantic Ocean; on the southwest by Delaware across Bay; and on the west by Pennsylvania across the River.Image:New Jersey Counties by metro area labeled.svg|right|thumb|statistical areas and divisions of New Jersey; counties shaded in blue hues belong to the York City Metropolitan Area; counties shaded in green hues are in the Metropolitan Area. Mercer County is located in the Greater New York Metropolitan Area. Atlantic, Cape May, and Cumberland Counties are located in the Greater Philadelphia Metropolitan Area. Warren County is considered part of the Valley.Image:Delaware Water Gap.jpg|thumb|New Jersey shares the Water Gap with neighboring Pennsylvania.New Jersey can be thought of as five regions, based on natural geography and population. Northeastern New Jersey, the Region, lies within the York City Metropolitan Area, and some residents commute into the city to work.  Northwestern New Jersey, or the Skylands, is, compared to the northeast, more wooded, rural, and mountainous. The Shore, along the Atlantic Coast in the central-east and southeast, has its own natural, residential, and lifestyle characteristics owing to its location by the ocean. The Valley includes the southwestern counties of the state, which reside within the Metropolitan Area. The fifth region is the Pine Barrens in the interior of the southern part. Covered rather extensively by mixed pine and oak forest, it has a much lower population density than much of the rest of the state.Image:Cape may.jpg|thumb|Sunset at May on the Shore.New Jersey also can be broadly divided into three geographic regions: Jersey, Jersey, and Jersey. Some New Jersey residents do not consider Central Jersey a region in its own right, but others believe it is a separate geographic and cultural area from the North and South.The federal of Management and Budget divides New Jerseys counties into seven Statistical Areas, including sixteen counties in the New York City or Philadelphia metro areas. Four counties have independent metro areas, and Warren County joins another Pennsylvania-based metro area. (See Statistical Areas of New Jersey for details.)It is also at the center of the megalopolis.Additionally, the New Jersey Commerce, Economic Growth, & Tourism Commission divides the state into six distinct regions to facilitate the states tourism industry. The regions are:*Region, encompassing Middlesex County, Union County, Essex County, Hudson County, Bergen County, and Passaic County.*Region, encompassing Sussex County, Morris County, Warren County, Hunterdon County, and Somerset County.*Region, encompassing Monmouth County and Ocean County.*River Region, encompassing Mercer County, Burlington County, Camden County, Gloucester County, and Salem County.*Atlantic City Region, encompassing Atlantic County.*Shore Region, encompassing Cumberland County and Cape May County.High Point, in Montague Township, Sussex County, is the highest elevation, at . The Palisades are a line of steep cliffs on the lower west side of the River.Major rivers include the Hudson, Delaware, Raritan, Passaic, Hackensack, Rahway, Musconetcong, Mullica, Rancocas, Manasquan, Maurice, and Toms rivers.Sandy Hook, along the eastern coast, is a popular recreational beach. It is a barrier spit and an extension of the Peninsula along the states Atlantic Ocean coast.Beach Island (LBI), a island along the eastern coast, has popular recreational beaches. The primary access point to the island is by a single bridge connection to the mainland. Lighthouse is on the northern tip.Areas managed by the Park Service include:*National Scenic Trail*National Scenic River*Water Gap National Recreation Area*Island National Monument*National Recreation Area in Monmouth County*Egg Harbor River*National Historical Park in Morristown*Jersey Coastal Heritage Trail Route*Jersey Pinelands National Reserve*Edison National Historical Park in West OrangeProminent geographic features include:* Water Gap* Swamp National Wildlife Refuge* The Highlands* Jersey Meadowlands* Pine Barrens* South MountainClimateAs with many other geographic features, New Jerseys climate divides into regions. The south, central, and northeast parts of the state have a humid mesothermal climate, while the northwest has a continental climate (microthermal), with slightly cooler temperatures due to higher elevation. New Jersey receives between 2,400 and 2,800 hours of sunshine annually.()Summers are typically hot and humid, with statewide average high temperatures of  and lows of ; however, temperatures exceed  on average 25 days each summer, though rarely exceed . Winters are usually cold, with average high temperatures of  and lows of  for most of the state, but temperatures could, for brief interludes, be as low as  and sometimes rise to . Northwestern parts of the state have slightly colder winters with average temperatures just below freezing. Spring and autumn may feature wide temperature variations, with lower humidity than summer.(Weather.com)Average annual precipitation ranges from , uniformly spread through the year. Average snowfall per winter season range from  in the south and near the seacoast,  in the northeast and central part of the state, to about  in the northwestern highlands, but this varies from year to year. Precipitation falls on an average of 120 days a year, with 25 to 30 thunderstorms, most of which occur during the summer.During winter and early spring, New Jersey can in some years experience noreasters, which are capable of causing blizzards or flooding throughout the northeastern United States. Hurricanes and storms (such as Tropical Storm Floyd in 1999()), tornadoes, and earthquakes are rare.Image:Palisades cliff.jpg|right|thumb|150px|Part of the Interstate Park, the Jersey Palisades overlook the River.HistoryAround 180 million years ago, during the Period, New Jersey bordered Africa. The pressure of the collision between North America and Africa gave rise to the Mountains. Around 18,000 years ago, the Age resulted in glaciers that reached New Jersey. As the glaciers retreated, they left behind Lake Passaic, as well as many rivers, swamps, and gorges.(Geological History by Great Swamp Watershed Association. Retrieved December 22, 2005.)New Jersey was originally settled by Native Americans, with the Lenni-Lenape being dominant at the time Europeans arrived. The Lenape were loosely organized groups that practiced small-scale agriculture (mainly based on corn) in order to increase their largely mobile hunter-gatherer society in the region surrounding the River, the lower River, and western Island Sound. The Lenape society was divided into matrilinear clans that were based upon common female ancestors. These clans were organized into three distinct phratries identified by their animal sign: Turtle, Turkey, and Wolf.  They first encountered the Dutch in the early 17th century, and their primary relationship with the Europeans was through trade.Colonial eraNew Jersey was first claimed by the Dutch.  The Dutch colony of Netherland consisted of parts of modern Atlantic states.  Although the European principle of land ownership was not recognized by the Lenape, West India Company policy required their colonists to purchase land which they settled. The first to do so was Michiel Pauw who established a patronship named Pavonia along the North River which eventually became the Bergen. Minuits purchase of lands along the River establish the colony of Sweden. The entire region became a territory of England in 1664, when an English fleet under the command of Colonel Nicolls sailed into what is today York Harbor and took control of Amsterdam, annexing the entire province.During the Civil War the Channel Island of Jersey remained loyal to the Crown and gave sanctuary to the King. It was from the Royal Square in St. Helier that II of England was first proclaimed King in 1649, following the execution of his father, Charles I. The North American lands were divided by Charles II, who gave his brother, the Duke of York (later King James II), the region between England and Maryland as a proprietary colony (as opposed to a royal colony). James then granted the land between the River and the River (the land that would become New Jersey) to two friends who had remained loyal through the Civil War: Sir George Carteret and Lord Berkeley of Stratton. The area was named the of New Jersey.Image:Old Queens Rutgers.jpg|thumb|The campuses of University (originally chartered as Queens College in 1766) include buildings of a variety of architectural styles.Since the states inception, New Jersey has been characterized by ethnic and religious diversity. New England Congregationalists settled alongside Scots Presbyterians and Reformed migrants.  While the majority of residents lived in towns with individual landholdings of , a few rich proprietors owned vast estates.  English Quakers and Anglicans owned large landholdings. Unlike Colony, Jamestown and other colonies, New Jersey was populated by a secondary wave of immigrants who came from other colonies instead of those who migrated directly from Europe. New Jersey remained agrarian and rural throughout the colonial era, and commercial farming only developed sporadically.  Some townships, such as Burlington on the Delaware River and Amboy, emerged as important ports for shipping to New York and Philadelphia. The colonys fertile lands and tolerant religious policy drew more settlers, and New Jersey boasted a population of 120,000 by 1775.Settlement for the first 10 years of English rule was along River and Kill and settlers came primarily from New England. Unlike other colonies that were settled by immigrants from Europe, New Jersey was populated by a secondary wave of settlement from communities already established on the North American continent. March 18, 1673, Berkeley sold his half of the colony to Quakers in England, who settled the Delaware Valley region as a Quaker colony. (Penn acted as trustee for the lands for a time.)  New Jersey was governed very briefly as two distinct provinces, East and Jersey, for 28 years between 1674 and 1702, at times part of the of New York or of New England.In 1702, the two provinces were reunited under a royal, rather than a proprietary, governor. Edward Hyde, Lord Cornbury, became the first governor of the colony as a royal colony. Lord Cornbury was an ineffective and corrupt ruler, taking bribes and speculating on land, so in 1708 he was recalled to England. New Jersey was then ruled by the governors of New York, but this infuriated the settlers of New Jersey, who accused those governors of favoritism to New York. Judge Lewis Morris led the case for a separate governor, and was appointed governor by King George II in 1738.(Streissguth pg 3036)Revolutionary War eraNew Jersey was one of the Colonies that revolted against British rule in the Revolution. The New Jersey Constitution of 1776 was passed July 2, 1776, just two days before the Continental Congress declared American Independence from Great Britain. It was an act of the Provincial Congress, which made itself into the state Legislature. To reassure neutrals, it provided that it would become void if New Jersey reached reconciliation with Great Britain.Image:Princetonwashington.jpg|thumb|Washington rallying his troops at the of PrincetonNew Jersey representatives Richard Stockton, Witherspoon, Hopkinson, John Hart, and Clark were among those who signed the States Declaration of Independence.During the Revolutionary War, British and American armies crossed New Jersey numerous times, and several pivotal battles took place in the state.  Because of this, New Jersey today is often referred to as The Crossroads of the Revolution.  The winter quarters of the revolutionary army were established there twice by General Washington in Morristown, which was called the military capital of the revolution.On December 25, 1776, the Army under Washington crossed the River.  After the crossing, he surprised and defeated the unprepared Hessian troops in the of Trenton. Slightly more than a week after victory at Trenton, on January 3, 1777, American forces gained an important victory by stopping General Cornwalliss charges at the Battle of Trenton.  By evading Cornwalliss army, Washington made a surprise attack on Princeton and successfully defeated the British forces there.  Leutzes painting of Crossing the Delaware became an icon of the Revolution.American forces under Washington met the forces under General Henry Clinton at the of Monmouth in an indecisive engagement in June 1778. Washington attempted to take the British column by surprise; when the British army attempted to flank the Americans, the Americans retreated in disorder. The ranks were later reorganized and withstood the British charges.In the summer of 1783, the Congress met in Hall at University, making Princeton the nations capital for four months. It was there that the Continental Congress learned of the signing of the of Paris (1783), which ended the war.On December 18, 1787, New Jersey became the third state to ratify the States Constitution, which was overwhelmingly popular in New Jersey, as it prevented New York and Pennsylvania from charging and keeping tariffs on goods imported from Europe. On November 20, 1789, the state became the first in the newly formed Union to ratify the Bill of Rights.The 1776 Jersey State Constitution gave the vote to all inhabitants who had a certain level of wealth. This included women and blacks, but not married women, because they could not own property separately from their husbands. Both sides, in several elections, claimed that the other side had had unqualified women vote and mocked them for use of petticoat electors (entitled to vote or not); on the other hand, both parties passed Voting Rights Acts. In 1807, the legislature passed a bill interpreting the constitution to mean universal white male suffrage, excluding paupers. (This was less revolutionary than it sounds: the constitution was itself only an act of the legislature.)(Klinghoffer and Elkis (The Petticoat Electors: Womens Suffrage in New Jersey, 17761807, Journal of the Early Republic 12, no. 2 (1992): 159193.))19th centuryOn February 15, 1804, New Jersey became the last northern state to abolish new slavery and enacted legislation that slowly phased out existing slavery. This led to a gradual scale-down of the slave population.  By the close of the Civil War about a dozen African Americans in New Jersey were still apprenticed freedmen.  New Jersey voters initially refused to ratify the constitutional amendments banning slavery and granting rights to the United States black population.In 1844, the second state constitution was ratified and brought into effect. Counties thereby became districts for the State Senate, and some realignment of boundaries (including the creation of Mercer County) immediately followed. This provision was retained in the 1947 Constitution, but was overturned by the Court of the United States in 1962 by the decision v. Carr. While the Governorship was stronger than under the 1776 constitution, the constitution of 1844 created many offices that were not responsible to him, or to the people, and it gave him a three-year term, but he could not succeed himself.Unlike the Revolutionary War, no Civil War battles took place within the state. However, throughout the course of the Civil War, over 80,000 from New Jersey enlisted in the Northern army to defeat the Southern Confederacy.New Jersey was one of the few states to reject President Lincoln twice in national elections, and sided with Douglas (1860) and B. McClellan (1864) during their campaigns. McClellan later became governor (187881). During the Civil War, the state was led first by Republican Governor Smith Olden, then by Democrat Parker.In the Revolution, cities like Paterson grew and prospered. Previously, the economy had been largely agrarian, which was problematically subject to crop failures and poor soil. This caused a shift to a more industrialized economy, one based on manufactured commodities such as textiles and silk. Inventor Edison also became an important figure of the Industrial Revolution, having been granted 1,093 patents, many of which for inventions he developed while working in New Jersey. Edisons facilities, first at Park, NJ and then in Orange, NJ, are considered perhaps the first centers in the U.S. Christie Street in Menlo Park was the first thoroughfare in the world to have electric lighting. Transportation was greatly improved as locomotion and steamboats were introduced to New Jersey.Iron mining was also a leading industry during the middle to late 19th century. iron pits in the Southern New Jersey Pinelands were among the first sources of iron for the new nation.() Mines such as Mt. Hope, Mine Hill and the Valley Mines created a thriving industry.  Mining generated the impetus for new towns and was one of the driving forces behind the need for the Canal. Zinc mines were also a major industry, especially the Hill Mine.20th century Image:0328Jersey City Statue of Liberty.JPG|thumb|right|The of Liberty and CityThrough both World Wars, New Jersey was a center for war production, especially in naval construction. Battleships, cruisers, and destroyers were all made in this state. In addition, Fort Dix (1917) (originally called Camp Dix),() Camp Merritt (1917)() and Kilmer (1941)() were all constructed to house and train American soldiers through both World Wars. New Jersey also became a principal location for defense in the War. Fourteen Nike Missile stations were constructed, especially for the defense of New York City and Pennsylvania. PT-109, a motor torpedo boat commanded by Lt. (j.g.) F. Kennedy in World War II, was built at the Elco Boatworks in Bayonne. The aircraft carrier Enterprise (CV-6) was briefly docked at the Military Ocean Terminal in Bayonne in the 1950s before she was sent to Kearney to be scrapped.() In 1962, the worlds first nuclear-powered cargo ship, the Savannah, was launched at Camden.New Jersey prospered through the Twenties. The first America Pageant was held in 1921 in Atlantic City, the first drive-in movie was shown in 1933 in Camden, and the Tunnel opened in 1927. During the Depression of the 1930s, the state offered begging licenses to unemployed residents,(Gerdes, Louise I. The 1930s, Greenhaven Press, Inc., 2000.) the zeppelin airship Hindenburg crashed in flames over Lakehurst, and the Morro Castle beached itself near Asbury Park after going up in flames while at sea.In 1951, the New Jersey Turnpike opened, permitting fast travel by car and truck between North Jersey (and metropolitan New York) and South Jersey (and metropolitan Philadelphia).In the 1960s, riots erupted in many of the industrial cities of North Jersey. The first race riots in New Jersey occurred in Jersey City on August 2, 1964. Several others ensued in 1967, in Newark and Plainfield. Other riots followed the assassination of Martin Luther King, Jr. in April 1968, just as in the rest of the country. A riot occurred in Camden in 1971.As a result of an order from the New Jersey Supreme Court to fund schools equitably, the New Jersey legislature reluctantly passed an income tax bill in 1976. Prior to this bill, the state had no income tax.()DemographicsfootnoteSource: 1910-2010()State populationResidents of New Jersey are most commonly referred to as New Jerseyans or New Jerseyites. altAs of the census of 2010, there were 8,791,894 people residing in the state.  The racial makeup of the state was 68.6% White, 13.7% African American, 0.3% Native American, 8.3% Asian, 0.0% Pacific Islander, 6.4% from other races, and 2.7% from two or more races. 17.7% of the population were Hispanic or Latino.The States Census Bureau, , estimated New Jerseys population at 8,707,739,() which represents an increase of 268,301, or 3.2%, since the last census in 2000.() This includes a natural increase since the last census of 343,965 people (that is, 933,185 births minus 589,220 deaths) and a decrease due to net migration of 53,930 people out of the state.( Immigration from outside the United States resulted in a net increase of 384,687 people, and migration within the country produced a net loss of 438,617 people.( , there were 1.6 million foreign-born living in the state (accounting for 19.2% of the population).()As of 2006, New Jersey is the eleventh-most populous state in the United States, and the most densely populated, at 1,174 residents per square mile (453 per km2), with most of the population residing in the counties surrounding York City, Philadelphia, and along the eastern Shore, while the extreme southern and northwestern counties are relatively less dense overall. It is also the second wealthiest state according to the U.S. Census Bureau.()The of population for New Jersey is located in Middlesex County, in the town of Milltown, just east of the Jersey Turnpike.()New Jersey is home to more scientists and engineers per square mile than anywhere else in the world.()New Jersey is one of the most ethnically and religiously diverse states in the country. It has the second largest Jewish population by percentage (after New York);() the second largest Muslim population by percentage (after Michigan); the largest population of people from Rica in the United States; the largest population of Cubans outside of Florida; the third highest Asian population by percentage; and the third highest Italian population by percentage according to the 2000 Census.  Americans, Hispanics and Latinos, and Arabs are also high in number. It has the third highest Indian population of any state by absolute numbers.(The Foreign Born from India in the United States, dated December 1, 2003)()(Mapping Census 2000: The Geography of U.S. Diversity (Microsoft Excel))( It has the third largest Korean population, fourth largest Filipino population, and fourth largest Chinese population, per the 2000 U.S. Census. The five largest ethnic groups are: Italian (17.9%), Irish (15.9%), African (13.6%), German (12.6%), Polish (6.9%).Newark is the fourth poorest city in America,() but New Jersey as a whole has the second highest median household income.(Md. is ranked as richest state) This is largely because so much of New Jersey consists of suburbs, most of them affluent, of York City and Philadelphia. New Jersey is also the most densely populated state, and the only state that has had every one of its counties deemed urban as defined by the Census Bureaus Statistical Area.()Avenue Palisades Park.jpg|200px|thumb|right|Broad Avenue, Koreatown in Palisades Park, Bergen County.()File:India Square JC jeh.JPG|200px|thumb|right|Square in Jersey City, Hudson County.The state has very sizable enclaves of different non-English-speaking communities. Some of these languages include:* Spanish  spoken throughout the state.* Italian  spoken throughout the state.* Polish  spoken throughout the state.* Gujarati  spoken throughout the state.* Hindi  spoken throughout the state.* Tagalog  spoken throughout the state.* Chinese  spoken throughout the state, most prominently in the northern and central counties.* Korean  spoken prominently in County.* Telugu  spoken prominently in Middlesex County.* Tamil  spoken prominently in Middlesex County.* Malayalam - spoken prominently in Bergen County.* Portuguese  spoken prominently in the Ironbound section of Newark.* Turkish - spoken prominently in the Istanbul section of Paterson.* Russian - spoken prominently in the Fair Lawn borough of Bergen County.thumb|right|New Jersey population distributionEach countys largest ethnic group, according to the 2000 Census, is:*Italian  Passaic, Bergen, Union, Hudson, Morris, Somerset, Middlesex, Mercer, Monmouth, Ocean, Atlantic, Cumberland()*Irish  Sussex, Burlington, Camden, Gloucester, Cape May(*German  Warren, Hunterdon, Salem(6.7% of its population was reported as under age 5, 24.8% under 18, and 13.2% were 65 or older. Females made up approximately 51.5% of the population.According to the U.S. Census, 12.31% of the population aged 5 and over speak Spanish at home, while 1.12% speak Italian, 1.03% speak Portuguese, and 1.02% speak Tagalog (Filipino).()In 2010, illegal immigrants constituted an estimated 6.4% of the population. This was the fourth highest percentage of any state in the country.()(behind Nevada, Arizona, California, but ahead of Texas and Florida)Religion *Less than 0.5%EconomyImage:1999 NJ Proof.png|thumb|right|The New Jersey State Quarter, released in 1999, with a depiction of Crossing the Delaware.The of Economic Analysis estimates that New Jerseys gross state product in 2010 was $487 billion.()() , the states unemployment rate is 9.4%.(Bls.gov; Local Area Unemployment Statistics)()AffluenceIts per capita gross state product in 2008 was $54,699, 2nd in the U.S. and above the national per capita gross domestic product of $46,588.() Its per-capita income was the third highest in the nation with $51,358.(  The state also has the highest percentage of millionaire households.() It is ranked 2nd in the nation by the number of places with per capita incomes above national average with 76.4%. Nine of New Jerseys counties are in the wealthiest 100 of the country.Fiscal policyNew Jersey has seven tax brackets for determining tax rates. The rates range from 1.4 to 8.97%. The standard tax rate is 7%, applicable to all retail sales unless specifically exempt by law. Exemptions include most food items for at-home preparation, medicines, clothing (except fur items), footwear, and disposable paper products for use in the home. Approximately 30 New Jersey municipalities are designated as Enterprise Zones and shoppers are charged a 3% tax rate, half of the rate charged outside the UEZs. Sections of Elizabeth and Jersey City are examples of communities that are subject to the lower sales tax rate.New Jersey has the highest tax rate of all 50 states with residents paying a total of $68 billion in state and local taxes annually with a per capita burden of $7,816 at a rate of 12.9% of income.(http://247wallst.com/2011/07/21/108558/3/)All property located in the state is subject to tax unless specifically exempted by statute. New Jersey does not assess an intangible personal property tax, but it does impose an tax.Federal taxation disparityNew Jersey has the highest disparity of any state in the United States between what it gives to the federal government and what it receives. In fiscal year 2005, New Jersey taxpayers gave the federal government $77 billion, while only receiving $55 billion. This difference is higher than any other state and means that for every $1 New Jersey taxpayers send to Washington, the state only receives $0.61 in return. This calculation is applied correctly after making the federal government deficit neutral, as sometimes the federal government spends more than it receives.(link Chart of State to Federal government spend/receive ratios, Foundation) , New Jersey has never been above 48th in rank for capita federal spending (with a rank of 50th for the majority of that time) since 1982, while being second or third in per capita federal taxes paid to Washington.New Jersey runs into deficits frequently and has one of the highest tax burdens in the nation.() Factors for this include the large federal tax liability which is not adjusted for New Jerseys higher cost of living and Medicaid funding formulas. As shown by the study, incomes tend to be higher in New Jersey, which puts those in higher tax brackets especially vulnerable to the minimum tax.Industriesthumb|left|A sign at the west end of State Route 495 promoting tourism around the state.Image:Cranberrys beim Ernten.jpeg|thumb|right|Cranberry harvest.New Jerseys economy is centered on the pharmaceutical industry, the financial industry, chemical development, telecommunications, food processing, electric equipment, printing and publishing, and tourism. New Jerseys agricultural outputs are nursery stock, horses, vegetables, fruits and nuts, seafood, and dairy products. New Jersey ranks second among states in blueberry production, third in cranberries and spinach and fourth in peppers, peaches and lettuce.()Although New Jersey is home to many energy-intensive industries, its energy consumption is only 2.7% of the U.S. total, and its carbon dioxide emissions are only 0.8% of the U.S. total. Its comparatively low greenhouse gas emissions can be attributed to nuclear power. According to the Information Administration, nuclear power dominates New Jerseys electricity market, typically supplying more than one-half of State generation. New Jersey has three nuclear power plants, including the Creek Nuclear Generating Station, which came online in 1969 and is the oldest operating nuclear plant in the country.()New Jersey has a strong scientific economy. New Jersey is home to major pharmaceutical firms such as and Johnson, Sanofi-Aventis, Novartis, Pfizer, Merck, Wyeth, Hoffman-LaRoche, Squibb, and Schering-Plough. New Jersey is home to major telecommunications firms such as Wireless, Avaya, Alcatel-Lucent and Communications. Furthermore, New Jersey draws upon its large and well-educated labor pool which also supports the myriad of industries that exist today.New Jersey is the ultimate community since the state is right next to New York City and Philadelphia. Thus, there is a strong service economy in New Jersey serving residents who work in New York City or Philadelphia. Some of these industries include retail sales, education and real estate. Liberty International Airport is ranked seventh among the nations busiest airports and among the top 20 busiest airports in the world.Shipping is a strong industry in New Jersey because of the states strategic location, the of New York and New Jersey the busiest on the East Coast. The Newark-Elizabeth Marine Terminal was the worlds first port and is one of the worlds largest container ports. New Jersey also has a strong presence in chemical development, refining, and food processing operations.New Jersey hosts several business headquarters, including twenty-four 500 companies.() Paramus is noted for having one of the highest retail sales per person ratios in the nation. Several New Jersey counties such as Somerset (7), Morris (10), Hunterdon (13), Bergen (21), Monmouth (42) counties are ranked among the counties in the United States. Four others are also in the top 100.Natural resourcesNew Jerseys greatest natural resource is its location, which has made the state a crossroads of commerce. Other commercial advantages include its extensive transportation system, which puts one quarter of all United States consumers within overnight delivery range. Lake and seaside resorts such as Atlantic City have contributed to New Jerseys rank of fifth among the states in revenues from tourism.Almost half of New Jersey is wooded. The chief tree of the northern forests is the oak. A large part of the southern section is in pine. Jersey oak has been used extensively in shipbuilding.The mineral resources in New Jersey are small. The state, however, does rank high in smelting and refining minerals from other states. Some mining activity does still take place in the area in and around the Furnace, which was long a center of zinc production (see Jersey Zinc Company).EducationIn 2010, there were 605 school districts in the state.()Secretary of Education Rick Rosenberg, appointed by Governor Corzine, created the Education Advancement Initiative (EAI) to increase College admission rates by 10% for New Jerseys high school students, decrease dropout rates by 15%, and increase the amount of money devoted to schools by 10%. Rosenberg retracted this plan when criticized for taking the money out of healthcare to fund this initiative.In 2010 the state government paid all of the teachers premiums for health insurance.(Census data reveal that New Jersey spent more per each public school student than any other state except New York in 2009, amounting to $16,271 spent per pupil, with 41% of the revenue derived from state sources.()According to 2011 Newsweek statistics, students of Technology High School in Lincroft, Monmouth County and County Academies in Hackensack, Bergen County registered average SAT scores of 2145 and 2100, respectively,() representing the highest and second-highest scores, respectively, of all listed U.S. high schools.()University in Princeton, Mercer County, is tied with University in Massachusetts as the top ranked U.S. national university for 2012 as per News & World Report.()TransportationRoadwaysthumb|right|Map of New Jersey showing major transportation networks and citiesImage:George Washington Bridge, HAER NY-129-66.jpg|thumb|right|The Washington Bridge, connecting Fort Lee, County, New Jersey to Manhattan in York City, is the worlds busiest motor vehicle bridge.()(The Jersey Turnpike is one of the best-known and most-trafficked roadways in the United States. This road carries interstate traffic between Delaware and New York, and the East Coast in general. Commonly referred to as simply the Turnpike, it is known for its numerous rest-areas named after prominent New Jerseyans as diverse as inventor Edison; States Secretary of the Treasury Hamilton; United States Presidents Cleveland and Wilson; writers Fenimore Cooper, Kilmer, and Whitman; patriot Pitcher; Red Cross advocate Barton; and football coach Lombardi.The State Parkway, or simply the Parkway, carries more in-state traffic and runs from the town of Montvale along New Jerseys northern border to its southernmost tip at Cape May for . It is the trunk that connects the New York metropolitan area to Atlantic City and is consistently one of the safest roads in the nation.  With a total of 15 travel lanes and 6 shoulder lanes, the Bridge on the Parkway, spanning the River in Middlesex County, is the widest motor vehicle bridge in the world by number of lanes() as well as one of the busiest.New Jersey is connected to New York City via various bridges and tunnels. The Washington Bridge at 300,000 vehicles per day carries the heaviest load of motor vehicle traffic of any bridge in the world((George Washington Bridge turns 75 years old: Huge flag, cake part of celebration, Herald-Record, October 24, 2006. The party, however, will be small in comparison to the one that the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey organized for 5,000 people to open the bridge to traffic in 1931. And it wont even be on what is now the worlds busiest bridge for fear of snarling traffic.) from Lee, New Jersey in County to the Washington Heights neighborhood in Manhattan in New York City on the Trans-Manhattan Expressway carrying I-95, US 1, and US 9. The Tunnel connects to Manhattan carrying New Jersey State Route 495 and the Tunnel connects to Manhattan carrying I-78. These are the three major Hudson River crossings that see heavy vehicular traffic. New Jersey is also connected to Island by three bridges. From the southernmost to northernmost; the Crossing, Bridge, and Bridge.Other expressways in New Jersey include the City Expressway, the Interstate Parkway, Interstate 76, Interstate 78, Interstate 80, Interstate 95, Interstate 195, 278, Interstate 280, 287, Interstate 295, and 676. Other major roadways include U.S. 1, U.S. 9, Jersey Route 17, Jersey Route 4, and Route 46.New Jersey has compacts with all three neighboring states. The Authority of New York and New Jersey, the River Port Authority (with Pennsylvania), and the River and Bay Authority (with Delaware) operate most of the major transportation routes into and out of New Jersey. Bridge tolls are collected in one direction only  it is free to cross into New Jersey, but motorists must pay when exiting the state. Exceptions to this are the Ferry Bridge and the River  Turnpike Toll Bridge where tolls are charged both ways. The Washington Crossing and Scudders Falls (on I-95) bridges near Trenton, as well as Trentons Calhoun Street and Bridge Street (Trenton Makes) bridges, are toll-free. In addition, * Bridge, Street Bridge, Bridge, and Black Eddy-Milford Bridge are free Delaware River bridges into and out of NJ.* Bridge  (NJ 12)* Rock Bridge  (pedestrian)* Bridge-Stockton Bridge  (PA 263 / CR 523)New Jersey is one of only two states (along with Oregon) where all fuel dispensing stations are required to sell gasoline full-service to customers. It is unlawful for a customer to serve him/herself.New Jerseys Highway Maintenance Program was rated Extremely Poor by Foundations  17th Annual Report on the Performance of State Highway Systems.AirportsImage:NewarkIntAirport.jpg|right|thumb|York City skyline from Continental Terminal C in Liberty Airport.Liberty International Airport is one of the busiest airports in the United States. Operated by the Authority of New York and New Jersey, which runs the other two major airports in the York metropolitan area (F. Kennedy International Airport and Airport), it is one of the main airports serving the New York City area. Airlines is the facilitys largest tenant, operating an entire terminal at Newark, which it uses as one of its primary hubs. Express operates a large cargo hub. The adjacent Newark Airport railroad station provides access to the trains of Amtrak and Jersey Transit along the Corridor Line.Two smaller commercial airports, City International Airport and Airport, also operate in other parts of New Jersey. Airport, in Bergen County, is a aviation airport popular with private and corporate aircraft, due to its proximity to New York City. Municipal Airport, in Cumberland County, is a aviation airport popular with private and corporate aircraft, due to its proximity to the shore.Rail and busALP-44.jpg|thumb|right|New Jersey Transit train in Elizabeth.The Jersey Transit Corporation (NJ Transit) operates extensive rail and bus service throughout the state. NJ Transit is a state-run corporation that began with the consolidation of several private bus companies in North Jersey. In the early 1980s, it acquired the commuter train operations of Conrail that connect towns in northern and central New Jersey to New York City. NJ Transit has eleven lines that run throughout different parts of the state. Most of the trains start at various points in the state and most end at either Pennsylvania Station, in New York City, or Terminal in Hoboken. NJ Transit began service between Atlantic City and Lindenwold in 1989 and extended it to Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, in the 1990s.Image:Hudson bergen exchange place.jpg|thumb|right|Two Light Rail trains in City, New Jersey.NJ Transit also operates three light rail systems in the state. The Light Rail connects Bayonne to North Bergen, with planned expansion into Bergen County communities. The Light Rail is the only subway system entirely in the state, but it is only partially underground. Its Main Line connects Newark Penn Station in Newark with outer parts of the city, ending at Grove Street station in Bloomfield. The Broad Street Line of the subway, the first component of the Rail Link, connects Broad Street Station to Penn Station. The last of the three light rail lines is the River Line which connects Trenton and Camden.The PATH is a subway and above-ground railway which links Hoboken, Jersey City, Harrison and Newark with New York City. The PATH operates four lines that connect various points in North Jersey and New York. The lines all terminate in Hudson County, Essex County or Manhattan in New York City.The PATCO High Speedline links Camden County and Philadelphia. PATCO operates a single elevated and subway line that runs from Lindenwold to Center City Philadelphia. PATCO operates stations in Lindenwold, Voorhees, Cherry Hill, Haddonfield, Haddon Township, Collingswood, and Camden, along with four stations in Philadelphia.Amtrak also operates numerous long-distance passenger trains in New Jersey to and from neighboring states and around the country. In addition to the Newark Airport connection, other major Amtrak railway stations include Trenton Rail Station, Metropark, and the grand historic Newark Penn Station.SEPTA also has two lines that operate into New Jersey. The Trenton Line terminates at the Transit Center, and the West Trenton Line terminates at the Trenton Rail Station in Ewing.Newark is a monorail connecting the Amtrak/NJ Transit station on the Corridor to the airports terminals and parking lots.Some private bus carriers still remain in New Jersey. Most of these carriers operate with state funding to offset losses and state owned buses are provided to these carriers of which USA companies make up the bulk. Other carriers include private charter and tour bus operators that take gamblers from other parts of New Jersey, New York City, Philadelphia, and Delaware to the casino resorts of Atlantic City.FerriesOn the Bay, the River and Bay Authority operates the May-Lewes Ferry. The agency also operates ferries between Mott (New Jersey) and Delaware and Fort DuPont in Delaware. The River Port Authority operates the Ferry between the Camden waterfront and Landing in Pennsylvania.In the of New York and New Jersey, New York Waterway has ferry terminals at Belford Harbor, City, Hoboken and Weehawken, and Landing. There are slips are at Liberte, Liberty Harbor, Exchange Place in Jersey City, Port Imperial and Harbor in Weehawken, Terminal and 14th Street in Hoboken. Manhattan terminals are located at Street/Pier 11, Battery Park City (BPC) or Midtown Ferry Terminal. Water Taxi in City has ferries from Hook and State Park to (BPC). Cruises has service from Liberty State Park and of Liberty National Monument, including Island. (Although there is a bridge from Ellis Island to the park built for renovations on the island it is not open for public use.) SeaStreak offers services from the Bayshore to Manhattan and during the Mets season to Stadium. The ferries on leave from Atlantic Highlands and two terminals in Highlands. Ferry service from Keyport and Amboy have been also been proposed. Service from Elizabeth at Bay is proposed in conjunction with re-development  plans on the shore near Gardens.($2B MXD Planned for Elizabeth Waterfront)Private bus carriersSeveral private bus lines provide transportation service in the state of New Jersey. Below is a list of major carriers and their areas of operation:* Academy--commuter bus service from Burlington, Middlesex, Monmouth, and Ocean counties to lower and Manhattan* Bergen Avenue IBOAlocal bus service in Jersey City* Broadway Buslocal bus service in Bayonne* USA**Coach--commuter bus service from Essex and Morris counties**ONE Bus/Olympia Trails--local bus service in Essex and Union counties, commuter bus service from the Raritan Valley to Manhattan**& Tan in Hudson County--local bus service in Hudson County**Coaches--commuter and local bus service from Bergen County to Manhattan**Trails--commuter bus service from Middlesex County to Manhattan, local bus service in Middlesex County* Bus Lines--commuter bus service from Essex County to Manhattan* Greyhound--interstate bus service from terminals in Newark, Atlantic City, and Mount Laurel* Bus Lines--commuter and local bus service from Morris, Somerset, Union, and Sussex counties to Manhattan* Martz Trailwaysservice from Warren County to Manhattan* Montgomery & West Side IBOA--local bus service in Jersey City* Lines--service from the Region to and from ManhattanLaw and governmentExecutiveThe position of Governor of New Jersey has been considered one of the most powerful in the nation. Until recently the governor was the only statewide elected office in the state appointed numerous government officials. Formerly, an Acting Governor was even more powerful as he simultaneously served as President of the Jersey State Senate, thus directing half of the legislative and all of the executive process. In 2002 and 2007, President of the State Senate Codey held the position of Acting Governor for a short time, and from 2004 to 2006 Codey became a long-term Acting Governor due to McGreeveys resignation. A 2005 amendment to the state Constitution prevents the Senate President from becoming Acting Governor in the event of a permanent gubernatorial vacancy without giving up her or his seat in the state Senate. Christie (Republican) is the Governor.The governors mansion is Drumthwacket, located in Princeton Township.In recent years, New Jersey was one of the few states without a lieutenant governor. Republican Guadagno was elected the first Governor of New Jersey and took office on January 19, 2010.  She was elected on the Republican ticket with Governor-Elect Christie in the November 2009 NJ gubernatorial election. The position was created as the result of a amendment to the Jersey State Constitution passed by the voters on November 8, 2005 and effective as of January 17, 2006.LegislativeImage:New Jersey State House.jpg|thumb|right|The Jersey State House is topped by its golden dome in Trenton.The current version of the Jersey State Constitution was adopted in 1947. It provides for a bicameral Jersey Legislature, consisting of an house Senate of 40 members and a house General Assembly of 80 members. Each of the 40 legislative districts elects one State Senator and two Assembly members. Assembly members are elected for a two-year term in all odd-numbered years; State Senators are elected in the years ending in 1, 3, and 7 and thus serve either four- or two-year terms.New Jersey is one of only five states that elects its state officials in odd-numbered years. (The others are Kentucky, Louisiana, Mississippi, and Virginia.) New Jersey holds elections for these offices every four years, in the year following each federal Presidential election year. Thus, the last year when New Jersey elected a Governor was 2009; the next gubernatorial election will occur in 2013, with future gubernatorial elections to take place in 2017, 2021, 2025, etc.JudicialThe Jersey Supreme Court() consists of a Chief Justice and six Associate Justices. All are appointed by the Governor with the and consent of a majority of the membership of the State Senate. Justices serve an initial seven-year term, after which they can be reappointed to serve until age 70.Most of the day-to-day work in the New Jersey courts is carried out in the Municipal Courts, where simple traffic tickets, minor criminal offenses, and small civil matters are heard.More serious criminal and civil cases are handled by the Superior Court for each county. All Superior Court judges are appointed by the Governor with the and consent of a majority of the membership of the State Senate. Each judge serves an initial seven-year term, after which he or she can be reappointed to serve until age 70.New Jerseys judiciary is unusual in that it still has separate courts of law and equity, like its neighbor Delaware but unlike most other U.S. states. The Jersey Superior Court is divided into Law and Chancery Divisions at the trial level.The Superior Court also has an Appellate Division, which functions as the states intermediate court. Superior Court judges are assigned to the Appellate Division by the Chief Justice.There is also a Tax Court, which is a court of limited jurisdiction. Tax Court judges hear appeals of tax decisions made by County Boards of Taxation. They also hear appeals on decisions made by the Director of the Division of Taxation on such matters as state income, sales and business taxes, and homestead rebates. Appeals from Tax Court decisions are heard in the Appellate Division of Superior Court. Tax Court judges are appointed by the Governor for initial terms of seven years, and upon reappointment are granted tenure until they reach the mandatory retirement age of 70. There are 12 Tax Court judgeships.CountiesNew Jersey is divided into 21 counties; 13 date from the colonial era. New Jersey was completely divided into counties by 1692; the present counties were created by dividing the existing ones; most recently Union County in 1857. New Jersey is the only state in the nation where elected county officials are called Freeholders, governing each county as part of its own of Chosen Freeholders. The number of freeholders in each county is determined by referendum, and must consist of three, five, seven or nine members.Depending on the county, the executive and legislative functions may be performed by the Board of Chosen Freeholders or split into separate branches of government. In 16 counties, members of the Board of Chosen Freeholders perform both legislative and executive functions on a commission basis, with each Freeholder assigned responsibility for a department or group of departments. In the other 5 counties (Atlantic, Bergen, Essex, Hudson and Mercer), there is a directly elected Executive who performs the executive functions while the Board of Chosen Freeholders retains a legislative and oversight role. In counties without an Executive, a County Administrator (or County Manager) may be hired to perform day-to-day administration of county functions.MunicipalitiesNew Jersey has 566 municipalities; the number was 567 before Pahaquarry Township was absorbed by Hardwick Township in 1997. Unlike states in the west and south, all New Jersey land is part of a municipality. In 2008, Governor Corzine proposed cutting state aid to all towns under 10,000 people, to encourage mergers to reduce administrative costs.() In May 2009, the Local Unit Alignment Reorganization and Consolidation Commission (LUARC) began a study of about 40 small communities in South Jersey to decide which ones might be good candidates for consolidation.(N.J. town mergers could start in 18 months by Jan Hefler, Philadelphia Inquirer, May 29, 2009. Retrieved on 2009-05-29)Types of governmentWhen the types of government were devised in the 19th century, the intention was that cities would be large built-up areas, with progressively smaller boroughs, towns, and villages; the rural areas in between would be relatively large townships. This is still often true, although Shrewsbury Township has been divided over the years; today it is less than a square mile, consisting only of a single housing development. Some townships  notably Brick, Hamilton, Middletown, and Toms River  have, without changing their boundaries, become large stretches of suburbia, as populous as cities, often focused around shopping centers and highways rather than traditional downtowns and main streets.Short Hills, Murray Hill, and many other locations in New Jersey are not municipalities but rather neighborhoods, with no exact boundaries. Often the cluster of houses, the traditional neighborhood, the postal district, and the designated place will differ.Forms of governmentThe five types of municipality differ mostly in name. Originally, each type had its own form of government but more modern forms are available to any municipality, even though the original type is retained in its formal name. Only boroughs can (but are not required to) have the borough form of government.Starting in the 20th century, largely driven by reform-minded goals, a series of six modern forms of government was implemented. This began with the Walsh Act, enacted in 1911 by the Jersey Legislature, which provided for a 3- or 5-member commission elected on a non-partisan basis. This was followed by the Municipal Manager Law, which offered a non-partisan council, provided for a weak mayor elected by and from the members of the council, and introduced government with an (ideally apolitical) appointed manager responsible for day-to-day administration of municipal affairs.The Faulkner Act, originally enacted in 1950 and substantially amended in 1981, offers four basic plans: Mayor-Council, Council-Manager, Small Municipality, and Mayor-Council-Administrator. The act provides many choices for communities with a preference for a strong executive and professional management of municipal affairs and offers great flexibility in allowing municipalities to select the characteristics of its government: the number of seats on the Council; seats selected at-large, by wards, or through a combination of both; staggered or concurrent terms of office; and a mayor chosen by the Council or elected directly by voters. Most large municipalities and a majority of New Jerseys residents are governed by municipalities with Faulkner Act charters. Municipalities can also formulate their own unique form of government and operate under a Special Charter with the approval of the Jersey Legislature.While municipalities retain their names derived from types of government, they may have changed to one of the modern forms of government, or further in the past to one of the other traditional forms, leading to municipalities with formal names quite baffling to the general public. For example, though there are four municipalities that are officially of the village type, Loch Arbour is the only one remaining with the village form of government. The other three villagesRidgefield Park (now with a Walsh Act form), Ridgewood (now with a Faulkner Act Council-Manager charter) and South Orange (now operates under a Special Charter)have all migrated to other non-village forms.PoliticsSocial attitudes and issuesSocially, New Jersey is considered one of the more liberal states in the nation. Polls indicate that 60% of the population are self-described as pro-choice, although a majority are opposed to late trimester and Birth Abortion and public funding of Abortion.()() In a 2009 University poll, a plurality supported marriage 49% to 43% opposed.()In April 2004, New Jersey enacted a domestic partnership law, which is available to both same-sex and opposite-sex couples aged 62 and over. During 2006, the New Jersey Supreme Court voted 4 to 3 that state lawmakers must provide the rights and benefits of marriage to gay and lesbian couples. Moreover, effective February 19, 2007, New Jersey became the third state in the U.S. (the other two being Connecticut and Vermont) to offer unions to same-sex couples, conferring over 850 rights, privileges and responsibilities of marriage; legislators declined, however, to use the term marriage for same-sex unions. Thus, three separate government-recognized relationships are now in effect in the Garden State: domestic partnerships, civil unions, and marriage. New Jersey also has some of the most stringent gun-control laws in the U.S. These include bans on assault firearms, hollow-nose bullets and even slingshots. No gun offense in New Jersey is graded less than a felony. guns and black powder guns are all treated as modern firearms. New Jersey does not recognize out-of-state gun licenses and aggressively enforces its own gun laws.(NRAILA.org)New Jersey has a severe city/urban litter reputational problem, as noted in the report, New Jersey: Americas Ugly Urban/City Litter (Trash) State. The state still has no statewide anti-litter slogan and its 1986 Clean Communities Act has been controversial in failing to help abate litter and debris on public streets, roadways and properties.ElectionsIn past federal elections, New Jersey was a Republican bastion, but recently has become a Democratic stronghold.  Currently, New Jersey Democrats have majority control of both houses of the Jersey Legislature (Senate, 2218, and Assembly, 4832), both U.S. Senate seats, and 8 out of the states 13 seats in the U.S. House of Representatives. The state had a Republican governor from 1994 to 2002, as Todd Whitman won twice with vote percentages of 47 and 49 percent.In the 2009 gubernatorial election, Republican Christie defeated incumbent Democrat Corzine. Because each candidate for lieutenant governor runs on the same ticket as the partys candidate for governor, the current Governor and Lieutenant Governor are members of the Republican Party. The governors appointments to cabinet and non-cabinet positions may be from either party. (The 2009 Attorney General appointee is a Democrat.)In federal elections, the state leans heavily towards the Democratic Party. For many years, however, it was a Republican stronghold, having given comfortable margins of victory to the Republican candidate in the close elections of 1948, 1968, and 1976. New Jersey was a crucial state in the elections of 1960, 1968, and 1992. The last elected Republican to hold a Senate seat from New Jersey was P. Case in 1979. (F. Brady was appointed a U.S. Senator by Governor Kean in 1982 and served for eight months, after A. Williams resigned the Senate seat following the Abscam investigations.)The states Democratic strongholds include Camden County, Essex County (including Newark, the states largest city), Hudson County (including Jersey City, the states second-largest city); Mercer County (especially around Trenton and Princeton), Middlesex County, and Union County (including Elizabeth, the states fourth-largest city).The suburban northwestern and southeastern counties of the state are reliably Republican: Republicans have support along the coast in Ocean County and in the mountainous northwestern part of the state, especially Morris County, Sussex County, and Warren County. Other suburban counties, especially Bergen County and Burlington County had the majority of votes go to the Democratic Party. In the 2008 election, President Obama won New Jersey with approximately fifty-seven percent of the vote, compared to McCains forty-one percent. Independent candidate Nader garnered less than one percent of the vote.About one-third of the states counties are considered swing counties, but some go more one way than others. For example, Salem County, the same is true with Passaic County, with a highly populated Hispanic Democratic south (including Paterson, the states third-largest city) and a rural, Republican north. Other swing counties like Monmouth County, Somerset County, and Cape May County tend to go Republican, as they also have population in conservative areas.To be eligible to vote in a U.S. election, all New Jerseyans are required to start their residency in the state 30 days prior to an election and register 29 days prior.Capital punishmentOn December 17, 2007, Governor Jon Corzine signed into law a bill that would eliminate the death penalty in New Jersey. New Jersey is the first state to pass such legislation since Iowa and Virginia eliminated executions in 1965.(Google.com Hester Jr., Tom (2007) N.J. Bans Death Penalty for Associated Press) Corzine also signed a bill that would downgrade the Death Row prisoners sentences from Death to Life in Prison with No Parole.(Peters, Jeremy W. Corzine Signs Bill Ending Executions, Then Commutes Sentences of Eight. New York Times. December 18, 2007. Retrieved on December 25, 2009.)Prominent cities and townsStreet in Newark.City by night.Image:Constitution Park Fort Lee New Jersey.JPG|thumb|Constitution Park in Fort Lee, County. High-rise residential complexes are a prominent feature of this borough.City, aerial view.jpg|right|thumb|Atlantic City, aerial view.Large cities (100,000 or greater)For its overall population and nation-leading density, New Jersey has a relative paucity of classic large cities. , only four municipalities had populations in excess of 100,000. With the 2004 Census estimate, Woodbridge briefly surpassed Edison in population, as both joined the 100,000 club. The 2006 Census estimate states that both Edison and Woodbridge Township have dropped below the 100,000 mark (with Edison surpassing Woodbridge).#Newark, Essex County: 273,546 (Census Estimate 2006: 281,402)#Jersey City, Hudson County: 240,055 (Census Estimate 2006: 241,791)#Paterson, Passaic County: 149,222 (Census Estimate 2006: 148,708)#Elizabeth, Union County: 120,568 (Census Estimate 2006: 126,179)#Edison, Middlesex County 97,687 (Census Estimate 2006: 99,523)#Woodbridge Township, Middlesex County: 97,203 (Census Estimate 2006: 99,208)Towns and small cities (60,000 to 100,000)#Toms River Township (Ocean County): 89,706 (Census Estimate 2006: 94,660)#Hamilton Township (Mercer County): 87,109 (Census Estimate 2006: 90,559)#Trenton (Mercer County): 85,403#Camden (Camden County): 79,904#Clifton (Passaic County): 78,672#Brick Township (Ocean County): 76,119#Cherry Hill Township (Camden County): 69,965#East Orange (Essex County): 69,824#Passaic (Passaic County): 67,861#Union City (Hudson County): 67,088#Middletown Township (Monmouth County): 66,327#Gloucester Township (Camden County): 64,350#Bayonne (Hudson County): 61,842#Irvington (Essex County): 60,695#Old Bridge Township (Middlesex County): 60,456#Lakewood Township (Ocean County): 60,352Wealth of municipalitiesPoints of interestMuseumsNew Jersey has many museums of all kinds. A few major museums in the state are listed. Entertainment/Concert VenuesDue to the major highways and cities located in and around the state, many residents and visitors take advantage of and contribute to performances in music, theater, and dance. There are many theater and dance companies throughout the region. Major events and performance venues include:Theme parksImage:Kingda Ka.jpg|thumb|Ka, located at Flags Great Adventure in New Jersey is the worlds tallest and second fastest coaster.New Jersey has a number of amusement parks, including the worlds largest seasonal theme park, to the biggest drive-thru safari outside of Africa, and an amusement and water park spread across three piers above the beach.Jersey Shoreon the Jersey Shore.SportsProfessional sportsNew Jersey currently has five teams from professional sports leagues playing in the state, although the League Soccer team and two Football League teams identify as being from New York.Image:Pudcentnewarkjeh.JPG|thumb|Center in Newark, home of the NHLs New Jersey Devils and NBAs New Jersey Nets.File:New Meadowlands Stadium Mezz Corner.jpg|thumb|Stadium, in East Rutherford, Bergen County, is the most expensive sports stadium ever built,() at approximately $1.6 billion.()The Hockey Leagues Jersey Devils, based in Newark at the Center, is one of only two major league franchises to bear the states name, the other one being the Basketball Associations Jersey Nets who are preparing to move to Brooklyn in 2012 and are also based at the Prudential Center. The New York-New Jersey Metropolitan Areas two Football League teams play in New Jersey; the York Giants and the York Jets both play in East Rutherford, County at Stadium,(New Meadowlands Stadium official website. New Meadowlands Stadium Corporation. Retrieved 2010-06-14.) which at a construction cost of approximately $1.6 billion,( is the most expensive sports stadium ever built.(The York Red Bulls of League Soccer play in Red Bull Arena, a soccer-specific stadium located in Harrison outside of Downtown Newark.The Giants and Jets played in Stadium before moving to adjacent MetLife Stadium in 2010 and will host Bowl XLVIII in 2014. The Meadowlands and its sports venues were widely considered to be outdated by todays professional sports standards. This led to the Devils move away from the Meadowlands Arena to the new Prudential Center in Newark at the start of the 200708 season. The Nets also left the Meadowlands for the Prudential Center in 2010 and plan to relocate to Brooklyn as soon as the Center is completed for them. With both teams leaving the Meadowlands Arena its future is in doubt.The sports complex is also home to the Racetrack one of three major racing tracks in the state. The Meadowlands Racetrack along with Raceway in Freehold are two of the major harness racing tracks in North America. Park Racetrack in Oceanport is also a popular spot for racing in New Jersey and the northeast. It hosted the Cup in 2007, and its turf course was renovated in preparation.Collegiate sports teamsNew Jerseyans collegiate allegiances are predominately split among the three major NCAA Division I programs in the state  the Rutgers University (New Jerseys largest state university) Scarlet Knights, the Seton Hall University (which is the states largest Roman Catholic university) Pirates, and the Princeton University (the states League university) Tigers. Both Rutgers and Seton Hall compete in the East Conference, and the rivalry between the two teams has always been an intense one. Rutgers and Princeton likewise have an intense rivalrystemming from the first intercollegiate football game in 1869though the two schools have not met on the football field since 1980. They continue to play each other annually in all other sports offered by the two universities.Rutgers, which fields 24 teams in various sports, is nationally known for its excellent football and womens basketball programs. The university is planning a large expansion to the on-campus Stadiumto accommodate the rising number of fansand the teams play in Piscataway, which is adjacent to the New Brunswick campus. The university also fields rising basketball and baseball programs. Rutgers fan base is mostly derived from the western parts of the state and Middlesex County, not to mention its alumni base, which is the largest in the state.Rutgers, The State University of New Jersey, also has campuses in Camden and Newark (in addition to its main campus in New Brunswick). The Rutgers-Camden athletic teams are called the Scarlet Raptors. The Rutgers-Newark athletic teams are called the Scarlet Raiders. The Scarlet Raiders and the Scarlet Raptors both compete within NCAA Division III.Seton Hall, unlike Rutgers, does not field a football team. Its basketball team, however, has been one of the most storied programs in the Big East, and it plays its home games at the state-of-the-art Center, located in downtown Newark. The Pirates, while lacking as large an alumni base as the state university, have a large well of support in the predominately Roman Catholic areas of the northern part of the state and the Shore.The states other Division I schools include the Monmouth University Hawks (West Long Branch), the New Jersey Institute of Technology (NJIT) Highlanders (Newark), the Rider University Broncs (Lawrenceville), and the Saint Peters College Peacocks and Peahens (Jersey City).Fairleigh Dickinson University competes in both Division I and Division III. It has two campuses, each with its own sports teams. The teams at the Metropolitan Campus are known as the FDU Knights, and compete in the Conference and NCAA Division I. The College at Florham (FDU-Florham) teams are known as the FDU-Florham Devils and compete in the Middle Atlantic Conferences Freedom Conference and NCAA Division III.Among the various Division III schools in the state, the Stevens Institute of Technology Ducks have fielded the longest continuously running collegiate mens lacrosse program in the country. 2009 marked the 125th season.High-school sports:See footnote(New Jersey High School News and Sports. iHigh.com, Inc - The High School Internet Network. Retrieved 2011-01-26.)GamblingIn 1978, the New Jersey legislature approved casino gambling in Atlantic City. At that time, Las Vegas was the only mega-casino resort.() By 1978, Atlantic City was in decline. It was no longer the seaside resort that it once was. With the institution of casino gambling, Atlantic City has come back as a resort city. There are numerous famous casinos, with its main contributor being Trump. Many lie along the Atlantic City Boardwalk, the longest boardwalk in the world.MediaNewspapersThere are many major New Jersey newspapers, including: *Park Press*County Times*Courier News*Courier-Post*Cranford Chronicle*Daily Record (Morris)()*Express-Times*County Times*News*News Tribune*County Democrat*Independent Press*Journal*New Jersey Herald()*News of Cumberland County*Press of Atlantic City*The Record()*The Record-Press and Suburban News*The Reporter (Somerset)*Star-Ledger*Sunbeam*Trentonian (Mercer)*The Warren Reporter*The Trenton TimesOn-line newsSince 2005  there have been a growing number of hyperlocal news sites. ()() These sites provide relevant news for their respective communities.()Radio stations:See: of radio stations in New JerseyTelevision and filmMotion picture technology was developed by Edison, with much of his early work done at his West Orange laboratory. Black Maria was the first motion picture studio. first motion picture industry started in 1907 in Fort Lee and the first studio was constructed there in 1909.(http://www.fortleefilm.org/) Laboratories in Passaic, developed early sets and made the first broadcast to the private home.A number of television shows and films have been filmed in New Jersey. Since 1978, the state has maintained a Motion Picture and Television Commission to encourage filming in-state.(http://www.njfilm.org/) New Jersey has long offered tax credits to television producers. Governor Christopher Christie suspended the credits in 2010, but the Jersey State Legislature in 2011 approved the restoration and expansion of the tax credit program. Under bills passed by both the state Senate and Assembly, the program offers 20 percent tax credits (22% in enterprise zones) to television and film productions that shoot in the state and meet set standards for hiring and local spending.()()MusicNew Jersey has long been an important area for both rock and rap music. Some prominent musicians from or with significant connections to New Jersey are:*Singer Sinatra was born in Hoboken. He sang with a neighborhood vocal group, the Hoboken Four, and appeared in neighborhood theater amateur shows before he became an entertainment legend as an Academy Award winning actor and one of the most famous male vocalists of all time.*Springsteen, who has sung of New Jersey life on most of his albums, hails from Freehold and is the most popular rock musician to ever come out of the state. Some of his songs that represent New Jersey life are Born to Run, Spirit In The Night, (Come Out Tonight), Thunder Road, Atlantic City, and Jungleland.* The Brothers all reside in Wyckoff, New Jersey, where the eldest brother of the group, Kevin Jonas was born, as well as the youngest Jonas, Frankie.*Irvingtons Latifah was the first female rapper to succeed in music, film, and television.*Hill is from Orange, New Jersey. Her 1998 debut solo album, The Miseducation of Lauryn Hill, sold 10 million copies internationally. She also sold millions with Fugees second album The Score.*Redman (Reggie Noble) was born, raised, and resides in Newark. He is the most successful African-American solo hip-hop artist out of New Jersey.*All members of Sugarhill Gang were born in Englewood.*Records rap producer Blaze hails from New Jersey.*Bon Jovi, who hails from Sayreville, reached fame in the 1980s with hard rock outfit Jovi. The band has also written many songs about life in New Jersey including Livin On A Prayer and even named one of his albums after the state. (see New Jersey)* Singer Warwick was born in East Orange.* Singer Houston (who is Dionne Warwicks cousin) was born in Newark, and grew up in neighboring East Orange.* Legendary jazz pianist and bandleader Basie was born in Red Bank in 1904. In the 1960s, he collaborated on several albums with fellow New Jersey native Sinatra. The Basie Theatre in Red Bank is named in his honor.*Parliament-Funkadelic, the pioneering funk music collective, was formed in Plainfield by George Clinton.*Asbury Park is home of Stone Pony, which Springsteen and Jovi frequented early in their careers and is still considered by many to be a Mecca for up-and-coming Shore musicians.*Hip-hop pioneers By Nature hail from East Orange.*In 1964, Isley Brothers founded the record label Records, named after Teaneck, their home at the time.*The Broadway musical Boys is based on the lives of the members of the Four Seasons, three of whose members were born in New Jersey (Tommy DeVito, Valli, and Massi)*pianist Evans was born in Plainfield in 1929.*Rock band Thursday was formed in Brunswick, NJ. Numerous songs reference the city.*Horror punk band The Misfits hail from Lodi, as well as their founder Danzig.*Punk rock poet Smith is from Mantua.*Acclaimed indie rock veterans La Tengo are based in Hoboken. They also have a song called The Night Falls on Hoboken.*New Jersey was the East Coast hub for ska music in the 90s. Some of the most popular ska bands, such as Catch 22 and Manifesto, come from East Brunswick.*Black Label Societys and Ozzy Osbournes famed guitarist Wylde was born in Bayonne and raised in Jackson*Bouncing Souls original four members grew up in Basking Ridge and formed in New Brunswick in the late 1980s.* Chemical Romances Iero, Way, Way, and Toro all hail from New Jersey.* Starship frontman Gabe Saporta is from New JerseyVideo games*Grand Theft Auto 1 (1997), takes place in New Jersey, called New Guernsey.*Theft Auto IV (2008), Lost and Damned (2009) and Ballad of Gay Tony, which take place in New Jersey, especially in County, County, Essex County, and County, New Jersey. City is called Alderney City.CultureGeneralLike every state, New Jersey has its own cuisine, religious communities, museums, and Halls of Fame in New Jersey.New Jersey is the birthplace of modern inventions such as: radio, the motion picture camera, the battery, the bulb, transistors, and the electric train. Other New Jersey creations include: the drive-in movie, the cultivated blueberry, sauce, the postcard, the boardwalk, the zipper, the phonograph, taffy, the dirigible, the seedless watermelon,() the first use of a submarine in warfare, and the ice cream cone.Freehold NJ.jpg|thumb|A diner in FreeholdThere are mineral museums in Franklin and Ogdensburg.Diners are common in New Jersey. The state is home to many diner manufacturers and has more diners than any other state: over 600. There are more diners in the state of New Jersey than any other place in the world.()New Jersey is the only state without a state song. Im From New Jersey is incorrectly listed on many websites as being the New Jersey State Song, but wasnt even a contender when in 1996 the Jersey Arts Council submitted their suggestions to the Jersey Legislature.()New Jersey has been rated as the least annoying state.()()Legends and ghostsA long-circulated legend says a creature, the Devil or the Leeds Devil, terrorizes the population of the Pine Barrens. The Jersey Devils are named for this mythical creature. New Jersey is also home to several other legends, such as the ghost of Road  a section of Riverview Drive between Totowa Road and Union Boulevard in Totowa, which is said to be haunted by a Lady in White;()and the haunted and demon-possessed Road in West Milford. Cooper Road in Middletown is said to be haunted by strange, ghostly people who jump out from behind trees at cars traveling down the unpaved portion of the road. The unpaved section has no street lights and thus is very dangerous as it has sharp turns where the ghostly people are said to jump in front of the cars from behind trees, causing them to crash. There is also the Ghost  the ghost of a little boy who runs across the street late at night in Atco. It is also rumored that Hoffa, the late leader of the Teamsters Union, is buried beneath Stadium or the Jersey Turnpike. However, on the popular television show MythBusters, the myth of Jimmy Hoffa being buried under Giants Stadium was debunked using penetrating radar.The magazine NJ (the creators of which later started U.S.) was started to catalog and explore the ghosts, legends, and prevalence of otherwise weird things in the state.State symbolsNotable peopleSee also*List of National Register of Historic Places in New Jersey*of people from New Jersey*stateReferencesExternal links;State Government*Official New Jersey state web site*New Jersey State Databases  Annotated list of searchable databases produced by New Jersey state agencies and compiled by the Government Documents Roundtable of the American Library Association.*Descriptions of NJ forms of government (e.g., township, borough, etc.) from NJ State League of Municipalities;U.S. Government*Energy Data & Statistics for New Jersey*USGS real-time, geographic, and other scientific resources of New Jersey*US Census Bureau*New Jersey State Facts;Other**The New Jersey Digital Highway, the statewide cultural heritage portal to digital collections from the states archives, libraries and museums*Abandoned and Historic Mines of New Jersey*New Jersey travel guide from Wikitravel Southeast JerseyCsaraJerseyJerseyJerseyaz:Nyu-CersiJersey-be-x-old:-JerseyYerseybo:JerseyJerseyJerseyJerseyJerseyJerseyJerseypdc:Nei-SchaersiJerseyHahoodzoJersey osariikJerseyeo:Nov-erzejoJerseyfa:JerseyJerseyJerseyJerseyJerseyJerseyJerseyNuadhJerseyTset-sIelekeJerseyio:Nova-JerseyJezJerseyie:Nov-JerseyJerseyos:-JerseyJerseyJerseyJerseyka:-Nowydhky:-JerseyJzeJerseymrj:-JerseyCaesarealv:dersijaDersisJerseyJerseyJerseyJerseyJerseyJerseyJerseyJerseyJerseyja:JerseyJerseyJerseyJerseyuz:Nyu-JersiJerseyJerseyJerseyJerseyJerseyJerseyJersey suyuru:-JerseyJerseyJerseyJerseyJerseyJerseyckb:JerseyJerseyJerseyJerseytt:-te:th:tg:-Jerseyuk:-Jrsy ShtatiJerseyJerseyJerseyJerseyzh-yue:JerseyDersszh:
21939
National_Security_Agency
The National Security Agency/Security Service (NSA/CSS, sometimes called jokingly No Such Agency()) is a cryptologic intelligence agency of the States Department of Defense responsible for the collection and analysis of foreign communications and foreign intelligence, as well as protecting U.S. government communications and systems,( which involves cryptanalysis and cryptography.The NSA is directed by at least a lieutenant general or vice admiral. NSA is a key component of the U.S. Intelligence Community, which is headed by the of National Intelligence. The Security Service is a co-located agency created to coordinate intelligence activities and co-operation between NSA and other U.S. military cryptanalysis agencies. The of the National Security Agency serves as the Commander of the States Cyber Command and Chief of the Security Service.(http://csis.org/event/cybersecurity-discussion-general-keith-b-alexander-director-national-security-agency) By law, NSAs intelligence gathering is limited to foreign communications, although domestic incidents such as the warrantless surveillance controversy have occurred.OrganizationThe National Security Agency is divided into two major missions: the Signals Intelligence Directorate (SID), which produces foreign intelligence information, and the Information Assurance Directorate (IAD), which protects U.S. information systems.()RoleFile:Cray X-MP.jpg|thumbnail|right|Cray X-MP/24 (ser. no. 115) supercomputer on display at the Cryptologic Museum.NSAs eavesdropping mission includes radio broadcasting, both from various organizations and individuals, the Internet, telephone calls, and other intercepted forms of communication. Its secure communications mission includes military, diplomatic, and all other sensitive, confidential or secret government communications. It has been described as the worlds largest single employer of mathematicians,() and the owner of the single largest group of supercomputers,() but it has tried to keep a low profile. For many years, its existence was not acknowledged by the U.S. government, earning it the nickname, No Such Agency (NSA). Because the agency rarely makes any public remarks, it has been quipped that their motto is Never Say Anything.. According to the Post, every day, collection systems at the National Security Agency intercept and store 1.7 billion e-mails, phone calls and other types of communications. The NSA sorts a fraction of those into 70 separate databases.(Priest, Dana and Arkin, William, A hidden world, growing beyond control, Post)Because of its listening task, NSA/CSS has been heavily involved in cryptanalytic research, continuing the work of predecessor agencies which had broken many War II codes and ciphers (see, for instance, Purple, project, and JN-25).In 2004, NSA Security Service and the Cyber Security Division of the of Homeland Security (DHS) agreed to expand NSA Centers of Academic Excellence in Information Assurance Education Program.()As part of the National Security Directive 54/Homeland Security Presidential Directive 23 (NSPD 54), signed on January 8, 2008 by President Bush, the NSA became the lead agency to monitor and protect all of the federal governments computer networks from cyber-terrorism.() In 2010, Robert Gates called for DHS to have a cell that would be able to apply the full surveillance powers of NSA for domestic cyber security.(Wall Street Journal CEO Council 2010 Annual Meeting.)FacilitiesSecurity Agency headquarters, Fort Meade, Maryland.jpg|thumbnail|300px|right|NSA headquarters in Fort Meade, MarylandHeadquarters for the National Security Agency is at George G. Meade, Maryland, about  southwest of Baltimore. The NSA has its own exit off Maryland Route 295 South labeled NSA Employees Only. The scale of the operations at the NSA is hard to determine from unclassified data; some 18,000 parking spaces are visible in photos of the site. In 2006, the Sun reported that the NSA was at risk of electrical overload because of insufficient internal electrical infrastructure at Fort Meade to support the amount of equipment being installed. This problem was apparently recognized in the 1990s but not made a priority, and now the agencys ability to keep its operations going is threatened.()Its secure government communications work has involved the NSA in numerous technology areas, including the design of specialized communications hardware and software, production of dedicated semiconductors (at the Ft. Meade chip fabrication plant), and advanced cryptography research. The agency contracts with the private sector in the fields of research and equipment.In addition to its Ft. Meade headquarters, the NSA has facilities at the Cryptology Center in Antonio, Texas; at Gordon, Georgia, and elsewhere. On January 6, 2011 a groundbreaking ceremony was held to begin construction on the NSAs first Comprehensive National Cyber-security Initiative (CNCI) Data Center; the Utah Data Center for short. The USD $1.5 billion data center is being built at Camp Williams, Utah, located  miles south of Lake City. The data center will help support the agencys National Cyber-security Initiative.()National Computer Security CenterThe National Computer Security Center, once part of the National Security Agency, was established in 1981 and was responsible for testing and evaluating computer equipment for use in high security and/or confidential applications. NCSC was also responsible for publishing the Orange Book and Trusted Network Interpretation (Red Book) detailing trusted computing and network platform specifications. The two works are more formally known as the Trusted Computing System Evaluation Criteria and Network Interpretation, part of the Series, however, they have largely been replaced by the Criteria.HistoryThe National Security Agencys predecessor was the Armed Forces Security Agency (AFSA), created on May 20, 1949.() This organization was originally established within the U.S. Department of Defense under the command of the Chiefs of Staff. The AFSA was to direct the communications and electronic intelligence activities of the U.S. intelligence units: the Security Agency, the Security Group, and the Air Force Security Service. However, that agency had little power and lacked a centralized coordination mechanism. The creation of NSA resulted from a December 10, 1951, memo sent by Intelligence Agency (CIA) Director Bedell Smith to James S. Lay, Executive Secretary of the National Security Council.(In a footnote on p. 30 of Body of Secrets (Anchor Books 2002), James Bamford mentions the classified CIA memorandum Proposed Survey of Intelligence Activities (December 10, 1951).) The memo observed that control over, and coordination of, the collection and processing of Communications Intelligence had proved ineffective and recommended a survey of communications intelligence activities. The proposal was approved on December 13, 1951, and the study authorized on December 28, 1951. The report was completed by June 13, 1952. Generally known as the Brownell Committee Report, after committee chairman Brownell, it surveyed the history of U.S. communications intelligence activities and suggested the need for a much greater degree of coordination and direction at the national level. As the change in the security agencys name indicated, the role of NSA was extended beyond the armed forces.The creation of NSA was authorized in a letter written by President S. Truman in June 1952. The agency was formally established through a revision of National Security Council Intelligence Directive (NSCID) 9 on October 24, 1952,(Memorandum on Communications Intelligence Activities The document which created NSA. President S Truman. October 24, 1952. Retrieved 11 April 2008.) and officially came into existence on November 4, 1952. President Trumans letter was itself classified and remained unknown to the public for more than a generation. A brief but vague reference to the NSA first appeared in the States Government Organization Manual from 1957, which described it as a separately organized agency within the Department of Defense under the direction, authority, and control of the Secretary of Defense ... for the performance of highly specialized technical functions in support of the intelligence activities of the United States.(David Kahn, The Codebreakers, Scribner Press, 1967, chapter 19, pp. 672733.);National Cryptologic MemorialCrews associated with NSA missions have been involved in a number of dangerous and deadly situations. The well known Liberty incident in 1967 and USS Pueblo incident in 1968 are a small sample of the losses endured during the Cold War.(A dangerous business, US Navy and National Reconnaissance during the Cold War, NSA)The National Security Agency/Central Security Service Cryptologic Memorial honors and remembers the fallen personnel, both military and civilian, of these intelligence missions. It is made of black granite, and has 163 names (as of 2011) carved into it. It is located at NSA headquarters. A tradition of declassifying the stories of the fallen was begun in 2001.(http://www.nsa.gov/about/cryptologic_heritage/memorial_wall/memorial_wall_list.shtml)InsigniaThe heraldic insignia of NSA consists of a eagle facing its right, grasping a key in its talons, representing NSAs clutch on security as well as the mission to protect and gain access to secrets. The eagle is set on a background of blue and its breast features a blue shield supported by 13 bands of red and white. The surrounding white circular border features National Security Agency around the top and States of America underneath, with two five-pointed silver stars between the two phrases. The current NSA insignia has been in use since 1965, when then-Director, LTG Marshall S. Carter (USA) ordered the creation of a device to represent the Agency.( )Effect on non-governmental cryptographyNSA has been involved in debates about public policy, both indirectly as a behind-the-scenes adviser to other departments, and directly during and after Vice Admiral Bobby Ray Inmans directorship. NSA was a major player in the debates of the 1990s regarding the of cryptography. Restrictions on export were reduced but not eliminated in 1996.Data Encryption StandardNSA was embroiled in some minor controversy concerning its involvement in the creation of the Data Encryption Standard (DES), a standard and public cipher algorithm used by the government and banking community. During the development of DES by IBM in the 1970s, NSA recommended changes to some details of the design. There was suspicion that these changes had weakened the algorithm sufficiently to enable the agency to eavesdrop if required, including speculation that a critical componentthe so-called S-boxeshad been altered to insert a backdoor and that the reduction in key length might have made it feasible for NSA to discover DES keys using massive computing power. It has since been observed that the S-boxes in DES are particularly resilient against cryptanalysis, a technique which was not publicly discovered until the late 1980s, but which was known to the IBM DES team. The States Senate Select Committee on Intelligence reviewed NSAs involvement, and concluded that while the agency had provided some assistance, it had not tampered with the design.()() In late 2009 NSA declassified information stating that NSA worked closely with IBM to strengthen the algorithm against all except brute force attacks and to strengthen substitution tables, called S-boxes. Conversely, NSA tried to convince IBM to reduce the length of the key from 64 to 48 bits. Ultimately they compromised on a 56-bit key.()Clipper chipBecause of concerns that widespread use of strong cryptography would hamper government use of wiretaps, NSA proposed the concept of escrow in 1993 and introduced the Clipper chip that would offer stronger protection than DES but would allow access to encrypted data by authorized law enforcement officials. The proposal was strongly opposed and key escrow requirements ultimately went nowhere. However, NSAs Fortezza hardware-based encryption cards, created for the Clipper project, are still used within government, and NSA ultimately published the design of the SKIPJACK cipher (but not the key exchange protocol) used on the cards.Advanced Encryption StandardPossibly because of previous controversy, the involvement of NSA in the selection of a successor to DES, the Advanced Encryption Standard (AES), was initially limited to hardware performance testing (see AES competition). NSA has subsequently certified AES for protection of classified information (for at most two levels, e.g. SECRET information in an unclassified environment) when used in NSA-approved systems.SHAThe widely-used SHA-1 and SHA-2 hash functions were designed by NSA. SHA-1 is a slight modification of the weaker SHA-0 algorithm, also designed by NSA in 1993. This small modification was suggested by NSA two years later, with no justification other than the fact that it provides additional security. An attack for SHA-0 that does not apply to the revised algorithm was indeed found between 1998 and 2005 by academic cryptographers. Because of weaknesses and key length restrictions in SHA-1, NIST deprecates its use for signatures, and approves only the newer SHA-2 algorithms for such applications from 2013 on.(Draft NIST SP 800-131, June 2010.)A new hash standard, SHA-3, is currently under development. An ongoing competition, closely resembling the successful AES process, will select the function used by the standard and is scheduled to end in 2012.Dual EC DRBG random number generatorNSA promoted the inclusion of a random number generator called EC DRBG in the U.S. Institute of Standards and Technologys 2007 guidelines. This led to speculation of a backdoor which would allow NSA access to data encrypted by systems using that random number generator.()Academic researchNSA has invested many millions of dollars in academic research under grant code prefix MDA904, resulting in over 3,000 papers (as of 2007-10-11). NSA/CSS has, at times, attempted to restrict the publication of academic research into cryptography; for example, the and Khafre block ciphers were voluntarily withheld in response to an NSA request to do so.NSANetFile:Intel GreenDoor.jpg|thumb|280px|Behind the Green Door secure communications center with SIPRNET, GWAN, NSANET, and JWICS accessNSANet is the official National Security Agency intranet.( It is a classified internal network,( and TS/SCI.( In 2004 it was reported to have used over twenty off-the-shelf operating systems.( Some universities that do highly-sensitive research are allowed to connect to it.( In 1998 it, along with NIPRNET and SIPRNET, had significant problems with poor search capabilities, unorganized data and old information.( In 2001 it was reported on the Newswire that NSA bought Auto-Trols product KONFIG NM to help document and manage NSANet.()()()()()()()()PatentsNSA has the ability to file for a patent from the Patent and Trademark Office under order. Unlike normal patents, these are not revealed to the public and do not expire. However, if the Patent Office receives an application for an identical patent from a third party, they will reveal NSAs patent and officially grant it to NSA for the full term on that date.()One of NSAs published patents describes a method of geographically locating an individual computer site in an Internet-like network, based on the latency of multiple network connections.()NSA programsECHELONNSA/CSS, in combination with the equivalent agencies in the Kingdom (Communications Headquarters), Canada (Security Establishment), Australia (Signals Directorate), and Zealand (Communications Security Bureau), otherwise known as the UKUSA group,(Richelson, Jeffrey T.; Ball, Desmond (1985). The Ties That Bind: Intelligence Cooperation Between the UKUSA Countries. London: Allen & Unwin. ISBN 0-04-327092-1) is widely reported to be in command of the operation of the so-called ECHELON system. Its capabilities are suspected to include the ability to monitor a large proportion of the worlds transmitted civilian telephone, fax and data traffic, according to a December 16, 2005 article in the York Times.()Technically, almost all modern telephone, internet, fax and satellite communications are exploitable due to recent advances in technology and the open air nature of much of the radio communications around the world.NSAs presumed collection operations have generated much criticism, possibly stemming from the assumption that NSA/CSS represents an infringement of Americans privacy. However, NSAs States Signals Intelligence Directive 18 (USSID 18) strictly prohibits the interception or collection of information about ... U.S. persons, entities, corporations or organizations.... without explicit written legal permission from the States Attorney General when the subject is located abroad, or the Intelligence Surveillance Court when within U.S. Borders.(National Security Agency. United States Signals Intelligence Directive 18. National Security Agency July 27, 1993. Last access date March 23, 2007) The U.S. Supreme Court has ruled that intelligence agencies cannot conduct surveillance against American citizens. There are a few extreme circumstances where collecting on a U.S. entity is allowed without a USSID 18 waiver, such as with civilian distress signals, or sudden emergencies such as the 11, 2001 attacks; however, the PATRIOT Act has significantly changed privacy legality.There have been alleged violations of USSID 18 that occurred in violation of NSAs strict charter prohibiting such acts. In addition, ECHELON is considered with indignation by citizens of countries outside the UKUSA alliance, with numerous allegations that the United States government uses it for motives other than its national security, including political and espionage.()() Examples include the gear-less turbine technology designed by the German firm Enercon(Die Zeit: 40/1999 Verrat unter Freunden (Treachery among friends, German), available at archiv.zeit.de)(Report A5-0264/2001 of the European Parliament (English), available at European Parliament website) and the speech technology developed by the Belgian firm & Hauspie. An article in the Baltimore Sun reported in 1995 that aerospace company Airbus lost a $6 billion contract with Arabia in 1994 after NSA reported that Airbus officials had been bribing Saudi officials to secure the contract.()()Domestic activityNSAs mission, as set forth in Order 12333, is to collect information that constitutes foreign intelligence or counterintelligence while not acquiring information concerning the domestic activities of United States persons. NSA has declared that it relies on the FBI to collect information on foreign intelligence activities within the borders of the USA, while confining its own activities within the USA to the embassies and missions of foreign nations.NSAs domestic surveillance activities are limited by the requirements imposed by the Amendment to the U.S. Constitution; however, these protections do not apply to non-U.S. persons located outside of U.S. borders, so the NSAs foreign surveillance efforts are subject to far fewer limitations under U.S. law.(David Alan Jordan. Decrypting the Fourth Amendment: Warrantless NSA Surveillance and the Enhanced Expectation of Privacy Provided by Encrypted Voice over Internet Protocol. Boston College Law Review. May, 2006. Last access date January 23, 2007) The specific requirements for domestic surveillance operations are contained in the Intelligence Surveillance Act of 1978 (FISA), which does not extend protection to non-U.S. citizens located outside of territory.(These activities, especially the publicly acknowledged domestic telephone tapping and call database programs, have prompted questions about the extent of the NSAs activities and concerns about threats to privacy and the rule of law.Wiretapping programsDomestic wiretapping under Richard NixonIn the years after President Nixon resigned, there were several investigations of suspected misuse of Intelligence Agency (CIA) and NSA facilities. Senator Church headed a Senate investigating committee (the Committee) which uncovered previously unknown activity, such as a CIA plot (ordered by President F. Kennedy) to assassinate Castro. The investigation also uncovered NSAs wiretaps on targeted American citizens. After the Church Committee hearings, the Intelligence Surveillance Act of 1978 became law, limiting circumstances under which domestic surveillance was allowed. IT projects: ThinThread, Trailblazer, Turbulence NSA created new IT systems to deal with the flood of information from new technologies like the internet and cellphones. ThinThread contained advanced mining capabilities. It also had a privacy mechanism; surveillance was stored encrypted; decryption required a warrant. The research done under this program may have contributed to the technology used in later systems. Thinthread was cancelled when Michael Hayden chose Trailblazer, which did not include Thinthreads privacy system.()Project ramped up circa 2000. SAIC, Boeing, CSC, IBM, and Litton worked on it. Some NSA whistleblowers complained internally about major problems surrounding Trailblazer. This led to investigations by Congress and the NSA and DoD General. The project was cancelled circa 2003-4; it was late, overbudget, and didnt do what it was supposed to do. The Baltimore Sun ran articles about this in 2006-07. The government then raided the whistleblowers houses. One of them, Thomas Drake, was charged with  in 2010, part of Obamas unusual use of espionage law against leakers and whistleblowers.(See refs of Andrews Drake article)(Bamford, Factory, p 325-340)Turbulence started circa 2005. It was developed in small, inexpensive test pieces rather than one grand plan like Trailblazer. It also included offensive cyber-warfare capabilities, like injecting malware into remote computers. Congress criticized Turbulence in 2007 for having similar bureaucratic problems as Trailblazer.(Warrantless wiretaps under George W. BushOn December 16, 2005, the York Times reported that, under House pressure and with an executive order from President W. Bush, the National Security Agency, in an attempt to thwart terrorism, had been tapping the telephones of select individuals in the U.S. calling persons outside the country, without obtaining warrants from the States Foreign Intelligence Surveillance Court, a secret court created for that purpose under the Intelligence Surveillance Act (FISA).(Risen & Lichtblau (December 16, 2005), Bush Lets U.S. Spy on Callers Without Courts, York Times)One such surveillance program, authorized by the U.S. Signals Intelligence Directive 18 of President George Bush, was the Highlander Project undertaken for the National Security Agency by the U.S. Army 513th Military Intelligence Brigade. NSA relayed telephone (including cell phone) conversations obtained from both ground, airborne, and satellite monitoring stations to various U.S. Army Signal Intelligence Officers, including the 201st Military Intelligence Battalion. Conversations of citizens of the U.S. were intercepted, along with those of other nations.(Gwu.edu)Proponents of the surveillance program claim that the President has executive authority to order such action, arguing that laws such as FISA are overridden by the Presidents Constitutional powers. In addition, some argued that FISA was implicitly overridden by a subsequent statute, the for Use of Military Force, although the Supreme Courts ruling in v. Rumsfeld deprecates this view. In the August 2006 case v. NSA, District Court Judge Diggs Taylor concluded that NSAs warrantless surveillance program was both illegal and unconstitutional. On July 6, 2007 the Circuit Court of Appeals overturned Judge Taylors ruling, reversing her findings.(6th Circuit Court of Appeals Decision)AT&T Internet monitoringIn May 2006, Klein, a former AT&T employee, alleged that his company had cooperated with NSA in installing hardware to monitor network communications including traffic between American citizens.( on PBS)Wiretapping under Barack ObamaThe New York Times reported in 2009 that the NSA is intercepting communications of American citizens including a Congressman, although the Justice Department believed that the NSA had corrected its errors.() United States Attorney General Holder resumed the wiretapping according to his understanding of the Foreign Intelligence Surveillance Act of 1978 Amendments Act of 2008 which Congress passed in July 2008 but without explaining what had occurred.()Transaction data miningNSA is reported to use its computing capability to analyze transactional data that it regularly acquires from other government agencies, which gather it under their own jurisdictional authorities. As part of this effort, NSA now monitors huge volumes of records of domestic emails and Internet searches as well as bank transfers, credit-card transactions and travel and telephone records, according to current and former intelligence officials interviewed by the Wall Street Journal.()CriticismsThe NSA received criticism early on in 1960 after two agents had defected to the Union. Investigations by the Un-American Activities Committee and a special subcommittee of the Armed Services Committee revealed severe cases of ignorance in personnel security regulations, prompting the former personnel director and the director of security to step down and leading to the adoption of stricter security practices.( Nonetheless, security breaches reoccurred only a year later when in an issue of Izvestia of July 23, 1963, a former NSA employee published several cryptologic secrets. The very same day, an NSA clerk-messenger committed suicide as ongoing investigations disclosed that he had sold secret information to the Soviets on a regular basis. The reluctance of Congressional houses to look into these affairs had prompted a journalist to write If a similar series of tragic blunders occurred in any ordinary agency of Government an aroused public would insist that those responsible be officially censured, demoted, or fired. David Kahn criticized the NSAs tactics of concealing its doings as smug and the Congress blind faith in the agencys right-doing as shortsighted, and pointed out the necessity of surveillance by the Congress to prevent abuse of power.(The number of exemptions from legal requirements has also been criticized. When in 1964 the Congress was hearing a bill giving the director of the NSA the power to fire at will any employee, the Washington Post wrote: This is the very definition of arbitrariness. It means that an employee could be discharged and disgraced on the basis of anonymous allegations without the slightest opportunity to defend himself. Yet, the bill was accepted with overwhelming majority.(On January 17, 2006, the for Constitutional Rights filed a lawsuit, v. Bush, against the W. Bush Presidency. The lawsuit challenged the National Security Agencys (NSAs) surveillance of people within the U.S., including the interception of CCR emails without securing a warrant first.()()In fictionSince the existence of the NSA has become more widely known in the past few decades, and particularly since the 1990s, the agency has regularly been portrayed in spy fiction. Many such portrayals grossly exaggerate the organizations involvement in the more sensational activities of intelligence agencies. The agency now plays a role in numerous books, films, television shows, and video games.StaffDirectors*November 1952November 1956 LTG J. Canine, USA*November 1956November 1960 Lt Gen A. Samford, USAF*November 1960January 1962 VADM H. Frost, USN*January 1962June 1965 Lt Gen A. Blake, USAF*June 1965August 1969 Lt Gen S. Carter, USA*August 1969August 1972 VADM A. M. Gaylor, USN*August 1972August 1973 Lt Gen C. Phillips, USAF*August 1973July 1977 Lt Gen Allen, Jr., USAF*July 1977April 1981 VADM Ray Inman, USN*April 1981May 1985 Lt Gen D. Faurer, USAF*May 1985August 1988 Lt Gen E. Odom, USA*August 1988May 1992 VADM O. Studeman, USN*May 1992February 1996 VADM M. McConnell, USN*February 1996March 1999 Lt Gen A. Minihan, USAF*March 1999April 2005 Lt Gen Michael V. Hayden, USAF*April 2005present GEN B. Alexander, USANotable cryptanalysts*D. Callimahos*Meyer Driscoll*F. Friedman*Kullback*Robert Morris*Rowlett*Sinkov*W. Tordella*YardleyNSA encryption systemsFile:STU-IIIphones.nsa.jpg|thumb|right|250px|STU-III secure telephones on display at the Cryptologic MuseumNSA is responsible for the encryption-related components in these systems:*EKMS Electronic Key Management System*FNBDT Future Narrow Band Digital Terminal*Fortezza encryption based on portable crypto token in Card format*KL-7 ADONIS off-line rotor encryption machine (post-WW II-1980s)*KW-26 ROMULUS electronic in-line teletypewriter encryptor (1960s1980s)*KW-37 JASON fleet broadcast encryptor (1960s1990s)*KY-57 VINSON tactical radio voice encryptor*KG-84 Dedicated Data Encryption/Decryption*SINCGARS tactical radio with cryptographically controlled frequency hopping*STE secure terminal equipment*STU-III secure telephone unit, currently being phased out by the STE*TACLANE product line by Dynamics C4 SystemsNSA has specified Suite A and Suite B cryptographic algorithm suites to be used in U.S. government systems; the Suite B algorithms are a subset of those previously specified by NIST and are expected to serve for most information protection purposes, while the Suite A algorithms are secret and are intended for especially high levels of protection.Some past NSA SIGINT activities*of Tonkin Incident*Air Lines Flight 007*Ivy Bells*USS Liberty incident*USS Pueblo (AGER-2)*projectSee also*Bamford*Consortium*of Intelligence and Research*Intelligence Agency*Security Service*Field Activity*Quarterly*Intelligence Agency*Signals Directorate*Security Service*Espionage*Bureau of Investigation*law enforcement in the United States*Communications Headquarters*and Mitchell Defection*(company)*Geospatial-Intelligence Agency*Reconnaissance Office*Security Whistleblowers Coalition*officer*Hall of Honor*Pelton*SHAMROCK*Linux*intelligence*(cipher)*TEMPEST*Andrews Drake (whistleblower)*1 product*UKUSA*States Department of Homeland Security*Air Force Office of Special Investigations*Anthony WalkerNSA computers*7950 Harvest*FROSTBURGReferencesFurther reading*James Bamford, of Secrets: Anatomy of the Ultra-Secret National Security Agency, Doubleday, 2001, ISBN 0-385-49907-8.*James Bamford, The Puzzle Palace, Penguin Books, ISBN 0-14-006748-5.***Levy, Steven, How the Code Rebels Beat the GovernmentSaving Privacy in the Digital Age discussion of the development of non-government cryptography, including many accounts of tussles with the NSA.*Radden Keefe, Patrick, Dispatches from the Secret World of Global Eavesdropping, Random House, ISBN 1-4000-6034-6.*Liston, Robert A., Pueblo Surrender: a Covert Action by the National Security Agency, ISBN 0-87131-554-8.*Kahn, David, Codebreakers, 1181 pp., ISBN 0-684-83130-9.  Look for the 1967 rather than the 1996 edition.*Tully, Andrew, Super Spies: More Secret, More Powerful than the CIA, 1969, LC 71080912.*Bamford, James, York Times, December 25, 2005; The Agency That Could Be Big Brother.*Sam Adams, of Numbers: An Intelligence Memoir Steerforth; New Ed edition (June 1, 1998)*Prados, The Soviet estimate: U.S. intelligence analysis & Russian military strength, hardcover, 367 pages, ISBN 0-385-27211-1, Dial Press (1982).*Laqueur, A World of secrets*Kent, Strategic Intelligence for American Public Policy*Aid, Secret Sentry: The Untold History of the National Security Agency, 432 pages, ISBN 978-1596915152, Bloomsbury Press (June 9, 2009)* Richard J. Aldrich, GCHQ: The Uncensored Story of Britains Most Secret Intelligence Agency, HarperCollins, 2010. ISBN 9780007278473.External links*NSA official site*Records of the National Security Agency/Central Security Service*History of NSA*The NSA charter*Inside The NSA - The Spy Factory Documentary via Educated Earth.*The Origins of the National Security Agency, 1940-1952newly declassified book-length report provided by The Memory Hole.*The National Security Archive at George Washington University**First person account of NSA interview and clearance January 2004*Bamford Big Brother Is Listening. Atlantic, April 2006*James Bamford Inside the National Security Agency (Lecture) Civil Liberties Union, KUOW-FM, PRX, NPR, February 24, 2007 (53: minutes)*GCHQ: Britains Most Secret Intelligence Agencylist  br:NSAde Seguretat Nacionalbezpenostn agenturada:NSASecurity Agencyet:NSAel:NSAde Seguridad NacionalSecurity Agency    Security AgencySecurity Agency Security AgencyKeamanan NasionalSecurity Agency  saugumo agentraSecurity AgencyKeselamatan NegaraSecurity Agencyja:Security AgencySecurity Agencyde Segurana NacionalSecurity Agency e Sigurimit Kombtar Amerikanscn:NSASecurity AgencySecurity Agencysr:fi:NSASecurity Agencyth:Gvenlik Tekilat quan An ninh Quc gia Hoa Kyi:NSAzh:
22304
Osmium
Osmium ( ) is a element with the symbol Os and number 76. Osmium is a hard, brittle, blue-gray or blue-black metal in the family, and is the densest natural element.  Osmium is twice as dense as lead. The density of osmium is , slightly greater than that of iridium, the second densest element. Osmium is found in nature as an alloy, mostly in platinum ores. Osmium is also used in alloys, with platinum, iridium and other platinum group metals. Those alloys are employed in pen tips, electrical contacts and in other applications where extreme durability and hardness are needed.(Hammond Osmium, C. R., p. 4-25 in )CharacteristicsPhysical propertiesOsmium is the densest metallic element and has a blue-gray tint. It is a hard but brittle metal that remains lustrous even at high temperatures. Because of its hardness, brittleness, low pressure (the lowest of the platinum group metals), and very high melting point (the fourth highest of all elements), solid osmium is difficult to machine, form, or work. Osmium is the densest element, slightly denser than iridium.() Calculations of density from the lattice may produce the most reliable data for these elements, giving a density of  for iridium versus  for osmium.()  The high density of osmium is a consequence of the contraction.(()Osmium possesses quite remarkable chemical and physical properties. It has the highest point and the lowest vapor pressure in the family. Osmium has a very low compressibility. Correspondingly, its modulus is extremely high, reported between  and , which rivals that of diamond (). The hardness of osmium is .()()()Chemical propertiesOsmium forms compounds with the states ranging from 2 to +8. The most common oxidation states are +2, +3, +4, and +8. The +8 oxidation state is notable for being the highest attained by any chemical element, and aside from osmium, is encountered only in xenon and ruthenium.() The oxidation state 1 and 2 represented by the two reactive compounds  and  are used in the synthesis of osmium cluster compounds.()() The most common compound exhibiting the +8 oxidation state is tetroxide. This toxic compound is formed when powdered osmium is exposed to air, and is a very volatile, water-soluble, pale yellow, crystalline solid with a strong smell. Therefore, osmium powder has a characteristic smell of osmium tetroxide.( Osmium tetroxide forms red osmates  upon reaction with a base. With ammonia, it forms the nitrido-osmates .()()() Osmium tetroxide boils at 130 C and is a powerful oxidizing agent. By contrast, dioxide (OsO2) is black, non-volatile, and much less reactive and toxic.Only two osmium compounds have major applications: osmium tetroxide  for staining tissue in microscopy and the non-volatile osmates for organic oxidation reactions.(  Osmium heptafluoride (OsF7) and osmium pentafluoride (OsF5) are known, but osmium trifluoride (OsF3) has not been synthesized yet. The lower oxidation states are stabilized by the larger halogens. Therefore, the trichloride, tribromide, triiodide and even osmium diiodide are known. The oxidation state +1 is only known for the osmium iodide (OsI), whereas several carbonyl complexes of osmium, such as dodecacarbonyl (), represent the oxidation state 0.((()()In general, the lower oxidation states of osmium are stabilized by ligands that are good -donors (such as amines) and -acceptors (heterocycles containing nitrogen). The higher oxidation states are stabilized by strong - and -donors, such as  and .()IsotopesOsmium has seven naturally occurring isotopes, six of which are stable: , , , , , and (most abundant) .  undergoes decay with such long half-life ((2.01.1) years) that for practical purposes it can be considered stable. Alpha decay is predicted for all 7 naturally occurring isotopes, but due to very long half-lives, it was observed only for . It is predicted that  and  can undergo beta decay but this radioactivity has not been observed yet.() is the daughter of  (half-life ) and is used extensively in dating terrestrial as well as meteoric rocks (see dating). It has also been used to measure the intensity of continental weathering over geologic time and to fix minimum ages for stabilization of the mantle roots of continental cratons. This decay is a reason why rhenium-rich minerals are abnormally rich in .() However, the most notable application of Os in dating has been in conjunction with iridium, to analyze the layer of quartz along the K-T boundary that marks the extinction of the dinosaurs 65 million years ago.()HistoryOsmium (from Greek osme () meaning smell) was discovered in 1803 by Tennant and Hyde Wollaston in London, England.() The discovery of osmium is intertwined with that of platinum and the other metals of the group. Platinum reached Europe as platina (small silver), first encountered in the late 17th century in silver mines around the Department, in Colombia.() The discovery that this metal was not an alloy, but a distinct new element, was published in 1748.() Chemists who studied platinum dissolved it in regia (a mixture of hydrochloric and acids) to create soluble salts. They always observed a small amount of a dark, insoluble residue.( Louis Proust thought that the residue was graphite.() Collet-Descotils, Franois, comte de Fourcroy, and Nicolas Vauquelin also observed the black residue in 1803, but did not obtain enough material for further experiments.( In 1803, Tennant analyzed the insoluble residue and concluded that it must contain a new metal. Vauquelin treated the powder alternately with alkali and acids( and obtained a volatile new oxide, which he believed to be of this new metalwhich he named ptene, from the Greek word  (ptnos) for winged.()() However, Tennant, who had the advantage of a much larger amount of residue, continued his research and identified two previously undiscovered elements in the black residue, iridium and osmium.(( He obtained a yellow solution (probably of cisOs(OH)2O42) by reactions with hydroxide at red heat. After acidification he was able to distill the formed OsO4.( He named osmium after Greek osme meaning a smell, because of the smell of the volatile tetroxide.() Discovery of the new elements was documented in a letter to the Society on June 21, 1804.(()Uranium and osmium were early successful catalysts in the process, the fixation reaction of nitrogen and hydrogen to produce ammonia, giving enough yield to make the process economically successful. However, in 1908 cheaper catalysts based on iron and iron oxides were introduced for the first pilot plants.()Nowadays, osmium is primarily obtained from the processing of platinum and nickel ores.()OccurrenceOsmium is the least abundant stable element in the Earths crust with an average mass fraction of 0.05 ppb in the crust.() File:Platinum  nuggets.jpg|thumb|left|Native platinum containing traces of  the other group  metalsOsmium is found in nature as an uncombined element or in natural alloys; especially the iridiumosmium alloys, osmiridium (osmium rich), and iridiosmium (iridium rich).() In the nickel and copper deposits, the platinum group metals occur as sulfides (i.e., (Pt,Pd)S)), tellurides (e.g., PtBiTe), antimonides (e.g., PdSb), and arsenides (e.g., PtAs2); in all these compounds platinum is exchanged by a small amount of iridium and osmium. As with all of the platinum group metals, osmium can be found naturally in alloys with nickel or copper.()Within the Earths crust, osmium, like iridium, is found at highest concentrations in three types of geologic structure: igneous deposits (crustal intrusions from below), impact craters, and deposits reworked from one of the former structures. The largest known primary reserves are in the igneous complex in Africa,() though the large coppernickel deposits near Norilsk in Russia, and the Basin in Canada are also significant sources of osmium. Smaller reserves can be found in the United States.( The alluvial deposits used by pre-Columbian people in the Department, Colombia are still a source for platinum group metals. The second large alluvial deposit was found in the Mountains, Russia, which is still mined.(()ProductionOsmium is obtained commercially as a by-product from nickel and copper mining and processing. During electrorefining of copper and nickel, noble metals such as silver, gold and the platinum group metals, together with non-metallic elements such as selenium and tellurium settle to the bottom of the cell as anode mud, which forms the starting material for their extraction.()() In order to separate the metals, they must first be brought into solution. Several methods are available depending on the separation process and the composition of the mixture; two representative methods are fusion with peroxide followed by dissolution in regia, and dissolution in a mixture of chlorine with acid.(() Osmium, ruthenium, rhodium and iridium can be separated from platinum, gold and base metals by their insolubility in aqua regia, leaving a solid residue. Rhodium can be separated from the residue by treatment with molten bisulfate. The insoluble residue, containing Ru, Os and Ir, is treated with oxide, in which Ir is insoluble, producing water-soluble Ru and Os salts. After oxidation to the volatile oxides,  is separated from  by precipitation of (NH4)3RuCl6 with ammonium chloride.After it is dissolved, osmium is separated from the other platinum group metals by distillation or extraction with organic solvents of the volatile osmium tetroxide.() The first method is similar to the procedure used by Tennant and Wollaston. Both methods are suitable for industrial scale production. In either case, the product is reduced using hydrogen, yielding the metal as a powder or sponge that can be treated using metallurgy techniques.()Neither the producers nor the United States Geological Survey published any production amounts for osmium. Estimations of the United States consumption date published from 1971,() which gives a consumption in the United States of 2000 ounces (62 kg), would suggest that the production is still less than 1 ton per year.Applicationsthumb|Electron micrograph of (organic) plant tissue without (top) and with (bottom) OsO4 stainingBecause of the volatility and extreme toxicity of its oxide, osmium is rarely used in its pure state, and is instead often alloyed with other metals. Those alloys are utilized in high-wear applications. Osmium alloys such as osmiridium are very hard and, along with other platinum group metals, are used in the tips of pens, instrument pivots, and electrical contacts, as they can resist wear from frequent operation. The stylus (needle) in early phonograph designs was also made of osmium, especially for records, until sapphire and diamond replaced the metal in later designs for 45-rpm and 33-rpm records.()thumb|left|300px|The Sharpless dihydroxylation: RL  Largest substituent; RM  Medium-sized substituent; RS  Smallest substituentOsmium tetroxide has been used in fingerprint detection() and in staining fatty tissue for optical and microscopy. As a strong oxidant, it cross-links lipids mainly by reacting with unsaturated carbon-carbon bonds, and thereby both fixes biological membranes in place in tissue samples and simultaneously stains them. Because osmium atoms are extremely electron dense, osmium staining greatly enhances image contrast in electron microscopy (TEM) studies of biological materials. Those carbon materials have otherwise very weak TEM contrast (see image).() Another osmium compound, osmium ferricyanide (OsFeCN), exhibits similar fixing and staining action.()An alloy of 90% platinum and 10% osmium is used in surgical implants such as pacemakers and replacement of pulmonary valves.()The tetroxide and a related compound, potassium osmate, are important oxidants for chemical synthesis, despite being very poisonous. For the asymmetric dihydroxylation, which uses osmate for the conversion of a bond into a vicinal diol, Barry Sharpless won the Prize in Chemistry in 2001.()()thumb|left|140px|Post-flight appearance of Os, Ag, and Au mirrors from the front (left images) and rear panels of Space Shuttle. Blackening reveals oxidation due to irradiation by oxygen atoms.()()In 1898 an Austrian chemist, Auer von Welsbach, developed the Oslamp with a filament made of osmium, which he introduced commercially in 1902. After only a few years, osmium was replaced by the more stable metal tungsten (also known as wolfram). Tungsten has the highest melting point of any metal, and using it in light bulbs increases the luminous efficacy and life of incandescent lamps.(The light bulb manufacturer OSRAM (founded in 1906 when three German companies, Auer-Gesellschaft, AEG and Siemens & Halske, combined their lamp production facilities) derived its name from the elements of OSmium and wolfRAM.()Like palladium, powdered osmium effectively absorbs hydrogen atoms. This could make osmium a potential candidate for a metal hydride battery electrode. However, osmium is expensive and would react with potassium hydroxide, the most common battery electrolyte.()Osmium has high reflectivity in the ultraviolet range of the spectrum; for example, at 600  osmium has a reflectivity two times that of gold.() This high reflectivity is desirable in space-based UV spectrometers which have reduced mirror sizes due to space limitations. Osmium-coated mirrors were flown in several space missions aboard the Shuttle, but it soon became clear that the oxygen radicals in the earth orbit are abundant enough to significantly deteriorate the osmium layer.()PrecautionsFinely divided metallic osmium is pyrophoric.( Osmium reacts with oxygen at room temperature forming volatile osmium tetroxide. Some osmium compounds are also converted to the tetroxide if oxygen is present.(This makes osmium tetroxide the main source of contact with the environment.tetroxide is highly volatile and penetrates skin readily, and is very toxic by inhalation, ingestion, and skin contact.() Airborne low concentrations of osmium tetroxide vapor can cause lung congestion and skin or eye damage, and should therefore be used in a fume hood.() Osmium tetroxide is rapidly reduced to relatively inert compounds by polyunsaturated vegetable oils, such as oil.()PriceOsmium is usually sold as a 99% pure powder. Like other precious metals, it is measured by weight and by grams. Its price at 2010 is about $400 per Troy ounce (or about $13 per gram), depending on the quantity and its supplier.(Los Alamos National Laboratorys Chemistry Division Cost of Osmium  Accessed 6 April)(Live Osmium prices  at Tax Free Gold .com . Accessed 6 April 2010)ReferencesExternal links*WebElements.com: Osmium*Chemistry in its element podcast (MP3) from the Society of Chemistrys World: Osmiumar:an:Osmioaz:Osmiumbn:be:bs:Osmijumbg:ca:Osmicv:cs:Osmiumco:Osmiucy:Osmiwmda:Osmiumde:Osmiumet:Osmiumel:es:Osmioeo:Osmioeu:Osmiofa:hif:Osmiumfr:Osmiumfur:Osmiga:Oismiamgv:Osmiumgl:Osmioxal:ko:hy:hr:Osmijio:Osmioid:Osmiumis:Osmnit:Osmiohe:jv:Osmiumkk:kv:ku:Osmiymmrj:la:Osmiumlv:Osmijslb:Osmiumlt:Osmislij:Osmiojbo:jinmrbosmihu:Ozmiummk:ml:mr:ms:Osmiumnl:Osmiumja:no:Osmiumnn:Osmiumoc:smipnb:nds:Osmiumpl:Osmpt:smioro:Osmiuqu:Osmiyuru:stq:Osmiumscn:smiusimple:Osmiumsk:Osmiumsl:Osmijsr:sh:Osmijumfi:Osmiumsv:Osmiumte:th:tr:Osmiyumuk:ur:Osmiumvi:Osmiwar:Osmyoyi:yo:Osmiumzh-yue:zh:
22625
Organized_crime
File:AlCaponemugshotCPD.jpg|thumb|right|225px|Capone, a face commonly associated with organized crime.Organized crime or criminal organizations are transnational, national, or local groupings of highly centralized enterprises run by criminals for the purpose of engaging in illegal activity, most commonly for monetary profit. Some criminal organizations, such as terrorist organizations, are politically motivated (see non-state actor (VNSA)). Gangs may become disciplined enough to be considered organized. An organized gang or criminal set can also be referred to as a mob.Mafia is a term used to describe a number of criminal organizations around the world. The first organization to bear the label was the Sicilian Mafia based in Sicily, known to its members as Nostra. In the States, the Mafia generally refers to the Italian American Mafia. Other high level organized crime groups such as the American prison gang the Mafia use the term Mafia to describe their group. American cartels are often considered Hispanic or Latino Mafias. Other international organizations described as mafias include the Mafia, the Mob, the Chinese Triads,  the Japanese Yakuza, the Neapolitan Camorra, Calabrian Ndrangheta, and the Apulian Corona Unita. There are also a number of localized mafia organizations around the world bearing no link to any specific ethnic background.In the States the Crime Control Act (1970) defines organized crime as The unlawful activities of ... a highly organized, disciplined association ....(http://www.atf.gov/pub/fire-explo_pub/xcomplete.htm)  Criminal activity as a structured group is referred to as racketeering and such crime is commonly referred to as the work of the Mob. In the UK, police estimate organised crime involves up to 38,000 people operating in 6,000 various groups.(Dominic Casciani, News home affairs correspondent: 28 July 2011 Criminal assets worth record 1bn seized by police) In addition, due to the escalating violence of Mexicos drug war, the Mexican cartels are considered the greatest organized crime threat to the United States, according to a report issued by the States Department of Justice.()Historical originsPre-Nineteenth CenturyToday, crime is sometimes thought of as an urban phenomenon, but for most of human history it was the rural world that was crime-ridden. Pirates, highwaymen and bandits attacked trade routes and roads, at times severely disrupting commerce, raising costs, insurance rates and prices to the consumer. According to criminologist Paul Lunde, Piracy and banditry were to the pre-industrial world what organized crime is to modern society.(Paul Lunde, Organized Crime, 2004.)  As Lunde states, Barbarian conquerors, whether Vandals, Goths, Norsemen, Turks or Mongols are not normally thought of as organized crime groups, yet they share many features associated with successful criminal organizations. They were for the most part non-ideological, predominantly ethnically based, used violence and intimidation, and adhered to their own codes of law.( Terrorism is linked to OC, but has political aims rather than solely financial ones, so there is overlap but separation between terrorism and OC.Twentieth CenturyCresseys Cosa Nostra model studied Mafia families exclusively and this limits his broader findings. Structures are formal and rational with allocated tasks, limits on entrance, and influence the rules established for organisational maintenance and sustainability.()() In this context there is a difference between organised and professional crime; there is well-defined hierarchy of roles for leaders and members, underlying rules and specific goals that determine their behavior, and these are formed as a social system, one that was rationally designed to maximize profits and to provide forbidden goods. Albini saw organised criminal behaviour as consisting of networks of patrons and clients, rather than rational hierarchies or secret societies.()()() The networks are characterised by a loose system of power relations. Each participant is interested in furthering his own welfare. Criminal entrepreneurs are the patrons and they exchange information with their clients in order to obtain their support. Clients include members of gangs, local and national politicians, officials of the govt and people engaged in legitimate business. People in the network may not directly be part of the core criminal organization. Furthering the approach of both Cressey and Albini, Ianni and Ianni studied Italian-American crime syndicates in New York and other cities.()()  Kinship is seen as the basis of organised crime rather than the structures Cressey had identified; this includes fictive godparental and affinitive ties as well as those based on blood relations, and it is the impersonal actions, not the status or affiliations of their members, that define the group. Rules of conduct and behavioural aspects of power and networks and roles include the following:* family operates as a social unit, with social and business functions merged;* leadership positions down to middle management are kinship based;* the higher the position, the closer the kinship relationship;* group assigns leadership positions to a central group of family members, including fictive godparental relationship reinforcement;* the leadership group are assigned to legal or illegal enterprises, but not both; and,* transfer of money, from legal and illegal business, and back to illegal business is by individuals, not companies.Strong family ties are derived from the traditions of southern Italy, where family rather than the church or state is the basis of social order and morality.The disorganized crime and choice theseOne of the most important trends to emerge in criminological thinking about OC in recent years is the suggestion that it is not, in a formal sense, organized at all. Evidence includes: lack of centralized control, absence of formal lines of communication, fragmented organizational structuree. It is distinctively disorganized. For example, Seattles crime network in the 1970s and 80s consisted of groups of businessmen, politicians and of law enforcement officers. They all had links to a national network via Meyer Lansky, who was powerful, but there was no evidence that Lansky or anyone else exercised centralized control over them.() While some crime involved well-known criminal hierarchies in the city, criminal activity was not subject to central management by these hierarchies nor by other controlling groups, nor were activities limited to a finite number of objectives. The networks of criminals involved with the crimes did not exhibit organizational cohesion. Too much emphasis had been placed on the Mafia as controlling OC. The Mafia were certainly powerful but they were part of a heterogeneous underworld, a network characterized by complex webs of relationships. OC groups were violent and aimed at making money but because of the lack of structure and fragmentation of objectives, they were disorganised.()() Further studies showed neither bureaucracy nor kinship groups are the primary structure of organized crime, rather they were in partnerships or a series of joint business ventures.()() Despite these conclusions, all researchers observed a degree of managerial activities among the groups they studied. All observed networks and a degree of persistence, and there may be utility in focusing on the identification of orgainising roles of people and events rather than the groups structure.()()  There may be three main approaches to understand the organisations in terms of their roles as social systems:()* organisations as rational systems: Highly formalized structures in terms of bureaucracys and hierarchy, with formal systems of rules regarding authority and highly specific goals;* organisations as natural systems: Participants may regard the organization as an end in itself, not merely a means to some other end. Promoting group values to maintain solidarity is high on the agenda. They do not rely on profit maximization. Their perversity and violence in respect of relationships is often remarkable, but they are characterized by their focus on the connections between their members, their associates and their victims; and,* organisations open systems: High levels of interdependence between themselves and the environment in which they operate. There is no one way in which they are organized or how they operate. They are adaptable and change to meet the demands of their changing environments and circumstances.Organised crime groups may be a combination of all three.International governance approachInternational consensus on defining organized crime has become important since the 1970s due its increased prevalence and impact. e.g. UN in 1976 and EU 1998. OC is the large scale and complex criminal activity carried on by groups of persons, however loosely or tightly organized for the enrichment of those participating at the expense of the community and its members. It is frequently accomplished through ruthless disregard of any law, including offences against the person and frequently in connexion with political corruption. (UN) A criminal organization shall mean a lasting, structured association of two or more persons, acting in concert with a view to committing crimes or other offences which are punishable by deprivation of liberty or a detention  order of a maximum of at least four years or a more serious penalty, whether such crimes or offences are an end in themselves or a means of obtaining material benefits and, if necessary, of improperly influencing the operation of public authorities. (UE) Not all groups exhibit the same characteristics of structure. However, violence and corruption and the pursuit of multiple enterprises and continuity serve to form the essence of OC activity.()() There are eleven characteristics from the European Commission and Europol pertinent to a working definition of organised crime. Six of those must be satisfied and the four in italics are mandatory. Summarised they are:* more than two people;* their own appointed tasks;* activity over a prolonged or indefinite period of time;* the use discipline or control;* perpetration of serious criminal offences;* operations on an international or transnational level;* the use violence or other intimidation;* the use of commercial or businesslike structures;* engagement in money laundering;* exertion of influence on politics, media, public administration, judicial authorities or the economy; and,* motivated by the pursuit of profit and/or power,with the against Transnational Organized Crime (the Palermo Convention) having a similar definition:* organised criminal: structured group, three or more people, one or more serious crimes, in order to obtain financial or other material benefit;* serious crime: offence punishable by at least four years in prison; and,* structured group: Not randomly formed and doesnt need formal structure,Others stress the importance of power, profit and perpetuity, defining organised criminal behaviour as:* nonideological: i.e. profit driven;* hierarchical: few elites and many operatives;* limited or exclusive membership: maintain secrecy and loyalty of members;* perpetuating itself: Recruitment process and policy;* willing to use illegal violence and bribery;* specialised division of labour: to achieve organization goal;* monopolistic: Market control to maximize profits; and,* has explicit rules and regulations: Codes of honour.()Definitions need to bring together its legal and social elements. OC has widespread social, political and economic effects. It uses violence and corruption to achieve its ends: OC when group primarily focused on illegal profits systematically commit crimes that adversely affect society and are capable of successfully shielding their activities, in particular by being willing to use physical violence or eliminate individuals by way of corruption.()() It is a mistake in using the term OC as though it denotes a clear and well-defined phenomenon. The evidence regarding OC shows a less well-organised, very diversified landscape of organizing criminalsthe economic activities of these orgainsing criminals can be better described from the viewpoint of crime enterprises than from a conceptually unclear frameworks such as OC. Many of the definitions emphasise the group nature of OC, the organisation of its members, its use of violence or corruption to achieve its goals, and its extra-jurisdictional character.OC may appear in many forms at different times and in different places. Due to the variety of definitions, there is evident danger in asking what is OC? and expecting a simple answer.()The locus of power and organized crimeSome espouse that all organized crime operates at an international level, though there is currently no international court capable of trying offences resulting from such activities (the International Criminal Courts remit extends only to dealing with people accused of offences against humanity, e.g. genocide). If a network operates primarily from one jurisdiction and carries out its illicit operations there and in some other jurisdictions it is international, though it may be appropriate to use the term transnational only to label the activities of a major crime group that is centred in no one jurisdiction but operating in many. The understanding of organized crime has therefore progressed to combined internationalisation and an understanding of social conflict into one of power, control, efficiency risk and utility, all within the context of organisational theory. The accumulation of social, economic and political power()  have sustained themselves as a core concerns of all criminal organizations: * social: criminal groups seek to develop social control in relation to particular communities;* economic: seek to exert influence by means of corruption and by coercion of legitimate and illegitimate praxis; and,* political: criminal groups use corruption and violence to attain power and status.()Contemporary organized crime may be very different from traditional Mafia style, particularly in terms of the distribution and centralization of power, authority structures and the concept of control over ones territory and organization. There is a tendency away from centralization of power and reliance upon family ties towards a fragmentation of structures and informality of relationships in crime groups. Organized crime most typically flourishes when a central government and society is disorganized, weak, absent or untrusted. This may occur in a society facing periods of political, economic or social turmoil or transition, such as a change of government or a period of rapid economic development, particularly if the society lacks strong and established institutions and the of law. The of the Soviet Union and the of 1989 in Europe that saw the downfall of the Bloc created a breeding ground for organized criminal organizations. The newest growth sectors for organized crime are theft and online extortion. These activities are troubling because they discourage consumers from using the Internet for e-commerce. E-commerce was supposed to level the playing ground between small and large businesses, but the growth of online organized crime is leading to the opposite effect; large businesses are able to afford more bandwidth (to resist attacks) and superior security. Furthermore, organized crime using the Internet is much harder to trace down for the police (even though they increasingly deploy cybercops) since most police forces and law enforcement agencies operate within a local or national jurisdiction while the Internet makes it easier for criminal organizations to operate across such boundaries without detection. In the past criminal organizations have naturally limited themselves by their need to expand, putting them in competition with each other. This competition, often leading to violence, uses valuable resources such as manpower (either killed or sent to prison), equipment and finances. In the United States, the Mob boss of the Hill Gang (in the 1980s) turned informant for the Bureau of Investigation (FBI). He used this position to eliminate competition and consolidate power within the city of Boston which led to the imprisonment of several senior organized crime figures including Angiulo, underboss of the crime family. Infighting sometimes occurs within an organization, such as the war of 193031 and the Boston Irish Mob Wars of the 1960s and 1970s.File:Charles Luciano.jpg|thumb|right|180px|Mugshot of Luciano in 1936, Sicilian mobster.Today criminal organizations are increasingly working together, realizing that it is better to work in cooperation rather than in competition with each other (once again, consolidating power). This has led to the rise of global criminal organizations such as Salvatrucha and the Street gang. The Mafia in the U.S. have had links with organized crime groups in Italy such as the Camorra, the Ndrangheta, Corona Unita, and Mafia. The Nostra has also been known to work with the Mob (Gotti of the Gambino family and Coonan of Westies are known to have worked together, with the Westies operating as a contract hitman for the Gambino family after they helped Coonan come to power), the Japanese Yakuza and the Mafia. The United Nations Office on Drugs and Crime estimated that organized crime groups held $322 billion in assets in 2005.() This rise in cooperation between criminal organizations has meant that law enforcement agencies are increasingly having to work together. The FBI operates an organized crime section from its headquarters in D.C. and is known to work with other national (e.g., di Stato, Russian Federal Security Service (FSB), and the Canadian Mounted Police), federal (e.g., of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms, and Explosives, Enforcement Administration, States Marshals Service, and the States Coast Guard), state (e.g., State Police Special Investigation Unit and the York State Police Bureau of Criminal Investigation) and city (e.g., York City Police Department Organized Crime Unit and the Angeles Police Department Special Operations Division) law enforcement agencies.Theoretical backgroundCriminal psychologyRational choiceBased on the now outdated notion that regardless of the reason for committing crime, the decision to do so is a rational choice made after weighing up the benefits versus consequences of the crime, this theory treats all individuals as rational operators, committing criminal acts after consideration of all associated risks (detection and punishment) compared with the rewards of crimes (personal, financial etc.).()  Little emphasis is placed on the offenders backgrounds or circumstances surrounding the crimes or offenders. The role of criminal organisations in lowering the perceptions of risk and increasing the likelihood of personal benefit is prioritised by this approach, with the organisations structure, purpose, and activity being indicative of the rational choices made by criminals and their organisers.()  It ignores that in addition to financial gains, people commit crimes for the need of acceptance, respect and trust by other members of the organisation.DeterrenceThis theory sees criminal behaviour as reflective of an individual, internal calculation() by the criminal that the benefits associated with offending (whether financial or otherwise) outweigh the perceived risks.()()  The perceived strength, importance or infallibility of the criminal organisation is directly proportional to the types of crime committed, their intensity and arguably the level of community response. The benefits of participating in organised crime (higher financial rewards, greater socioeconomic control and influence, protection of the family or significant others, perceived freedoms from oppressive laws or norms) contribute greatly to the psychology behind highly organised group offending.Social learningCriminals learn through associations with one another. The success of organised crime groups if therefore dependent upon the strength of their communication and the enforcement of their value systems, the recruitment and training processes employed to sustain, build or fill gaps in criminal operations.() An understanding of this theory sees close associations between criminals, imitation of superiors, and understanding of value systems, processes and authority as the main drivers behind organised crime. Interpersonal relationships define the motivations the individual developes, with the effect of family or peer criminal activity being a strong predictor of inter-generational offending.()  This theory also developed to include the strengths and weaknesses of reinforcement, which in the context of continuing criminal enterprises may be used to help understand propensities for certain crimes or victims, level of integration into the mainstream culture and likelihood of recidivism / success in rehabilitation.(()()EnterpriseUnder this theory, organised crime exists because legitimate markets leave many customers and potential customers unsatisfied.()  High demand for a particular good or service (e.g. drugs, prostitution, arms, slaves), low levels of risk detection and high profits lead to a conducive environment for entrepreneurial criminal groups to enter the market and profit by supplying those goods and services.()  For success, there must be:* an identified market; and,* a certain rate of consumption (demand) to maintain profit and outweigh perceived risks.()()Under these conditions competition is discouraged, ensuring criminal monopolies sustain profits. Legal substitution of goods or services may (by increasing competition) force the dynamic of organised criminal operations to adjust, as will deterrence measures (reducing demand), and the restriction of resources (controlling the ability to supply or produce to supply).()Differential associationSutherland goes further to say that deviancy is contingent on conflicting groups within society, and that such groups struggle over the means to define what is criminal or deviant within society. Criminal organisations therefore gravitate around illegal avenues of production, profit-making, protectionism or social control and attempt (by increasing their operations or membership) to make these acceptable.(()() This also explains the propensity of criminal organisations to develop rackets, to coerce through the use of violence, aggression and threatening behaviour (at times termed terrorism).()()()() Preoccupation with methods of accumulating profit highlight the lack of legitimate means to achieve economic or social advantage, as does the organisation of crime or corruption (though it is debatable whether these are based on wealth, power or both). The ability to effect social norms and practices through political and economic influence (and the enforcement or normalisation of criminogenic needs) may be defined by differential association theory.Critical criminology and sociologySocial disorganizationSocial disorganisation theory is intended to be applied to neighbourhood level street crime,() thus the context of gang activity, loosely formed criminal associations or networks, socioeconomic demographic impacts, legitimate access to public resources, employment or education, and mobility give it relevance to organised crime. Where  the upper- and lower-classes live in close proximity this can result in feelings of anger, hostility, social injustice and frustration.()  Criminals experience poverty; and witness affluence they are deprived of and which is virtually impossible for them to attain through conventional means.() The concept of neighbourhood is central to this theory, as it defines the social learning, locus of control, cultural influences and access to social opportunity experienced by criminals and the groups they form.() Fear of or lack of trust in mainstream authority may also be a key contributor to social disorganisation; organised crime groups replicate such figures and thus ensure control over the counter-culture.() This theory has tended to view violent or anti-social behaviour by gangs as reflective of their social disorganisation rather than as a product or tool of their organisation.()AnomieSociologist K. Merton believed deviance depended on societys definition of success,() and the desires of individuals to achieve success through socially defined avenues. Criminality becomes attractive when expectations of being able to fulfil goals (therefore achieving success) by legitimate means cannot be fulfilled.() Criminal organisations capitalise on states of normlessness by imposing criminogenic needs and illicit avenues to achieve them. This has been used as the basis for numerous meta-theories of organised crime through its integration of social learning, cultural deviance, and criminogenic motivations.() If crime is seen as a function of anomie,() organised behaviour produces stability, increases protection or security, and may be directly proportional to market forces as expressed by entrepreneurship- or risk-based approaches. It is the inadequate supply of legitimate opportunities that constrains the ability for the individual to pursue valued societal goals and reduces the likelihood that using legitimate opportunities will enable them to satisfy such goals (due to their position in society).()Cultural devianceCriminals violate the law because they belong to a unique subculture - the counter-culture - their values and norms conflicting with those of the working-, middle- or upper-classes upon which criminal laws are based. This subculture shares an alternative lifestyle, language and culture, and is generally typified by being tough, taking care of their own affairs and rejecting government authority. Role models include drug dealers, thieves and pimps, as they have achieved success and wealth not otherwise available through socially-provided opportunities. It is through modelling organised crime as a counter-cultural avenue to success that such organisations are sustained.(()()Alien conspiracy/queer ladder of mobilityThe alien conspiracy theory and queer ladder of mobility theories state that ethnicity and outsider status (immigrants, or those not within the dominant ethno-centric groups) and their influences are thought to dictate the prevalence of organise crime in society.()  The alien theory posits that the contemporary structures of organised crime gained prominence during the 1860s in Sicily and that elements of the Sicilian population are responsible for the foundation of most European and North American organised crime,() made up of Italian-dominated crime families. Bells theory of the queer ladder of mobility hypothesised that ethnic succession (the attainment of power and control by one more marginalised ethnic group over other less marginalised groups) occurs by promoting the perpetration of criminal activities within a disenfranchised or oppressed demographic. Whilst early organised crime was dominated by the Mafia they have been relatively substituted by the Mob (early 1900s), the Brotherhood (1960s onwards), Colombian cartel and cartel (mid 1970s - 1990s), and more recently the Mexican Cartel (late 1980s onwards), the Mafia (1988 onwards), Al-Qaeda (1988 onwards) and the Taliban (1994 onwards). Many argue this misinterprets and overstates the role of ethnicity in organised crime.()  A contradiction of this theory is that syndicates had developed long before large-scale Sicilian immigration in 1860s, with these immigrants merely joining a widespread phenomena of crime and corruption.()()()Models of organised crimeCausalThe demand for illegal goods and services nurtures the emergence of ever more centralized and powerful criminal syndicates, who may ultimately succeed in undermining public morals, neutralizing law enforcement through corruption and infiltrating the legal economy unless appropriate countermeasures are taken. This theoretical proposition can be depicted in a model comprising four elements: government, society, illegal markets and organized crime.()  While interrelations are acknowledged in both directions between the model elements, in the last instance the purpose is to explain variations in the power and reach of organized crime in the sense of an ultimately unified organizational entity.((OrganisationalPatron-client networksPatron-client networks are defined by the fluid criminal interactions they produce. Organised crime groups operate as smaller units within the overall network, and as such tend towards valuing significant others, familiarity of social and economic environments, or tradition. These networks are usually composed of:* Hierarchies based on naturally forming family, social and cultural traditions;* Tight-knit locus of activity/labour;* Fraternal or nepotistic value systems;* Personalised activity; including family rivalries, territorial disputes, recruitment and training of family members, etc.;* Entrenched belief systems, reliance of tradition (including religion, family values, cultural expectations, class politics, gender roles, etc.); and,* Communication and rule enforcement mechanisms dependent on organisational structure, social etiquette, history of criminal involvement, and collective decision-making.(((()()Perhaps the best known patron-client networks are the Sicilian and Italian American Cosa Nostra, most commonly known as the Mafia. The Neopolitan Camorra, the Calabrian and Italian Canadian Ndrangheta, and the Apulian Corona Unita are similar Italian organized crime groups. Other organized enterprises include the mafia, mob, Chinese Triads, and the Japanese Yakuza.Bureaucratic/corporate operationsBureaucratic/corporate organised crime groups are defined by the general rigidity of their internal structures. Focusing more on how the operations works, succeeds, sustains itself or avoids retribution, they are generally typified by:* A complex authority structure;* An extensive division of labour between classes within the organisation;* Meritocratic (as opposed to cultural or social attributes);* Responsibilities carried out in an impersonal manner;* Extensive written rules/regulations (as opposed to cultural praxis dictating action); and,* Top-down communication and rule enforcement mechanisms.However, this model of operation has some flaws:* The top-down communication strategy is susceptible to interception, more so further down the hierarchy being communicated to;* Maintaining written records jeopardises the security of the organisation and relies on increased security measures;* Infiltration at lower levels in the hierarchy can jeopardise the entire organisation (a house of cards effect); and,* Death, injury, incarceration or internal power struggles dramatically heighten the insecurity of operations.Whilst bureaucratic operations emphasis business processes and strongly authoritarian hierarchies, these are based on enforcing power relationships rather than an overlying aim of protectionism, sustainability or growth.()()()()Youth and street gangsA distinctive gang culture underpins many, but not all, organised groups;()() this may develop through recruiting strategies, social learning processes in the corrective system experienced by youth, family or peer involvement in crime, and the coercive actions of criminal authority figures. The term street gang is commonly used interchangeably with youth gang, referring to neighborhood or street-based youth groups that meet gang criteria. Miller (1992) defines a street gang as a self-formed association of peers, united by mutual interests, with identifiable leadership and internal organization, who act collectively or as individuals to achieve specific purposes, including the conduct of illegal activity and control of a particular territory, facility, or enterprise.(Miller, W.B. 1992 (Revised from 1982). Crime by Youth Gangs and Groups in the United States. Washington, DC: U.S. Department of Justice, Office of JusticePrograms, Office of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention.)Zones of transition refer to deteriorating neighbourhoods with shifting populations()()  - conflict between groups, fighting, turf wars, and theft promotes solidarity and cohesion.() Cohen (1955): working class teenagers joined gangs due to frustration of inability to achieve status and goals of the middle class; Cloward and Ohlin (1960): blocked opportunity, but unequal distribution of opportunities lead to creating different types of gangs (that is, some focused on robbery and property theft, some on fighting and conflict and some were retreatists focusing on drug taking); Spergel (1966) was one of the first criminologists to focus on evidence-based practice rather than intuition into gang life and culture. Klein (1971) like Spergel studied the effects on members of social workers interventions. More interventions actually lead to greater gang participation and solidarity and bonds between members. Downes and Rock (1988) on Parkers analysis: strain theory applies, labelling theory (from experience with police and courts), control theory (involvement in trouble from early childhood and the eventual decision that the costs outweigh the benefits) and conflict theories. No ethnic group is more disposed to gang involvement than another, rather it is the status of being marginalised, alienated or rejected that makes some groups more vulnerable to gang formation,()()()  and this would also be accounted for in the effect of social exclusion,()()  especially in terms of recruitment and retention. These may also be defined by age (typically youth) or peer group influences,() and the permanence or consistency of their criminal activity. These groups also form their own symbolic identity or public representation which are recognisable by the community at large (include colours, symbols, patches, flags and tattoos).Research has focused on whether the gangs have formal structures, clear hierarchies and leadership in comparison with adult groups, and whether they are rational in pursuit of their goals, though positions on structures, hierarchies and defined roles are conflicting. Some studied street gangs involved in drug dealing - finding that their structure and behaviour had a degree of organisational rationality.()  Members saw themselves as organised criminals; gangs were formal-rational organisations,()()()   Strong organisational structures, well defined roles and rules that guided members behaviour. Also a specified and regular means of income (i.e. drugs). Padilla (1992) agreed with the two above. However some have found these to be loose rather than well-defined and lacking persistent focus, there was relatively low cohesion , few shared goals and little organisational structure.( Shared norms, value and loyalties were low, structures chaotic, little role differentiation or clear distribution of labour. Similarly, the use of violence does not conform to the principles behind protection rackets, political intimidation and drug trafficking activities employed by those adult groups. In many cases gang members graduate from youth gangs to highly developed OC groups, with some already in contact with such syndicates and through this we see a greater propensity for imitation. Gangs and traditional criminal organisations cannot be universally linked (Decker, 1998),()()  however there there are clear benefits to both the adult and youth organisation through their association. In terms of structure, no single crime group is archetypal, though in most cases there are well-defined patterns of vertical integration (where criminal groups attempt to control the supply and demand), as is the case in arms, sex and drug trafficking.Individual differenceEntrepreneurialThe entrepreneurial model looks at either the individual criminal, or a smaller group of organised criminals, that capitalise off the more fluid group-association of contemporary organised crime.(  This model conforms to social learning theory or differential association in that there are clear associations and interaction between criminals where knowledge may be shared, or values enforced, however it is argued that rational choice is not represented in this. The choice to commit a certain act, or associate with other organised crime groups, may be seen as much more of an entrepreneurial decision - contributing to the continuation of a criminal enterprise, by maximising those aspects that protect or support their own individual gain. In this context, the role of risk is also easily understandable,(( however it is debatable whether the underlying motivation should be seen as true entrepreneurship()  or entrepreneurship as a product of some social disadvantage.The criminal organisation, much in the same way as assessing pleasure or pain, weighs up factors like legal, social and economic risk to determine potential profit and loss from certain criminal activities. This decision-making process is constructed from the entrepreneurial nature of its members, their motivations and the environments they work within. Opportunism is also a key factor  the organised criminal or criminal group is likely to fluidly change the criminal associates they have, the types of crime they perpetrates, and how they functions in the public (recruitment, reputation, etc.) in order to ensure efficiency, capitalisation or protection of their interests.()InternetWikileaks and Anonymous allow the individual to be involved in organised criminal activity outside of the usual bureaucratic versus network paradigm. The activities of these groups are directly retaliatory to social changes, political and economic decision-making, rather than for profit or interpersonal benefit. Loosely formed groups of illegal hackers, Internet activists, human rights activists and other interest groups agitate around key themes or issues, and are directed by groups of online administrators (usually associated with a central lobby group). This predominantly includes the leaking and distribution of official documents (confidential military information, nuclear weaponry and research data, information on detainee/prisoner conditions, diplomatic information) and co-ordinated cyber attacks on corporations, government bodies and public individuals. The Internet model should not to be confused with simple fraud or theft through use of the Internet, which form part of wider criminal operations under bureaucratic or network models. Individual members coalesce for a limited period of time to conduct specifically defined tasks, and are more loosely structured and flexible. These show somewhat different structures between groups from different regions. Very developed Eastern European organised cybercriminal groups can be similar to traditional organised crime groups. These groups are also in a unique position due to the fact that physical strength is insignificant to their success. The Internet model allows (group) in particular to integrate the entrepreneurial and patron-client network models of organised crime by relying on the enterprise of the individual as the main motivation for their participation in the criminal network. Wikileaks and Anonymous form the role of patron by promoting loyalty to the cause and perpetual succession. Shared accountability may also be seen as a defining factor in this model.Multimodel approachCulture and ethnicity provide an environment where trust and communication between criminals can be efficient and secure. This may ultimately lead to a competitive advantage for some groups, however it is inaccurate to adopt this as the only determinant of classification in organised crime. This categorisation includes the Mafia, Jamaican posses, Colombian drug trafficking groups, Nigerian organised crime groups, Japanese Yakuza (or Boryokudan), Korean criminal groups and ethnic Chinese criminal groups. Under this perspective, organised crime is not a modern phenomenon - the construction of 17th and 18th century crime gangs fulfil all the present day criteria of criminal organisations (in clear opposition to the Alien Conspiracy Theory). These roamed the rural borderlands of central Europe embarking on many of the same illegal activities associated with todays crime organisations, with the exception of money laundering.When the French revolution created strong nation states, the criminal gangs moved to other poorly controlled regions like the Balkans and Southern Italy, where the seeds were sown for the Sicilian Mafia - the lynchpin of organised crime in the New World.()Typical activitiesOrganized crime often victimize businesses through the use of extortion or theft and fraud activities like hijacking cargo trucks, robbing goods, committing bankruptcy fraud (also known as bust-out), insurance fraud or stock fraud (inside trading). Organized crime groups also victimize individuals by car theft (either for dismantling at chop shops or for export), theft, bank robbery, burglary, jewelry theft, computer hacking, credit card fraud, economic espionage, embezzlement, theft, and fraud (and dump scam). Some organized crime groups defraud national, state, or local governments by bid-rigging public projects, counterfeiting money, smuggling or manufacturing untaxed alcohol (bootlegging) or cigarettes (buttlegging), and providing immigrant workers to avoid taxes.Organized crime groups seek out corrupt public officials in executive, law enforcement, and judicial roles so that their activities can avoid, or at least receive early warnings about, investigation and prosecution.Organized crime groups also provide a range of illegal services and goods, such as loansharking of money at very high interest rates, assassination, blackmailing, bombings, bookmaking and gambling, tricks, infringement, counterfeiting of intellectual property, kidnapping, prostitution, trafficking, trafficking, oil smuggling, trafficking, killing, document forgery, illegal dumping of toxic waste, illegal trading of nuclear materials, military equipment smuggling, nuclear weapons smuggling, fraud, providing illegal immigration and cheap labor, people smuggling, trading in endangered species, and in human beings. Organized crime groups also do a range of business and labour racketeering activities, such as skimming casinos, insider trading, setting up monopolies in industries such as garbage collecting, construction and cement pouring, bid rigging, getting no-show and no-work jobs, money laundering, corruption and bullying.Violence AssaultThe commission of violent crime may form part of a criminal organisations tools used to achieve criminogenic goals (for example, its threatening, authoritative, coercive, terror-inducing, or rebellious role), due to psychosocial factors (cultural conflict, aggression, rebellion against authority, access to illicit substances, counter-cultural dynamic), or may, in and of itself, be crime rationally chosen by individual criminals and the groups they form. Assaults are used for coercive measures, to rough up debtors, competition or recruits, in the commission of robberies and in connection to other property offences, as an expression of counter-cultural authority;()  and as a principle violence is normalised within criminal organisations (in direct opposition to mainstream society) and the locations they control.()  Whilst the intensity of violence is dependent on the types of crime the organisation is involved in (as well as their organisational structure or cultural tradition) aggressive acts range on a spectrum from low-grade physical assaults to murder. Bodily harm and grievous bodily harm, within the context of organised crime, must be understood as indicators of intense social and cultural conflict, motivations contrary to the security of the public, and other psychosocial factors.()MurderMurder has evolved from the honour and vengeance killings of the Yakuza or mafia()()()() which placed large physical and symbolic importance on the act of murder, its purposes and consequences,()() to a much less discriminate form of expressing power, enforcing criminal authority, achieving retribution or eliminating competition. The role of the hitman has been generally consistent throughout the history of organised crime, whether that be due to the efficiency or expediency of hiring a professional assassin or the need to distance oneself from the commission of murderous acts (making it harder to prove liability). This may include the assassination of notable figures (public, private or criminal), once again dependent on authority, retribution or competition. Revenge killings, armed robberies, violent disputes over controlled territories and offences against members of the public must also be considered when looking at the dynamic between different criminal organisations and their (at times) conflicting needs.Ideological crimeIn addition to what is considered traditional organized crime involving direct crimes of fraud swindles, scams, racketeering and other Influenced and Corrupt Organizations Act (RICO) predicate acts motivated for the accumulation of monetary gain, there is also non-traditional organized crime which is engaged in for political or ideological gain or acceptance. Such crime groups are often labeled organizationsThere is no universally agreed, legally binding, criminal law definition of terrorism.(Angus Martyn, The Right of Self-Defence under International Law-the Response to the Terrorist Attacks of 11 September, Australian Law and Bills Digest Group, Parliament of Australia Web Site, 12 February 2002.)(Thalif Deen. POLITICS: U.N. Member States Struggle to Define Terrorism, Press Service, 25 July 2005.) Common definitions of terrorism refer only to those violent acts which are intended to create fear (terror), are perpetrated for a religious, political or ideological goal, deliberately target or disregard the safety of non-combatants (civilians), and are committed by non-government agencies. Some definitions also include acts of unlawful violence and war, especially crimes against humanity (See The Trials). The use of similar tactics by criminal organizations for rackets or to enforce a of silence is usually not labeled terrorism though these same actions may be labeled terrorism when done by a politically motivated group.Notable groups include Al-Qaeda, Liberation Front, Army of God, Liberation Army, Covenant, The Sword, and the Arm of the Lord, Liberation Front, Hamas, Hezbollah, Republican Army, Workers Party, e Toiba, 19th Communist Organization, The Order, Armed Forces of Colombia, Liberation Army, Taliban, Freedom Front  and Underground.Other* trafficking* Arson* Coercion* Extortion* racket* assaultFinancial crimeOC groups generate large amounts of money by activities such as drug trafficking, arms smuggling and financial crime. This is of little use to them unless they can disguise it and convert it into funds that are available for investment into legitimate enterprise. The methods they use for converting its dirty money into clean assets encourages corruption. OC groups need to hide the moneys illegal origin. It allows for the expansion of OC groups, as the laundry or wash cycle operates to cover the money trail and convert proceeds of crime into usable assets. ML is bad for international and domestic trade, banking reputations and for effective governments and rule of law. Estimated figures of money laundering were between $200  $600 billion per year throughout the 1990s (US Congress Office 1995; Robinson 1996). In 2002 this was estimated between $500 billion to $1 trillion per year (UN 2002). This would make organised crime the third largest business in world after foreign exchange and oil (Robinson 1996). The rapid growth of money laundering is due to:* the scale of OC precluding it from being a cash business - groups have little option but to convert its proceeds into legitimate funds and do so by investment, by developing legitimate businesses and purchasing property;* globalisation of communications and commerce - technology has made rapid transfer of funds across international borders much easier, with groups continuously changing techniques to avoid investigation; and,* a lack of effective financial regulation in parts of the global economy.Money Laundering is a three-stage process:* Placement: (also called immersion) groups smurf small amounts at a time to avoid suspicion; physical disposal of money by moving crime funds into the legitimate financial system; may involve bank complicity, mixing licit and illicit funds, cash purchases and smuggling currency to safe havens.* Layering: disguises the trail to foil pursuit. Also called heavy soaping. It involves creating false paper trails, converting cash into assets by cash purchases.* Integration: (also called spin dry): Making it into clean taxable income by real-estate transactions, sham loans, foreign bank complicy and false import and export transactions.Means of money laundering:* Money transmitters, black money markets purchasing goods, gambling, increasing the complexity of the money trail.* Underground banking (flying money), involves clandestine bankers around the world.* It often involves otherwise legitimate banks and professionals.The policy aim in this area is to make the financial markets transparent, and minimise the circulation of criminal money and its cost upon legitimate markets.()()Remittance services()In addition to ordinary banking, however, money and other forms of value can be transferred through the use of so-called remittance services which have operated for hundreds of years in non-Western societies. Originating in southeast Asia and India, users of these systems transfer funds through the use of agents who enter into agreements with each other to receive money from people in one country (such as overseas workers) and to pay money to specified relatives or friends in other countries without having to rely on conventional banking arrangements. Funds can be moved quickly, cheaply and securely between locations that often dont have established banking networks or modern forms of electronic funds transfers available. Because such systems operate outside conventional banking systems, they are known as alternative remittance, underground or parallel banking systems. They are invariably legitimate and legal in many countries, although concerns have arisen in recent years that they could be used to circumvent anti-money laundering and counter-terrorism financing controls that now operate across the global financial services sector. Particular risks arise from the irregular forms of record-keeping which are often employed and the possibility that the laws of those countries in which they operate may not be fully complied with. Alternative remittance is only one of a number of terms used to describe the practice of transferring value, including money, from one country to another. It is generally used where value is sent through informal channels, as distinct from conventional banks. Terms used in other jurisdictions include hundi, hawala, poe kuan, informal funds transfer, underground banking, parallel banking, informal funds transfer and money/value transfer. The remittance system pre-dates modern banking and arose in various locations including China, southeast Asia and the Middle East where there was a need to move value without taking the risk of physically moving money itself. At its most basic, a remittance service involves a sender, a beneficiary and two intermediaries. The sender wishes to send a remittance to the beneficiary, often in the country of origin where the sender previously resided.CounterfeitingIn 2007, the OECD reported the scope of counterfeit products to include food, pharmaceuticals, pesticides, electrical components, tobacco and even household cleaning products in addition to the usual films, music, literature, games and other electrical appliances, software and fashion.()  A number of qualitative changes in the trade of counterfeit products:* a large increase in fake goods which are dangerous to health and safety;* most products repossessed by authorities are now household items rather than luxury goods;* a growing number of technological products; and,* production is now operated on an industrial scale.()Tax evasionThe economic effects of organised crime have been approached from a number of both theoretical and empirical positions, however the nature of such activity allows for misrepresentation.()()()()()() The level of taxation taken by a nation-state, rates of unemployment, mean household incomes and level of satisfaction with government and other economic factors all contribute to the likelihood of criminals to participate in tax evasion,( As most organised crime is perpetrated in the liminal state between legitimate and illegitimate markets, these economic factors must adjusted to ensure the optimal amount of taxation without promoting the practice of tax evasion.() As with any other crime, technological advancements have made the commission of tax evasion easier, faster and more globalised. The ability for organised criminals to operate fraudulent financial accounts, utilise illicit bank accounts, access havens or shelters,() and operating goods smuggling synidactes to evade importation taxes help ensure financial sustainability, security from law enforcement, general anonymity and the continuation of their operations.CybercrimeInternet fraudIdentity theft is a form of fraud or cheating of another persons identity in which someone pretends to be someone else by assuming that persons identity, typically in order to access resources or obtain credit and other benefits in that persons name. Victims of identity theft (those whose identity has been assumed by the identity thief) can suffer adverse consequences if held accountable for the perpetrators actions, as can organizations and individuals who are defrauded by the identity thief, and to that extent are also victims. Internet fraud refers to the actual use of Internet services to present fraudulent solicitations to prospective victims, to conduct fraudulent transactions, or to transmit the proceeds of fraud to financial institutions or to others connected with the scheme. In the context of organised crime, both may serve as means through which other criminal activity may be successfully perpetrated or as the primary goal themselves. fraud, fraud, scams, scams, and other phishing scams are the most common and most widely used forms of identity theft,() though with the advent of social networking fake websites, accounts and other fraudulent or deceitful activity has become commonplace.Copyright infringementCopyright infringement is the unauthorized or prohibited use of works under copyright, infringing the copyright holders rights, such as the right to reproduce or perform the copyrighted work, or to make works. Whilst almost universally considered under procedure, the impact and intent of organised criminal operations in this area of crime has been the subject of much debate. Article 61 of the on Trade-Related Aspects of Intellectual Property Rights (TRIPs) requires that signatory countries establish criminal procedures and penalties in cases of willful trademark counterfeiting or copyright piracy on a commercial scale. More recently copyright holders have demanded that states provide criminal sanctions for all types of copyright infringement.() Organised criminal groups capitalise on consumer complicity, advancements in security and anonymity technology, emerging markets and new methods of product transmission, and the consistent nature of these provides a stable financial basis for other areas of organised crime.CyberwarfareCyberwarfare refers to politically motivated hacking to conduct sabotage and espionage.  It is a form of warfare sometimes seen as analogous to warfare(DOD - Cyberspace) although this analogy is controversial for both its accuracy and its political motivation. It has been defined as activities by a nation-state to penetrate another nations computers or networks with the intention of causing civil damage or disruption.(Clarke, Richard A. Cyber War, HarperCollins (2010)) Moreover it acts as the fifth domain of warfare,(Cyberwar: War in the Fifth Domain Economist, July 1, 2010) and J. Lynn, U.S. Deputy of Defense, states that as a doctrinal matter, Pentagon has formally recognized cyberspace as a new domain in warfare . . . which has become just as critical to military operations as land, sea, air, and space.(Lynn, William J. III. Defending a New Domain: The Pentagons Cyberstrategy, Foreign Affairs, Sept/Oct. 2010, pp. 97-108) Cyber espionage is the practice of obtaining confidential, sensitive, proprietary or classified information from individuals, competitors, groups, or governments using illegal exploitation methods on internet, networks, software and/or computers. There is also a clear military, political, or economic motivation. Unsecured information may be intercepted and modified, making espionage possible internationally. The recently established Command is currently debating whether such activities as commercial espionage or theft of intellectual property are criminal activities or actual breaches of national security.( Furtermore, military activities that use computers and satellites for coordination are at risk of equipment disruption. Orders and communications can be intercepted or replaced.  Power, water, fuel, communications, and transportation infrastructure all may be vulnerable to sabotage. According to Clarke, the civilian realm is also at risk, noting that the security breaches have already gone beyond stolen credit card numbers, and that potential targets can also include the electric power grid, trains, or the stock market.(Clarke: More defense needed in cyberspace HometownAnnapolis.com, Sept. 24, 2010)Computer virusesThe term computer virus may be used as an overarching phrase to include all types of true viruses, malware, including worms, Trojan horses, most rootkits, spyware, dishonest adware and other malicious and unwanted software (though all are technically unique),() and proves to be quite financially lucrative for criminal organisations,() offering greater opportunities for fraud and extortion whilst increasing security, secrecy and anonymity.()  Worms may be utilised by organised crime groups to exploit security vulnerabilities (duplicating itself automatically across other computers a given network),()  while a Trojan horse is a program that appears harmless but hides malicious functions (such as retrieval of stored confidential data, corruption of information, or interception of transmissions). Worms and Trojan horses, like viruses, may harm a computer systems data or performance. Applying the Internet model of organised crime, the proliferation of computer viruses and other malicious software promotes a sense of detachment between the perpetrator (whether that be the criminal organisation or another individual) and the victim; this may help to explain vast increases in cyber-crime such as these for the purpose of ideological crime or terrorism.() In mid July 2010, security experts discovered a malicious software program that had infiltrated factory computers and had spread to plants around the world. It is considered the first attack on critical industrial infrastructure that sits at the foundation of modern economies, notes the New York Times.(Malware Hits Computerized Industrial Equipment New York Times, Sept. 24, 2010)White-collar crime and corruptionPolitical corruptionPolitical corruption is the use of legislated powers by government officials for illegitimate private gain. Misuse of government power for other purposes, such as repression of political opponents and general brutality, is not considered political corruption. Neither are illegal acts by private persons or corporations not directly involved with the government. An illegal act by an officeholder constitutes political corruption only if the act is directly related to their official duties. Forms of corruption vary, but include bribery, extortion, cronyism, nepotism, patronage, graft, and embezzlement. While corruption may facilitate criminal enterprise such as trafficking, laundering, and trafficking, it is not restricted to these activities. The activities that constitute illegal corruption differ depending on the country or jurisdiction. For instance, certain political funding practices that are legal in one place may be illegal in another. In some cases, government officials have broad or poorly defined powers, which make it difficult to distinguish between legal and illegal actions. Worldwide, bribery alone is estimated to involve over 1 trillion US dollars annually.(African corruption on the wane, 10 July 2007, News) A state of unrestrained political corruption is known as a kleptocracy, literally meaning rule by thieves.Corporate crimeCorporate crime refers to crimes committed either by a corporation (i.e., a entity having a separate legal personality from the persons that manage its activities), or by individuals that may be identified with a corporation or other business entity (see vicarious liability and liability). Note that some forms of corporate corruption may not actually be criminal if they are not specifically illegal under a given system of laws. For example, some jurisdictions allow trading.Drug traffickingHeroin: Source countries / production: three major regions known as the golden triangle (Burma, Laos, Thailand), golden crescent (Afghanistan) and Central and South America. There are suggestions that due to the continuing decline in opium production in South East Asia, traffickers may begin to look to Afghanistan as a source of heroin.()Human traffickingSex traffickingtrafficking for the purpose of sexual exploitation is a major cause of contemporary sexual slavery and is primarily for prostituting women and children into sex industries.() Sexual slavery encompasses most, if not all, forms of forced prostitution.(Trafficking in Persons: Global Patterns, the 2006 UNODC Anti-Human Trafficking Unit report) The terms prostitution or enforced prostitution appear in international and humanitarian conventions but have been insufficiently understood and inconsistently applied. Forced prostitution generally refers to conditions of control over a person who is coerced by another to engage in sexual activity.() Official numbers of individuals in sexual slavery worldwide vary. In 2001 Organization for Migration estimated 400,000, the Bureau of Investigation estimated 700,000 and UNICEF estimated 1.75 million.(Sex Slaves: Estimating Numbers, Broadcasting System Frontline fact site.) The most common destinations for victims of human trafficking are Thailand, Japan, Israel, Belgium, the Netherlands, Germany, Italy, Turkey and the US, according to a report by UNODC.()Illegal Immigration and People smuggling (Migrant Trafficking)See (gang), CoyotajePeople smuggling is defined as the facilitation, transportation, attempted transportation or illegal entry of a person or persons across an international border, in violation of one or more countries laws, either clandestinely or through deception, such as the use of fraudulent documents.(US Department of State) The term is understood as and often used interchangeably with migrant smuggling, which is defined by the United Nations Convention Against Transnational Organized Crime as ...the procurement, in order to obtain, directly or indirectly, a financial or other material benefit, of the illegal entry of a person into a state party of which the person is not a national.(United Nations Office on Drugs and Crime) This practice has increased over the past few decades and today now accounts for a significant portion of illegal immigration in countries around the world. People smuggling generally takes place with the consent of the person or persons being smuggled, and common reasons for individuals seeking to be smuggled include employment and economic opportunity, personal and/or familial betterment, and escape from persecution or conflict.Contemporary slavery and unfree labour (Labour Racketeering)The number of slaves today remains as high as 12 million() to 27 million,()()() though this is probably the smallest proportion of the worlds population in history.(Slavery is not dead, just less recognizable.) Most are debt slaves, largely in Asia, who are under bondage incurred by lenders, sometimes even for generations.() It is the fastest growing criminal industry and is predicted to eventually outgrow drug trafficking.(() Labour racketeering has developed since the 1930s, effecting national and international construction, mining, energy production and transportation()  sectors immensely.() Activity has focused on the importation of cheap or labour, involvement with union and public officials (corruption), and counterfeiting.()Legislative frameworks and policing measures;International* against Transnational Organized Crime (the Palermo Convention) - the international treaty against organized crime; includes the to Prevent, Suppress and Punish Trafficking in Persons, especially Women and Children and the against the Smuggling of Migrants by Land, Sea and Air;United States* Federal Anti-Racketeering Act (the Hobbs Act) 1946* Wire Act 1961* Secrecy Act 1970* Crime Control Act 1970* 21 of the United States Code 1970* Criminal Enterprise (contemporary)* Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations Act (the RICO Act) 1970* Laundering Control Act 1986* States Patriot Act 2001* Enforcement and Recovery Act of 2009;United Kingdom* Serious Organised Crime and Police Act 2005;Canada* Code of Canada 1985;India* Control of Organised Crime Act;Italy*41-bis prison regimeSee also* market* family* in Italy* tattoos* Cartel* Gang* criminal enterprise* Informant* organized crime* crime in Australia* crime in California* crime in Chicago* crime in China* crime in Hong Kong* crime in Italy* crime in Japan* crime in Korea* crime in Minneapolis* crime in Pakistan* motorcycle gangs* Piracy* gang* organised crime in Israel* Terrorism* financing* of organized crime* Tocsearch (dynamic database)* organized crime* Uncover* States Federal Witness Protection Program* Vendetta* tapping;Activities:* trafficking* theft* Assassination* fraud* shop* smuggling* crime* killing* infringement* Counterfeiting* trafficking* Extortion* trafficking* theft* gambling* immigration* laundering* smuggling* Prostitution* retail crime* Racket* running* crime;Lists:* gangs (1950s-1960s)* of American Old West outlaws* of bank robbers and robberies* of Chinese criminal organizations* of confidence tricks* of crime bosses* of criminal enterprises, gangs and syndicates* of Depression-era outlaws* of designated terrorist organizations* of Mafia crime families* of pirates* of real-life con artists;US specific:* of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms, and Explosives (ATF)* Enforcement Administration (DEA)* Bureau of Investigation (FBI)* and Customs Enforcement (ICE)* Criminal Investigation Division* States Marshals Service* States Secret Service;News:* crime and corruption reporting projectFootnotesExternal links* Mob Life: Gangster Kings of Crime - slideshow by magazine* UNODC - United Nations Office on Drugs and Crime  Sub-section dealing with organized crime worldwide*Organized Crime. Oxford Bibliographies Online: Criminology.hon-chokriminalzloinkriminalitetKriminalittkuritegevusorganizadoorganiskriminalorganizzatanusikalstamumasbnzsmisdaadja:kriminalitetzorganizowanaorganizadoorganizatkriminalecrime(skupina)kriminalkriminalrikollisuusbrottslighetsuphm c t chczh:
23195
Petroleum
File:Oil Reserves.png|thumb|400px|right|Proven world reserves, 2009File:Oil well.jpg|thumb|Pumpjack pumping an oil well near Texas.Petroleum (L. petroleum, from  (rock) +  (oil)(Petroleum. Oxford English Dictionary)) or crude oil is a naturally occurring, liquid consisting of a complex mixture of hydrocarbons of various molecular weights and other liquid compounds, that are found in geologic formations beneath the Earths surface. Petroleum is recovered mostly through drilling. This latter stage comes after the studies of structural geology (at the reservoir scale), sedimentary basin analysis, reservoir characterization (mainly in terms of porosity and permeable structures).()() It is refined and separated, most easily by point, into a large number of consumer products, from petrol and kerosene to asphalt and chemical reagents used to make plastics and pharmaceuticals.() Petroleum is used in manufacturing a wide variety of materials.()EtymologyThe term petroleum was found (in the spelling petraoleum) in 10th-century Old English sources.(Oxford English Dictionary online edition, entry petroleum)  It was used in the treatise De Natura Fossilium, published in 1546 by the German mineralogist Bauer, also known as Georgius Agricola.(Bauer (1546))  In the 19th century, the term petroleum was frequently used to refer to mineral oils produced by distillation from mined organic solids such as coal (and later shale), and refined oils produced from them; in the United Kingdom, storage (and later transport) of these oils were regulated by a series of Petroleum Acts, from the Petroleum Act 1862 c. 66 onward.CompositionIn its strictest sense, petroleum includes only crude oil, but in common usage it includes all liquid, gaseous, and solid (e.g., paraffin) hydrocarbons. Under surface pressure and temperature conditions, lighter hydrocarbons methane, ethane, propane and butane occur as gases, while pentane and heavier ones are in the form of liquids or solids. However, in an underground reservoir the proportions of gas, liquid, and solid depend on subsurface conditions and on the diagram of the petroleum mixture.(Hyne (2001), pp. 14.)An well produces predominantly crude oil, with some natural gas dissolved in it. Because the pressure is lower at the surface than underground, some of the gas will come out of solution and be recovered (or  burned) as associated gas or solution gas. A well produces predominantly natural gas. However, because the underground temperature and pressure are higher than at the surface, the gas may contain heavier hydrocarbons such as pentane, hexane, and heptane in the state. At surface conditions these will condense out of the gas to form gas condensate, often shortened to condensate. Condensate resembles petrol in appearance and is similar in composition to some volatile crude oils.The proportion of light hydrocarbons in the petroleum mixture varies greatly among different fields, ranging from as much as 97% by weight in the lighter oils to as little as 50% in the heavier oils and bitumens.The hydrocarbons in crude oil are mostly alkanes, cycloalkanes and various hydrocarbons while the other organic compounds contain nitrogen, oxygen and sulfur, and trace amounts of metals such as iron, nickel, copper and vanadium. The exact molecular composition varies widely from formation to formation but the proportion of elements vary over fairly narrow limits as follows:(Speight (1999), p. 215216.){| class  wikitable|+ Composition by weight|-! Element !! Percent range|-|Carbon || 83 to 87%|-|Hydrogen || 10 to 14%|-|Nitrogen || 0.1 to 2%|-|Oxygen || 0.05 to 1.5%|-|Sulfur || 0.05 to 6.0%|-|Metals || 3 (1.2 trillion (short scale) barrels) without oil sands,() or 595 km3 (3.74 trillion barrels) with oil sands.()  Consumption is currently around  per day, or 4.9 km3 per year. Which in turn yields a remaining oil supply of only about 120 years, if current demand remain static.ChemistryFile:Octane molecule 3D model.png|thumb|Octane, a hydrocarbon found in petroleum. Lines represent bonds; black spheres represent carbon; white spheres represent hydrogen.Petroleum is a mixture of a very large number of different hydrocarbons; the most commonly found molecules are alkanes (linear or branched), cycloalkanes, hydrocarbons, or more complicated chemicals like asphaltenes. Each petroleum variety has a unique mix of molecules, which define its physical and chemical properties, like color and viscosity.The alkanes, also known as paraffins, are saturated hydrocarbons with straight or branched chains which contain only carbon and hydrogen and have the general formula CnH2n+2. They generally have from 5 to 40 carbon atoms per molecule, although trace amounts of shorter or longer molecules may be present in the mixture.The alkanes from pentane (C5H12) to octane (C8H18) are  refined into petrol, the ones from nonane (C9H20) to hexadecane (C16H34) into fuel, kerosene and fuel). Alkanes with more than 16 carbon atoms can be refined into oil and oil. At the heavier end of the range, wax is an alkane with approximately 25 carbon atoms, while asphalt has 35 and up, although these are usually cracked by modern refineries into more valuable products. The shortest molecules, those with four or fewer carbon atoms, are in a gaseous state at room temperature. They are the petroleum gases. Depending on demand and the cost of recovery, these gases are either flared off, sold as liquified petroleum gas under pressure, or used to power the refinerys own burners. During the winter, Butane (C4H10), is blended into the petrol pool at high rates, because butanes high vapor pressure assists with cold starts. Liquified under pressure slightly above atmospheric, it is best known for powering cigarette lighters, but it is also a main fuel source for many developing countries. Propane can be liquified under modest pressure, and is consumed for just about every application relying on petroleum for energy, from cooking to heating to transportation.The cycloalkanes, also known as naphthenes, are saturated hydrocarbons which have one or more carbon rings to which hydrogen atoms are attached according to the formula CnH2n. Cycloalkanes have similar properties to alkanes but have higher boiling points.The aromatic hydrocarbons are unsaturated hydrocarbons which have one or more planar six-carbon rings called rings, to which hydrogen atoms are attached with the formula CnHn. They tend to burn with a sooty flame, and many have a sweet aroma. Some are carcinogenic.These different molecules are separated by distillation at an oil refinery to produce petrol, jet fuel, kerosene, and other hydrocarbons. For example, 2,2,4-Trimethylpentane (isooctane), widely used in petrol, has a chemical formula of C8H18 and it reacts with oxygen exothermically:():2 (l) + 25 (g)  16 (g) + 18 (g) + 10.86 MJ/mol (of octane)The amount of various molecules in an oil sample can be determined in laboratory. The molecules are typically extracted in a solvent, then separated in a chromatograph, and finally determined with a suitable detector, such as a ionization detector or a spectrometer.(Use of ozone depleting substances in laboratories. TemaNord 2003:516.) Due to the large number of co-eluted hydrocarbons within oil, many cannot be resolved by traditional gas chromatography and typically appear as a hump in the chromatogram. This complex mixture (UCM) of hydrocarbons is particularly apparent when analysing weathered oils and extracts from tissues of organisms exposed to oil.Incomplete combustion of petroleum or petrol results in production of toxic byproducts. Too little oxygen results in monoxide. Due to the high temperatures and high pressures involved, exhaust gases from petrol combustion in car engines usually include oxides which are responsible for creation of smog.Empirical equations for the thermal properties of petroleum productsHeat of combustionAt a constant volume the heat of combustion of a petroleum product can be approximated as follows::Q_v  12,400 - 2,100d^2where Q_v is measured in cal/gram and d is the specific gravity at .Thermal conductivityThe thermal conductivity of petroleum based liquids can be modeled as follows::K  \frac{0.813}{d}1-0.0203(t-32)0.547where K is measured in BTUhr1ft2 , t is measured in F and d is the specific gravity at .Specific heatThe specific heat of a petroleum oils can be modeled as follows::c  \frac{1}{\sqrt{d}} 0.388+0.00045t,where c is measured in BTU/lbm-F, t is the temperature in Fahrenheit and d is the specific gravity at .In units of kcal/(kgC), the formula is::\frac{1}{\sqrt{d}} 0.402+0.00081t,where the temperature t is in Celsius and d is the specific gravity at 15 C.Latent heat of vaporizationThe latent heat of vaporization can be modeled under atmospheric conditions as follows::L  \frac{1}{d}- 0.09t,where L is measured in BTU/lbm, t is measured in F and d is the specific gravity at .In units of kcal/kg, the formula is::L  \frac{1}{d}- 0.162t,where the temperature t is in Celsius and d is the specific gravity at 15 C.(United States Bureau of Standards, Thermal Properties of Petroleum Products.  Miscellaneous Publication No. 97, November 9th, 1929.)FormationFile:Treibs&Chlorophyll.png|thumb|350 px|right|Structure of vanadium porphyrin compound extracted from petroleum by E. Treibs, father of geochemistry. Treibs noted the close structural similarity of this molecule and a.Petroleum is a fuel derived from ancient fossilized materials, such as zooplankton and algae.() Vast quantities of these remains settled to sea or lake bottoms, mixing with sediments and being buried under anoxic conditions. As further layers settled to the sea or lake bed, intense heat and pressure built up in the lower regions. This process caused the organic matter to change, first into a waxy material known as kerogen, which is found in various shales around the world, and then with more heat into liquid and gaseous hydrocarbons via a process known as catagenesis. Formation of petroleum occurs from hydrocarbon pyrolysis in a variety of mainly endothermic reactions at high temperature and/or pressure.()There were certain warm nutrient-rich environments such as the of Mexico and the ancient Sea where the large amounts of organic material falling to the ocean floor exceeded the rate at which it could decompose. This resulted in large masses of organic material being buried under subsequent deposits such as shale formed from mud. This massive organic deposit later became heated and transformed under pressure into oil.()Geologists often refer to the temperature range in which oil forms as an oil window()below the minimum temperature oil remains trapped in the form of kerogen, and above the maximum temperature the oil is converted to gas through the process of cracking.  Sometimes, oil formed at extreme depths may migrate and become trapped at a much shallower level. The Oil Sands is one example of this. Abiogenic origin hypothesis A small number of geologists adhere to the petroleum origin hypothesis, maintaining that high molecular weight hydrocarbons of purely inorganic origin exist within Earths interior and are the source for major petroleum deposits. The hypothesis was originally proposed by Kudryavtsev and Porfiriev in the 1950s, and more recently Gold proposed a similar deep hot biosphere idea. The thermodynamic synthesis routes necessary to carry abiogenic source material into subsurface oil are not established, observation of organic markers in kerogen and oil is not explained, and no oil deposits have been located by this hypothesis.()Crude oilCrude oil reservoirsThree conditions must be present for oil reservoirs to form: a rock rich in hydrocarbon material buried deep enough for subterranean heat to cook it into oil; a porous and permeable reservoir rock for it to accumulate in; and a cap rock (seal) or other mechanism that prevents it from escaping to the surface. Within these reservoirs, fluids will typically organize themselves like a three-layer cake with a layer of water below the oil layer and a layer of gas above it, although the different layers vary in size between reservoirs. Because most hydrocarbons are lighter than rock or water, they often migrate upward through adjacent rock layers until either reaching the surface or becoming trapped within porous rocks (known as reservoirs) by impermeable rocks above. However, the process is influenced by underground water flows, causing oil to migrate hundreds of kilometres horizontally or even short distances downward before becoming trapped in a reservoir. When hydrocarbons are concentrated in a trap, an field forms, from which the liquid can be extracted by drilling and pumping.The reactions that produce oil and natural gas are often modeled as first order breakdown reactions, where hydrocarbons are broken down to oil and natural gas by a set of parallel reactions, and oil eventually breaks down to natural gas by another set of reactions. The latter set is regularly used in petrochemical plants and refineries.Wells are drilled into oil reservoirs to extract the crude oil. Natural lift production methods that rely on the natural reservoir pressure to force the oil to the surface are usually sufficient for a while after reservoirs are first tapped. In some reservoirs, such as in the Middle East, the natural pressure is sufficient over a long time. The natural pressure in many reservoirs, however, eventually dissipates. Then the oil must be pumped out using artificial lift created by mechanical pumps powered by gas or electricity. Over time, these primary methods become less effective and secondary production methods may be used. A common secondary method is waterflood or injection of water into the reservoir to increase pressure and force the oil to the drilled shaft or wellbore. Eventually tertiary or enhanced oil recovery methods may be used to increase the oils flow characteristics by injecting steam, carbon dioxide and other gases or chemicals into the reservoir. In the United States, primary production methods account for less than 40% of the oil produced on a daily basis, secondary methods account for about half, and tertiary recovery the remaining 10%. Extracting oil (or bitumen) from oil/tar sand and oil shale deposits requires mining the sand or shale and heating it in a vessel or retort, or using in-situ methods of injecting heated liquids into the deposit and then pumping out the oil-saturated liquid.Unconventional oil reservoirsOil-eating bacteria biodegrade oil that has escaped to the surface. sands are reservoirs of partially biodegraded oil still in the process of escaping and being biodegraded, but they contain so much migrating oil that, although most of it has escaped, vast amounts are still presentmore than can be found in conventional oil reservoirs. The lighter fractions of the crude oil are destroyed first, resulting in reservoirs containing an extremely heavy form of crude oil, called crude bitumen in Canada, or extra-heavy crude oil in Venezuela. These two countries have the worlds largest deposits of oil sands.On the other hand, shales are source rocks that have not been exposed to heat or pressure long enough to convert their trapped hydrocarbons into crude oil. Technically speaking, oil shales are not always shales and do not contain oil, but are fined-grain sedimentary rocks containing an insoluble organic solid called kerogen. The kerogen in the rock can be converted into crude oil using heat and pressure to simulate natural processes. The method has been known for centuries and was patented in 1694 under British Crown Patent No. 330 covering, A way to extract and make great quantityes of pitch, tarr, and oyle out of a sort of stone. Although oil shales are found in many countries, the United States has the worlds largest deposits.()ClassificationThe industry generally classifies crude oil by the geographic location it is produced in (e.g. Texas Intermediate, Brent, or Oman), its gravity (an oil industry measure of density), and its sulfur content. Crude oil may be considered light if it has low density or heavy if it has high density; and it may be referred to as sweet if it contains relatively little sulfur or sour if it contains substantial amounts of sulfur.The geographic location is important because it affects transportation costs to the refinery. Light crude oil is more desirable than heavy oil since it produces a higher yield of petrol, while sweet oil commands a higher price than sour oil because it has fewer environmental problems and requires less refining to meet sulfur standards imposed on fuels in consuming countries. Each crude oil has unique molecular characteristics which are understood by the use of crude oil assay analysis in petroleum laboratories.Barrels from an area in which the crude oils molecular characteristics have been determined and the oil has been classified are used as pricing references throughout the world.  Some of the common reference crudes are:*Texas Intermediate (WTI), a very high-quality, sweet, light oil delivered at Oklahoma for North American oil*Brent Blend, comprising 15 oils from fields in the Brent and Ninian systems in the Shetland Basin of the Sea. The oil is landed at Voe terminal in Shetland.  Oil production from Europe, Africa and Middle Eastern oil flowing West tends to be priced off this oil, which forms a benchmark*Dubai-Oman, used as benchmark for Middle East sour crude oil flowing to the Asia-Pacific region*Tapis (from Malaysia, used as a reference for light Far East oil)*Minas (from Indonesia, used as a reference for heavy Far East oil)*The Reference Basket, a weighted average of oil blends from various OPEC (The Organization of the Petroleum Exporting Countries) countries*Midway Sunset Heavy, by which heavy oil in California is priced ()There are declining amounts of these benchmark oils being produced each year, so other oils are more commonly what is actually delivered. While the reference price may be for West Texas Intermediate delivered at Cushing, the actual oil being traded may be a discounted Canadian heavy oil delivered at Alberta, and for a Brent Blend delivered at Shetland, it may be a Russian Export Blend delivered at the port of Primorsk.()Petroleum industryFile:WTI price 96 09.svg|thumb|York Mercantile Exchange prices for West Texas Intermediate 19962009The petroleum industry is involved in the global processes of exploration, extraction, refining, transporting (often with tankers and pipelines), and marketing petroleum products. The largest volume products of the industry are oil and petrol . Petroleum is also the raw material for many chemical products, including pharmaceuticals, solvents, fertilizers, pesticides, and plastics.  The industry is usually divided into three major components: upstream, midstream and downstream.  Midstream operations are usually included in the downstream category.Petroleum is vital to many industries, and is of importance to the maintenance of industrialized civilization itself, and thus is critical concern to many nations. Oil accounts for a large percentage of the worlds energy consumption, ranging from a low of 32% for Europe and Asia, up to a high of 53% for the East.  Other geographic regions consumption patterns are as follows: South and America (44%), Africa (41%), and America (40%).  The world at large consumes 30 billion barrels (4.8 km) of oil per year, and the top oil consumers largely consist of developed nations.  In fact, 24% of the oil consumed in 2004 went to the States alone,()  though by 2007 this had dropped to 21% of world oil consumed.()In the US, in the states of Arizona, California, Hawaii, Nevada, Oregon and Washington, the States Petroleum Association (WSPA) represents companies responsible for producing, distributing, refining, transporting and marketing petroleum. This non-profit trade association was founded in 1907, and is the oldest petroleum trade association in the United States.()HistoryFile:Gusher Okemah OK 1922.jpg|thumb|Oil derrick in Oklahoma, 1922.Petroleum, in one form or another, has been used since ancient times, and is now important across society, including in economy, politics and technology. The rise in importance was mostly due to the invention of the combustion engine, the rise in aviation and the increasing use of plastic.More than 4000 years ago, according to Herodotus and Siculus, asphalt was used in the construction of the walls and towers of Babylon; there were oil pits near Ardericca (near Babylon), and a pitch spring on Zacynthus.() Great quantities of it were found on the banks of the river Issus, one of the tributaries of the Euphrates. Ancient Persian tablets indicate the medicinal and lighting uses of petroleum in the upper levels of their society. By 347 AD, oil was produced from bamboo-drilled wells in China.(George E. Totten ASTM Timeline)In the 1850s, the process to distill kerosene from petroleum was invented by ukasiewicz, providing a cheaper alternative to oil. The demand for the petroleum as a fuel for lighting in North America and around the world quickly grew.(Maugeri (2006), p. 3) The worlds first commercial oil well was drilled in Poland in 1853. Oil exploration developed in many parts of the world with the Russian Empire, particularly the Branobel company in Azerbaijan (Asias first modern borehole oil production began in 1848 at the Bibi-Heybat field near Baku), taking the lead in production by the end of the 19th century.(Akiner(2004), p. 5) Access to oil was and still is a major factor in several military conflicts of the twentieth century, including War II, during which oil facilities were a major strategic asset and were extensively bombed.(Hanson Baldwin, 1959, Oil Strategy in World War II, American Petroleum Institute Quarterly  Centennial Issue, pages 10-11. American Petroleum Institute.) Barbarossa included the goal to capture the Baku oilfields, as it would provide much needed oil-supplies for the German military which was suffering from blockades.(Baku: City that Oil Built ) Oil exploration in North America during the early 20th century later led to the U.S. becoming the leading producer by the mid 1900s. As petroleum production in the U.S. peaked during the 1960s, however, the United States was surpassed by Saudi Arabia and Russia.Today, about 90% of vehicular fuel needs are met by oil. Petroleum also makes up 40% of total energy consumption in the States, but is responsible for only 1% of electricity generation. Petroleums worth as a portable, dense energy source powering the vast majority of vehicles and as the base of many industrial chemicals makes it one of the worlds most important commodities. Viability of the oil commodity is controlled by several key parameters, number of vehicles in the world competing for fuel, quantity of oil exported to the world market (Land Model), Energy Gain (economically useful energy provided minus energy consumed), political stability of oil exporting nations and ability to defend oil supply lines.The top three oil producing countries are Arabia, Russia, and the States.()  About 80% of the worlds readily accessible reserves are located in the East, with 62.5% coming from the Arab 5: Arabia, UAE, Iraq, Qatar and Kuwait.  A large portion of the worlds total oil exists as unconventional sources, such as bitumen in Canada and Venezuela and shale.  While significant volumes of oil are extracted from oil sands, particularly in Canada, logistical and technical hurdles remain, as oil extraction requires large amounts of heat and water, making its net energy content quite low relative to conventional crude oil. Thus, Canadas oil sands are not expected to provide more than a few million barrels per day in the foreseeable future.Conventional crude oil production, those having Net Energy Gain above 10 stopped growing in 2005 at about . The Energy Agencys (IEA) 2010 World Energy Outlook estimated that conventional crude oil production has peaked and is depleting at 6.8% per year. Joint Forces Commands Joint Operating Environment 2010 issued this warning to all US military commands By 2012, surplus oil production capacity could entirely disappear, and as early as 2015, the shortfall in output could reach nearly 10 million barrels per day.PriceAfter the collapse of the OPEC-administered pricing system in 1985, and a short lived experiment with netback pricing, oil-exporting countries adopted a market-linked pricing mechanism.(Mabro (2006), p. 351.) First adopted by PEMEX in 1986, market-linked pricing was widely accepted, and by 1988 became and still is the main method for pricing crude oil in international trade.( The current reference, or pricing markers, are Brent, WTI, and Dubai/Oman.(UsesThe chemical structure of petroleum is heterogeneous, composed of hydrocarbon chains of different lengths. Because of this, petroleum may be taken to oil refineries and the hydrocarbon chemicals separated by distillation and treated by other processes, to be used for a variety of purposes.  See products.FuelsThe most common distillation fractions of petroleum are fuels.Fuels include (by increasing boiling temperature range):(Speight (1999), p. 543.)Other derivativesCertain types of resultant hydrocarbons may be mixed with other non-hydrocarbons, to create other end products:*Alkenes (olefins) which can be manufactured into plastics or other compounds*Lubricants (produces light machine oils, oils, and greases, adding viscosity stabilizers as required).*Wax, used in the packaging of foods, among others.*Sulfur or acid. These are a useful industrial materials.  Sulfuric acid is usually prepared as the acid precursor oleum, a byproduct of sulfur removal from fuels.*Bulk tar.*Asphalt*coke, used in speciality carbon products or as solid fuel.*wax*Aromatic petrochemicals to be used as precursors in other chemical production.AgricultureSince the 1940s, agricultural productivity has increased dramatically, due largely to the increased use of energy-intensive mechanization, fertilizers and pesticides. Nearly all pesticides and many fertilizers are made from oil.(World oil supplies are set to run out faster than expected, warn scientists. The Independent. June 14, 2007.)Petroleum by countryConsumption statisticsFile:Global Carbon Emissions.svg|Global fossil carbon emissions, an indicator of consumption, for 18002007. Total is black, Oil is in blue.File:TPES outlook.jpg|EIA Primary Energy Outlook (retrieved on 2011-06)File:Oil consumption per day by region from 1980 to 2006.svg|daily oil consumption from 1980 to 2006File:Oil consumption per day by region from 1980 to 2006 solid3.svg|oil consumption by percentage of total per region from 1980 to 2006: redUSA, blueEurope, yellowAsia+OceaniaConsumptionThis table orders the amount of petroleum consumed in 2008 in thousand barrels (bbl) per day and in thousand cubic metres (m3) per day:(U.S. Energy Information Administration. Excel file from this web page. Table Posted: March 1, 2010)(From DSW-Datareport 2008 (Deutsche Stiftung Weltbevlkerung))(One cubic metre of oil is equivalent to 6.28981077 barrels of oil){| styletext-align:right; classwikitable sortable|-!Consuming Nation 2008!(1000 bbl/day)!(1000 m3/day)!population in millions!bbl/year per capita!m3/year per capita|-||States 1 ||  || 314|disptable|-||China ||  || 1345|disptable|-||Japan 2 ||  || 127|disptable|-||India 2 ||  || 1198|disptable|-||Russia 1 ||  || 140|disptable|-||Germany 2 ||  || 82|disptable|-||Brazil ||  || 193|disptable|-||Arabia (OPEC) ||  || 25|disptable|-||Canada ||  || 33|disptable|-||Korea 2 ||  || 48|disptable|-||Mexico 1 ||  || 109|disptable|-||France 2||  || 62|disptable|-||Iran (OPEC)||  || 74|disptable|-||Kingdom 1 ||  || 61|disptable|-||Italy 2||  || 60|disptable|}Source: US Energy Information AdministrationPopulation Data:()1 peak production of oil already passed in this state2 This country is not a major oil producerProductionproducing countries map.png|thumb|center|550px|Oil producing countriesIn petroleum industry parlance, production refers to the quantity of crude extracted from reserves, not the literal creation of the product.Source: U.S. Energy Information Administration1 Peak production of conventional oil already passed in this state2 Although Canadian conventional oil production is declining, total oil production is increasing as oil sands production grows. If oil sands are included, it has the worlds second largest oil reserves after Saudi Arabia.3 Though still a member, Iraq has not been included in production figures since 1998ExportIn order of net exports in 2009 and 2006 in thousand bbl/d and thousand m/d:Source: US Energy Information Administration1 peak production already passed in this state2 Canadian statistics are complicated by the fact it is both an importer and exporter of crude oil, and refines large amounts of oil for the U.S. market. It is the leading source of U.S. imports of oil and products, averaging  in August 2007.http://tonto.eia.doe.gov/dnav/pet/pet_move_impcus_a2_nus_ep00_im0_mbblpd_m.htm.Total world production/consumption (as of 2005) is approximately .ImportIn order of net imports in 2009 and 2006 in thousand bbl/d and thousand m/d:Source: US Energy Information Administration1 peak production of oil already passed in this state2 Major oil producer whose production is still increasingNon-producing consumersCountries whose oil production is 10% or less of their consumption.Source:  CIA World FactbookEnvironmental effectsBecause petroleum is a naturally occurring substance, its presence in the environment need not be the result of human causes such as accidents and routine activities ( seismic exploration, drilling, extraction, refining and combustion). Phenomena such as seeps(http://seeps.wr.usgs.gov/ Natural Oil and Gas Seeps in California) and pits are examples of areas that petroleum naturally affects. Regardless of source, petroleums effects when released into the environment are similar.Global warmingWhen burned, petroleum releases carbon dioxide; a gas. Along with the burning of coal, petroleum combustion is the largest contributor to the increase in atmospheric CO2. Atmospheric CO2 has risen steadily since the revolution to current levels  of over 380ppmv, from the 180 - 300ppmv of the prior 800 thousand years, driving warming.(Historical trends in carbon dioxide concentrations and temperature, on a geological and recent time scale. (June 2007). In UNEP/GRID-Arendal Maps and Graphics Library. Retrieved 19:14, February 19, 2011.)(Deep ice tells long climate story. Retrieved 19:14, February 19, 2011.)(Mitchell, John F. B. (1989). THE GREENHOUSE EFFECT AND CLIMATE CHANGE. Reviews of Geophysics (American Geophysical Union) 27 (1): 115139. . http://astrosun2.astro.cornell.edu/academics/courses/astro202/Mitchell_GRL89.pdf. Retrieved February 19, 2011.)ExtractionOil extraction is simply the removal of oil from the reservoir (oil pool). Oil is often recovered as a water-in-oil emulsion, and specialty chemicals called demulsifiers are used to separate the oil from water.  Oil extraction is costly and sometimes environmentally damaging, although Dr. John Hunt of the Hole Oceanographic Institution pointed out in a 1981 paper that over 70% of the reserves in the world are associated with visible macroseepages, and many oil fields are found due to natural seeps. Offshore exploration and extraction of oil disturbs the surrounding marine environment.(Waste discharges during the offshore oil and gas activity by Stanislave Patin, tr. Elena Cascio)Oil spillsFile:PrestigeVolunteersInGaliciaCoast.jpg|thumb|Volunteers cleaning up the aftermath of the oil spillCrude oil and refined fuel spills from tanker ship accidents have damaged natural ecosystems in Alaska, the of Mexico, the Islands, France and many other places.The quantity of oil spilled  during accidents has ranged from a few hundred tons to several hundred thousand tons (e.g., Deepwater Horizon Oil Spill, Empress, Cadiz). Smaller spills have already proven to have a great impact on ecosystems, such as the Valdez oil spillOil spills at sea are generally much more damaging than those on land, since they can spread for hundreds of nautical miles in a thin slick which can cover beaches with a thin coating of oil. This can kill sea birds, mammals, shellfish and other organisms it coats. Oil spills on land are more readily containable if a makeshift earth dam can be rapidly bulldozed around the spill site before most of the oil escapes, and land animals can avoid the oil more easily.Control of oil spills is difficult, requires ad hoc methods, and often a large amount of manpower. The dropping of bombs and incendiary devices from aircraft on the Canyon wreck produced poor results;(Torrey Canyon bombing by the Navy and RAF) modern techniques would include pumping the oil from the wreck, like in the oil spill or the Erika oil spill.()Though crude oil is predominantly composed of various hydrocarbons, certain nitrogen heterocylic compounds, such as pyridine, picoline, and quinoline are reported as contaminants associated with crude oil, as well as facilities processing oil shale or coal, and have also been found at legacy wood treatment sites.  These compounds have a very high water solubility, and thus tend to dissolve and move with water.  Certain naturally occurring bacteria, such as Micrococcus, Arthrobacter, and Rhodococcus and have been shown to degrade these contaminants.(Sims, G. K. and E.J. OLoughlin.  1989. Degradation of pyridines in the environment.  CRC Critical Reviews in Environmental Control.  19(4): 309-340.)Degradation of underground tanks located at gas stations may also occur, significantly affecting soil and groundwater. In these instances of the biological degradation of petroleum hydrocarbons, solutions such as bioremediation may be used.TarballsA tarball is a blob of oil (not to be confused with tar, which is typically derived from pine trees rather than petroleum) which has been weathered after floating in the ocean. Tarballs are an aquatic pollutant in most environments, although they can occur naturally, for example, in the Santa Barbara Channel of California.(A. Y. Itah and J. P. Essien, Growth Profile and Hydrocarbonoclastic Potential of Microorganisms Isolated from Tarballs in the Bight of Bonny, Nigeria, World Journal of Microbiology and Biotechnology, Volume 21, Numbers 6-7, October, 2005, , p 1317-1322)(Frances D. Hostettler, Robert J. Rosenbauer, Thomas D. Lorenson, Jennifer Dougherty, Geochemical characterization of tarballs on beaches along the California coast. Part I-- Shallow seepage impacting the Santa Barbara Channel Islands, Santa Cruz, Santa Rosa and San Miguel, Organic Geochemistry, Volume 35, Issue 6, June 2004, Pages 725-746, ISSN 0146-6380, . http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/B6V7P-4C47JKF-3/2/138e858a8f538caf6c2a0482290c3e1f) Their concentration and features have been used to assess the extent of spills. Their composition can be used to identify their sources of origin,(Anthony H Knap, Kathryn A Burns, Rodger Dawson, Manfred Ehrhardt and Karsten H Palmork, Dissolved/dispersed hydrocarbons, tarballs and the surface microlayer: Experiences from an IOC/UNEP Workshop in Bermuda, December, 1984, Marine Pollution Bulletin, Volume 17, Issue 7, July 1986, Pages 313-319. )(Zhendi Wang, Merv Fingas, Michael Landriault, Lise Sigouin, Bill Castle, David Hostetter, Dachung Zhang, Brad Spencer, Identification and Linkage of Tarballs from the Coasts of Vancouver Island and Northern California Using GC/MS and Isotopic Techniques, Journal of High Resolution Chromatography, Volume 21 Issue 7, Pages 383395, ) and tarballs themselves may be dispersed over long distances by deep sea currents.( They are slowly decomposed by bacteria, including violaceum, resinae, submarinus, varians, aeruginosa, marina and estuari.(WhalesJames S. Robbins has argued that the advent of petroleum-refined kerosene saved some species of great whales from extinction by providing an inexpensive substitute for whale oil, thus eliminating the economic imperative for open-boat whaling.(How Capitalism Saved the Whales by James S. Robbins, The Freeman, August, 1992.)Alternatives to petroleumIn the United States in 2007 about 70% of petroleum was used for transportation (e.g. petrol, diesel, jet fuel), 24% by industry (e.g. production of plastics), 5% for residential and commercial uses, and 2% for electricity production.(U.S. Primary Energy Consumption by Source and Sector, 2007. Energy Information Administration)  Outside of the US, a higher proportion of petroleum tends to be used for electricity.(needtitle UN Energy Program)Alternatives to petroleum-based vehicle fuelsFile:Piracicaba 10 2008 151 Gast station selling four fuels.jpg|right|thumb|200px|Typical Brazilian fuel station with four fuels for sale: biodiesel (B3), gasohol (E25), neat ethanol (E100), and natural gas (CNG).fuel vehicles refers to both:*vehicles that use fuels used in standard or modified combustion engines such as gas vehicles, ethanol vehicles, vehicles, biodiesel-powered vehicles, and hydrogen vehicles.*vehicles with advanced propulsion systems that reduce or substitute petroleum use such as electric vehicles, hybrid electric vehicles, electric vehicles, and hydrogen cell vehicles.Alternatives to using oil in industryBiological feedstocks do exist for industrial uses such as Bioplastic production.(Bioprocessing Seattle Times (2003))Alternatives to burning petroleum for electricityIn oil producing countries with little refinery capacity, oil is sometimes burned to produce electricity.  energy technologies such as power, power, hydro, biomass and biofuels might someday be used to replace some of these generators, but today the primary alternatives remain large scale hydroelectricity, nuclear and coal-fired generation.Future of petroleum productionConsumption in the twentieth and twenty-first centuries has been abundantly pushed by automobile growth; the 1985-2003 oil glut even fuelled the sales of low economy vehicles in OECD countries. In 2008, the economic crisis seems to have some impact on the sales of such vehicles; still, the 2008 oil consumption shows a small increase. The BRIC countries might also kick in, as China briefly was the first automobile market in December 2009.() The immediate outlook still hints upwards.In the long term, uncertainties linger; the OPEC believes that the OECD countries will push low consumption  policies at some point in the future; when that happens, it will definitely curb the oil sales, and both OPEC and EIA kept lowering their 2020 consumption estimates during the past 5 years.() Oil products are more and more in competition with alternative sources, mainly coal and natural gas, both cheaper sources.Production will also face an increasingly complex situation; while OPEC countries still have large reserves at low production prices, newly found reservoirs often lead to higher prices; offshore giants such as Tupi, Guara and Tiber demand high investments and ever-increasing technological abilities. Subsalt reservoirs such as Tupi were unknown in the twentieth century, mainly because the industry was unable to probe them. Oil Recovery (EOR) techniques (example: DaQing, China () ) will continue to play a major role in increasing the worlds recoverable oil.Hubbert peak theoryThe Hubbert peak theory (also known as peak oil) posits that future petroleum production (whether for individual oil wells, entire oil fields, whole countries, or worldwide production) will eventually peak and then decline at a similar rate to the rate of increase before the peak as these reserves are exhausted.  The peak of oil discoveries was in 1965, and oil production per year has surpassed oil discoveries every year since 1980.()Hubbert applied his theory to predict the peak of U.S. oil production at a date between 1966 and 1970. This prediction was based on data available at the time of his publication in 1956.  In the same paper, Hubbert predicts world peak oil in half a century after his publication, which would be 2006.()It is difficult to predict the oil peak in any given region, due to the lack of knowledge and/or  transparency in accounting of global oil reserves.() The scientist and researchers from University argue that official figures are inflated because OPEC members over-reported reserves in the 1980s when competing for global market share.(Oil reserves exaggerated by one third. Telegraph. March 22, 2010.) Based on available production data, proponents have previously predicted the peak for the world to be in years 1989, 1995, or 1995-2000. Some of these predictions date from before the recession of the early 1980s, and the consequent reduction in global consumption, the effect of which was to delay the date of any peak by several years.  Just as the 1971 U.S. peak in oil production was only clearly recognized after the fact, a peak in world production will be difficult to discern until production clearly drops off.The Energy Agency (IEA) says production of conventional crude oil peaked in 2006.(Is Peak Oil Behind Us?. The New York Times. November 14, 2010)(Has the World Already Passed Peak Oil? . National Geographic News. November 9, 2010) Since virtually all economic sectors rely heavily on petroleum, peak oil could lead to a partial or complete failure of markets.(Military Study Warns of a Potentially Drastic Oil Crisis. Spiegel Online. September 1, 2010.)See also*of oil equivalent*oil ratio*of countries by proven oil reserves*of oil fields*of petroleum companies*synthetic crude oil*burden*geology*depolymerization*oil* SandsNotesReferences**year1546 translated 1955****External links**Petroleum Online e-Learning resource from IHRDC*U.S. Energy Information Administration**U.S. Department of Energy EIA  World supply and consumption**Who are the major players supplying the world oil market?*American Petroleum Institute  the trade association of the US oil industry.*http://www.iea.org/Textbase/stats/surveys/oilsurv.pdf Oil survey  OECD Energy Agency *Oil volume-weight and price converter*Oil and Gas Industry Learning Center  information on oil and gas processes*U.S. National Library of Medicine: Hazardous Substances Databank  Crude Oilaf:Ru-olieam:ar:an:Petrolioarc:ast:Petrleuaz:Neftbn:zh-min-nan:Chioh-iba:be:be-x-old:bs:Naftabg:ca:Petrolics:Ropacy:Petroliwmda:Roliede:Erdlbikahet:Naftael:es:Petrleoeo:Naftoeu:Petroliofa:fo:Oljafr:Ptrolegl:Petrleogan:ko:hy:hi:hr:Naftaio:Petrolobumiia:Petroleois:Hrolait:Petroliohe:patraka:kk:ya petroliku:Neftla:Petroleumlv:Naftalt:Naftaln:Pitljbo:ctilehu:Kolajml:arz:mzn:ms:Petroleummwl:Petrleonah:Chapopohtlinl:Aardolieja:no:Petroleumnn:Petroleumoc:Petrliuz:Neftpfl:Erdeelnaftowapt:Petrleoro:Petrolwiraru:sah:sq:Naftascn:Pitrliusimple:Petroleumsk:Ropasl:Naftasr:sh:Naftabumifi:Maaljysv:Petroleumta:tt:th:tr:Petroluk:ur:ug:vec:Petroliomwa:Petroleyi:bat-smg:Naptazh:
23431
History_of_Peru
The history of Peru spans several millennia, extending back through several stages of cultural development in the mountain region and the coastal desert. About 15,200 years ago, groups of people are believed to have crossed the Strait from Asia and survived as nomads, hunting, gathering fruits and vegetables and fishing in the sea, rivers and lakes. Peruvian territory was home to the Chico civilization, one of the six oldest in the world, and to the Empire, the largest state in Pre-Columbian America. It was conquered by the Empire in the 16th century, which established a Viceroyalty with jurisdiction over most of its South American domains. The nation declared independence from Spain in 1821 but consolidated only after the of Ayacucho, three years later.Pre-Columbian culturesHunting tools dating back to more than 11,000 years have been found in the caves in Pachacamac, Telarmachay, Junin and Lauricocha.(Historia del Peru, Lexus Origen de las Civilizaciones Andinas. p. 41.) Some of the oldest civilizations appeared circa 6000 BC in the coastal provinces of Chilca and Paracas, and in the highland province of de Huaylas. Over the following three thousand years, inhabitants switched from nomadic lifestyles to cultivating land, as evidence from sites such as Jiskairumoko, Kotosh, and Prieta demonstrates. Cultivation of plants such as corn and cotton (Gossypium barbadense) began, as well as the domestication of animals such as the wild ancestors of the llama, the alpaca, and the pig. Inhabitants practiced spinning and knitting of cotton and wool, basketry, and pottery.As these inhabitants became sedentary, farming allowed them to build settlements and new societies emerged along the coast and in the Andean mountains. The first known city in all of the Americas was Caral, located in the Valley 200 km north of Lima. It is the oldest city in America and was built in approximately 2500 BC.( What is left from the civilization, also called Chico, are about 30 pyramidical structures built up in receding terraces ending in a flat roof; some of them measured up to 20 meters in height. Caral is one of six world centers of the rise of civilization.(Charles C. Mann, Oldest Civilization in the Americas Revealed, Science, 7 January 2005, accessed 1 Nov 2010. Quote: Almost 5000 years ago, ancient Peruvians built monumental temples and pyramids in dry valleys near the coast, showing that urban society in the Americas is as old as the most ancient civilizations of the Old World.) In the early 21st century, archeologists have discovered new evidence of ancient pre-Ceramic complex cultures. In 2005 Tom D. Dillehay and his team announced the discovery of three irrigation canals that were 5400 years old, and a possible fourth that is 6700 years old, all in the Valley in northern Peru, evidence of community activity to support improved agriculture at a much earlier date than previously believed.(Nicholas Bakalar, Ancient Canals in Andes Reveal Early Agriculture, National Geographic News, 5 Dec 2005, accessed 1 Nov 2010) In 2006, Robert Benfer and a research team discovered a 4200-year-old observatory at Vista, a site in the Andes several kilometers north of present-day Lima. They believe the observatory was related to the societys reliance on agriculture and understanding the seasons. The site includes the oldest three-dimensional sculptures found thus far in South America.(Richard A. Lovett, Oldest Observatory in Americas Discovered in Peru, National Geographic News, 16 May 2006, accessed 1 Nov 2010) In 2007 the archeologist Alva and his team found a 4000-year-old temple with painted murals at Ventarrn, in the northwest Lambayeque region. The temple contained ceremonial offerings gained from exchange with Peruvian jungle societies, as well as those from the Ecuadoran coast.(Hearn, Kelly. Oldest Temple, Mural in the Americas Found in Peru, National Geographic, 12 Nov 2007, accessed 1 Nov 2010) Such finds show sophisticated, monumental construction requiring large-scale organization of labor, suggesting that hierarchical, complex cultures arose in South America much earlier than scholars had thought. Image:Nazca monkey.jpg|thumb|left|A Nazca line artwork.Many other civilizations developed and were absorbed by the most powerful ones such as Kotosh, Chavin, Paracas, Lima, Nasca, Moche, Tiwanaku, Wari, Lambayeque, Chimu, Chan, and Chincha, among others. The culture emerged on the southern coast around 300 BC. They are known for their use of vicua fibers instead of just cotton to produce fine textiles&mdash;innovations that did not reach the northern coast of Peru until centuries later. Coastal cultures such as the Moche and Nazca flourished from about 100 BC to about AD 700: the Moche produced impressive metalwork, as well as some of the finest pottery seen in the ancient world, while the Nazca are known for their textiles and the enigmatic lines. These coastal cultures eventually began to decline as a result of recurring Nio floods and droughts. In consequence, the Huari and Tiwanaku, who dwelt inland in the Andes became the predominant cultures of the region encompassing much of modern-day Peru and Bolivia. They were succeeded by powerful city-states, such as Chancay, Sipan, and Cajamarca, and two empires: Chimor and cultureThese cultures developed relatively advanced techniques of cultivation, gold and silver craft, pottery, metallurgy, and knitting. Around 700 BC, they appear to have developed systems of social organization that were the precursors of the Inca civilization. Not all Andean cultures were willing to offer their loyalty to the Incas as the Incas expanded their empire, and many were openly hostile. The people of the culture were an example of this, but the Inca eventually conquered and integrated them into their empire.Inca Empire (14381532)The Incas built the largest empire and dynasty of pre-Columbian America.(The Inca) The Tahuantinsuyowhich is derived from Quechua for The Four United Regionsreached its greatest extension at the beginning of the 16th century. It dominated a territory that included (from north to south): Ecuador, part of Colombia, the northern half of Chile, and the north-west part of Argentina; and from east to west, from Bolivia to the Amazonian forests and Peru. The empire originated from a tribe based in Cuzco, which became the capital. Pachacuti was the first ruler to considerably expand the boundaries of the Cuzco state.  His offspring later ruled an empire by both violent and peaceful conquest. In Cuzco, the royal city was created to resemble a Cougar; the head, the main royal structure, formed what is now known as Sacsayhuaman. The Empires administrative, political, and military center was located in Cuzco.  The empire was divided into four quarters: Chinchasuyo, Antisuyo, Contisuyo, and Collasuyo. Quechua was the official language, imposed on the citizens. It was the language of a neighbouring tribe of the original tribe of the empire. Conquered populationstribes, kingdoms, states, and citieswere allowed to practice their own religions and lifestyles, but had to recognize Inca cultural practices as superior to their own. Inti, the sun god, was to be worshipped as one of the most important gods of the empire. His representation on earth was the Inca (Emperor).The Tahuantinsuyo was organized in dominions with a stratified society, in which the ruler was the Inca. It was also supported by an economy based on the collective property of the land. In fact, the Empire was conceived like an ambitious and audacious civilizing project, based on a mythical thought, in which the harmony of the relationships between the human being, nature, and gods was truly essential.Many interesting customs were observed, for example the extravagant feast of Inti Raymi which gave thanks to the God Sun, and the young women who were the Virgins of the Sun, sacrificial virgins devoted to the Inti. The empire, being quite large, also had an impressive transportation system of roads to all points of the empire called the Inca Trail, and chasquis, message carriers who relayed information from anywhere in the empire to Cuzco.Image:Sunset across Machu Picchu.jpg|thumb|right|View of PicchuPicchu (Quechua: Old Peak; sometimes called the Lost City of the Incas) is a well-preserved pre-Columbian Inca ruin located on a high mountain ridge above the Valley, about 70 km (44 mi) northwest of Cuzco. Elevation measurements vary depending on whether the data refers to the ruin or the extremity of the mountain; Machu Picchu tourist information reports the elevation as 2,350 m (7,711 ft)1. Forgotten for centuries by the outside world, although not by locals, it was brought back to international attention by Yale archaeologist Bingham III, who rediscovered it in 1911 and wrote a best-selling work about it. Peru is pursuing legal efforts to retrieve thousands of artifacts that Bingham removed from the site.()Although Picchu is by far the most well-known internationally, Peru boasts many other sites where the modern visitor can see extensive and well-preserved ruins, remnants of the Inca-period and even older constructions.  Much of the Inca architecture and stonework found at these sites continues to confound archaeologists.  For example, at Sacsayhuaman, in Cuzco, the zig-zag-shaped walls are composed of massive boulders fitted very precisely to one anothers irregular, angular shapes.  No mortar holds them together, but nonetheless they have remained absolutely solid through the centuries, surviving earthquakes that flattened many of Cuzcos colonial constructions.  Damage to the walls visible today was mainly inflicted during battles between the Spanish and the Inca, as well as later, in the colonial era.  As Cuzco grew, Sacsayhuamans walls were partially dismantled, the site becoming a convenient source of construction materials for the citys newer inhabitants.  Today we not only do not know how these stones were shaped and smoothed, lifted on top of one another (they really are very massive) or fitted together by the Incas; we also dont know how they got the stones to the site in the first place.  The stone used is not native to the area, and most likely came from mountains many miles away.Conquest of Peru (15321572)When the Spanish landed in 1531, Perus territory was the nucleus of the highly developed Inca civilization. Centered at Cuzco, the Inca Empire extended over a vast region, stretching from northern Ecuador to central Chile. Pizarro and his brothers were attracted by the news of a rich and fabulous kingdom.(Atahualpa, Pizarro and the Fall of the Inca Empire) In 1532, they arrived in the country, which they called Peru. (The forms Biru, Pir, and Ber are also seen in early records.) According to Porras Barrenechea, Peru is not a Quechuan nor Caribbean word, but Indo-Hispanic or hybrid. In the years between 1524 and 1526 smallpox, introduced from Panama and preceding the Spanish conquerors swept through the Inca Empire.() The death of the Incan ruler Capac as well as most of his family including his heir, caused the fall of the Incan political structure and contributed to the civil war between the brothers Atahualpa and Huscar.(Hemming, John. The Conquest of the Inca. New York: Harcourt, Inc., 1970, 28-29.) Taking advantage of this, Pizarro carried out a dtat. On November 16, 1532, while the natives were in a celebration in Cajamarca, the Spanish in a surprise move captured the Inca Atahualpa during the of Cajamarca, causing a great consternation among the natives and conditioning the future course of the fight. When Huscar was killed, the Spanish tried and convicted Atahualpa of the murder, executing him by strangulation.For a period, Pizarro maintained the ostensible authority of the Inca, recognizing Huallpa as the Inca after Atahualpas death. But the conquerors abuses made this faade too obvious. Spanish domination consolidated itself as successive indigenous rebellions were bloodily repressed. By March 23, 1534, Pizarro and the Spanish had refounded the Inca city of Cuzco as a new Spanish colonial settlement.Establishing a stable colonial government was delayed for some time by native revolts and bands of the Conquistadores (led by Pizarro and de Almagro) fighting among themselves. A long civil war developed, from which the Pizarros emerged victorious at the of Las Salinas. In 1541, Pizarro was assassinated by a faction led by Diego de Almagro (El Mozo), and the stability of the original colonial regime was shaken up in the ensuing war. thumb|left|Pizarro and his followers in Lima in 1535Despite this, the Spaniards did not neglect the colonizing process. Its most significant milestone was the foundation of Lima in January 1535, from which the political and administrative institutions were organized. The new rulers instituted an encomienda system, by which the Spanish extracted tribute from the local population, part of which was forwarded to Seville in return for converting the natives to Christianity.  Title to the land itself remained with the of Spain. As governor of Peru, Pizarro used the encomienda system to grant virtually unlimited authority over groups of native Peruvians to his soldier companions, thus forming the colonial land-tenure structure. The indigenous inhabitants of Peru were now expected to raise World cattle, poultry, and crops for their landlords. Resistance was punished severely, giving rise to the Legend. The necessity of consolidating Spanish royal authority over these territories, led to the creation of a Audiencia (Royal Audience). The following year, in 1542, the of Peru (in Spanish, Virreinato del Per) was established, with authority over most of Spanish-ruled South America. (Colombia, Ecuador, Panam and Venezuela were split off as the of New Granada (in Spanish, Virreinato de Nueva Granada) in 1717; and Argentina, Bolivia, Paraguay, and Uruguay were set up as the of the Ro de la Plata in 1776.) In response to the internal strife plaguing the country after Pizarros death, Spain finally sent Nez Vela to be Perus first viceroy in 1544. He was later  killed by Pizarros brother, Pizarro, but a new viceroy, de la Gasca, eventually managed to restore order. He captured and executed Gonzalo Pizarro.A census taken by the last Quipucamayoc indicated that there were 12 million inhabitants of Inca Peru; 45 years later, under viceroy Toledo, the census figures amounted to only 1,100,000 Indians. Historian David N. Cook estimates that their population decreased from an estimated 9 million in the 1520s to around 600,000 in 1620 mainly because of diseases.(Noble David Cook, Demographic collapse: Indian Peru, 15201620, p. 114.) While the attrition was not an organized attempt at genocide, the results were similar. Scholars now believe that, among the various contributing factors, epidemic disease such as smallpox (unlike the Spanish, the Amerindians had no immunity to the disease)(The Story Of... Smallpox  and other Deadly Eurasian Germs) was the overwhelming cause of the population decline of the American natives.(Smallpox: Eradicating the Scourge) Inca cities were given Spanish Christian names and rebuilt as Spanish towns centered around a plaza with a church or cathedral facing an official residence. A few Inca cities like Cuzco retained native masonry for the foundations of their walls. Other Inca sites, like Viejo, were abandoned for cities at lower altitudes more hospitable to the Spanish.Viceroyalty of Peru (15421824)File:Colonial Peru textile.jpg|thumb|Colonial tapestry, late 17th or early 18th century. It was woven by Indian weavers for a Spanish client, incorporating then-fashionable Chinese imagery.In 1542, the Spanish Crown created the of Peru, which was reorganized after the arrival of Viceroy de Toledo in 1572. He put an end to the indigenous State of Vilcabamba, executed Tupac Amaru I. He also sought economic development through commercial monopoly and mineral extraction, mainly from the silver mines of Potos. He reused the Inca mita, a forced labor program, to mobilize native communities for mining work. This organization transformed Peru into the principal source of Spanish wealth and power in South America. The town of Lima, founded by Pizarro on January 18, 1535 as the Ciudad de Reyes (City of Kings), became the seat of the new viceroyalty. It grew into a powerful city, with jurisdiction over most of Spanish South America. Precious metals passed through Lima on its way to the of Panama and from there to Spain. On the local level, Spanish encomenderos depended on local chieftains (curacas) to control even the most remote settlements, in a rigorous hierarchy. By the 18th century, Lima had become a distinguished and aristocratic colonial capital, seat of a university and the chief Spanish stronghold in the Americas. Nevertheless, throughout this period, the Inca were not entirely suppressed. In the eighteenth century alone, there were fourteen large uprisings, the most important of which were that of Santos Atahualpa in 1742, and Uprising of Amaru II in 1780.The creation of the Viceroyalties of New Granada and Rio de la Plata (at the expense of its territory), the duty exemptions that moved the commercial center from Lima to Caracas and Aires, and the decrease of the mining and textile production determined the progressive decay of the of Peru. The economic crisis favored the indigenous rebellion from 1780 to 1781. This rebellion was headed by Amaru II. At this time, the Napoleonic invasion of the Peninsula and the degradation of the Royal power took place. The Creole rebellion of Hunuco arose in 1812 and the rebellion of Cuzco arose between 1814 and 1816. These rebellions defended the liberal principles sanctioned by the Constitution of Cadiz of 1812.These events created a favorable climate so that emancipating ideas developed between the Spanish Criollo people throughout the Spanish America. In contrast, the Criollo oligarchy in Per remained mostly Spain loyalist, which accounts for the fact that the of Peru became the last redoubt of the Spanish dominion in South America.Republic of PeruWars of independence (18101824)Image:La Independencia del Per.jpg|thumb|right|Jos de San Martns proclamation of the independence of Peru on July 28, 1821 in Peru.Perus movement toward independence was launched by an uprising of Spanish-American landowners and their forces, led by de San Martn of Argentina and Bolvar of Venezuela. San Martn, who had displaced the royalists of Chile after the of Chacabuco, and who had disembarked in Paracas in 1819, led the military campaign of 4,200 soldiers. The expedition which included warships  was organized and financed by Chile which sailed from Valparaso in August 1820.(http://books.google.com/books?idAFyfZNKxBPoC&pgPA39&lpgPA39&dqchilean+soldiers+liberation+of+peru&sourceweb&ots-t80VFUItP&sigbl1dya60XvZ7BJZAeNctTrqrtgI&hlen&saX&oibook_result&resnum2&ctresult#PPA39,M1) San Martin proclaimed the independence of Peru in Lima on July 28, 1821, with the words ... From this moment on, Peru is free and independent, by the general will of the people and the justice of its cause that God defends. Long live the homeland! Long live freedom! Long live our independence!. Still, the situation remained changing and emancipation was only completed by December 1824, when General Jos de Sucre defeated Spanish troops at the of Ayacucho. Spain made futile attempts to regain its former colonies, such as at the of Callao, and only in 1879 finally recognized Peruvian independence.Territorial disputes (18241884)After independence, Peru and its neighbors engaged in intermittent territorial disputes. A short-lived attempt to reunite Peru and Bolivia was made during the period 1836&ndash;1839 when the Confederation came into existence, severe internal opposition led to its demise in the of the Confederation.()Peru embarked on a railroad building program. Meiggs built a standard gauge line from Callao across the Andes to the Interior, Huancayo; striking for Cuzco he built the line but also bankrupted the country.In 1879, Peru entered the of the Pacific which lasted until 1884. Bolivia invoked its alliance with Peru against Chile. The Government tried to mediate the dispute by sending a diplomatic team to negotiate with the Chilean government, but the committee concluded that war was inevitable. Chile declared war on April 5, 1879. Almost five years of war ended with the loss of the department of Tarapac and the provinces of Tacna and Arica, in the Atacama region.Originally Chile committed to a referendum for the cities of Arica and Tacna to be held years later, in order to self determine their national affiliation. However, Chile refused to apply the Treaty, and both countries could not determine the statutory framework. In an arbitrage that both countries admitted, the USA decided that the plebiscite was impossible to take, therefore, direct negotiations between the parties led to a treaty (of Lima, 1929), in which Arica was ceded to Chile and Tacna remained in Peru. Tacna returned to Peru on August 29, 1929. The territorial loss and the extensive looting of Peruvian cities by Chilean troops left scars on the countrys relations with Chile that have not yet fully healed.Following the War of 1941, the Protocol sought to formalize the boundary between those two countries. Ongoing boundary disagreements led to a brief war in early 1981 and the War in early 1995, but in 1998 the governments of both countries signed a historic peace treaty that clearly demarcated the international boundary between them. In late 1999, the governments of Peru and Chile likewise similarly implemented the last outstanding article of their 1929 border agreement.Aristocratic Republic (18841930)After the of the Pacific,  an extraordinary effort of rebuilding began. The government started to initiate a number of social and economic reforms in order to recover from the damage of the war. Political stability was achieved only in the early 1900s.  In 1894, de Pirola, after allying his party with the Party of Peru to organize guerrillas with fighters to occupy Lima, ousted Avelino Cceres and once again became president of Peru in 1895. After a brief period in which the military once again controlled the country, civilian rule was permanently established with Pierolas election in 1895. His second term was successfully completed in 1899 and was marked by his reconstruction of a devastated Peru by initiating fiscal, military, religious, and civil reforms. Until the 1920s, this period was called the Aristocratic Republic, since most of the presidents that ruled the country were from the social elite.During B. Leguas periods in government (1908&ndash;1912 and 1919&ndash;1930, the latter known as the Oncenio (the Eleventh), the entrance of American capital became general and the bourgeoisie was favored. This policy, along with increased dependence on foreign investment, focused opposition from the most progressive sectors of Peruvian society against the landowner oligarchy. In 1929, Peru and Chile signed a final peace treaty, the of Lima by which Tacna returned to Peru and Peru yielded permanently the formerly rich provinces of Arica and Tarapac, but kept certain rights to the port activities in Arica and decisions of what Chile can do on those territories. The alternation between democracy and militarism (19301979) After the worldwide crisis of 1929, numerous brief governments followed one another. The APRA party had the opportunity to cause system reforms by means of political actions, but it was not successful. This was a nationalistic movement, populist and anti-imperialist, headed by Victor Raul Haya de la Torre in 1924. The Socialist Party of Peru, later the Communist Party, was created four years later and it was led by Jose C. Mariategui.Repression was brutal in the early 1930s and tens of thousands of APRA followers (Apristas) were executed or imprisoned. This period was also characterized by a sudden population growth and an increase in urbanization. According to Alberto Flores Galindo, By the 1940 census, the last that utilized racial categories, mestizos were grouped with whites, and the two constituted more than 53 percent of the population. Mestizos likely outnumbered Indians and were the largest population group.() During World War II, Peru was the first South American nation to align with the United States and its allies against Germany and Japan.In the mid-20th century, Ral Haya de la Torre (founder of the APRA), together with Carlos Maritegui (leader of the Communist Party), were two major forces in Peruvian politics. Ideologically opposed, they both managed to create the first political parties that tackled the social and economic problems of the country. Although Maritegui died at a young age, Haya de la Torre was twice elected president, but prevented by the military from taking office.  During World War II, the country rounded up around 2,000 of its Japanese immigrant population and shipped them to the United States as part of the internment program.(France-Presse/Press, Peru sorry for World War II internments, Times, 16 June 2011, p. 2.)President Bustamante y Rivero hoped to create a more democratic government by limiting the power of the military and the oligarchy. Elected with the cooperation of the APRA, conflict soon arose between the President and Haya de la Torre. Without the support of the APRA party, Bustamante y Rivero found his presidency severely limited. The President disbanded his Aprista cabinet and replaced it with a mostly military one. In 1948, Minister A. Odria and other right-wing elements of the Cabinet urged Bustamante y Rivero to ban the APRA, but  when the President refused, Odra resigned his post.In a military coup on October 29, Gen. A. Odria became the new President. Odras presidency was known as the Ochenio. He came down hard on APRA, momentarily pleasing the oligarchy and all others on the right, but followed a populist course that won him great favor with the poor and lower classes.  A thriving economy allowed him to indulge in expensive but crowd-pleasing social policies. At the same time, however, rights were severely restricted and corruption was rampant throughout his rgime. It was feared that his dictatorship would run indefinitely, so it came as a surprise when Odra allowed new elections. During this time, Belande Terry started his political career, and led the slate submitted by the National Front of Democratic Youth. After the National Election Board refused to accept his candidacy, he led a massive protest, and the striking image of Belande walking with the flag was featured by newsmagazine Caretas the following day, in an article entitled As Nacen Los Lideres (Thus Are Leaders Born). Belandes 1956 candidacy was ultimately unsuccessful, as the dictatorship-favored right-wing candidacy of Prado Ugarteche took first place.Belande ran for president once again in the National Elections of 1962, this time with his own party, Accin Popular (Popular Action). The results were very tight; he ended in second place, following Vctor Ral Haya de la Torre (APRA), by less than 14,000 votes. Since none of the candidates managed to get the Constitutionally-established minimum of one third of the vote required to win outright, selection of the President should have fallen to Congress; the long-held antagonistic relationship between the military and APRA prompted Haya de la Torre to make a deal with former dictator Odria, who had come in third, which would have resulted in Odria taking the Presidency in a coalition government. However, widespread allegations of fraud prompted the Peruvian military to depose Prado and install a military junta, led by Ricardo Perez Godoy. Godoy ran a short transitional government and held new elections in 1963, which were won by Belande by a more comfortable but still narrow five percent margin.Throughout Latin America in the 1960s, communist movements inspired by the Revolution sought to win power through warfare.  The Left Movement (Peru), or MIR, launched an insurrection that had been crushed by 1965, but Perus internal strife would only accelerate until its climax in the 1990s.The military has been prominent in Peruvian history. Coups have repeatedly interrupted civilian constitutional government. The most recent period of military rule (19681980) began when General Velasco Alvarado overthrew elected President Belande Terry of the Action Party (AP). As part of what has been called the first phase of the military governments nationalist program, Velasco undertook an extensive agrarian reform program and nationalized the fish meal industry, some petroleum companies, and several banks and mining firms.General Morales Bermdez replaced Velasco in 1975, citing Velascos economic mismanagement and deteriorating health.  Morales Bermdez moved the revolution into a more conservative second phase, tempering the radical measures of the first phase and beginning the task of restoring the countrys economy. A Constitutional Assembly was created in 1979, which was led by Ral Haya de la Torre. Morales Bermdez presided over the return to civilian government in accordance with a new constitution drawn up in 1979.Democratic restoration and elections (1979present day)During the 1980s, cultivation of illicit coca was established in large areas on the eastern Andean slope. Rural insurgent movements, like the Path  (Sendero Luminoso, SL) and the Amaru Revolutionary Movement (MRTA) increased during this time and derived significant financial support from alliances with the narcotraffickers, leading to the conflict in Peru. In the May 1980 elections, President Belande Terry was returned to office by a strong plurality. One of his first actions as President was the return of several newspapers to their respective owners. In this way, of speech once again played an important part in Peruvian politics. Gradually, he also attempted to undo some of the most radical effects of the Agrarian Reform initiated by Velasco, and reversed the independent stance that the Military Government of Velasco had with the United States. Belandes second term was also marked by the unconditional support for Argentine forces during the War with the United Kingdom in 1982. Belande declared that Peru was ready to support Argentina with all the resources it needed. This included a number of fighter planes and possibly personnel from the Air Force, as well as ships, and medical teams. Belaundes government proposed a peace settlement between the two countries, but it was rejected by both sides, as both claimed undiluted sovereignty of the territory. In response to Chiles support of the UK, Belande called for Latin American unity.The nagging economic problems left over from the previous military government persisted, worsened by an occurrence of the Nio weather phenomenon in 1982&ndash;83, which caused widespread flooding in some parts of the country, severe droughts in others, and decimated the schools of ocean fish that are one of the countrys major resources. After a promising beginning, Belandes popularity eroded under the stress of inflation, economic hardship, and terrorism. In 1985, the Popular Revolutionary Alliance (APRA) won the presidential election, bringing Garca to office. The transfer of the presidency from Belande to Garca on July 28, 1985, was Perus first exchange of power from one democratically elected leader to another for the first time in 40 years. With a parliamentary majority for the first time in APRAs history, Alan Garca started his administration with hopes for a better future. However, economic mismanagement led to hyperinflation from 1988 to 1990. Garcas term in office was marked by bouts of hyperinflation, which reached 7,649% in 1990 and had a cumulative total of 2,200,200% between July 1985 and July 1990, thereby profoundly destabilizing the Peruvian economy. Owing to such chronic inflation, the Peruvian currency, the sol, was replaced by the Inti in mid-1985, which itself was replaced the nuevo sol (new sun) in July 1991, at which time the new sol had a cumulative value of one billion old soles. During his administration, the per capita annual income of Peruvians fell to $720 (below the level of 1960) and Perus Domestic Product dropped 20%. By the end of his term, national reserves were a negative $900 million. The economic turbulence of the time acerbated social tensions in Peru and partly contributed to the rise of the violent rebel movement Path. The Garca administration unsuccessfully sought a military solution to the growing terrorism, committing human rights violations which are still under investigation. Concerned about the economy, the increasing terrorist threat from Sendero Luminoso and MRTA, and allegations of official corruption, voters chose a relatively unknown mathematician-turned-politician, Fujimori, as president in 1990. The first round of the election was won by well-known writer Vargas Llosa, a conservative candidate who went on to receive the Nobel Prize in Literature in 2010, but Fujimori defeated him in the second round. Fujimori implemented drastic measures that caused inflation to drop from 7,650% in 1990 to 139% in 1991. Faced with opposition to his reform efforts, Fujimori dissolved Congress in the auto-golpe of April 5, 1992. He then revised the constitution; called new congressional elections; and implemented substantial economic reform, including privatization of numerous state-owned companies, creation of an investment-friendly climate, and sound management of the economy.Fujimoris administration was dogged by several insurgent groups, most notably Sendero Luminoso (Shining Path), which carried on a terrorist campaign in the countryside throughout the 1980s and 1990s. He cracked down on the insurgents and was successful in largely quelling them by the late 1990s, but the fight was marred by atrocities committed by the both Peruvian security forces and the insurgents:  the Altos massacre and Cantuta massacre by Government paramilitary groups, and the bombings of Tarata and Frecuencia Latina by Path. Those examples subsequently came to be seen as symbols of the human rights violations committed during the last years of violence. With the capture of Guzmn (known as President Gonzalo) in September 1992, the Shining Path received a severe blow which practically destroyed the organization.In December 1996, a group of insurgents belonging to the MRTA took over the Japanese embassy in Lima, taking 72 people hostage. Military commandos stormed the embassy compound in May 1997, which resulted in the death of all 15 hostage takers, one hostage, and 2 commandos. It later emerged, however, that Fujimoris security chief Montesinos may have ordered the killing of at least eight of the rebels after they surrendered.Fujimoris constitutionally questionable decision to seek a third term and subsequent tainted victory in June 2000 brought political and economic turmoil. A bribery scandal that broke just weeks after he took office in July forced Fujimori to call new elections in which he would not run. The scandal involved Vladimiro Montesinos, who was shown in a video broadcast on TV bribing a politician to change sides. Montesinos subsequently emerged as the center a vast web of illegal activities, including embezzlement, graft, drug trafficking, as well as human rights violations committed during the war against Sendero Luminoso. In November 2000, Fujimori resigned from office and went to Japan in self-imposed exile, avoiding prosecution for human rights violations and corruption charges by the new Peruvian authorities. His main intelligence chief, Montesinos, fled Peru shortly afterwards. Authorities in Venezuela arrested him in Caracas in June 2001 and turned him over to Peruvian authorities; he is now imprisoned and charged with acts of corruption and human rights violations committed during Fujimoris administration. A caretaker government presided over by Valentn Paniagua took on the responsibility of conducting new presidential and congressional elections. The elections were held in April 2001; observers considered them to be free and fair. Toledo (who led the opposition against Fujimori) defeated former President Garca. The newly elected government took office on July 28, 2001. The Toledo Administration managed to restore some degree of democracy to Peru following the authoritarianism and corruption that plagued both the Fujimori and Garca governments. Innocents wrongfully tried by military courts during the war against terrorism (19802000) were allowed to receive new trials in civilian courts. On August 28, 2003, the Truth and Reconciliation Commission (CVR), which had been charged with studying the roots of the violence of the 1980&ndash;2000 period, presented its formal report to the President. President Toledo was forced to make a number of cabinet changes, mostly in response to personal scandals. Toledos governing coalition had a minority of seats in Congress and had to negotiate on an hoc basis with other parties to form majorities on legislative proposals. Toledos popularity in the polls suffered throughout the last years of his regime, due in part to family scandals and in part to dissatisfaction amongst workers with their share of benefits from Perus macroeconomic success. After strikes by teachers and agricultural producers led to nationwide road blockages in May 2003, Toledo declared a state of emergency that suspended some civil liberties and gave the military power to enforce order in 12 regions. The state of emergency was later reduced to only the few areas where the Shining Path was operating. On July 28, 2006 former president Alan Garca became the current President of Peru.  He won the 2006 elections after winning in a runoff against Humala.In May 2008, President Garca was a signatory to the The Constitutive Treaty of the of South American Nations. Peru has ratified the treaty.On June 5, 2011, Ollanta Humala was elected President in a run-off against Fujimori, the daughter of Alberto Fujimori and former Lady of Peru, in the 2011 elections, making him the first leftist president of Peru since Velasco Alvarado.NotesSee also*of Peruvian history*of South AmericaReferences* Historia del Peru. Lexus Editores, Barcelona 2000Further reading* Bonilla, Heraclio. The New Profile of Peruvian History, Latin American Research Review Vol. 16, No. 3 (1981), pp. 210224 in JSTOR* Jacobsen, Nils. Mirages of Transition: The Peruvian Altiplano, 1780-1930 (1996)* Keith, Robert G. Conquest and Agrarian Change: The Emergence of the Hacienda System on the Peruvian Coast (1979)* Means, Philip Ainsworth.  Fall of the Inca Empire and the Spanish Rule in Peru: 1530-1780 (1933)* Miller, Rory. Region and Class in Modern Peruvian History (1987)* Pike, Frederick B. The Modern History of Peru (1967)* Thurner, Mark. Historys Peru: The Poetics of Colonial and Postcolonial Historiography (University Press of Florida; 2010) 302 pages; a study of Peruvian historiography from Inca Garcilaso de la Vega (15391616) to Jorge Basadre (190380).External links* Archaeological information from the North of Peru* Machu Picchu information, photos, maps and more* World Almanac 2009 information about History of Peru and more* U.S. State Department Background Note: Peru*WorldStatesmen* State of Fear is a documentary that tells the story of Perus war on terror based on the findings of the Peruvian Truth and Reconciliation Commission.*  Ayacucho Repblica Aristocrtica photo gallery del PerPeruPerusdel Perde Peruodu Proude Perdel Per istorija ja:Perudo Peruwiay kawsayninhistoriahistoriazh:
23754
Parapsychology
Image:Wm james.jpg|thumb|American psychologist and philosopher James (18421910) was an early psychical researcher.()The term parapsychology was coined in or around 1889 by philosopher Dessoir, and originates from para meaning alongside, and psychology. The term was adopted by Rhine in the 1930s as a replacement for the term research.() Parapsychologists study a number of ostensible paranormal phenomena, including telepathy, precognition, clairvoyance, psychokinesis, experiences, reincarnation and experiences. Parapsychology research is conducted in some 30 different countries.( Laboratory and field research is conducted through private institutions and universities.() Privately-funded units in psychology departments at universities in the Kingdom are among the most active today.() In the United States, interest in research peaked in the 1970s and university-based research has declined since then, although private institutions still receive funding from donations.((Odling-Smee 2007) The status of paranormal research in the United States is now at an all-time low, after a relative surge of interest in the 1970s. Money continues to pour from philanthropic sources to private institutions, but any chance of credibility depends on ties with universities, and only a trickle of research now persists in university labs.) While parapsychological research has occasionally appeared in mainstream academic journals,(((( most of the recent research is published in a small number of niche journals.((Odling-Smee 2007) But parapsychologists are still limited to publishing in a small number of niche journals.) Journals dealing with parapsychology include the of Parapsychology, of Near-Death Studies, of Consciousness Studies, of the Society for Psychical Research and of Scientific Exploration.The Association regards the results of parapsychologists experiments as having demonstrated the existence of some forms of psychic abilities,(What is the state-of-the-evidence for psi?, FAQ of the Parapsychological Association. Retrieved: 2009-01-07) and proponents of parapsychology have seen it as an embryo science,(Parapsychology: An Exchange The New York Review of Books, December 18, 1980.) a frontier science of the mind,(J. B. Rhine and J. G. Pratt (1957). Parapsychology: Frontier Science of the Mind) and a frontier discipline for advancing knowledge.(The Stepchildren of Science: Psychical Research and Parapsychology in Germany, c. 18701939 Journal of the History of Medicine, August 3, 2010.) However, critics argue that methodological flaws can explain any apparent experimental successes() and the status of parapsychology as a science has been vigorously disputed.()  Many scientists regard the discipline as pseudoscience as they claim that parapsychologists continue investigation despite not having demonstrated conclusive evidence of psychic abilities in more than a century of research.()()() Laureate, David Josephson, and some other proponents of parapsychology have spoken of irrational attacks on parapsychology which stem from the difficulties of putting these phenomona into our present system of the universe.(TerminologyThe term parapsychology was coined in or around 1889 by philosopher Dessoir. It was adopted by Rhine in the 1930s as a replacement for the term psychical research in order to indicate a significant shift toward experimental methodology and academic discipline.( The term originates from the   meaning alongside, and psychology.HistoryFile:Henry Sidgwick.jpg|thumb|right|Sidgwick was an English utilitarian philosopher.  He was one of the founders and first president of the for Psychical Research and a member of the Society.File:Hudson Thomson Jay.jpg|right|thumb|Jay Hudson was Chief Examiner of the US Patent Office and Psychical researcher, known for his three laws of psychic phenomena, which were first published in 1893.Image:Cartas Zener.svg|thumb|right|Early parapsychological research employed the use of cards in experiments designed to test for the existence of telepathic communication.Early psychical researchThe for Psychical Research (SPR) was founded in London in 1882. The formation of the SPR was the first systematic effort to organize scientists and scholars for a critical and sustained investigation of paranormal phenomena. The early membership of the SPR included philosophers, scholars, scientists, educators and politicians, such as Sidgwick, Balfour, Crookes, Osgood Mason and Richet.()The SPR classified its subjects of study into several areas: telepathy, hypnotism, phenomena, apparitions, haunts, and the physical aspects of Spiritualism such as table-tilting and the appearance of matter from unknown sources, otherwise known as materialization. One of the first collaborative efforts of the SPR was its Census of Hallucinations, which researched apparitional experiences and in the sane. The census was the Societys first attempt at a statistical evaluation of paranormal phenomena, and the resulting publication in 1886, Phantasms of the Living is still widely referenced in parapsychological literature today. The SPR became the model for similar societies in other European countries and the United States during the late 19th century. Largely due to the support of psychologist James, the Society for Psychical Research (ASPR) opened its doors in York City in 1885.( The SPR and ASPR continue research in parapsychology.()Rhine eraIn 1911, University became the first academic institution in the States to study extrasensory perception (ESP) and psychokinesis (PK) in a laboratory setting. The effort was headed by psychologist John Edgar Coover. In 1930, University became the second major U.S. academic institution to engage in the critical study of ESP and psychokinesis in the laboratory. Under the guidance of psychologist William McDougall, and with the help of others in the departmentincluding psychologists Zener, B. Rhine, and Louisa E. Rhinelaboratory ESP experiments using volunteer subjects from the undergraduate student body began. As opposed to the approaches of psychical research, which generally sought qualitative evidence for paranormal phenomena, the experiments at Duke University proffered a quantitative, statistical approach using cards and dice. As a consequence of the ESP experiments at Duke, standard laboratory procedures for the testing of ESP developed and came to be adopted by interested researchers throughout the world.(The publication of J.B. Rhines book, New Frontiers of the Mind (1937) brought the laboratorys findings to the general public. In his book, Rhine popularized the word parapsychology, which psychologist Dessoir had coined over 40 years earlier, to describe the research conducted at Duke. Rhine also founded an autonomous Parapsychology Laboratory within Duke and started the of Parapsychology, which he co-edited with McDougall.(Rhine, along with associate Zener, had developed a statistical system of testing for ESP that involved subjects guessing what symbol, out of five possible symbols, would appear when going through a special deck of cards designed for this purpose. A percentage of correct guesses (or hits) significantly above 20% was perceived as higher than chance and indicative of psychic ability. Rhine stated in his first book, ExtraSensory Perception (1934), that after 90,000 trials, he felt ESP is an actual and demonstrable occurrence.(J. B. Rhine (1934). Extra-Sensory Perception. (4th ed.) Branden Publishing Company 1997. ISBN 0-8283-1464-0)The parapsychology experiments at Duke evoked much criticism from academics and others who challenged the concepts and evidence of ESP. One such criticism was that subjects were simply cheating. Illusionist Christopher wrote years later that he felt there are at least a dozen ways a subject who wished to cheat under the conditions Rhine described could deceive the investigator.( According to Christopher, Rhine did take precautions against cheating in response to criticisms of his methods, but once he did, he was unable to find the same high scores reported in earlier trials.(Christopher, Milbourne. (1970) ESP, Seers & Psychics. Thomas Y. Crowell Co.) Another criticism, made by chemist Langmuir, among others, was one of selective reporting. Langmuir stated that Rhine did not report scores of subjects that he suspected were intentionally guessing wrong, and that this, he felt, biased the statistical results higher than they should have been.(Rhine and his colleagues attempted to address these criticisms through new experiments, articles, and books, and revisited the state of the criticism along with their responses in the book Extra-Sensory Perception After Sixty Years (1940).(Rhine, J.B. (1966). Foreword. In Pratt, J.G., Rhine, J.B., Smith, B.M., Stuart, C.E., & Greenwood, J.A. (eds.). Extra-Sensory Perception After Sixty Years, 2nd ed. Boston, US: Humphries.) In 1957, Rhine and Gaither Pratt wrote Frontier Science of the Mind.The administration of Duke grew less sympathetic to parapsychology, and after Rhines retirement in 1965 parapsychological links with the university were broken. Rhine later established the Foundation for Research on the Nature of Man (FRNM) and the Institute for Parapsychology as a successor to the Duke laboratory.( In 1995, the centenary of Rhines birth, the FRNM was renamed the Research Center. Today, the Rhine Research Center is a parapsychology research unit, stating that it aims to improve the human condition by creating a scientific understanding of those abilities and sensitivities that appear to transcend the ordinary limits of space and time.()Establishment of the Parapsychological AssociationThe Association (PA) was created in North Carolina, on June 19, 1957. Its formation was proposed by J. B. Rhine at a workshop on parapsychology which was held at the Parapsychology Laboratory of Duke University. Rhine proposed that the group form itself into the nucleus of an international professional society in parapsychology. The aim of the organization, as stated in its Constitution, became to advance parapsychology as a science, to disseminate knowledge of the field, and to integrate the findings with those of other branches of science.()Under the direction of anthropologist Mead, the Parapsychological Association took a large step in advancing the field of parapsychology in 1969 when it became affiliated with the Association for the Advancement of Science (AAAS), the largest general scientific society in the world.() In 1979, physicist A. Wheeler argued that parapsychology is pseudoscientific, and that the affiliation of the PA to the AAAS needed to be reconsidered.()()His challenge to parapsychologys AAAS affiliation was unsuccessful.( Today, the PA consists of about three hundred full, associate, and affiliated members worldwide.()The 1970s and 1980sThe affiliation of the Parapsychological Association (PA) with the American Association for the Advancement of Science, along with a general openness to psychic and occult phenomena in the 1970s, led to a decade of increased parapsychological research. During this period, other related organizations were also formed, including the Academy of Parapsychology and Medicine (1970), the Institute of Parascience (1971), the Academy of Religion and Psychical Research, the of Noetic Sciences (1973), the International Kirlian Research Association (1975), and the Engineering Anomalies Research Laboratory (1979). Parapsychological work was also conducted at the Research Institute (SRI) during this time.(The scope of parapsychology expanded during these years. Psychiatrist Stevenson conducted much of his research into reincarnation during the 1970s, and the second edition of his Cases Suggestive of Reincarnation was published in 1974. Psychologist Moss devoted time to the study of photography at UCLAs parapsychology laboratory. The influx of spiritual teachers from Asia, and their claims of abilities produced by meditation, led to research on states of consciousness. American Society for Psychical Research Director of Research, Karlis Osis, conducted experiments in out of body experiences. Physicist Targ coined the term viewing for use in some of his work at SRI in 1974.(The surge in paranormal research continued into the 1980s: the Parapsychological Association reported members working in more than 30 countries. For example, research was carried out and regular conferences held in Europe and the former Union( although the word parapsychology was discarded in favour of the term psychotronics.() The promoters of psychotronics was Czech scientist Rejdk. Rejdk kept enforcing the psychotronics as a science on the world-wide scale and for many years, he organized conferences on research in psychotronics. The psychotronics of this era is being understood as a new science in the terms of human bionics. The main objectives of psychotronics were to verify and study distant interactions human organism and its information and energy expressions and subsequently the phenomena of telepathy, clairvoyance and psychokinesis, to discover new principles of nature.(Sbornk I. Konference o vzkumu v psychotronice (symposium, 1st Conference on Psychotronics Research), Prague, 1973)(Sbornk V. Mezinrodn konference o vzkumu v psychotronice (symposium, 5. International Conference of Psychotronics Research), Bratislava 1983) In 1985 a Chair of Parapsychology was established within the Department of Psychology at the of Edinburgh. Robert Morris, a respected experimental parapsychologist from the United States took up the position, and with his research associates and PhD students pursued a comprehensive research programme.(John Beloff. Parapsychology: A Concise History Palgrave Macmillan, 1997, p. 155.) Since Professor Morris death in 2004 the Chair of Parapsychology has remained vacant.(Adrian Parker.Playing Unfair with Parapsychologists)More recent developmentsFile:RupertSheldrake.jpg|thumb|right|Sheldrake is an English biochemist and plant physiologist. He is known for his research into parapsychology.Since the 1980s, contemporary parapsychological research has waned considerably in the United States.((Odling-Smee 2007)) Early research was considered inconclusive, and parapsychologists were faced with strong opposition from their academic colleagues.( Some effects thought to be paranormal, for example the effects of Kirlian photography (thought by some to represent a human aura), disappeared under more stringent controls, leaving those avenues of research at dead-ends.( Many university laboratories in the United States have closed, citing a lack of acceptance by mainstream science as the reason;( the bulk of parapsychology research in the US is now confined to private institutions funded by private sources.( After 28 years of research, Engineering Anomalies Research Laboratory (PEAR), which studied psychokinesis, closed in 2007.(Two universities in the States currently have academic parapsychology laboratories. The Division of Perceptual Studies, a unit at the of Virginias Department of Psychiatric Medicine, studies the possibility of survival of consciousness after bodily death, experiences, and experiences.(University of Virginia School of Medicine. The Division of Perceptual Studies) The of Arizonas Veritas Laboratory conducts laboratory investigations of mediums. Several private institutions, including the Institute of Noetic Sciences, conduct and promote parapsychological research.(Over the last two decades some new sources of funding for parapsychology in Europe have see a substantial increase in European parapsychological research so that the center of gravity for the field has swung from the United States to Europe.( Of all nations the United Kingdom has the largest number of active parapsychologists.(Harvey J. Irwin and Caroline Watt. An introduction to parapsychology McFarland, 2007, pp. 248-249.) In the UK, researchers work in conventional psychology departments, and also do studies in mainstream psychology to boost their credibility and show that their methods are sound.( It is thought that this approach could account for the relative strength of parapsychology in Britain.(As of 2007, parapsychology research is represented in some 30 different countries( and a number of universities worldwide continue academic parapsychology programs. Among these are the Parapsychology Unit at the of Edinburgh;() the Parapsychology Research Group at Hope University (this closed in April 2011);()()  the SOPHIA Project at the of Arizona;() the Consciousness and Transpersonal Psychology Research Unit of John Moores University;() the Center for the Study of Anomalous Psychological Processes at the of Northampton;( ) and the Anomalistic Psychology Research Unit at Goldsmiths of London.()Research and professional organizations include the Association;() the for Psychical Research, publisher of the Journal of Society for Psychical Research;() the Society for Psychical Research, publisher of the Journal of the American Society for Psychical Research (last published in 2004);() the Rhine Research Center and Institute for Parapsychology, publisher of the of Parapsychology;() the Parapsychology Foundation, which published the International Journal of Parapsychology (between 1959 to 1968 and 20002001)() and the Australian Institute of Parapsychological Research, publisher of the Australian Journal of Parapsychology.() The European Journal of Parapsychology ceased publishing in 2010 (accessdate2007-11-14)Parapsychological research has also been augmented by other sub-disciplines of psychology. These related fields include psychology, which studies transcendent or spiritual aspects of the human mind, and psychology, which examines paranormal beliefs and subjective anomalous experiences in traditional psychological terms.(()ResearchScopeParapsychologists study a number of ostensible paranormal phenomena, including but not limited to:*Telepathy: Transfer of information on thoughts or feelings between individuals by means other than the five classical senses.*Precognition: Perception of information about future places or events before they occur.*Clairvoyance: Obtaining information about places or events at remote locations, by means unknown to current science.*Psychokinesis: The ability of the mind to influence matter, time, space, or energy by means unknown to current science.*experiences: An experience reported by a person who nearly died, or who experienced death and then revived.*Reincarnation: The rebirth of a soul or other non-physical aspect of human consciousness in a new physical body after death.*experiences: Phenomena often attributed to ghosts and encountered in places a deceased individual is thought to have frequented, or in association with the persons former belongings.The definitions for the terms above may not reflect their mainstream usage, nor the opinions of all parapsychologists and their critics.According to the Parapsychological Association, parapsychologists do not study all paranormal phenomena, nor are they concerned with astrology, UFOs, Bigfoot, paganism, vampires, alchemy, or witchcraft.()MethodologyParapsychologists employ a variety of approaches for the study of apparent paranormal phenomena. These methods include qualitative approaches used in traditional psychology, but also quantitative empirical methodologies.Experimental researchGanzfeldImage:Ganzfeld.jpg|thumb|left|Participant of a experiment which proponents say shows evidence of telepathy.The Ganzfeld (German for whole field) is a technique used to test individuals for telepathy. The techniquea form of moderate deprivationwas developed to quickly quiet mental noise by providing mild, unpatterned stimuli to the visual and auditory senses. The visual sense is usually isolated by creating a soft red glow which is diffused through half balls placed over the recipients eyes. The auditory sense is usually blocked by playing noise, static, or similar sounds to the recipient. The subject is also seated in a reclined, comfortable position to minimize the sense of touch.()In the typical Ganzfeld experiment, a sender and a receiver are isolated.() The receiver is put into the Ganzfeld state( or effect and the sender is shown a video clip or still picture and asked to mentally send that image to the receiver. The receiver, while in the Ganzfeld, is asked to continuously speak aloud all mental processes, including images, thoughts, and feelings. At the end of the sending period, typically about 20 to 40 minutes in length, the receiver is taken out of the Ganzfeld state and shown four images or videos, one of which is the true target and three of which are non-target decoys. The receiver attempts to select the true target, using perceptions experienced during the Ganzfeld state as clues to what the mentally sent image might have been.Some parapsychologists have claimed that the aggregate results of ganzfeld experiments indicate that, on average, the target image is selected by the receiver more often than would be expected by chance alone; these claims have been summarized by parapsychologist Radin in his book The Conscious Universe.((Pedersen, Morten Monrad. Book review of The Conscious Universe. SkepticReport.com) However, the claims are disputed since the interpretation of the aggregate data is unclear;()( additionally, early Ganzfeld experiments were found to be affected by serious methodological errors. However, the data set post-1985 (which is widely regarded as a turning point in the Ganzfeld experiments) remains statistically significant and has an inclining effect size regression.()Remote viewingRemote viewing experiments test the ability to gather information about a remote target consisting of an object, place, or person that is hidden from the physical perception of the viewer and typically separated from the viewer by some distance. In one type of remote viewing experiment, a pool of several hundred photographs are created. One of these is randomly selected by a third party to be the target. It is then set aside in a remote location. The remote viewer attempts to sketch or otherwise describe that remote target photo. This procedure is repeated for a number of different targets. Many ways of analytically evaluating the results of this sort of experiment have been developed. One common method is to take a group of seven target photos and responses, randomly shuffle the targets and responses, and then ask independent judges to rank or match the correct targets with the participants actual responses. This method assumes that if there were an anomalous transfer of information, the responses should correspond more closely to the correct targets than to the mismatched targets.Several hundred such trials have been conducted by investigators over the past 25 years, including those by the Engineering Anomalies Research Laboratory (PEAR) and by scientists at International and Applications International Corporation.()() Many of these were under contract by the government as part of the espionage program Project, which terminated in 1995 having failed, in the governments eyes, to document any practical intelligence value.(Time magazine, 11 December 1995, p.45, The Vision Thing by Douglas Waller, Washington) PEAR closed its doors at the end of February 2007. Its founder, G. Jahn, said of it that, For 28 years, weve done what we wanted to do, and theres no reason to stay and generate more of the same data.( However, physicist L. Park said of PEAR, Its been an embarrassment to science, and I think an embarrassment for Princeton.()Psychokinesis on random number generatorsThe advent of powerful and inexpensive electronic and computer technologies has allowed the development of fully automated experiments studying possible interactions between mind and matter. In the most common experiment of this type, a true number generator (RNG), based on electronic or radioactive noise, produces a data stream that is recorded and analyzed by computer software. A subject attempts to mentally alter the distribution of the random numbers, usually in an experimental design that is functionally equivalent to getting more heads than tails while flipping a coin. In the RNG experiment, design flexibility can be combined with rigorous controls, while collecting a large amount of data in very short period of time. This technique has been used both to test individuals for psychokinesis and to test the possible influence on RNGs of large groups of people.()Major meta-analyses of the RNG database have been published every few years since appearing in the journal of Physics in 1986.( PEAR founder G. Jahn and his colleague Brenda Dunne say that the effect size in all cases was found to be very small, but consistent across time and experimental designs, resulting in an overall significance. The most recent meta-analysis on psychokinesis was published in Bulletin, along with several critical commentaries.()() It analyzed the results of 380 studies; the authors reported an overall positive effect size that was statistically significant but very small relative to the sample size and could be explained by bias.Direct mental interactions with living systemsFormerly called bio-PK, direct mental interactions with living systems (DMILS) studies the effects of one persons intentions on a distant persons psychophysiological state.( One type of DMILS experiment looks at the commonly reported feeling of being stared at. The starer and the staree are isolated in different locations, and the starer is periodically asked to simply gaze at the staree via closed circuit video links. Meanwhile, the starees nervous system activity is automatically and continuously monitored.Parapsychologists have interpreted the cumulative data on this and similar DMILS experiments to suggest that one persons attention directed towards a remote, isolated person can significantly activate or calm that persons system. In a meta-analysis of these experiments published in the British Journal of Psychology in 2004, researchers found that there was a small but significant overall DMILS effect. However, the study also found that when a small number of the highest-quality studies from one laboratory were analyzed, the effect size was not significant. The authors concluded that although the existence of some anomaly related to distant intentions cannot be ruled out, there was also a shortage of independent replications and theoretical concepts.()Near death experiencesImage:Ascent of the Blessed.jpg|upright|thumb|of the Blessed by Bosch (after 1490) depicts a tunnel of light and spiritual figures similar to those reported by near-death experiencers.A experience (NDE) is an experience reported by a person who nearly died, or who experienced death and then revived. NDEs include one or more of the following experiences: a sense of being dead; an experience; a sensation of floating above ones body and seeing the surrounding area; a sense of overwhelming love and peace; a sensation of moving upwards through a tunnel or narrow passageway; meeting deceased relatives or spiritual figures; encountering a being of light, or a light; experiencing a review; reaching a border or boundary; and a feeling of being returned to the body, often accompanied by reluctance.()Interest in the NDE was originally spurred by the research of psychiatrists Kbler-Ross, G. Ritchie, and Moody. In 1975, Moody wrote the best-selling book After Life and in 1977 he wrote a second book, Reflections on Life After Life.(Lee Worth Bailey and Jenny L. Yates (1996). The near-death experience: a reader Routledge, p. 26.) In 1998 Moody was appointed chair in consciousness studies at the of Nevada, Las Vegas. The Association for Near-death Studies (IANDS) was founded in 1978 to meet the needs of early researchers and experiencers within this field of research. Later researchers, such as psychiatrist Greyson, psychologist Ring, and cardiologist Michael Sabom, introduced the study of near-death experiences to the academic setting.(Reincarnation researchFile:Jim Tucker.jpg|thumb|right|B. Tucker is Associate Professor of Psychiatry and Neurobehavioral Sciences at the of Virginia. His main research interests are children who seem to remember previous lives, and prenatal and birth memories.Psychiatrist Stevenson, from the of Virginia, investigated many reports of young children who claimed to remember a past life. He conducted more than 2,500 case studies over a period of 40 years and published twelve books, including Reincarnation and Biology Intersect and Cases of the Reincarnation Type.Stevenson found that childhood memories ostensibly related to reincarnation normally occurred between the ages of three and seven years then fade shortly afterwards. He compared the memories with reports of people known to the deceased, attempting to do so before any contact between the child and the deceaseds family had occurred,() and searched for disconfirming evidence that could provide alternative explanations for the reports aside from reincarnation.()Some 35 per cent of the subjects examined by Stevenson had birthmarks or birth defects.  Stevenson believed  that the existence of birth marks and deformities on children, when they occurred at the location of fatal wounds in the deceased, provided the best evidence for reincarnation.() However,  Stevenson has never claimed that he had proved the existence of reincarnation, and cautiously referred to his cases as being of the reincarnation type or suggestive of reincarnation.(Harvey J. Irwin (2004). An introduction to parapsychology McFarland, p. 218.) Researchers who believe in the evidence for reincarnation have been unsuccessful in getting the community to consider it a serious possibility.(Shroder, Tom. Ian Stevenson; Sought To Document Memories Of Past Lives in Children, The Washington Post, February 11, 2007.)Stevenson retired in 2002, and psychiatrist B. Tucker took over his work. Tucker presented an overview of Stevensons research into reincarnation in Life Before Life: A Scientific Investigation of Childrens Memories of Previous Lives.Anomalous psychologyA number of surveys have found that many people report having had experiences that could be interpreted as telepathy, precognition, and similar phenomena.(Spooky survey gets big response, ABC Science Online, 17 November 2006)(Musella, D. P. (2005). Gallup poll shows that Americans belief in the paranormal persists. Skeptical Inquirer, 29(5), 5.) Variables that have been associated with reports of psi-phenomena include belief in the reality of psi; the tendency to have hypnotic, dissociative, and other alterations of consciousness; and, less reliably so, neuroticism, extraversion, and openness to experience. Although psi-related experiences can occur in the context of such psychopathologies as psychotic, dissociative, and other disorders, most individuals who endorse a belief in psi generally have normal intellectual functioning and lack serious psychopathology.(Criticism and controversyQuestioning the validity of parapsychology researchImage:Paraghost.gif|thumb|left|Fabricated images of ghosts such as this were very popular in the 19th century.Scientists critical of parapsychology assert that its extraordinary claims demand extraordinary evidence if they are to be taken seriously.() Many analysts of parapsychology hold that the entire body of evidence to date is of poor quality and not adequately controlled. In their view, parapsychology has not produced conclusive results. In support of this view, critics cite instances of fraud, flawed studies, and biases (such as illusion, error, bias, of control, thinking, and the blind spot)() as ways to explain parapsychological results.() Skeptics have also contended that peoples desire to believe in paranormal phenomena causes them to discount strong evidence that it does not exist.()The existence of parapsychological phenomena and the scientific validity of parapsychological research is disputed by independent evaluators and researchers. In 1988, the National Academy of Sciences published a report on the subject that concluded that no scientific justification from research conducted over a period of 130 years for the existence of parapsychological phenomena.() In the same report, however, they also recommended monitoring some parapsychological research, such as psychokinesis on random number generators and ganzfeld effects, for possible future studies.( The studies at the PEAR lab, recommended for monitoring by the report, have since concluded. These studies likewise failed to elicit a positive response by the scientific community despite numerous trials.( A 2008 study tested participants repeatedly for 90 minutes in a resonance imaging (fMRI) environment and showed no detectable psi effect, no baseline measure outside of the fMRI was collected for comparison.(Additionally, the methods of parapsychologists are regarded by critics, including those who wrote the science standards for the State Board of Education,() to be pseudoscientific.() Some of the more specific criticisms state that parapsychology does not have a clearly defined subject matter, an easily repeatable experiment that can demonstrate a psi effect on demand, nor an underlying theory to explain the paranormal transfer of information.( James E. Alcock, Professor of Psychology at University ()()()() has asserted that few of parapsychologys experimental results have prompted interdisciplinary research with more mainstream sciences such as physics or biology, and that parapsychology remains an isolated science to such an extent that its very legitimacy is questionable,() and as a whole is not justified in being labeled scientific.() Many in the scientific community consider parapsychology a pseudoscience as they claim it continues to explore the hypothesis that psychic abilities exist despite a century of experimental results that fail to conclusively demonstrate that hypothesis.(Wiseman has criticized the parapsychological community for widespread errors in research methods including cherry-picking new procedures which may produce preferred results, explaining away unsuccessful attempted replications with claims of an experimenter effect, mining, and Retrospective data selection.()  Whilst Richard Wiseman considers remote viewing to be proven by the current standards of scientific endeavour, he uses this to call for higher standard of evidence when studying the paranormal.(http://www.dailymail.co.uk/news/article-510762/Could-proof-theory-ALL-psychic.html#ixzz0RBt2KwPH)Sagan has suggested that there are three claims in the field of parapsychology which have at least some experimental support and deserve serious study, as they might be true:(Sagan, Carl. The Demon-Haunted World, Random House, 1997, p. 302.)*(1) that by thought alone humans can affect random number generators in computers;*(2) that people under mild sensory deprivation can receive thoughts or images projected at them;*(3) that young children sometimes report the details of a previous life, which upon checking turn out to be accurate and which they could not have know about in any other way than reincarnation.(FraudImage:James Randi crop.jpg|thumb|right|Stage magician and skeptic Randi has stated that magic tricks can simulate or duplicate some supposedly psychic phenomena.There have been instances of fraud in the history of parapsychology research. The SoalGoldney experiments of 19411943 (suggesting precognitive ability of a single participant) were long regarded as some of the best in the field because they relied upon independent checking and witnesses to prevent fraud. However, many years later, statistical evidence, uncovered and published by other parapsychologists in the field, suggested that Dr. Soal had cheated by altering some of the raw data.(()()In 1974, a number of experiments by J. Levy, J. B. Rhines successor as director of the Institute for Parapsychology, were exposed as fraud.( ) Levy had reported on a series of successful ESP experiments involving computer-controlled manipulation of non-human subjects, including eggs and rats. His experiments showed very high positive results. Because the subjects were non-human, and because the experimental environment was mostly automated, his successful experiments avoided criticism concerning experimenter effects, and removed the question of the subjects belief as an influence on the outcome.() However, Levys fellow researchers became suspicious about his methods. They found that Levy interfered with data-recording equipment, manually creating fraudulent strings of positive results. Rhine fired Levy and reported the fraud in a number of articles.()()Some instances of fraud amongst spiritualist mediums were exposed by early psychical researchers such as Richard Hodgson() and Price.() In the 1920s, magician and escapologist Houdini said that researchers and observers had not created experimental procedures which absolutely preclude fraud.()In 1979, magician and debunker Randi engineered a hoax, now referred to as Alpha. Randi recruited two young magicians and sent them undercover to Washington Universitys McDonnell Laboratory with the specific aim of exposing poor experimental methods and the credulity thought to be common in parapsychology. The McDonnell laboratory did not make any formal statements or publications suggesting that the effects demonstrated by the two magicians were genuine.( However, Randi has stated that both of his recruits deceived experimenters over a period of three years with demonstrations of supposedly psychic abilities: blowing electric fuses sealed in a box, causing a lightweight paper rotor perched atop a needle to turn inside a bell jar, bending metal spoons sealed in a glass bottle, etc.(Randi, J. (1983) The Project Alpha experiment: Part one: the first two years. Skeptical Inquirer, Summer issue, Pages 24-33 and Randi, J. (1983)The Project Alpha Experiment: Part two: Beyond the Laboratory, Skeptical Inquirer Fall issue, Pages 36-45) The hoax by Randi raised ethical concerns in the scientific community, eliciting criticism even among skeptical communities such as the Committee for the Scientific Investigation of Claims of the Paranormal (CSICOP), which he helped found. Psychologist Ray Hyman, a CSICOP member, called the results counterproductive.(The New York Times, 15 February 1983, Magicians Effort to Debunk Scientists Raises Ethical Issues by William J. Broad)Criticism of experimental resultsCritical analysts, including some parapsychologists, are not satisfied with experimental parapschology studies.()() Some reviewers, such as psychologist Hyman, contend that apparently successful experimental results in psi research are more likely due to sloppy procedures, poorly trained researchers, or methodological flaws rather than to genuine psi effects.()()()() Within parapsychology there are disagreements over the results and methodology as well. For example, the experiments at the PEAR laboratory were criticized in a paper published by the of Parapsychology,() in which parapsychologists independent from the PEAR laboratory concluded that these experiments departed from criteria usually expected in formal scientific experimentation due to problems with regard to randomization, statistical baselines, application of statistical models, agent coding of descriptor lists, feedback to percipients, sensory cues, and precautions against cheating. They felt that the originally stated significance values were meaningless.A typical measure of psi phenomena is statistical deviation from chance expectation. However, critics point out that statistical deviation is, strictly speaking, only evidence of a statistical anomaly, and the cause of the deviation is not known. Hyman contends that even if psi experiments could be designed that would regularly reproduce similar deviations from chance, they would not necessarily prove psychic functioning.() Critics have coined the term The Psi Assumption to describe the assumption that any significant departure from the laws of chance in a test of psychic ability is evidence that something anomalous or paranormal has occurred...other words assuming what they should be proving. These critics hold that concluding the existence of psychic phenomena based on chance deviation in inadequately designed experiments is the consequent or the question.()Selection bias and meta-analysisSelective reporting has been offered by critics as an explanation for the positive results reported by parapsychologists. Selective reporting is sometimes referred to as a file drawer problem, which arises when only positive study results are made public, while studies with negative or null results are not made public.( Selective reporting has a compounded effect on meta-analysis, which is a statistical technique that aggregates the results of many studies in order to generate sufficient statistical power to demonstrate a result that the individual studies themselves could not demonstrate at a statistically significant level. For example, a recent meta-analysis combined 380 studies on psychokinesis,( including data from the PEAR lab. It concluded that, although there is a statistically significant overall effect, it is not consistent and relatively few negative studies would cancel it out. Consequently, biased publication of positive results could be the cause.(The popularity of meta-analysis in parapsychology has been criticized by numerous researchers,( and is often seen as troublesome even within parapsychology itself.() Critics have said that parapsychologists misuse meta-analysis to create the incorrect impression that statistically significant results have been obtained that indicate the existence of psi phenomena.() Physicist Robert Park states that parapsychologys reported positive results are problematic because most such findings are invariably at the margin of statistical significance and that might be explained by a number of confounding effects; Park notes that such marginal results are a typical symptom of science as described by Langmuir.()Researcher J. E. Kennedy has argued that concerns over the use of meta-analysis in science and medicine apply as well to problems present in parapsychological meta-analysis. As a analysis, critics emphasize the opportunity the method presents to produce biased outcomes via the selection of cases chosen for study, methods employed, and other key criteria. Critics say that analogous problems with meta-analysis have been documented in medicine, where it has been shown different investigators performing meta-analyses of the same set of studies have reached contradictory conclusions.()Skeptics organizationsOrganizations that encourage a critical examination of parapsychology and parapsychological research include the for Skeptical Inquiry, publisher of the Inquirer;() the Randi Educational Foundation, founded by illusionist and skeptic James Randi,() and theOccult Investigative Committee of the of American Magicians() a society for professional magicians that seeks the promotion of harmony among magicians, and the opposition of the unnecessary public exposure of magical effects.()Parapsychologists rebuttalsFile:Brian David Josephson.jpg|thumb|right|Nobel laureate David Josephson is one of the more well-known scientists who say that parapsychological phenomena may be real.According to some parapsychologists, controversy stems from the apparent elusiveness and unpredictability of parapsychological phenomena and their incompatibility with the established laws.  Greater acceptance of the field will therefore be contingent on improved replicability and better integration with related subject areas.(W. Edward Craighead and Charles B. Nemeroff (2001). Parapsychology in The Corsini Encyclopedia of Psychology and Behavioral Science, John Wiley, p. 1141.)Harvey J. Irwin and Caroline Watt have discussed skeptical attacks on parapsychology.(Harvey J. Irwin and Caroline Watt (2007). An introduction to parapsychology McFarland, p. 259.) Irwin suggests that skeptics often use name-calling and ridicule to belittle parapsychology, and he says that this approach is characteristic of the for the Scientific Investigation of Claims of the Paranormal and its periodical the Inquirer.(Harvey J. Irwin (1989). An introduction to parapsychology, McFarland, p. 274.) Irwin contends that some scientists reject parapsychology simply because they cannot accept its empirical findings.(Harvey J. Irwin (1989). An introduction to parapsychology, McFarland, p. 272.)Laureate David Josephson and some other proponents of parapsychology have spoken of irrational attacks on parapsychology which stem from the difficulties of putting these phenomona into our present system of the universe.( Josephson contends that some scientists feel uncomfortable about ideas such as telepathy and that their emotions sometimes get in the way when making evaluations.(Michael A. Thalbourne and Lance Storm (2005). Parapsychology in the twenty-first century: essays on the future of psychical research McFarland, pp. 1-2.) He compares this situation to that of Wegeners hypothesis of drift, where there was initially great resistance to acceptance despite the strength of the evidence. Only after Wegeners death did further evidence lead to a gradual change of opinion and ultimate acceptance of his ideas.(In his 2005 book Life Before Life: A Scientific Investigation of Childrens Memories of Previous Lives, B. Tucker acknowledges that some of his main conclusions about research may seem to be astounding to some readers, but he considers them to be no more astounding than how many currently accepted ideas in physics seemed to be when they were originally proposed.(Jim B. Tucker (2005). Life Before Life: A scientific Investigation of Childrens Memories of Previous Lives, St. Martins Press, New York, p. 211.)There are some aspects of parapsychology which could be interpreted as being characteristic of a young science.(Harvey J. Irwin (1989). An introduction to parapsychology, McFarland, p. 275.)  Proponents of parapsychology have seen it as an embryo science,( a frontier science of the mind,( and a frontier discipline for advancing knowledge.(Historically, it has been argued that the research agenda pursued by early psychical researchers contributed to the development of ideas about dissociation and consciousness in mainstream psychology and psychiatry.(Harvey J. Irwin and Caroline Watt (2007). An introduction to parapsychology McFarland, p. 260.)In regard to the issue of fraud, the assertion that parapsychologists have sometimes cheated is undeniable. However, there is no clear evidence that there is an unusually high incidence of fraud in this field.(H. J. Irwin (1989). An Introduction to Parapsychology, McFarland & Company, p. 273.)NotesFurther reading**Henry, Jane (2005).  Parapsychology: research on exceptional experiences Routledge.* Holzer, Hans (2003). The Supernatural: Explaining the Unexplained Publisher: Franklin Lakes, NJ: New Page Books.*********Thalbourne, Michael A.; Lance Storm (2005). Parapsychology in the twenty-first century: essays on the future of psychical research McFarland. pp. 387.*External links*The Division of Perceptual Studies at the of Virginia School of Medicine.* Institute of Noetic Sciences A nonprofit organization that sponsors research in parapsychology.* Parapsychological Association An organization of scientists and scholars engaged in the study of psychic phenomena, affiliated with the Association for the Advancement of Science in 1969.* Rhine Research Center A historical parapsychological research center featuring the first building ever made for experimental work in parapsychology.  The Rhine Research Center is a hub for research and education in Parapsychology.* Society for Psychical Research Founded in 1882, the SPR was the first society to conduct organised scholarly research into parapsychology and other human experiences that challenge contemporary scientific models. It continues its work today.* Committee for Skeptical Inquiry Organization formed in 1976 to promote skepticism and encourage the critical investigation of paranormal claims and parapsychology.* James Randi Educational Foundation The James Randi Education Foundation(JREF) was founded to promote critical thinking in the areas of the supernatural and paranormal.  The JREF has provided skeptical views in the area of parapsychology.* FindArticles.com Index Large number of articles about parapsychology, from publications such as the of Parapsychology and the Inquirer.* ar:bn:ca:Parapsicologiacs:Parapsychologieda:Parapsykologide:Parapsychologieet:Parapshholoogiael:es:Parapsicologaeo:Parapsikologioeu:Parapsikologiafa:fr:Parapsychologieko:hi:hr:Parapsihologijait:Parapsicologiahe:lv:Parapsiholoijalt:Parapsichologijamk:ml:nl:Parapsychologieja:no:Parapsykologipl:Parapsychologiapt:Parapsicologiaro:Parapsihologieru:sq:Parapsikologjiasimple:Parapsychologysk:Parapsycholgiackb:sr:sh:Parapsihologijafi:Parapsykologiasv:Parapsykologitr:Parapsikolojiuk:zh:
24962
Paint_Your_Wagon_(musical)
Paint Your Wagon is a Broadway musical comedy, with book and lyrics by Alan J. Lerner and music by Loewe.  The story centers around a miner and his daughter and follows the lives and loves of the people in a mining camp in Gold Rush-era California.  Popular songs from the show included Star, I Talk to the Trees and Call the Wind Maria. (While the name in this title is pronounced as in the currently popular spelling Mariah, the original spelling is the classical spelling of Maria.)The musical ran on Broadway in 1951 and in the West End in 1953.  Synopsis;Act IIn the California Wilderness in May 1853, a crusty old miner, Ben Rumson, is conducting a make-shift funeral for a friend. Meanwhile his 16-year-old daughter Jennifer discovers gold dust.  Ben claims the land, and prospectors start flocking to the brand new town of Rumson (Im On My Way).  Two months later Rumson has a population of 400, all of whom are men except for Jennifer.  Prospector Jake Whippany is waiting to save enough money to send for Cherry and her Fandango girls (Rumson), while Jennifer senses the tension building in town (Whats Going On Here?).  Julio Valveras, a handsome young miner forced to live and work outside of town because he is Mexican, comes to town with dirty laundry and runs into Jennifer, who volunteers to do his laundry.  They also talk to each other (I Talk to the Trees).  Steve Bulmarck and the other men ponder the lonely nomadic life they lead in the song They Call the Wind Maria.   Two months later the men want Ben to send Jennifer away, and he wishes her mother was still alive to help him (I Still See Elisa).  Jennifer is in love with Julio (How Can I Wait?), and when Ben sees Jennifer dancing with Julios clothes, he decides to send her East on the next stage.  Jacob Woodling, a Mormon man with two wives, Sarah and Elizabeth, arrives in Rumson where the men demand Jacob sell one of his wives.  To his surprise, Ben finds himself wooing Elizabeth (In Between) and wins her for $800 (Whoop-Ti-Yay).  Jennifer is disgusted by her fathers actions and runs away, telling Julio that she will be reunited with him in a years time (Carino Mio). Cherry and her Fandango girls arrive (Theres a Coach Comin In).  Julio learns his claim is running dry which means he has to move on to make a living and that he will not be there to greet Jennifer when she returns.;Act IIA year later in October, the miners celebrate the high times in Rumson now that the Fandango girls are around (Hand Me Down That Can o Beans).  Edgar Crocker, a miner who has saved his money, falls for Elizabeth and she responds, although Ben does not notice since he thinks Raymond Janney is in love with her (he is).  Another miner, Mike Mooney, tells Julio about a lake that has gold dust on the bottom and he considers looking for it (Another Autumn).  Jennifer returns in December, having learned civilized ways back East (All for Him).  Ben tells his daughter that he will soon be moving on since he was not meant to stay in one place for long (Star).  The next day as Cherry and the girls are packing to leave they tell her about Julio leaving to find the lake with a bottom of gold.  Raymond Janney offers to buy Elizabeth from Ben for $3,000, but she runs off with Edgar Crocker.  Word comes of another strike 40 miles south of Rumson and the rest of the town packs up to leave except for Jennifer, who is waiting for Julio to return, and Ben, who suddenly realizes that Rumson is indeed his town.  Late in April, Julio appears, a broken man.  The now dying Ben welcomes him and Julio is amazed to see Jennifer is there.  As they move toward each other, the wagons filled with people move on.Songs;Act 1*Im On My Way - Steve Bullnack, Jake Whippany, Mike Mooney, Lee Zen, Sing Yuy, Sandy Twist, Edgar Crocker, Reuben Sloane and Miners *Rumson - Jake *Whats Goin On Here? - Jennifer Rumson *I Talk to the Trees - Julio Valveras and Jennifer *Call the Wind Maria - Steve, Miners and Dancer *I Still See Elisa - Ben Rumson *How Can I Wait? - Jennifer *Trio - Elizabeth Woodling, Sarah Woodling and Jacob Woodling *Rumson (Reprise) - Jake *In Between - Ben *Whoop-Ti-Ay! - Ben , Elizabeth and Miners *How Can I Wait? (Reprise) - Jennifer and Julio ;Act 2*Hand Me Down That Can OBeans - Jake and Miners *Rope Dance - Fandangos, Pete Billings and Singer *Can-can - Suzanne Duval, Rocky, Fandangos and Miners *Another Autumn - Julio Valveras, Dancer and Pete Billings *Movin - Miners *Im On My Way (Reprise) - Miners *All For Him - Jennifer *(I Was Born Under a) Wandrin Star - Ben *I Talk to the Trees (Reprise) - Jennifer *Strike! - Steve , Jasper and Jake *(I Was Born Under a) Wandrin Star (Reprise) - Jake, Steve, Sandy and MinersProductionsThe musical opened on Broadway at the Shubert Theatre on November 12, 1951, and closed on July 19, 1952, after 289 performances. The production was directed by Daniel Mann, set design by Oliver Smith, costume design by Motley, lighting design by Peggy Clark, music for dances arranged by Rittman, with dances and musical ensembles by de Mille set to the orchestrations of Royal.(Green, Stanley. Paint Your Wagon. The World of Musical Comedy, Da Capo Press, 1984, ISBN 0306802074, pp.44243) It starred James Barton (as Ben Rumson), San Juan (Jennifer Rumson), Bavaar (Julio Valveras), de Lappe (Yvonne Sorel), James Mitchell (Pete Billings), Medford (Cherry), and Marijane Maricle (Elizabeth Woodling).(  Ives and Dowling later took over the role of Ben Rumson.(Cullen, Frank; Hackman, Florence; McNeilly, Donald.  James Barton  Vaudeville, old and new, Psychology Press, 2007, ISBN 0415938538, p.77) De Mille later restaged the dances as a stand-alone ballet, Gold Rush.(Music: Testing a Hunch Magazine, October 26, 1953)The West End production opened on February 11, 1953 at Majestys Theatre and ran for 477 performances.(Chronology, 1953.  Guidetomusicaltheatre.com, accessed January 19, 2011) It starred real life father and daughter Howes and Ann Howes.(Green, Stanley.  Howes, Sally Anne Encyclopedia of the Musical Theatre, Da Capo Press, 1980, ISBN 0306801132, p. 200) A new production, with a revised libretto by Rambo, was produced by the Theatre Company in Lake City, Utah and ran from September 28, 2007, through October 13, 2007. The director was Charles Morey and choreographer Patti DBeck, with a cast of nearly 30. One change from the original was to have They Call the Wind Maria staged as an ensemble number instead of a showcase solo.(With a Fresh Coat of Creativity, Paint Your Wagon Opens in UT on Route to Wider Life. Playbill.com, September 28, 2007)(Lincoln, Ivan M.  Wagon is a cruisin after overhaul, Deseret Morning News (Salt Lake City), October 2, 2007)ReceptionThe interwoven use of ballet that worked so well in the highlands was less effective on the Prairies, and the subject matter was harsh and cold. In spite of the shows failure, Loewe displayed ... an uncanny ability to write scores indigenous to the time and locale of the characters and plots.(Suskin, Steven.  Paint Your Wagon Show Tunes: The Songs, Shows, and Careers of Broadways Major Composers (3 ed.), Oxford University Press US, 2000, ISBN 0195125991, p. 224)The reviewer for the Deseret Morning News (Salt Lake City), wrote of the 2007 Pioneer Theatre Company production: Paint Your Wagon has a lusty new lease on life and is rarin to go. The original music is intact, although some songs have been shuffled into better positions in the revised plot. And most of the familiar characters are still there. ...  Rambo and Orichs overhauled Wagon is a vast improvement over the 1951 model, enhanced by Pioneer Theatre Companys usual Broadway-quality scenery, costuming, lighting and sound, along with Mearle Marshs superb pit orchestra.(Awards and nominations*World Award :Tony Bavaar (winner) ReferencesExternal links* *Paint Your Wagon History and Synopsis at Tams-WitmarkYour Wagon
25604
Radon
Radon ( ) is a element with symbol Rn and number 86. It is a radioactive, colorless, odorless, tasteless gas, occurring naturally as the decay product of uranium or thorium. Its most stable isotope, 222Rn, has a half-life of 3.8 days. Radon is one of the densest substances that remains a gas under normal conditions and is considered a health hazard due to its radioactivity. Intense radioactivity also hindered chemical studies of radon and only a few compounds are known. Radon is formed as part of the normal radioactive chain of uranium and thorium. Uranium and thorium have been around since the earth was formed and their most common isotope has a very long half-life (4.5 billion years). Uranium and thorium, radium, and thus radon, will continue to occur for millions of years at about the same concentrations as they do now.(Toxological profile for radon, for Toxic Substances and Disease Registry, U.S. Public Health Service, In collaboration with U.S. Environmental Protection Agency, December 1990.)Radon is responsible for the majority of the public exposure to radiation. It is often the single largest contributor to an individuals radiation dose, and is the most variable from location to location. Radon gas from natural sources can accumulate in buildings, especially in confined areas such as attics and basements. It can also be found in some spring waters and hot springs.() Epidemiological studies have shown a clear link between breathing high concentrations of radon and incidence of cancer. Thus, radon is considered a significant contaminant that affects air quality worldwide. According to the States Environmental Protection Agency, radon is the second most frequent cause of lung cancer, after cigarette smoking, causing 21,000 lung cancer deaths per year in the States.()CharacteristicsPhysical propertiesRadon is a colorless and odorless gas, and therefore not detectable by human senses alone. At temperature and pressure, radon forms a monatomic gas with a density of 9.73 kg/m3,() about 8 times the density of the Earths atmosphere at sea level, 1.217 kg/m3.() Radon is one of the heaviest gases at room temperature and is the heaviest of the noble gases. Although colorless at standard temperature and pressure, when cooled below its point of , radon has a brilliant phosphorescence which turns from yellow to orange-red as the temperature is lowered.() Upon condensation, radon glows because of the intense radiation it produces.()Chemical propertiesBeing a noble gas, radon is chemically not very reactive. However, the 3.8 day half-life of radon-222 makes it useful in physical sciences as a natural tracer.shell 086 Radon.svg|left|thumb|An electron shell diagram for radon. Note the eight electrons in the outer shell.Radon is a member of the zero-valence elements that are called noble gases. It is inert to most common chemical reactions, such as combustion, because the outer shell contains eight electrons. This produces a stable, minimum energy configuration in which the outer electrons are tightly bound.() 1037 kJ/mol is required to extract one electron from its shells (also known as the ionization energy).() However, in accordance with periodic trends, radon has a lower electronegativity than the element one period before it, xenon, and is therefore more reactive. Radon is sparingly soluble in water, but more soluble than lighter noble gases. Radon is appreciably more soluble in organic liquids than in water. Early studies concluded that the stability of radon hydrate should be of the same order as that of the hydrates of chlorine () or dioxide (), and significantly higher than the stability of the hydrate of sulfide ().()Because of its cost and radioactivity, experimental chemical research is seldom performed with radon, and as a result there are very few reported compounds of radon, all either fluorides or oxides. Radon can be oxidized by a few powerful oxidizing agents such as fluorine, thus forming fluoride.()() It decomposes back to elements at a temperature of above 250 C. It has a low volatility and was thought to be . But because of the short half-life of radon and the radioactivity of its compounds, it has not been possible to study the compound in any detail. Theoretical studies on this molecule predict that it should have a Rn-F bond distance of 2.08 , and that the compound is thermodynamically more stable and less volatile than its lighter counterpart .() The octahedral molecule  was predicted to have an even lower of formation than the difluoride.() The RnF+ ion is believed to form by the reaction:():Rn (g) + 2  (s)   (s) + 2  (g)Radon oxides are among the few other reported Radon compounds.() Radon carbonyl RnCO has been predicted to be stable and to have a molecular geometry.() The molecules  and RnXe were found to be significantly stabilized by spin-orbit coupling.() Radon caged inside a fullerene has been proposed as a drug for tumors.()Isotopeschain(4n+2, Uranium series).PNG|thumb|upright|altUranium series|(More comprehensive graphic)Radon has no isotopes, however, 36 radioactive isotopes have been characterized, with their masses ranging from 193 to 228.() The most stable isotope is 222Rn, which is a product of 226Ra, a decay product of 238U.() Among the daughters of 222Rn is also the highly unstable isotope 218Rn. There are three other radon isotopes that have a half-life of over an hour: 211Rn, 210Rn and 224Rn. The 220Rn isotope is a natural decay product of the most stable thorium isotope (232Th), and is commonly referred to as thoron. It has a half-life of 55.6 seconds and also emits alpha radiation. Similarly, 219Rn is derived from the most stable isotope of actinium (227Ac)named actinonand is an alpha emitter with a half-life of 3.96 seconds.( No radon isotopes are part of the neptunium(237Np) decay series.Progenies222Rn belongs to the radium and uranium-238 decay chain, and has a half-life of 3.8235 days. Its four first products (excluding marginal decay schemes) are very short-lived, meaning that the corresponding disintegrations are indicative of the initial radon distribution. Its decay goes through the following sequence:( *222Rn, 3.8 days, decaying to...*218Po, 3.10 minutes, decaying to...*214Pb, 26.8 minutes, decaying to...*214Bi, 19.9 minutes, beta decaying to...*214Po, 0.1643 ms, alpha decaying to...At the next step, 214Po decays to 210Pb, which has a much longer half-life of 22.3 years. Its progenies are:*210Bi, 5.013 days, beta decaying to...*210Po, 138.376 days, alpha decaying to...*206Pb, stable.The radon equilibrium factor() is the ratio between the activity of all short-period radon progenies (which are responsible for most of radons biological effects), and the activity that would be at equilibrium with the radon parent. If a closed volume is constantly supplied with radon, the concentration of short-lived isotopes will increase until an equilibrium is reached where the rate of decay of each decay product will equal that of the radon itself. The equilibrium factor is 1 when both activities are equal, meaning that the decay products have stayed close to the radon parent long enough for the equilibrium to be reached, within a couple of hours. Under these conditions each additional pCi/L of radon will increase exposure, by 0.01 WL (see explanation of WL below). These conditions are not always met: in many homes, the equilibrium fraction is typically 40%; that is, there will be 0.004 WL of progeny for each pCi/L of radon in air.( 210Pb takes much longer (decades) to come in equilibrium with radon, but, if the environment permits accumulation of dust over extended periods of time, 210lead and its decay products may contribute to overall radiation levels as well.Because of their electrostatic charge, radon progenies adhere to surfaces or dust particles, whereas gaseous radon does not. Attachment removes them from the air, usually causing the equilibrium factor in the atmosphere to be less than one. The equilibrium factor is also lowered by air circulation or air filtration devices, and is increased by airborne dust particles, including cigarette smoke. In high concentrations, airborne radon isotopes contribute significantly to human health risk. The equilibrium factor found in epidemiological studies is 0.4.()History and etymologythumb|upright|right|Apparatus used by Ramsay and Whytlaw-Gray to isolate radon. M is a capillary tube where approximately 0.1 mm3 were isolated. Rn mixed with  entered the evacuated system through siphon A; mercury is shown in black.Radon was the fifth radioactive element to be discovered, in 1900 by Ernst Dorn, after uranium, thorium, radium and polonium.()()() In 1900 Dorn reported some experiments in which he noticed that radium compounds emanate a radioactive gas which he named Radium Emanation (Ra Em).() Before that, in 1899, Pierre and Curie observed that the gas emitted by radium remained radioactive for a month.() Later that year, B. Owens and Rutherford, at University in Montreal, noticed variations when trying to measure radiation from thorium oxide.(: the radiation from thorium oxide was not constant, but varied in a most capricious manner. whereas all the compounds of Uranium give out a radiation which is remarkably constant) Rutherford noticed that the compounds of thorium continuously emit a radioactive gas which retain the radioactive powers for several minutes and called this gas emanation (from Latin emanareto elapse and emanatioexpiration),() and later Thorium Emanation (Th Em). In 1901, he demonstrated that the emanations are radioactive, but credited the Curies for the discovery of the element.() In 1903, similar emanations were observed from actinium by Debierne()() and were called Actinium Emanation (Ac Em).Several names were suggested for these three gases: exradio, exthorio, and exactinio in 1904;() radon, thoron, and akton in 1918;() radeon, thoreon, and actineon in 1919,() and eventually radon, thoron, and actinon in 1920.() The likeness of the spectra of these three gases with those of argon, krypton, and xenon, and their observed chemical inertia led Sir Ramsay to suggest in 1904 that the emanations might contain a new element of the noble gas family.(In 1910, Sir William Ramsay and Whytlaw-Gray isolated radon, determined its density, and determined that it was the heaviest known gas.( They wrote that Lexpression de lmanation du radium est fort incommode, (the expression of radium emanation is very awkward) and suggested the new name niton (Nt) (from the Latin nitens meaning shining) in order to emphasize the property of gases that cause the phosphorescence of some substances,() and in 1912 it was accepted by the International Commission for Atomic Weights. In 1923, the International Committee for Chemical Elements and Union of Pure and Applied Chemistry (IUPAC) chose among the names radon (Rn), thoron (Tn), and actinon (An). Later, when isotopes were numbered instead of named, the element took the name of the most stable isotope, radon, while Tn was renamed 220Rn and An was renamed 219Rn. As late as the 1960s, the element was also referred to simply as emanation.() The first synthesized compound of radon, radon fluoride, was obtained in 1962.()The danger of high exposure to radon in mines, where exposures reaching 1,000,000 Bq/m3 can be found, has long been known. In 1530, Paracelsus described a wasting disease of miners, the mala metallorum, and Agricola recommended ventilation in mines to avoid this mountain sickness (Bergsucht).(Le radon, aspects historiques et perception du risque, Roland Masse.)(Radon Toxicity: Who is at Risk?, Agency for Toxic Substances and Disease Registry, 2000.)In 1879, this condition was identified as lung cancer by Herting and Hesse in their investigation of miners from Schneeberg, Germany.The first major studies with radon and health occurred in the context of mining in the Joachimsthal region of Bohemia.(Proctor, Robert N. The Nazi War on Cancer. Princeton University Press, 2000 p.99.) In the US, studies and mitigation only followed decades of health effects on uranium miners of the United States employed during the early War; standards were not implemented until 1971.(Edelstein, Michael R., William J. Makofske. Radons deadly daughters:science, environmental policy, and the politics of risk. Rowman & Littlefield, 1998, pp.3639)OccurrenceConcentration unitsImage:Lead210inairatjapan.png|thumb|300px|210Pb is formed from the decay of 222Rn. Here is a typical deposition rate of 210Pb as observed in Japan as a function of time, due to variations in radon concentration.()All discussions of radon concentrations in the environment refer to 222Rn. While the average rate of production of 220Rn (from the thorium decay series) is about the same as 222Rn, the amount of 220Rn in the environment is much less than that of 222Rn because of the short half-life of 220Rn (1 minute versus 4 days).(Radon concentration is usually measured in the atmosphere, in becquerel per cubic meter (Bq/m3), the derived unit. Typical domestic exposures are about 100 Bq/m3 indoors, and 1020 Bq/m3 outdoors.It is often measured in picocuries per liter (pCi/L) in the USA, with 1 pCi/L37 Bq/m3.()In the mining industry, the exposition is traditionally measured in working level (WL), and the cumulative exposition in working level month (WLM): 1 WL equals any combination of short-lived 222Rn progeny (218Po, 214Pb, 214Bi, and 214Po) in 1 liter of air that releases 1.3  105 MeV of potential alpha energy;( one WL is equivalent to 2.08  105 joules per cubic meter of air (J/m3).( The SI unit of cumulative exposure is expressed in joule-hours per cubic meter (Jh/m3). One WLM is equivalent to 3.6  103 Jh/m3. An exposure to 1 WL for 1 working month (170 hours) equals 1 WLM cumulative exposure.A cumulative exposition of 1 WLM is roughly equivalent to living one year in an atmosphere with a radon concentration of 230 Bq/m3.(Radon (Rn). CEA. 12 April 2005. (in French))Radon (222Rn), when released into the air, decays to 210Pb and other radioisotopes, the levels of 210Pb can be measured. The rate of deposition of this radioisotope is weather dependent.Radon concentrations found in natural environments are much too low to be detected by chemical means. A 1000 Bq/m3 (relatively high) concentration corresponds to 0.17 picogram per cubic meter. The average concentration of radon in the atmosphere is about 6 atoms of radon for each molecule in the air, or about 150 atoms in each ml of air.() The radon activity of the Earth atmosphere originates from some tens of grams of radon, consistently replaced by decay of larger amounts of radium and uranium.()Naturalthumb|200px|Radon concentration next to a uranium mine. Radon is a decay product of uranium, which is relatively common in the crust, but generally concentrated in ore-bearing rocks scattered around the world.Every square mile of surface soil, to a depth of 6 inches (2.6 km2 to a depth of 15 cm), contains approximately 1 gram of radium, which releases radon in small amounts to the atmosphere( On a global scale, it is estimated that 2,400 million curies (90 TBq) of radon are released from soil annually.() Radon concentration varies widely from place to place. In the open air, it ranges from 1 to 100 Bq/m3, even less (0.1 Bq/m3) above the ocean.In caves or aerated mines, or ill-aerated houses, its concentration climbs to 202,000 Bq/m3.()Radon concentration can be much higher in mining contexts. Ventilation regulations instruct to maintain radon concentration in uranium mines under the working level, with 95th percentile levels ranging up to nearly 3 WL (546 pCi 222Rn per liter of air; 20.2 kBq/m3, measured from 1976 to 1985).(The concentration in the air at the (unventilated) Gastein Healing Gallery averages 43 kBq/m3 (1.2 nCi/L) with maximal value of 160 kBq/m3 (4.3 nCi/L).()Radon mostly appears with the decay chain of the radium and uranium series (222Rn), and marginally with the thorium series (220Rn). The element emanates naturally from the ground, and some building materials, all over the world, wherever traces of uranium or thorium can be found, and particularly in regions with soils containing granite or shale, which have a higher concentration of uranium. However, not all granitic regions are prone to high emissions of radon. Being a rare gas, it usually migrates freely through faults and fragmented soils, and may accumulate in caves or water. Owing to its very short half-life (four days for 222Rn), radon concentration decreases very quickly when the distance from the production area increases. Radon concentration varies greatly with season and atmospheric conditions. For instance, it has been shown to accumulate in the air if there is a meteorological inversion and little wind.()High concentrations of radon can be found in some spring waters and hot springs.() The towns of Montana; Misasa; Kreuznach, Germany; and the country of Japan have radium-rich springs which emit radon. To be classified as a radon mineral water, radon concentration must be above a minimum of 2 nCi/L (74 kBq/m3).() The activity of radon mineral water reaches 2,000 kBq/m3 in Merano and 4,000 kBq/m3 in Lurisia (Italy).(Natural radon concentrations in atmosphere are so low that radon-rich water in contact with the atmosphere will continually lose radon by volatilization. Hence, water has a higher concentration of 222Rn than water, because radon is continuously produced by radioactive decay of 226Ra present in rocks. Likewise, the saturated zone of a soil frequently has a higher radon content than the unsaturated zone because of diffusional losses to the atmosphere.()()In 1971, 15 passed 110 km (68 mi) above the Aristarchus plateau on the Moon, and detected a significant rise in alpha particles thought to be caused by the decay of 222Rn. The presence of 222Rn has been inferred later from data obtained from the Prospector particle spectrometer.()Radon is found in some petroleum. Because radon has a similar pressure and temperature curve as propane, and refineries separate petrochemicals based on their boiling points, the piping carrying freshly separated propane in oil refineries can become partially radioactive because of decaying radon and its products. Residues from the petroleum and gas industry often contain radium and its daughters. The sulfate scale from an well can be radium rich, while the water, oil, and gas from a well often contains radon. Radon decays to form solid radioisotopes which form coatings on the inside of pipework. In an oil processing plant, the area of the plant where propane is processed is often one of the more contaminated areas, because radon has a similar boiling point as propane.()Accumulation in housesLognormal distribution.gif|thumb|300px|Typical log-normal radon distribution in dwellings.The phenomenon of heightened radon contamination in homes was discovered by chance in 1985 after the stringent radiation testing conducted at a nuclear power plant entrance revealed that Stanley Watras, an engineer entering the plant, was contaminated by radioactive substances.() Typical domestic exposures are of approximately 100 Bq/m3 indoors. Depending on how houses are built and ventilated, radon may accumulate in basements and dwellings. Radon concentrations in the same location may differ by a factor of two over a period of 1 hour. Also, the concentration in one room of a building may be significantly different than the concentration in an adjoining room.(The distribution of radon concentrations tends to be asymmetrical around the average, the larger concentrations have a disproportionately greater weight. Indoor radon concentration is usually assumed to follow a distribution on a given territory.(Numerous references, see for instance Analysis And Modelling Of Indoor Radon Distributions Using Extreme Values Theory or Indoor Radon in Hungary (Lognormal Mysticism) for a discussion.) Thus, the mean is generally used for estimating the average radon concentration in an area.()The mean concentration ranges from less than 10 Bq/m3 to over 100 Bq/m3 in some European countries.( ) Typical standard deviations found in studies range between 2 and 3, meaning (given the rule) that the radon concentration is expected to be more than a hundred times the mean concentration for 2 to 3% of the cases.The highest average radon concentrations in the United States are found in Iowa and in the Appalachian Mountain areas in southeastern Pennsylvania.() Some of the highest readings ever have been recorded in the Irish town of County Cork, prompting local fears regarding lung cancer. Iowa has the highest average radon concentrations in the United States due to significant glaciation that ground the granitic rocks from the Shield and deposited it as soils making up the rich Iowa farmland.() Many cities within the state, such as City, have passed requirements for radon-resistant construction in new homes.In a few locations, tailings have been used for landfills and were subsequently built on, resulting in possible increased exposure to radon.(Industrial productionRadon is obtained as a by-product of uraniferous ores processing after transferring into 1% solutions of hydrochloric or acids. The gas mixture extracted from the solutions contains , , He, Rn, ,  and hydrocarbons. The mixture is purified by passing it over copper at 720 C to remove the  and the , and then KOH and  are used to remove the acids and moisture by sorption. Radon is condensed by liquid nitrogen and purified from residue gases by sublimation.()Radon commercialization is regulated, but it is available in small quantities for the calibration of 222Rn measurement systems, at a price of almost $6,000 per milliliter of radium solution (which only contains about 15 picograms of actual radon at a given moment).()Radon is produced by a solution of radium-226 (half-life of 1600 years). Radium-226 decays by alpha-particle emission, producing radon which collects over samples of radium-226 at a rate of about 1 mm3/day per gram of radium; equilibrium is quickly achieved and radon is produced in a steady flow, with an activity equal to that of the radium (50 Bq). Gaseous 222Rn (half-life of about four days) escapes from the capsule through diffusion.()Concentration scaleApplicationsMedicalAn early-20th-century form of quackery was the treatment of maladies in a radiotorium.() It was a small, sealed room for patients to be exposed to radon for its medicinal effects. The carcinogenic nature of radon due to its ionizing radiation became apparent later on. Radons molecule-damaging radioactivity has been used to kill cancerous cells.() It does not, however, increase the health of healthy cells. Just the opposite, in fact. The ionizing radiation causes the formation of radicals, which results in genetic and other cell damage, resulting in increased rates of illness, including cancer.thumb|An apparatus for (allegedly) dissolving radon into drinking water, in a restaurant in JapanExposure to radon, a process known as hormesis, has been suggested to mitigate diseases such as arthritis.()() As a result, in the late 20th century and early 21st century, some health mines were established in Montana which attracted people seeking relief from health problems such as arthritis through limited exposure to radioactive mine water and radon. The practice is controversial because of the well-documented ill effects of high-dose radiation on the body.() Radon has nevertheless been found to induce beneficial long-term effects.()Radioactive water baths have been applied since 1906 in Jchymov, Republic, but even before radon discovery they were used in Gastein, Austria. Radium-rich springs are also used in traditional Japanese onsen in Misasa, Prefecture. Drinking therapy is applied in Brambach, Germany. Inhalation therapy is carried out in Gasteiner-Heilstollen, Austria, in wieradw-Zdrj, Czerniawa-Zdrj, Kowary, Zdrj, Poland, in Bi, Romania, and in Boulder, United States. In the United States and Europe there are several radon spas, where people sit for minutes or hours in a high-radon atmosphere in the belief that low doses of radiation will invigorate or energize them.(()Radon has been produced commercially for use in radiation therapy, but for the most part has been replaced by radionuclides made in accelerators and reactors. Radon has been used in implantable seeds, made of gold or glass, primarily used to treat cancers.The gold seeds were produced by filling a long tube with radon pumped from a radium source, the tube being then divided into short sections by crimping and cutting. The gold layer keeps the radon within, and filters out the alpha and beta radiations, while allowing the rays to escape (which kill the diseased tissue). The activities might range from 0.05 to 5 millicuries per seed (2 to 200 MBq).( The gamma rays are produced by radon and the first short-lived elements of its decay chain (218Po, 214Pb, 214Bi, 214Po).Radon and its first decay products being very short-lived, the seed is left in place. After 12 half-lives (43 days), radon radioactivity is at 1/2000 of its original level. At this stage, the predominant residual activity originates from the radon decay product 210Pb, whose half-life (22.3 year) is 2000 times that or radon (and whose activity is thus 1/2000 of radons), and its descendants 210Bi and 210Po, totalizing 0.03% of the initial seed activity.In the early part of the 20th century in the USA, gold which was contaminated with 210Pb entered the jewelry industry. This was from gold seeds which had held 222Rn that had been melted down after the radon had decayed.()()Wearing a contaminated ring could lead to a skin exposition of 10 to 100 rad/day (0.4 to 4 mSv/h)()ScientificRadon emanation from the soil varies with soil type and with surface uranium content, so outdoor radon concentrations can be used to track air masses to a limited degree. This fact has been put to use by some atmospheric scientists. Because of radons rapid loss to air and comparatively rapid decay, radon is used in hydrologic research that studies the interaction between ground water and streams. Any significant concentration of radon in a stream is a good indicator that there are local inputs of ground water. Radon is also used in the dating of oil-containing soils because radon has a high affinity for oil-like substances.Radon soil-concentration has been used in an experimental way to map buried close-subsurface geological faults because concentrations are generally higher over the faults.() Similarly, it has found some limited use in prospecting for gradients.Some researchers have investigated changes in groundwater radon concentrations for prediction.(Igarashi, G. & Wakita, H. (1995). Geochemical and hydrological observations for earthquake prediction in Japan, Journal of the Physics of the Earth, 43, 585598.)(Wakita, H., (1996). Earthquake chemistry II, collected papers, edn, Vol. II, Laboratory for Earthquake Chemistry, Faculty of Science, University of Tokyo, Japan)() Radon has a half-life of approximately 3.8 days, which means that it can be found only shortly after it has been produced in the radioactive decay chain. For this reason, it has been hypothesized that increases in radon concentration is due to the generation of new cracks underground, which would allow increased ground water circulation, flushing out radon. The generation of new cracks might not unreasonably be assumed to precede major earthquakes. In the 1970s and 1980s, scientific measurements of radon emissions near faults found that earthquakes often occurred with no radon signal, and radon was often detected with no earthquake to follow. It was then dismissed by many as an unreliable indicator.() However, as of 2009, it is under investigation as a possible precursor by NASA.()Radon is a known pollutant emitted from geothermal power stations, though it disperses rapidly, and no radiological hazard has been demonstrated in various investigations. The trend in geothermal plants is to reinject all emissions by pumping deep underground, and this seems likely to ultimately decrease such radon hazards further.In the 1950s, radon has been used in industrial radiography.()Health epidemiologyRadon-222 has been classified by Agency for Research on Cancer as being carcinogenic to humans,() and as a gas that can be inhaled, lung cancer is a particular concern for people exposed to high levels of radon for sustained periods of time. During the 1940s and 50s, when safety standards requiring expensive ventilation in mines were not widely implemented,() radon exposure was linked to lung cancer among non-smoking miners of uranium and other hard rock materials in what is now the Republic, and later among miners from the Southwestern United States.()()()Since that time, ventilation and other measures have been used to reduce radon levels in most affected mines that continue to operate. In recent years, the average annual exposure of uranium miners has fallen to levels similar to the concentrations inhaled in some homes. This has reduced the risk of occupationally induced cancer from radon, although health issues may persist for those who are currently employed in affected mines and for those who have been employed in them in the past.( As the relative risk for miners has decreased, so has the ability to detect excess risks among that population.() Radon exposure (actually radon progeny) has been linked to lung cancer in numerous case-control studies performed in the United States, Europe and China. There are approximately 20,000 deaths per year in the USA due to radon-induced lung cancers.(American Lung Association. Lungusa.org (2009-09-14). Retrieved on 2011-08-20.)One of the most comprehensive radon studies performed in the United States by Dr. William Field and colleagues found a 50% increased lung cancer risk even at the protracted exposures at the EPAs action level of 4 pCi/L. North American and European Pooled analyses further support these findings.(Reducing Environmental Cancer Risk  What We Can Do Now. US Department of Health and Human Services. 20082009 Annual Report) Many researchers have highlighted a theoretical possible increased risk of leukemia of radon, but empirical support for this has not emerged.()() The effects of radon if ingested are similarly unknown, although studies have found that its biological half-life ranges from 3070 minutes, with 90 percent removal at 100 minutes. In 1999 National Research Council investigated the issue of radon in drinking water. The risks associated with ingestion was considered almost negligible.(Risk Assessment of Radon in Drinking Water. Nap.edu (2003-06-01). Retrieved on 2011-08-20.)Domestic-level exposureFile:Radon and Cancer by Cohen.GIF|thumb|A controversial epidemiological study showing decreased cancer risk vs. radon domestic exposure (5 pCi/L  200 Bq/m3).() This study lacks individual level controls for smoking and radon exposure, and therefore lacks statistical power to draw conclusions on what would be hormesis. Because of this the error bars (which simply reflect the raw data variability) are probably too small.()Most models of residential radon exposure are based on studies of miners, and direct estimates of the risks posed to homeowners would be more desirable.( Nonetheless, because of the difficulties of measuring the risk of radon relative to other contributorsnamely smokingmodels of their effect have often made use of them.Radon has been considered the second leading cause of lung cancer and leading environmental cause of cancer mortality by the States Environmental Protection Agency.() Others have reached similar conclusions for the United Kingdom () and France.() Radon exposure in homes and offices may arise from certain subsurface rock formations and also from certain building materials (e.g. some granites); greatest risk of radon exposure arises from buildings which are tight, insufficiently ventilated and have leaks that let in soil air from the ground into basements and dwelling rooms.The actionable concentration of radon in a home varies depending on the organization doing the recommendation, for example, the United States Environmental Protection Agency encourages that action be taken at concentrations as low as 74 Bq/m3 (2 pCi/L),() and the Union recommends action be taken when concentrations reach 400 Bq/m3 (11 pCi/L) for old houses and 200 Bq/m3 (5 pCi/L) for new ones.On 8 July 2010 the UKs Health Protection Agency issued new advice setting a Target Level of 100 Bq/m3 whilst retaining an Action Level of 200 Bq/m3.()Radon and smokingResults from epidemiological studies indicate that the risk of lung cancer increases with exposure to residential radon. However, there are always major uncertainties in this studies. A classical and well-known example of source of error is smoking.In addition, smoking is the most important risk factor for lung cancer. In the West, tobacco smoke is estimated to cause about 90% of all lung cancers. There is a tendency for other hypothetical lung cancer risks to drown in the risk of smoking. Results from epidemiological studies must always be interpreted with caution.Radon, like other known or suspected external risk factors for lung cancer, is a threat for smokers and former smokers. This was clearly demonstrated by the European pooling study.() A commentary(Replies to Radon in homes and risk of lung cancer: collaborative analysis of individual data from 13 European case-control studies. Bmj.com. Retrieved on 2011-08-20.) to the pooling study stated: it is not appropriate to talk simply of a risk from radon in homes. The risk is from smoking, compounded by a synergistic effect of radon for smokers. Without smoking, the effect seems to be so small as to be insignificant.A study() of radiation from postmastectomy radiotherapy shows that the simple models previously used to assess the combined and separate risks from radiation and smoking need to be developed. This is also supported by new discussion about the calculation method, LNT, which routinely has been used.()Radon and passive smokingAn important question is if also passive smoking can cause a similar synergy effect with residential radon. This has been insufficiently studied. The basic data for the European pooling study makes it impossible to exclude that such synergy effect is an explanation for the (very limited) increase in the risk from radon that was stated for non-smokers.A study(Lagarde et al., Residential radon and lung cancer among never-smokers in Sweden. Epidemiology, 2001) from 2001 which included 436 cases (never smokers who had lung cancer), and a control group (1649 never smokers) showed that exposure to radon increased the risk of lung cancer in never smokers. But the group that had been exposed to passive smoking at home appeared to bear the entire risk increase, while those who were not exposed to passive smoking did not show any increased risk with increasing radon level.This needs confirmation by additional studies. Although the startling results from 2001 new studies seems not to have been implemented.Testing and mitigationthumb|A radon test kit.There are relatively simple tests for radon gas, but these tests are not commonly done, even in areas of known systematic hazards. Radon test kits are commercially available. The short-term radon test kits used for screening purposes are inexpensive, in many cases free. The kit includes a collector that the user hangs in the lowest livable floor of the house for 2 to 7 days. The user then sends the collector to a laboratory for analysis. Long term kits, taking collections for up to one year, are also available. An open-land test kit can test radon emissions from the land before construction begins.(Radon levels fluctuate naturally, due to factors like transient weather conditions, so an initial test might not be an accurate assessment of a homes average radon level. Therefore, a high result (over 4 pCi/L) justifies repeating the test before undertaking more expensive abatement projects. Measurements between 4 and 10 pCi/L warrant a long term radon test. Measurements over 10 pCi/L warrant only another short term test so that abatement measures are not unduly delayed. Purchasers of real estate are advised to delay or decline a purchase if the seller has not successfully abated radon to 4 pCi/L or less.(Because the half-life of radon is only 3.8 days, removing or isolating the source will greatly reduce the hazard within a few weeks. Another method of reducing radon levels is to modify the buildings ventilation. Generally, the indoor radon concentrations increase as ventilation rates decrease.( In a well ventilated place, the radon concentration tends to align with outdoor values (typically 10 Bq/m3, ranging from 1 to 100 Bq/m3).(Radon levels in indoor air can be lowered in a number of ways, from sub-slab depressurization to increasing the ventilation rate of the building. The four principal ways of reducing the amount of radon accumulating in a house are:(()*Sub-slab depressurization (soil suction) by increasing under-floor ventilation;*Improving the ventilation of the house and avoiding the transport of radon from the basement into living rooms;*Installing a radon sump system in the basement;*Installing a positive pressurization or positive supply ventilation system.According to the EPAs A Citizens Guide to Radon,() the method to reduce radon primarily used is a vent pipe system and fan, which pulls radon from beneath the house and vents it to the outside, which is also called sub-slab depressurization, active soil depressurization, or soil suction. Generally indoor radon can be mitigated by sub-slab depressurization and exhausting such radon-laden air to the outdoors, away from windows and other building openings. EPA generally recommends methods which prevent the entry of radon. Soil suction, for example, prevents radon from entering your home by drawing the radon from below the home and venting it through a pipe, or pipes, to the air above the home where it is quickly diluted and EPA does not recommend the use of sealing alone to reduce radon because, by itself, sealing has not been shown to lower radon levels significantly or consistently according to the EPAs Consumers Guide to Radon Reduction: How to fix your home.() Positive-pressure ventilation systems can be combined with a heat exchanger to recover energy in the process of exchanging air with the outside, and simply exhausting basement air to the outside is not necessarily a viable solution as this can actually draw radon gas into a dwelling. Homes built on a crawl space may benefit from a radon collector installed under a radon barrier (a sheet of plastic that covers the crawl space).(() For crawlspaces, the EPA states An effective method to reduce radon levels in crawlspace homes involves covering the earth floor with a high-density plastic sheet. A vent pipe and fan are used to draw the radon from under the sheet and vent it to the outdoors. This form of soil suction is called submembrane suction, and when properly applied is the most effective way to reduce radon levels in crawlspace homes.(See also*Radon Project*cell*Exposure Compensation Act*RadiohaloReferencesExternal links*Toxicological Profile for Radon, Draft for Public Comment, Agency for Toxic Substances and Disease Registry, September 2008*Health Effects of Exposure to Radon: BEIR VI. Committee on Health Risks of Exposure to Radon (BEIR VI), National Research Council available on-line*UNSCEAR 2000 Report to the General Assembly, with scientific annexes: Annex B: Exposures from natural radiation sources.*Should you measure the radon concentration in your home?, Phillip N. Price, Gelman, in Statistics: A Guide to the Unknown, January 2004.*Radon and radon publications at the States Environmental Protection Agency*National Radon Program Services hosted by State University*Radon Information from the UK Health Protection Agency*Frequently Asked Questions About Radon at Safety Council*Home Buyers and Sellers Guide to Radon An article by the International Association of Certified Home Inspectors (InterNACHI)*Radon and Lung Health from the American Lung Association*Radons impact on your health  Lung Association*The Geology of Radon, James K. Otton, Linda C.S. Gundersen, and R. Randall Schumann*Map referring to radon concentrations in England and Wales*EPA Federal Radon Mitigation Action Planaf:Radonar:an:Radnaz:Radonbn:be:bs:Radonbg:ca:Radcv:cs:Radonco:Radonecy:Radonda:Radonde:Radonet:Radoonel:es:Radneo:Radonoeu:Radonfa:hif:Radonfr:Radonfur:Radonga:Radngv:Raadongl:Radonhak:Tngxal:ko:hy:hi:hr:Radonio:Radonoid:Radonis:Radonit:Radonhe:jv:Radonkn:kk:sw:Radonikv:ht:Radonmrj:la:Radonlv:Radonslb:Radonlt:Radonaslij:Radonjbo:dircynavnihu:Radonmk:ml:mr:ms:Radon(element)ja:no:Radonnn:Radonoc:Radonpnb:pms:Rdonnds:Radonpl:Radonpt:Rdonro:Radonqu:Radunru:stq:Radonsq:Radoniscn:Radonsimple:Radonsk:Radnsl:Radonsr:sh:Radonfi:Radonsv:Radontl:Radonta:th:tr:Radonuk:ur:ug:vi:Radonwar:Radonyi:yo:Radonzh-yue:zh:
26007
Mass_racial_violence_in_the_United_States
Mass racial violence, also called riots can include such disparate events as:* attacks on Irish Catholics and other immigrants in the 19th century* attacks on Italian immigrants in the early 20th century and Puerto Ricans in the later 20th century* attacks on Americans that occurred in addition to the lynchings in the period after Reconstruction through the first half of the 20th century.* frequent fighting among various ethnic groups in major cities, specifically in the northeast and midwest United States throughout the late 19th century and early 20th century. This example was made famous in the stage musical West Side Story and its film adaptation.* unrest in African-American communities, such as the 1968 riots following the assassination of Luther King, Jr.Anti-immigrant and anti-Catholic violenceRiots defined by race have taken place between ethnic groups in the United States since as early as the pre-Revolution era of the 18th century. During the early-to-mid- 19th centuries, violent rioting occurred between Protestant Nativists and recently arrived  Irish Catholic immigrants.  These reached heights during the peak of immigration in the 1840s and 1850s in cities including New York, Philadelphia, and Boston.  During the early 20th century, riots were common against Irish and French-Canadian immigrants in Rhode Island.The San Francisco Vigilance Movements of 1851 and 1856 are often described by sympathetic historians as responses to rampant crime and government corruption.  In addition to lynching accused criminals, the vigilantes also systematically attacked Irish immigrants, however.  The anti-immigrant violence later focused on Mexicans and Chinese immigrants.During the late 19th century and early 20th century, Italian Americans were the second minority group (next to African Americans) most likely to be lynched.   One of the largest lynchings in US history occurred in Orleans in 1891, when eleven Italians were violently murdered in the streets by a large lynch mob. In the 1890s a total of twenty Italians were lynched in the South.  Riots and lynchings against Italian Americans erupted into the 20th century in the South, as well as in York City, Chicago, and Boston.19th century eventsLike lynchings, race riots often had their roots in economic tensions or in white defense of the color line. left|thumb|175px|Political cartoon about the East St. Louis massacres of 1917. The caption reads, Mr. President, why not make America safe for democracy?In 1887, for example, ten thousand workers at sugar plantations in Louisiana, organized by the of Labor, went on strike for an increase in their pay to $1.25 a day. Most of the workers were black, but some were white, infuriating Governor Douglas McEnery, who declared that God Almighty has himself drawn the color line. The militia was called in, but then withdrawn to give free rein to a lynch mob in Thibodaux. The mob killed between 20 and 300 people.  A black newspaper described the scene:: Six killed and five wounded is what the daily papers here say, but from an eye witness to the whole transaction we learn that no less than thirty-five Negroes were killed outright. Lame men and blind women shot; children and hoary-headed grandsires ruthlessly swept down! The Negroes offered no resistance; they could not, as the killing was unexpected. Those of them not killed took to the woods, a majority of them finding refuge in this city.(Zinn, 2004;http://web.archive.org/web/20060315064001/http://www.dougriddle.com/essays/sk20021220.html, retrieved March 27, 2009.)These events also targeted individuals, as in the 1891 mob lynching of Coe, a worker in Nebraska. Approximately 10,000 white people reportedly swarmed the courthouse when Coe was torn from his jail cell, beaten and lynched. Reportedly 6,000 people visited Coes corpse during a public exhibition at which pieces of the lynching rope were sold as souvenirs.  This was a period when even officially sanctioned executions were regularly conducted in public, such as hangings.(Bristow, D.L. (2002) A Dirty, Wicked Town. Caxton Press. p 253.)20th century eventsLabor conflict was a source of tensions that catalyzed into the St. Louis Riot of 1917. White rioters killed an estimated one hundred black residents of East St. Louis, after black residents had killed two white policemen. Image:chicago-race-riot.jpg|thumb|left|300px|A white gang looking for blacks during the Race Riot of 1919 White-on-Black race riots include the Riots (1906), the Omaha and Chicago Riots (1919), and the Tulsa Riots (1921).The Race Riot of 1919 grew out of tensions on the Southside, where Irish descendants and African Americans competed for jobs at the stockyards, and where both were crowded into substandard housing.  The Irish descendants had been in the city longer, and were organized around athletic and political clubs. left|thumb|178px|Buildings burning during the Tulsa race riot of 1921.  A young black Chicagoan, Williams, paddled a raft near a Southside Lake Michigan beach into white territory, and drowned after being hit by a rock thrown by a young white man. Witnesses pointed out the killer to a policeman, who refused to make an arrest.  An indignant black mob attacked the officer.(Chicago Daily Tribune, http://historymatters.gmu.edu/d/4975/) Violence broke out across the city.  White mobs, many of them organized around Irish athletic clubs, began pulling black people off trolley cars, attacking black businesses, and beating victims with baseball bats and iron bars. Black people fought back. Having learned from the East St. Louis Riot, the city closed down the street car system, but the rioting continued. A total of 23 blacks and 15 whites were killed.(Dray, 2002.)The 1921 Race Riot grew out of black resistance to the attempted lynching of 19-year old shoeshiner Rowland. Thirty-nine people (26 black, 13 white) were confirmed killed.  Recent investigations suggest that the actual number of casualties could be much higher.  White mobs set fire to the black Greenwood district, destroying 1,256 homes and as many as 200 businesses.  Fires leveled 35 blocks of residential and commercial neighborhood.  Black people were rounded up by the Oklahoma National Guard and put into several internment centers, including a baseball stadium. White rioters in airplanes shot at black refugees and dropped improvised kerosene bombs and dynamite on them.(Ellsworth, Scott. The Tulsa Race Riot, retrieved July 23, 2005.)By the 1960s, decades of racial, economic, and political forces, which generated inner city poverty, sparked race riots across America.  The beating and rumored death of cab driver John Smith by police, sparked the Newark riots.   This event became, per capita, one of the deadliest civil disturbances of the 1960s.  The long and short term causes of the Newark riots are explored in depth in the documentary film 67.Timeline of eventsNativist Period 1700s-1860:for information about riots worldwide, see of riots.*1829: Riot of 1829 (Cincinnati, Ohio):Rioting against African-Americans results in thousands leaving for Canada.*1829: Anti-Catholic Riots (Massachusetts)*1834: Convent Burning*1835: Points Riot (York City, New York)*1841: Riot of 1841 (Cincinnati, Ohio)*1844: Nativist Riots (May 68/July 58)*1851: Anti-German Riot*1855: Monday (Louisville, KY Anti-German Riots)Civil War Period 1861-1865*1863: New York City Draft RiotPost-Civil War and Reconstruction Period: 1865 - 1889*1866: Orleans Riot (Orleans, Louisiana)*1866: Memphis Riot of 1866 (Memphis, Tennessee)*1868: Riot (Tennessee)*1868: Opelousas, Louisiana http://www.opelousasmassacre.com/*1868: Camilla, Georgia*1868: Island Riot:Irish and German-American indigent immigrants, temporarily interned at Island by the Commissioners of Emigration, begin rioting following an altercation between two residents resulting in thirty men seriously wounded and around sixty arrested.(Riot On Wards Island.; Terrific Battle Between German and Irish Emigrants. New York Times.  06 Mar. 1868)*1870: Eutaw, Alabama*1870: Laurens, South Carolina*1870: war: Alamance County, North Carolina:Federal troops, led by Col. Kirk and requested by NC governor Holden, were sent to extinguish racial violence.  Holden was eventually impeached because of the offensive.*1870: New York City Orange Riot*1871: race riot of 1871*1871: Second New York City Orange Riot*1871: Los Angeles Anti-Chinese Riot*1871: Coal Riot:Violence occurs between striking members of a miners union in Pennsylvania when Welsh miners attack Irish and German-American miners who chose to leave the union and accept the terms offered by local mining companies.(The Coal Riot. Horrible Treatment of the Laborers by the Miners. - Condition of the Wounded - A War of Races - Welsh vs. Irish and Germans.  New York Times.  11 May 1871)*1873: massacre (Louisiana)*1874: Vicksburg, Mississippi*1874: New Orleans, Louisiana*1874: Coushatta, Louisiana*1875: Yazoo City, Mississippi*1875: Clinton, Mississippi*1876: Statewide violence in South Carolina*1876: Hamburg, South Carolina*1876: Ellenton, South Carolina*1885: Rock Springs Massacre, Wyoming*1886: Riot.*1887: Denver Riot of 1887:In one of the largest civil disturbances in the citys history, fighting between Swedish, Hungarian and Polish immigrants results in the shooting death of one man and injuring several others before broken up by police.(A Race Riot In Denver.; One Man Killed And A Number Of Heads Broken.  New York Times.  12 Apr 1887)*1887: massacre, Louisiana -- strike of 10,000 sugar-cane workers which led to a mass killing of an estimated 50 African AmericansJim Crow Period: 1890 - 1914*1891: Orleans Anti-Italian Riot:A lynch mob storms a local jail and hangs several Italians following the acquittal of several Sicilian immigrants alleged to be involved in the murder of New Orleans police chief Hennessy.*1891: 1st Omaha Race Riot:10,000 white people storm the local courthouse to beat and lynch Coe, who was alleged to have raped a white child.*1894: NY Riot of 1894:Two groups of Irish and Italian-Americans are arrested by police after a half hour of hurling bricks and shooting at each other resulting from a barroom brawl when visiting Italian patrons refused to pay for their drinks at a local saloon. After the mob is dispersed by police, five Italians are arrested while two others are sent to a local hospital.(Race Riot In Buffalo.; Italians and Irish Fight for an Hour and a Half in the Street.  New York Times.  19 Mar. 1894)*1894: Bituminous Coal Miners Strike:Much of the violence in this national strike was not specifically racial, but in Iowa, where the employees of Coal Company (Iowa) refused to join the strike, armed confrontation between strikers and strike breakers took on racial overtones because the majority of Consolidations employees were African American.  The National Guard was mobilized just in time to avert open warfare.(Thomas J. Hudson, Iowa Chapter VIII, Events from Jackson to Cummins, The Province and the States, Vol. V, the Western Historical Association, 1904; page 170)(The Natioinal Guard - Iowas Splendid Militia, The Midland Monthly, Vol. II, No. 5 Nov. 1894; page 419.)(Service at Muchakinock and Evans, in Mahaska County, During the Coal Miners Strike, Report of the Ajutant-General to the Governor of the State of Iowa for Biennial Period Ending Nov. 30, 1895, Conway, Des Moines, 1895; page 18)*1898: Race Riot*1898: City, South Carolina*1898: Greenwood County, South Carolina*1899: NY Riot:Angered towards the recent hiring of African-American workers, a group of between 80 and 100 Arab laborers attack a group of African-American workers near the Freeman & Hammond brick yard with numerous men injured on both sides.(Race Riots In Newburg.; Negroes Employed in Brick Yards Provoke Other Laborers -- Lively Battle Between the Factions.  New York Times.  29 Jul. 1899)*1900: New Orleans, Louisiana : Charles Riots*1900: New York City, New York*1902: New York City, New York Anti-Semitic riots involving Irish factory workers, city policemen and thousands of Jews attending Josephs funeral*1906: Little Rock, Arkansas. Started when a white police officer in Argenta killed a black musician in a bathroom. in aftermath, there were half a block of burned down commercial buildings, two black residencies burned down, and the departure of many blacks as white men taking arms ran down the street.(Argenta Race Riot, Encyclopedia of Arkansas History and Culture (accessed April 28, 2011).)*1906: Riots, Georgia*1908: Springfield, Illinois*1909: Town, a successful Greek immigrant community in Omaha, Nebraska is burnt to the ground and its residents are forced to leave town by a white mob.(Larsen, L. & Cotrell, B. (1997). The gate city: A history of Omaha. University of Nebraska Press. P 163.)*1910: Nationwide riots following the heavyweight championship fight between Jack Johnson and Jim Jeffries in Nevada on July 4War and Inter-War Period: 1914 - 1945*1917: St. Louis, Illinois*1917: Pennsylvania*1917: Pennsylvania*1917: Riot (1917)*Summer of 1919**1919: Washington, D.C.**1919: Chicago, Illinois**1919: Omaha, Nebraska**1919: South Carolina**1919: Texas**1919: Knoxville, Tennessee**1919: Elaine, Arkansas*1921: Tulsa, Oklahoma*1923: Rosewood, Florida (area is now an outgrowth of Key, Florida)*1935: Harlem Race Riot*1943: Detroit Race Riot*1943: Harlem Race Riot*1943: Zoot Suit Riots, Los Angeles, California*1944: Agana, GuamCivil Rights and Black Power Movements Period: 1955 - 19771963*Street Baptist Church bombing; Alabama - September1964*1964 race riot; New York - July*New York City 1964 riot; York City, New York - July*1964 race riot; Pennsylvania - August*City 1964 race riot, August 24, City, New Jersey*1964 race riot, August 1113, New Jersey*1964 race riot, August 1113, New Jersey*1964 race riot, Dixmoor riot, August 1617, Illinois1965*Riot; Los Angeles, California - August1966*Riots; Ohio - July*Point Riot; San Francisco*Street Riots; Chicago - June1967*Newark riots; New Jersey - July*Street riot; Detroit, Michigan - July*Plainfield riots; New Jersey - July*riot; Milwaukee, Wisconsin - July 3031*North Side Riots; Paul, Minnesota - August1968*massacre; South Carolina - February*125 cities in April and May, in response to the murder of Luther King, Jr. including:**riot of 1968; Baltimore Maryland**Washington, D.C. riots; D.C.**New York City riot; New York City, New York**West Side Riots; Chicago, Illinois**riots of 1968; Kentucky**District MLK riots; PA**IL Race Riot at Argo High School September 19681970*State killings; Mississippi - May*Park Riot; Park, New Jersey - July*Moratorium, an anti War protest turned riot in Los Angeles - August1971*Riots, August 1971, Camden, New Jersey1972*High School riots; Florida1977*New York City Blackout riotModern*1980: Riot 1980 - May*1991: Heights Riot - May*1992: Los Angeles riots - April 29 to May 5 - among the worst rioting in U.S. History.*2001: Cincinnati Riots - April*2009: Oakland CA, Oscar Grant Murder RiotsSee also* of riots and civil unrest in Omaha, Nebraska* timeline of race riots* of incidents of civil unrest in the United States* of United States military history events* of race riotsReferencesFurther reading* Dray, Philip. At the Hands of Persons Unknown: The Lynching of Black America, New York: Random House, 2002.* Ifill, Sherrilyn A. On the Courthouse Lawn: Confronting the Legacy of Lynching in the Twenty-first Century (Beacon Press, 2007) ISBN 978-0-8070-0987-1* Sowell, Thomas. Ethnic America: A History. Copyright 1981: Basic Books, Inc.* Zinn, Howard. Voices of a Peoples History of the United States. New York: Seven Stories Press, 2004.External links* Revolution 67 - Documentary about the Newark, New Jersey race riots of 1967* Uprisings  Urban riots of the 1960s.
26388
Reno,_Nevada
footnotes                Reno is the seat of Washoe County, Nevada, United States.  The city has a population of about 220,500(U.S. Census information) and is the most populous Nevada city outside of the Vegas metropolitan area. It sits in a high desert valley at the foot of the Sierra Nevada.Reno, known as The Biggest Little City in the World, is famous for its casinos, and is the birthplace of the gaming corporation Entertainment.  City residents are called Renoites. Reno is bordered to the east by the city of Sparks. The metropolitan area is informally called the Meadows, and consists of about 400,000 residents.()HistoryArchaeological finds place the eastern border for the prehistoric people in the Reno area.()As early as the 1850s a few pioneers settled in the Truckee Meadows, a relatively fertile valley through which the River made its way from Tahoe to Pyramid Lake. In addition to subsistence farming, these early residents could pick up business from travelers along the Trail, which followed the Truckee westward, before branching off towards Lake, where the formidable obstacle of the Sierra began.Gold was discovered in the vicinity of Virginia City in 1850 and a modest mining community developed, but the discovery of silver in 1859 at the Lode led to a mining rush.To provide the necessary connection between Virginia City and the California Trail, Charles W. Fuller built a log toll bridge across the Truckee River in 1859.  A small community that would serve to service travelers soon grew up near the bridge.  After two years, Fuller sold the bridge to C. Lake, who continued to develop the community with the addition of a grist mill, kiln, and livery stable to the hotel and eating house.  He renamed it Lakes Crossing. In 1864, Washoe County was consolidated with Roop County; Lakes Crossing became the largest town in the county. Lake had earned himself the title founder of Reno.(Guy Louis Rocha, Renos First Robber Baron, Nevada Magazine 40,2(MarchApril 1980), p. 28.)By January 1863, the Pacific Railroad (CPRR) had begun laying tracks east from Sacramento, California, eventually connecting with the Pacific Railroad at Utah to form the first transcontinental railroad. Lake deeded land to the CPRR in exchange for its promise to build a depot at Lakes Crossing.  Once the railroad station was established, the town of Reno officially came into being on May 9, 1868.()  CPRR construction superintendent Crocker named the community after Major General Jesse Lee Reno, a Union officer killed in the Civil War at the of South Mountain.In 1871 Reno became the county seat of the newly expanded Washoe County, replacing the previous county seat, located in Washoe City. However, political power in Nevada remained with the mining communities, first Virginia City and later Tonopah and Goldfield.The extension of the and Truckee Railroad to Reno in 1872 provided a boost to the new citys economy.  In the following decades, Reno continued to grow and prosper as a business and agricultural center and became the principal settlement on the transcontinental railroad between Sacramento and Salt Lake City.thumb|left|Downtown RenoAs the mining boom waned early in the 20th century, Nevadas centers of political and business activity shifted to the non-mining communities, especially Reno and Las Vegas, and today the former mining metropolises stand as little more than ghost towns.  Despite this, Nevada is still the third-largest gold producer in the world, after South Africa and Australia; the state yielded 6.9 percent of the worlds supply in 2005 world gold production.(ReviewJournal.com  News  Gold hits record high)The Arch was erected on Virginia Street in 1926 to promote the upcoming Transcontinental Highways Exposition of 1927, the arch included the words Nevadas Transcontinental Highways Exposition and the dates of the exposition. After the exposition, the Reno City Council decided to keep the arch as a permanent downtown gateway, and Mayor E.E. Roberts asked the citizens of Reno to suggest a slogan for the arch. No acceptable slogan was received until a $100 prize was offered, and G.A. Burns of Sacramento was declared the winner on March 14, 1929 with Reno, The Biggest Little City in the World.Nevadas legalization of casino gambling in 1931 and the passage of liberal divorce laws created another boom for Reno.  Pyle once wrote in one of his columns All the people you saw on the streets in Reno were obviously there to get divorces. In Rands novel Fountainhead, published in 1943, the New-York-based female protagonist tells a friend I am going to Reno, which is taken as a different way of saying I am going to divorce my husband. Among others, the Belgian-French writer Simenon, at the time living in the US, came to Reno in 1949 in order to divorce his first wife.(The divorce business eventually died as the other states fell in line by passing their own laws easing the requirements for divorce, but gambling continued as a major Reno industry. Beginning in the 1950s, the need for economic diversification beyond gaming fueled a movement for more lenient business taxation.(One of the worst disasters in the history of the region occurred on the afternoon of February 5, 1957 when an explosion ripped through the heart of downtown.  At 1:03 pm, two explosions, caused by natural gas leaking into the maze of pipes and ditches under the city, and an ensuing fire destroyed five buildings in the vicinity of Sierra and First streets along the Truckee River. Forty-nine people were injured in the disaster and two were killed.  The first explosion hit under the block of shops on the west side of Sierra Street (now the site of the Century Riverside), the second, across Sierra Street, now the site of the Palladio.The presence of a main east-west rail line, the emerging interstate highway system, favorable tax climate and relatively inexpensive land created good conditions for warehousing and distribution of goods to the growing population in the surrounding eleven western states.Reno has experienced a growing economy which has resulted in new home construction around the metro area. A direct result of this growth and the bubble has been a large increase in housing prices in the area, Reno-Sparks being named the 44th most overvalued housing market in the nation in 2006.() As of January 2007 Renos housing market has fallen by 7% bringing the median home price down to $315,000.(rsr_2007.qxd) The Nevada economy overall, while taking the unemployment rate into consideration, ranks very low in comparison to all other states. On the other hand, the state recently ranked the nations fastest growing in population (2010). Major new construction projects have been completed in the Reno & Sparks areas. A few new luxury communities were recently built in Truckee, CA, approximately 28 miles west of Reno on Interstate 80. Reno also is an outdoor recreation destination, due to close proximity to the Sierra Nevada Mountain Range, Lake Tahoe, and numerous ski resorts in the region, including Northstar-at-Tahoe. Almost all of the ski resorts on the north end of Lake Tahoe have constructed new ski lodges and made other facility improvements to cater to visitors in all seasons. Squaw Valley offers Squaw Village, a walk through village experience. Diamond Peak in Incline Village, NV just completed a newly constructed large ski lodge. The Tahoe Donner community in Truckee, CA also has made improvements to its ski resort and other facilities. Recently, Tahoe Donner Ski Resort opened Candyland Terrain Park. Squaw Valley now offers a Half Pipe and they host national events there. These ski Resorts are only a short drive from Reno.In more recent years, the city has gained some notoriety as the subject of the comedy series 911! (which is not, however, filmed in the city).Environmental factorsImage:Lakeviewlift.JPG|thumb|View of Tahoe from a Diamond Peak ski liftWetlands are an important part of the Reno/Tahoe area. They act as a natural filter for the solids that come out of the water treatment plant. Plant roots absorb nutrients from the water and naturally filter it. Wetlands are home for over 75% of the species in the Basin. However, the areas wetlands are at risk of being destroyed due to development around the city. While developers build on top of the wetlands they fill them with dirt destroying the habitat they create for the plants and animals. Washoe county has devised a plan that will help protect these ecosystems: Mitigation. In the future, when developers try to build over a wetland, they will be responsible for creating another wetland near Washoe Lake.The Truckee River serves as Renos primary source of drinking water. It supplies Reno with  of water a day during the summer, and  of water per day in the winter. Before the water goes to the homes around the Reno area, it must go to one of two treatment plants, Chalk Bluff or Glendale Water Treatment Plant. As an attempt to save water, golf courses in Reno, like Arrow Creek Golf Course, have been using treated effluent water instead of treated water from one of Renos water plants.The Reno-Sparks treatment plant discharges tertiary treated effluent to the River.  In the 1990s this capacity was increased from 20 to 30 million U.S. gallons (70 to 110 million liters) per day.  While treated, the effluent contains suspended solids, nitrogen, and phosphorus, aggravating water quality concerns of the river and its receiving waters of Pyramid Lake.  Local agencies working with the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency have developed a number of watershed management strategies to accommodate this expanded effluent discharge; to accomplish this successful outcome, the Model was developed and calibrated for the Truckee River in order to analyze the most cost effective available management strategy set.(C. Michael Hogan, Marc Papineau et al. 1987. Development of a dynamic water quality simulation model for the Truckee River, Earth Metrics Inc., Environmental Protection Agency Technology Series, Washington D.C.)  The resulting management strategies included a package of measures such as use controls in the Tahoe basin, urban runoff controls in Reno and Sparks and best management practices for wastewater discharge.GeologyReno is situated just east of the Sierra Nevada on the western edge of the Basin at an elevation of about  above sea level.  Numerous faults exist throughout the region.  Most of these are normal (vertical motion) faults associated with the uplift of the various mountain ranges, including the Sierra Nevada mountain range.In February 2008, an unusual swarm began to occur with some quakes registering between 4 and 4.5 on the magnitude scale. The earthquakes were centered around the Somersett community in Western Reno near the areas of Mogul and Verdi. Many homes in these areas were damaged.()ClimateReno sits in the rain shadow of the Sierra Nevada Mountain Range.  Annual rainfall averages . Despite this low amount of rainfall per year, Reno features a climate due to its low evapotranspiration. Annual precipitation has ranged from  in 1947 to  in 1983. The most precipitation in one month was  in December 1955 and the most precipitation in 24 hours was  on January 21, 1943.  Winter has snowfall which is usually light to moderate but can be heavy some days, averaging  annually. Snowfall varies with the lowest amounts (roughly 1923 inches annually) at the lowest part of the valley at and east of the Reno/Tahoe International airport at 4404 feet, while the foothills of the Carson range to the west ranging from 4700 to 5600 just a few miles west of downtown can receive up to 23 times as much annual snowfall. The mountains of the Virginia range to the east can receive more summer thunderstorms and precipitation, and around twice as much annual snowfall above 5500 feet. However, Snowfall increases up in the Virginia Range are less dramatic as elevation climbs than the Carson Range to the West because the Virginia Range is well within the Rain Shadow of the Sierra Nevada and Carson range. The most snowfall in one year was  in 1971 and the most snowfall in one month was  in March 1952. Most rainfall occurs in winter and spring.  The city has 300 days of sunshine per year. Summer thunderstorms can occur between April and October. The eastern side of town and the mountains east of Reno tend to be prone to thunderstorms more often and these storms may be severe because an afternoon downslope west wind, called a Washoe Zephyr, can develop in the Sierra Nevada, causing air to be pulled down in the Sierra Nevada and Reno, destroying or preventing thunderstorms but the same wind can push air upwards against the Virginia range and other mountain ranges east of Reno, creating powerful thunderstorms. Nevadas climate is unpredictable at times.()(Google Books)Summer highs are in the low to mid 90s F (3236 C), but temperatures above  occur. The July high daytime temperature peaks at an averages ; the night low ; while January high daytime temperatures average  and low night temperatures average . The record high temperature was  on July 10 and 11, 2002.  The record low temperature was  on January 8, 1890.(National Weather Service website (www.weather.gov)) In addition, the region is windy throughout the year; observers such as Twain have commented about the Zephyr, northwestern Nevadas distinctive wind.source 2  HKO()  Source no. 3: The Weather Channel()GovernmentReno has a basic democratic municipal government. The city council is the core of the government, with seven members. Five of these council people represent districts of Reno, and are vetted in the primary by the citizens of each district.In general, the top two vote earners in each ward make the ballot for the city-wide election.The other two members are the at-large, who represent the entire city, and the mayor, who is elected by the people of the city. The council has several duties, including setting priorities for the city, promoting communication with the public, planning development, and redevelopment.There is an elected attorney who is responsible for civil and criminal cases. The City Attorney represents the city government in court, and prosecutes misdemeanors.The citys charter calls for a council-manager form of government, meaning that the council appoints only two positions, the manager, who implements and enforces the policies and programs the council approves, and the clerk.The manager in charge of the budget and workforce for all city programs. The clerk, who records the proceedings of the council, makes appointments for the council, and makes sure efficient copying and printing services are available.In 2010, there was a ballot question asking whether the Reno city government and the Washoe County government should become one combined governmental body.() According to unofficial results the day after the election, 54% of voters approved of the ballot measure to consolidate the governments.()EducationUniversities and collegesImage:Reno with mountains.gif|thumb|right|An older picture showing part of the of Nevada, Reno campus in the foreground* The of Nevada, Reno is the oldest university in the state of Nevada and Nevada System of Higher Education.  In 1886, the state university, previously only a college preparatory school, moved from Elko in remote northeastern Nevada to a site north of downtown Reno, where it became a full-fledged state college. The university grew slowly over the decades, but has begun to expand rapidly along with the rest of the state and currently has an enrollment of 16,867(), with most students hailing from within Nevada.  Among its specialties are engineering, agriculture, journalism, business, and one of only two Basque Studies programs in the nation. It houses the Judicial College. The university was also named one of the top 200 colleges in the nation in the most recent U.S. News and World Report National Universities category index.* Meadows Community College (TMCC) is a regionally accredited, two year institution which is part of the Nevada System of Higher Education. The college has an enrollment of approximately 13,000 students attending classes at a primary campus and four satellite centers. The college offers a wide range of academic and university transfer programs, occupational training, career enhancement workshops, and classes just for fun. TMCC offers associate of arts, associate of science, associate of applied science or associate of general studies degrees, one-year certificates, or certificates of completion in more than 50 career fields, including architecture, auto/diesel mechanics, criminal justice, dental hygiene, graphic design, nursing, and welding.* The School of Law at Old College located in Reno was the first law school established in the state of Nevada.  Its doors were open from 19811988.* College of Northern Nevada (CCNN) is a nationally accredited trade school that trains students in technical fields that support fast growing industries.  The college is locally owned and operated.  Employer advisory boards direct the college in order to provide skill training that is relevant to industry needs.* of Phoenix  Northern Nevada Campus is located in south Reno. The university faculty is a collection business and academic professionals from the local Reno area.* Morrison University is located in the south side of Reno.Public schoolsPublic education is provided by the County School District.* Reno has eleven public high schools: Damonte Ranch, Galena, Hug, McQueen, North Valleys, Regional Technical Institute (RTI), Reno, Truckee Meadows Community College High School,(TMCC High School) Washoe, and Wooster.* There are three public high schools in neighboring Sparks, attended by many students who live in Reno: Reed, Spanish Springs, and Sparks High School.* Reno-Sparks has 13 middle schools: Billinghurst, Clayton, Cold Springs, DePoali, Dilworth, Mendive, OBrien, Pine, Shaw (Spanish Springs),Sparks, Swope, Trainer, Vaughn.* Reno-Sparks has 64 elementary schools: Allen, Anderson, Beasley, Jesse Beck, Bennett, Booth, Brown, Cannan, Caughlin Ranch, Corbett, Desert Heights, Diedrichsen, Dodson, Donner Springs, Double Diamond, Drake, Duncan, Dunn, Elmcrest, Gomes, Grace Warner, Greenbrae, Hidden Valley, Huffaker, Hunsberger, Hunter Lake, Jesse Hall, Johnson, Juniper, Lemmon Valley, Elizabeth Lenz, Lincoln Park, Echo Loder, Mathews, Maxwell, Melton, Mitchell, Moss, Mount Rose, Natchez, Palmer, Peavine, Picollo Special Education School, Pleasant Valley, Risley, Roy Gomm, Sepulveda, Sierra Vista, Silver Lake, Alice Smith, Kate Smith, Smithridge, Spanish Springs, Stead, Sun Valley, Taylor, Towles, Van Gorder, Verdi VUR-die, Veterans Memorial, Warner, Westergard, Whitehead and Sarah Winnemucca. (some schools included on this list are in Sparks)Public charter schoolsReno has many schools, which include:Academy for Career Education, serving grades 1012, opened 2002.(ACE High School) Bailey Charter Elementary School, serving grades K-6, opened 2001.(School Brief) Coral Academy of Science, serving grades K-12, opened 2000.(Coral Academy of Science ) Davidson Academy, serving grades 612, opened 2006.(Official Site) High Desert Montessori School, serving grades PreK-7, opened 2002. I Can Do Anything Charter School, serving grades 912, opened 2000.  Rainshadow Community Charter High School, serving grades 912, opened 2003.(Rainshadow Community Charter High School) Sierra Nevada Academy Charter School, serving grades PreK-8, opened 1999. TEAM A (Together Everyone Achieves More Academy), serving grades 912, opened 2004.()Alpine Academy Charter High School, serving grades 912, opened 2009. (http://alpineacademy.net/)Private schoolsReno has a few private elementary schools such as Christian School, Christian School, and Lamplight Christian School(Lamplight Christian School) as well as private high schools, the largest of which are Manogue High School(Bishop Manogue Catholic High School  Home) and Ridge School (SRS).(Sage Ridge School)LibrariesCounty Library System has locations throughout Reno and its surrounding communities.EconomyReno, including the citys famous arch over Virginia Street at night.Before the late 1950s, Reno was the gambling capital of the United States, but in the last twenty years Las Vegas rapid growth, Airlines 2000 buyout of Air and the growth of Indian gambling gaming in California have somewhat reduced its business. Older casinos were either torn down (Mapes Hotel, Fitzgeralds Nevada Club, Primadonna, Horseshoe Club, Harolds Club, Palace Club) and smaller casinos like the Comstock, Sundowner, Golden Phoenix, Kings Inn, Money Tree, Virginian, and Riverboat closed, and some converted to condos.Because of geographical proximity, Reno has traditionally drawn the majority of its California tourists and gamblers from the Francisco Bay Area and Sacramento, while Las Vegas has historically served more tourists from Southern California and the Phoenix area.Several local large hotel casinos have shown significant growth and have moved gaming further away from the Virginia Street core. These larger hotel casinos are the Atlantis, the Peppermill and the Sierra Resort. The Peppermill was chosen as the most outstanding Reno gaming/hotel property by Casino Player and Nevada magazines. In 2005, the Peppermill Hotel Casino began a $300 million dollar Tuscan-themed expansion.In an effort to bring more tourism to the area, Reno holds several events throughout the year, most of which have been extremely successful. They include August Nights() (a classic car convention), Vibrations (a motorcycle fan gathering and rally), Great Reno Balloon Race, the in the West Nugget Rib Cook-off (held in Sparks), a de Mayo celebration, bowling tournaments (held in the Bowling Stadium), and the Air Races.Several large commercial developments were constructed during the mid-2000s boom, such as Summit in 2007 and at Sparks Marina in 2008.Reno is the location of the headquarters for numerous companies, including Capital, Hamilton, of Subs, PC-Doctor, and Game Technology, which manufactures machines. Technologies and GameTech have development and manufacturing presence in Reno.DemographicsAs of the census of 2000, there were 180,480 people, 73,904 households, and 41,681 families residing in the city.  The population density was 1,008.3 per square mile (2,611.4/km).  There were 79,453 housing units at an average density of 1,149.6 per square mile (443.9/km).  The racial makeup of the city was 77.5% White, 2.6% African American, 1.3% Native American, 5.3% Asian, 0.6% Pacific Islander, 9.3% from other races, and 3.6% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 19.2% of the population. Americans made up 29.0% of the citys population.(Facfinder.census.gov)There were 73,904 households out of which 27.6% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 40.5% were married couples living together, 10.6% had a female householder with no husband present, and 43.6% were non-families. 32.6% of all households were made up of individuals and 9.2% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older.  The average household size was 2.38 and the average family size was 3.06.In the city the population was spread out with 23.2% under the age of 18, 11.8% from 18 to 24, 31.5% from 25 to 44, 22.2% from 45 to 64, and 11.4% who were 65 years of age or older.  The median age was 34 years. For every 100 females there were 104.6 males.  For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 104.0 males.The median income for a household in the city was $40,530, and the median income for a family was $49,582. Males had a median income of $33,204 versus $26,763 for females. The per capita income for the city was $22,520.  About 8.3% of families and 12.6% of the population were below the poverty line, including 16.3% of those under age 18 and 7.1% of those age 65 or over. The population was 180,480 at the 2000 census; in 2008, its population was estimated at 217,016, making it the fourth-largest city in the state after Las Vegas, Henderson and North Las Vegas, and the largest outside of Clark County.(  Reno lies  north of the Nevada state capital, Carson City, and  northeast of Tahoe in a shrub-steppe.  Reno shares its eastern border with the city of Sparks and is the larger of the principal cities of the Reno-Sparks, Nevada Metropolitan Statistical Area (MSA), a metropolitan area that covers Storey and Washoe counties.(Metropolitan statistical areas and components, of Management and Budget, May 11, 2007. Retrieved July 30, 2008.)  The MSA had a combined population of 342,885 at the 2000 census.  The MSA is combined with the Fernley Micropolitan Statistical Area to form the Reno-Sparks-Fernley Statistical Area,(Combined statistical areas and component core based statistical areas, of Management and Budget, May 11, 2007. Retrieved July 30, 2008.) which had a total population of 377,386 at the 2000 census.Transportationthumb|left|Reno Skylinein Downtown Reno|altA 6-lane freeway passing under a series of underpassesRoadsReno was historically served by the Highway and a branch of the Highway. After the formation of Highways, Route 40 was historically routed along 4th street through downtown Reno, before being replaced with Interstate 80. The primary north-south highway through Reno is U.S. Route 395.Transportation Commission of Washoe County (RTC) has a bus system that provides intracity buses, intercity buses to Carson City, and an on-demand shuttle service for disabled persons.() The bus system has its main terminal on 4th Street in downtown Reno and secondary terminals in Sparks and at Mall in south Reno.Numerous shuttle and excursion services are offered connecting the International Airport to various destinations:*South Tahoe Express provides connecting shuttle service to South Lake Tahoe Resorts.*Eastern Sierra Transit Authority provides shuttles to destinations south along the U.S. Route 395 corridor in California, such as Mountain and Lancaster*Modoc Sage Stage provides shuttles to Alturas and Susanville, along the northern US 395 corridor.RailroadsReno was historically a stopover along the Transcontinental Railroad, the modern Overland Route continues to run through Reno. Reno was historically the southern terminus of the Railway (NCO) and the northern terminus of the and Truckee Railroad. Using the NCO depot and right of way, the Pacific Railroad historically provided rail service to Reno.  Downtown Reno has two historic train depots, the inactive Railroad Depot and the still active Amtrak depot, originally built by the Pacific Railroad.Amtrak provides daily passenger service to Reno via the Zephyr and multiple Thruway Motorcoaches connecting to trains departing from California.AirThe city is served by International Airport, with general aviation traffic handled by Stead Airport. Reno/Tahoe International Airport is the second busiest commercial airport in the state of Nevada after International Airport in Las Vegas. Reno was the hub and headquarters of the defunct airline Air.UtilitiesPotable water for the City of Reno is provided by the Meadows Water Authority.  The Truckee River is the primary water source, with the purification being done at two plants, Chalk Bluff and Glendale.  The Chalk Bluff plant main intakes are west of Reno in Verdi, with the water flowing through a series of flumes and ditches to the plant itself.  Alternative intakes are located below the plant along the banks of the Truckee River itself.  The Glendale plant is sited alongside the river, and is fed by a rock and concrete rubble diversion dam a short distance upstream.()Sewage treatment for the majority of the Truckee Meadows takes place at the Truckee Meadows Water Reclamation Facility at the eastern edge of the valley.  Treated effluent returns to the Truckee River by way of Steamboat Creek.()Electrical power and natural gas are provided by Energy, formerly Sierra Pacific.  Power comes from multiple sources, including Station to the east, and the Steamboat Springs cycle power plants at the southern end of town.SportsImage:RenoEventsCenter.jpg|right|thumb|Events CenterReno is home to the Aces, the league baseball Triple-A affiliate of the Diamondbacks, and plays in Ballpark, a downtown ballpark opened in 2009.  Reno has hosted multiple semi-professional baseball teams in the past, most under the Silver Sox name.  The Reno Astros, a semi-pro unaffiliated baseball team plays at Stadium.In basketball, the Bighorns, a 2008 expansion of the Development League, plays at the Events Center.(NBA Development League: The D-League Expands to Reno)Reno is host to both amateur and professional combat sporting events such as arts and boxing.  The Fight of the Century between Jack Johnson and J. Jeffries was held in Reno in 1910.()  Boxer Mancini fought four of his last five fights in Reno against Chacon, Bramble, Camacho, and Haugen.()Reno is expected to be the future home of an ECHL ice hockey team, currently named the Raiders, but construction on a suitable arena has yet to begin as of the 20102011 season. The franchise has been dormant since 1998, when it was named the Rage, and earlier the Renegades, and played in the now defunct Coast Hockey League (WCHL).The Open is northern Nevadas only PGA TOUR event, held at Montrux Golf & Country Club in Reno. As part of the FedEx Cup, the tournament follows 132 PGA TOUR professionals competing for a share of the events $3 million purse. The Reno-Tahoe Open Foundation has donated more than $1.8 Million to local charities.Reno has a college sports scene, with the Wolf Pack appearing in football bowl games and an Associated Press Top Ten ranking in basketball in 2007.thumb|Reno Whitewater Festival at the whitewater park in RenoIn 2004, the city completed a $1.5 million whitewater park on the Truckee River in downtown Reno which hosts whitewater events throughout the year.  The course runs Class 2 and 3 rapids with year-round public access. The  north channel features more aggressive rapids, drop pools and holes for rodeo kayak-type maneuvers. The milder  south channel is set up as a kayak slalom course and a beginner area.Reno is home to two roller derby teams, the Battle Born Derby Demons and the Reno Roller Girls.() The Battle Born Derby Demons compete on flat tracks locally and nationally. They are the only Derby team locally to compete in a national Derby league.Reno is the home of the Bowling Stadium, which hosts the States Bowling Congress (USBC) Open Championships every three years.2022 Winter Olympics bidThe resort region around Lake Tahoe on the California-Nevada borders have formed the Reno-Tahoe Winter Games Coalition to make a bid for the Winter Olympics.  They cited the airport, close mountains, and compact geographic area in which the games could be held. Valley Ski Resort, which hosted the Winter Olympics, is considered a major advantage to the bid.(Reno-Taho 2018 Bid Competitive-GamesBids.com 9.20.07)RecreationImage:Tahoe.JPG|right|thumb|Winter Ski slopes overlooking TahoeReno is home to a variety of recreation activities including both seasonal and year-round. In the summer, Reno locals can be found near three major bodies of water: Tahoe, the River, and Pyramid Lake. The Truckee River originates at Lake Tahoe and flows west to east through the center of downtown Reno before terminating at Pyramid Lake to the north. The river is  a major part of Artown, held in the summer at Wingfield Park. Lake is a popular kite and windsurf location because of its high wind speeds during the summer.Skiing and snowboarding are among the most popular winter sports and draw in many tourists. There are 18 ski resorts() (8 major resorts), including Northstar-at-Tahoe, Sierra-at-Tahoe, Alpine Meadows, Valley Ski Resort, Sugar Bowl, Diamond Peak, Mountain Resort, and Rose Ski Resort located as close as eleven miles (18 km) and as far as ninety-eight miles from the Reno-Tahoe International Airport. Other popular Reno winter activities include snowshoeing, ice skating, and snowmobiling. There are many bike paths to ride in the summer time. International bike competitions are held in Lake Tahoe over the summer time.Culture* Artown* Automobile Museum* Museum of Art* Shakespeare Company* Pioneer Center For Performing Arts* Philharmonic Orchestra* Pops Orchestra* of Nevada, Reno Arboretum* D. May Arboretum and Botanical GardenNotable residents* Amick  Actress* Ault  Hall of Fame NCAA Football coach, currently coaches the Wolf Pack football team.* Babbitt  Basketball player for the Portland Trail Blazers* Bahrke   silver medalist Winter Olympics, bronze medalist Winter Olympics, and 2003 World Cup champion* Boyd  Offensive lineman for the Vikings* Chris Carr  kick returner and nickleback for the Baltimore Ravens.* XL  Rapper; owns a residence in Reno* Van Tilburg Clark  Author of Ox-Bow Incident* Clifford  Clearwater Revival drummer.* Flanigan  Actor.* Galindo  Figure skater* Gaugh  Drummer of the Band Sublime* Jim Gibbons  Governor and member of the States House of Representatives from Nevada.* Gilmartin  Golfer, Entrepreneur* Hanson  Producer-director of 8 Mile, L.A. Confidential, The Hand That Rocks the Cradle, and others.* Harman  American professional poker player.* W. Hartley (190170), Los Angeles City Council member, 193941, born in Reno* Ivens  Soap opera actress on My Children* Johnson  Basketball player for the Portland Trail Blazers* Kotsay  Professional baseball player* Lane  Former boxing referee and District Judge and a television personality on Mills Lane.* Laxalt  Governor and Senator from Nevada* London  Multiple award winning entertainer. Greg London Day July 30, 2009 Proclamation by Reno Mayor, Cashell.* MacDuff  film producer, Oakdale Pictures* Meservy  Singer-songwriter* Marotta  Boxing commentator, Los Angeles radio personality* Messenger  Professional Baseball Player.* Chuck Ruff  Winter Group drummer* Scott  Soap actor* Sossamon  Actress of A Knights Tale and Days and 40 Nights.* Stone  Actress* Vlautin  author and musician()* Buzz Von Ornsteiner  Forensic Psychologist/Television personality* Wells  Miss Nevada 1959  Actress on TV series Island.* Yamaguchi  Figure skater and Olympic Gold Medalist Albertville 1992* Conrad  Playboys Playmate of the year (1989) and Hefners ex-wife.Reno in mediaMovies filmed in Reno include:            * Cooler()   * Magnolia(DuVal.(2002) p.117)   * Hard Eight(DuVal.(2002) p.79)  * Varrick()   * Hearts(DuVal.(2002) p.51)   * The Wizard()   * Jinxed!(   * The Misfits()   * Kingpin()         * the Marbles(DuVal.(2002) p.11)    * Pink Cadillac(   * Diamonds()   * Act()  * Fathers Day(DuVal.(2002) p.19)  * Up in Reno()    * Powers in Goldmember()   * Austens Mafia!   * Pounds of Trouble         * Split(DuVal.(2002) p.13)    * Close & Personal(DuVal.(2002) p.177)   * The Pledge()    * Me Again(   * Last Don(DuVal.(2002) p.107)    * Down   * Oceans Eleven (Original)()         * Hardys Blonde Trouble(DuVal.(2002) p.5)   * Fury()   * and Howard   * Belvedere Goes to College(DuVal.(2002) p.125)   * Scarecrow(DuVal.(2002) p.220)   * Is the Wind   * to Kill (1947 film)(DuVal.(2002) p.25)   * Kickassia      Sister citiesReno has six cities:(Sister Cities International, Inc. (SCI))*  Yellowknife, Territories, Canada*  Hatzor, Israel*  Sebastian, Spain*  Udonthani, Thailand*  Taichung, Taiwan, Republic of China*  Shenzhen, Peoples Republic of China*  Nalchik, RussiaWanganui, New Zealand was a sister city from 1974 to 2009.()ReferencesExternal links* City of Reno* Reno-Sparks Convention and Visitors Authority (RSCVA)* af:Reno(Nevada)zh-min-nan:Renobs:Renobg:(Nevada)(Nevada)(Nevada)et:Reno(Nevada)(Nevado)eu:Reno(Nevada)( )NevadaNevada(Nevada)he:NevadaNevadalv:Rno(Nevada)hu:Reno(Nevada)()(Nevada)pnb:(Nevada)(Nevada)Nevadaru:Nevada(Nevada)()fi:Renosv:RenoNevada()Nevada(Nevada)Nevadayi:()
26905
Siege
File:Ultimos Momentos en Rancagua.jpg|thumb|300px|Picture of the siege of the Rancagua during the War of IndependenceA siege is a military blockade of a city or fortress with the intent of conquering by attrition or assault. The term derives from sedere, Latin for to sit.(Merriam-Webster: siege)  Generally speaking, siege warfare is a form of constant, low intensity conflict characterized by one party holding a strong, static defensive position.  Consequently, an opportunity for negotiation between combatants is not uncommon, as proximity and fluctuating advantage can encourage diplomacy.A siege occurs when an attacker encounters a city or fortress that cannot be easily taken by a de main and refuses to surrender. Sieges involve surrounding the target and blocking the reinforcement or escape of troops or provision of supplies (a tactic known as investment(Merriam-Webster: invest)), typically coupled with attempts to reduce the fortifications by means of engines, artillery bombardment, mining (also known as sapping), or the use of deception or treachery to bypass defences. Failing a military outcome, sieges can often be decided by starvation, thirst or disease, which can afflict either the attacker or defender.Sieges probably predate the development of cities as large population centres.  Ancient cities in the Middle East show archaeological evidence of having had fortified walls. During the States era of China, there is both textual and archaeological evidence of prolonged sieges and siege machinery used against the defenders of city walls. Siege machinery was also a tradition of the ancient world. During the Renaissance and the Modern period, siege warfare dominated the conduct of war in Europe. da Vinci gained as much of his renown from the design of fortifications as from his artwork.Medieval campaigns were generally designed around a succession of sieges.  In the Napoleonic era, increasing use of ever more powerful cannon reduced the value of fortifications. In the 20th century, the significance of the classical siege declined. With the advent of mobile warfare, a single fortified stronghold is no longer as decisive as it once was. While traditional sieges do still occur, they are not as common as they once were due to changes in modes of battle, principally the ease by which huge volumes of destructive power can be directed onto a static target.  Modern sieges are more commonly the result of smaller hostage, militant, or extreme resisting-arrest situations such as the Siege.Ancient eraThe necessity of city wallsThe Assyrians deployed large labour forces to build new palaces, temples and defensive walls. Some settlements in the Valley Civilization were also fortified. By about 3500 BC, hundreds of small farming villages dotted the River floodplain. Many of these settlements had fortifications and planned streets.The stone and mud brick houses of Diji were clustered behind massive stone flood dikes and defensive walls, for neighbouring communities quarreled constantly about the control of prime agricultural land. Mundigak (c. 2500 BC) in present-day southeast Afghanistan has defensive walls and square bastions of sun-dried bricks.City walls and fortifications were essential for the defense of the first cities in the Near East. The walls were built of mud bricks, stone, wood or a combination of these materials depending on local availability. They may also have served the dual purpose of showing presumptive enemies the might of the kingdom. The great walls surrounding the Sumerian city of Uruk gained such a widespread reputation. The walls were 9.5 km (6 mi) in length, and up to 12 m (40 ft) in height.Later the walls of Babylon, reinforced by towers and moats, gained a similar reputation. In Anatolia, the Hittites built massive stone walls around their cities, taking advantage of the hillsides. In Dynasty China, at the site of Ao, large walls were erected in the 15th century BC that had dimensions of 20 m (65 ft) in width at the base and enclosed an area of some  squared.(Needham, Volume 4, Part 2, 43.) The ancient Chinese capital for the State of Zhao, Handan, founded in 386 BC), also had walls that were 20 m (65 ft) wide at the base; they were 15 m (50 ft) tall, with two separate sides of its rectangular enclosure at a length of 1,530 yd (1,400 m).(The cities of the Indus Valley Civilization showed less effort in constructing defences, as did the civilization on Crete. These civilizations probably relied more on the defence of their outer borders or sea shores. Unlike the ancient Minoan civilization, the Mycenaean Greeks emphasized the need for fortifications alongside natural defenses of mountainous terrain, such as the massive Cyclopean walls built at Mycenae during the last half of the 2nd millennium BC.Archaeological evidence File:Ramesseum siege of Dapur.jpg|thumb|180px|The Egyptian of Dapur in the 13th century BC, from Ramesseum, ThebesAlthough there are depictions of sieges from the ancient Near East in historical sources and in art, there are very few examples of siege systems that have been found archaeologically. Of the few examples, several are noteworthy:*The late 9th century BC siege system surrounding es-Safi/Gath, Israel, consists of a 2.5 km long siege trench, towers and other elements, and is the earliest evidence of a circumvallation system known in the world. It was apparently built by Hazael of Aram Damascus, as part of his siege and conquest of Philistine Gath in the late 9th century BC (mentioned in Kings 12:18).*The late 8th century BC siege system surrounding the site of Lachish (Tell el-Duweir) in Israel, built by Sennacherib of Assyria in 701 BC, is not only evident in the archaeological remains, but is described in Assyrian and biblical sources and in the reliefs of Sennacheribs palace in Nineveh.*The siege of Alt-Paphos, Cyprus by the Persian army in the 4th century BC.DepictionsThe earliest representations of siege warfare have been dated to the Period of Egypt, c. 3000 BC. These show the symbolic destruction of city walls by divine animals using hoes.The first siege equipment is known from Egyptian tomb reliefs of the 24th century BC, showing Egyptian soldiers storming Canaanite town walls on wheeled siege ladders. Later Egyptian temple reliefs of the 13th century BC portray the violent of Dapur, a Syrian city, with soldiers climbing scale ladders supported by archers.Assyrian palace reliefs of the 9th to 7th centuries BC display sieges of several Near Eastern cities. Though a simple battering ram had come into use in the previous millennium, the Assyrians improved siege warfare and used huge wooden tower-shaped battering rams with archers positioned on top.In ancient China, sieges of city walls (along with naval battles) were portrayed on bronze hu vessels, like those found in Chengdu, Sichuan in 1965  which have been dated to the States Period (5th century BC to 3rd century BC).(Needham, Volume 5, Part 6, 446.)Tactics Offensivedf tg 0000158 Belagerung ^ Festung ^ Belagerungsmaschine.jpg|thumb|left|185px|Depiction of various siege machines in the mid-16th c.The most common practice of siege warfare was to lay siege and just wait for the surrender of the enemies inside, or quite commonly, to coerce someone inside to betray the fortification. During a siege a surrounding army would build earthworks (a line of circumvallation) to completely encircle their target, preventing food, water, and other supplies from reaching the besieged city. If sufficiently desperate as the siege progressed, defenders and civilians might have been reduced to eating anything vaguely edible - horses, family pets, the leather from shoes, and even each other.The Egyptian siege of Megiddo in the 15th century BC lasted for 7 months before its inhabitants surrendered. The Hittite siege of a rebellious Anatolian vassal in the 14th century BC ended when the queen mother came out of the city and begged for mercy on behalf of her people. The Hittite campaign against the kingdom of Mitanni in the 14th century BC bypassed the fortified city of Carchemish. If the main objective of a campaign was not the conquest of a particular city, it could simply be passed by. When the main objective of the campaign had been fulfilled, the Hittite army returned to Carchemish and the city fell after an eight-day siege.The well-known Siege of Jerusalem in the 8th century BC came to an end when the Israelites bought them off with gifts and tribute, according to the Assyrian account, or when the Assyrian camp was struck by mass death, according to the Biblical account. Due to logistics, long-lasting sieges involving a minor force could seldom be maintained.To end a siege more rapidly various methods were developed in ancient and medieval times to counter fortifications, and a large variety of engines were developed for use by besieging armies. Ladders could be used to escalade over the defences. rams and hooks could also be used to force through gates or walls, while  catapults, ballistae, trebuchets, mangonels, and onagers could be used to launch projectiles in order to break down a citys fortifications and kill its defenders. A tower, a substantial structure built to equal or greater height than the fortifications walls, could allow the attackers to fire down upon the defenders and also advance troops to the wall with less danger than using ladders.File:Trebuchet.jpg|thumb|right|180px|Medieval trebuchets could sling about two projectiles per hour at enemy positions.In addition to launching projectiles at the fortifications or defenders, it was also quite common to attempt to undermine the fortifications, causing them to collapse. This could be accomplished by digging a tunnel beneath the foundations of the walls, and then deliberately collapsing or exploding the tunnel. This process is known as mining. The defenders could dig counter-tunnels to cut into the attackers works and collapse them prematurely.Fire was often used as a weapon when dealing with wooden fortifications.  The Empire used fire, which contained additives that made it hard to extinguish. Combined with a primitive flamethrower, it proved an effective offensive and defensive weapon.(For example, )Disease was another effective siege weapon, although the attackers were often as vulnerable as the defenders. In some instances, catapults or similar weapons were used to fling diseased animals over city walls in an early example of warfare. If all else failed, a besieger could claim the booty of his conquest undamaged, and retain his men and equipment intact, for the price of a well-placed bribe to a disgruntled gate-keeper.DefensiveThe universal method for defending against siege is the use of fortifications, principally walls and ditches to supplement natural features. A sufficient supply of food and water was also important to defeat the simplest method of siege warfare: starvation. On occasion, the defenders would drive surplus civilians out to reduce the demands on stored food and water.During the States Period in China (481221 BC), warfare lost its honorable, gentlemens duty that was found in the previous era of the and Autumn Period, and became more practical, competitive, cut-throat, and efficient for gaining victory. The Chinese invention of the hand-held, trigger-mechanism crossbow during this period revolutionized warfare, giving greater emphasis to infantry and cavalry and less to traditional chariot warfare.The philosophically-pacifist Mohists (followers of the philosopher Mozi) of the 5th century BC believed in aiding the defensive warfare of smaller Chinese states against the hostile offensive warfare of larger domineering states. The Mohists were renowned in the smaller states (and the enemies of the larger states) for the inventions of siege machinery to scale or destroy walls. These included traction trebuchet catapults, eight-foot-high ballistas, a wheeled siege ramp with grappling hooks known as the Cloud Bridge (the protractable, folded ramp slinging forward by means of a counterweight with rope and pulley), and wheeled hook-carts used to latch large iron hooks onto the tops of walls to pull them down.File:Ireland-Cahir Castle.jpg|thumb|upright|Castle in Ireland was besieged and captured three times: in 1599 by the Earl of Essex, in 1647 by Lord Inchiquin, and in 1650 by Cromwell.When enemies attempted to dig tunnels under walls for mining or entry into the city, the defenders used large bellows (the type the Chinese commonly used in heating up a furnace for smelting iron) to pump smoke into the tunnels in order to suffocate the intruders.Advances in the prosecution of sieges in ancient and medieval times naturally encouraged the development of a variety of defensive counter-measures. In particular, fortifications became progressively strongerfor example, the advent of the castle from the period of the Crusadesand more dangerous to attackerswitness the increasing use of machicolations and murder-holes, as well the preparation of hot or incendiary substances. slits (also called arrow loops or loopholes), ports (airlock-like doors) for sallies, and deep water wells were also integral means of resisting siege at this time. Particular attention would be paid to defending entrances, with gates protected by drawbridges, portcullises  and barbicans. Moats and other water defences, whether natural or augmented, were also vital to defenders.In the European Ages, virtually all large cities had city wallsDubrovnik in Dalmatia is an impressive and well-preserved exampleand more important cities had citadels, forts or castles. Great effort was expended to ensure a good water supply inside the city in case of siege. In some cases, long tunnels were constructed to carry water into the city. Complex systems of underground tunnels were used for storage and communications in medieval cities like Tbor in Bohemia, similar to those used much later in Vietnam during the War.Until the invention of gunpowder-based weapons (and the resulting higher-velocity projectiles), the balance of power and logistics definitely favored the defender. With the invention of gunpowder, cannon and (in modern times) mortars and howitzers, the traditional methods of defence became less effective against a determined siege.Siege accountsAlthough there are numerous ancient accounts of cities being sacked, few contain any clues to how this was achieved. Some popular tales existed on how the cunning heroes succeeded in their sieges. The best-known is the Horse of the War, and a similar story tells how the Canaanite city of Joppa was conquered by the Egyptians in the 15th century BC. The Biblical of Joshua contains the story of the miraculous of Jericho.A more detailed historical account from the 8th century BC, called the Piankhi stela, records how the Nubians laid siege to and conquered several Egyptian cities by using battering rams, archers, and slingers and building causeways across moats.Greco-Roman erathe Greats Macedonian army successfully besieged many powerful cities during his astounding conquests. Two of his most impressive achievements in siegecraft took place in the Siege of Tyre and the of the Sogdian Rock. His engineers built a causeway that was originally 60 m (200 ft) wide and reached the range of his torsion-powered artillery, while his soldiers pushed towers housing stone throwers and light catapults to bombard the city walls.Most conquerors before him had found Tyre, a Phoenician island-city about 1 km from the mainland, impregnable. The Macedonians built a mole, a raised spit of earth across the water, by piling stones up on a natural land bridge that extended underwater to the island, and although the Tyrians rallied by sending a fire-ship to destroy the towers, and captured the mole in a swarming frenzy, the city eventually fell to the Macedonians after a seven-month siege. In complete contrast to Tyre, Sogdian Rock was captured by stealthy attack. Alexander used commando-like tactics to scale the cliffs and capture the high ground, and the demoralized defenders surrendered.The importance of siege warfare in the ancient period should not be underestimated. One of the contributing causes of Hannibals inability to defeat Rome was his lack of a train, thus, while he was able to defeat Roman armies in the field, he was unable to capture Rome itself. The legionary armies of the Republic and Empire are noted as being particularly skilled and determined in siege warfare. An astonishing number and variety of sieges, for example, formed the core of Julius Caesars mid-1st century BC conquest of Gaul (modern France).In his de Bello Gallico (Commentaries on the Gallic War), Caesar describes how at the of Alesia the legions created two huge fortified walls around the city. The inner circumvallation, , held in Vercingetorixs forces, while the outer contravallation kept relief from reaching them. The Romans held the ground in between the two walls. The besieged Gauls, facing starvation, eventually surrendered after their relief force met defeat against Caesars auxiliary cavalry.The Sicarii Zealots who defended Masada in 73 AD were defeated by the Roman legions who built a ramp 100 m high up to the fortresss west wall.Chinese and MongolsIn the Middle Ages, the Empires campaign against China (then comprising the Xia Dynasty, Jin Dynasty, and Song Dynasty) by Khan until Khan, who eventually established the Dynasty in 1271, with their armies was extremely effective, allowing the Mongols to sweep through large areas. Even if they could not enter some of the more well-fortified cities, they used innovative battle tactics to grab hold of the land and the people::By concentrating on the field armies, the strongholds had to wait. Of course, smaller fortresses, or ones easily surprised, were taken as they came along. This had two effects. First, it cut off the principal city from communicating with other cities where they might expect aid. Secondly, refugees from these smaller cities would flee to the last stronghold. The reports from these cities and the streaming hordes of refugees not only reduced the morale of the inhabitants and garrison of the principal city, it also strained their resources. Food and water reserves were taxed by the sudden influx of refugees. Soon, what was once a formidable undertaking became easy. The Mongols were then free to lay siege without interference of the field army as it had been destroyed... At the siege of Aleppo, Hulegu used twenty catapults against the Bab al-Iraq (Gate of Iraq) alone. In Jzjn, there are several episodes in which the Mongols constructed hundreds of siege machines in order to surpass the number which the defending city possessed. While Jzjn surely exaggerated, the improbably high numbers which he used for both the Mongols and the defenders do give one a sense of the large numbers of machines used at a single siege.Another Mongol tactic was to use catapults to launch corpses of plague victims into besieged cities. The disease-carrying fleas from the bodies would then infest the city, and the plague would spread allowing the city to be easily captured, although this transmission mechanism was not known at the time. In 1346 the bodies of Mongol warriors of the Horde who had died of plague were thrown over the walls of the besieged Crimean city of Kaffa (now Feodosiya). It has been speculated that this operation may have been responsible for the advent of the Death in Europe.p The Black Death is estimated to have killed 30%  60% of Europes population.On the first night while laying siege to a city, the leader of the Mongol forces would lead from a white tent: if the city surrendered, all would be spared. On the second day, he would use a red tent: if the city surrendered, the men would all be killed, but the rest would be spared. On the third day, he would use a black tent: no quarter would be given.File:Ulsan waesung attack.jpg|thumb|Chinese and Korean troops assault the Japanese forces of Hideyoshi in the of Ulsan Castle during the War (15921598).However, the Chinese were not completely defenceless, and from 1234 until 1279 AD the Southern Song Chinese held out against the enormous barrage of Mongol attacks. Much of this success in defense lay in the worlds first use of gunpowder (i.e. with early flamethrowers, grenades, firearms, cannons, and mines) to fight back against the Khitans, the Tanguts, the Jurchens, and then the Mongols.The Chinese of the Song period also discovered the explosive potential of packing hollowed cannonball shells with gunpowder. Written later around 1350 in the Huo Long Jing, this manuscript of Yu recorded an earlier Song-era cast-iron cannon known as the flying-cloud thunderclap eruptor (fei yun pi-li pao). The manuscript stated that (Wade-Giles spelling):The shells (phao) are made of cast iron, as large as a bowl and shaped like a ball. Inside they contain half a pound of magic gunpowder (shen huo). They are sent flying towards the enemy camp from an eruptor (mu phao); and when they get there a sound like a thunder-clap is heard, and flashes of light appear. If ten of these shells are fired successfully into the enemy camp, the whole place will be set ablaze...(Needham, Volume 5, Part 7, 264.)During the Dynasty (13681644 AD), the Chinese were very concerned with city planning in regards to gunpowder warfare. The site for constructing the walls and the thickness of the walls in Beijings City were favored by the Chinese Emperor (r. 14021424), because they were in pristine position to resist cannon volley and were built thick enough to withstand attacks from cannon fire.For more see of the Song Dynasty.Age of gunpowderof Constantinople.jpg|thumb|left|170px|Turks laid siege to Constantinople  for nearly two months in 1453. Other sieges lasted even much longer.The introduction of gunpowder and the use of cannons brought about a new age in siege warfare. Cannons were first used in Dynasty China during the early 13th century, but did not become significant weapons for another 150 years or so. By the 16th century, they were an essential and regularized part of any campaigning army, or castles defences.The greatest advantage of cannons over other siege weapons was the ability to fire a heavier projectile, further, faster and more often than previous weapons. They could also fire projectiles in a straight line, so that they could destroy the bases of high walls. Thus, old fashioned walls - that is high and, relatively, thin - were excellent targets and, over time, easily demolished. In 1453, the great walls of Constantinople, the capital of the Empire, were broken through in just six weeks by the 62 cannons of IIs army.File:Sixteenth Century Cannon2.jpg|thumb|right|160px|Late 16th c. illustration of Cannon with gabions.However, new fortifications, designed to withstand gunpowder weapons, were soon constructed throughout Europe. During the Renaissance and the Modern period, siege warfare continued to dominate the conduct of the European wars.Once siege guns were developed the techniques for assaulting a town or a fortress became well known and ritualized. The attacking army would surround a town. Then the town would be asked to surrender. If they did not comply the besieging army would surround the town with temporary fortifications to stop allies from the stronghold or relief getting in. The attackers would then build a length of trenches parallel to the defences and just out of range of the defending artillery. They would then dig a trench towards the town in a zigzag pattern so that it could not be enfiladed by defending fire. Once within artillery range another parallel trench would be dug with gun emplacements. This was called sapping.If necessary using the first artillery fire for cover this process would be repeated until guns were close enough to be laid accurately to make a breach in the fortifications. In order to allow the hope and support troops to get close enough to exploit the breach, more zigzag trenches could be dug even closer to the walls with more parallel trenches to protect and conceal the attacking troops. After each step in the process the besiegers would ask the besieged to surrender. If the forlorn hope stormed the breach successfully the defenders could expect no mercy.Emerging theoriesThe castles that in earlier years had been formidable obstacles were easily breached by the new weapons. For example, in Spain, the newly equipped army of and Isabella was able to conquer Moorish strongholds in Granada in 1482&ndash;92 that had held out for centuries before the invention of cannons.In the early 15th century, Italian architect Battista Alberti wrote a treatise entitled De Re aedificatoria which theorized methods of building fortifications capable of withstanding the new guns. He proposed that walls be built in uneven lines, like the teeth of a saw. He proposed star-shaped fortresses with low thick walls.However, few rulers paid any attention to his theories. A few towns in Italy began building in the new style late in the 1480s, but it was only with the French invasion of the Italian peninsula in 1494&ndash;95 that the new fortifications were built on a large scale. Charles VIII invaded Italy with an army of 18,000 men and a horse-drawn siege-train. As a result he could defeat virtually any city or state, no matter how well defended. In a panic, military strategy was completely rethought throughout the Italian states of the time, with a strong emphasis on the new fortifications that could withstand a modern siege.New fortressesThe most effective way to protect walls against cannon fire proved to be depth (increasing the width of the defences) and angles (ensuring that attackers could only fire on walls at an oblique angle, not square on). Initially walls were lowered and backed, in front and behind, with earth. Towers were reformed into triangular bastions. This design matured into the italienne. Star-shaped fortresses surrounding towns and even cities with outlying defences proved very difficult to capture, even for a well equipped army. Fortresses built in this style throughout the 16th century did not become fully obsolete until the 19th century, and were still in use throughout War I (though modified for 20th century warfare). During World War II trace italienne fortresses could still present a formidable challenge, for example in the last days of World War II, during the in Berlin that saw some of the heaviest urban fighting of the war, the Soviets did not attempt to storm the Citadel (built between 1559 and 1594) but chose to invest it and negotiate its surrender.However, the cost of building such vast modern fortifications was incredibly high, and was often too much for individual cities to undertake. Many were bankrupted in the process of building them; others, such as Siena, spent so much money on fortifications that they were unable to maintain their armies properly, and so lost their wars anyway. Nonetheless, innumerable large and impressive fortresses were built throughout northern Italy in the first decades of the 16th century to resist repeated French invasions that became known as the Wars. Many stand to this day.In the 1530s and 1540s, the new style of fortification began to spread out of Italy into the rest of Europe, particularly to France, the Netherlands, and Spain. Italian engineers were in enormous demand throughout Europe, especially in war-torn areas such as the Netherlands, which became dotted by towns encircled in modern fortifications. The densely populated areas of Italy and the United Provinces (the Netherlands) were infamous for their high degree of fortification of cities. It made campaigns in these areas very hard to successfully conduct, considering even minor cities had to be captured by siege within the span of the campaigning season. In the Dutch case, the possibility of flooding large parts of the land provided an additional obstacle to besiegers, for example at the of Leiden. For many years, defensive and offensive tactics were well balanced leading to protracted and costly wars such as Europe had never known, involving more and more planning and government involvement. The new fortresses ensured that war rarely extended beyond a series of sieges. Because the new fortresses could easily hold 10,000 men, an attacking army could not ignore a powerfully fortified position without serious risk of counterattack. As a result, virtually all towns had to be taken, and that was usually a long, drawn-out affair, potentially lasting from several months to years, while the members of the town were starved to death. Most battles in this period were between besieging armies and relief columns sent to rescue the besieged.Marshal Vauban and Van CoehoornFile:Vauban-fortress.jpg|thumb|220px|Vauban refined siege warfare by designing fortresses to withstand attacks and planning attacks.At the end of the 17th century, two influential military engineers, the French Marshal Vauban and the Dutch military engineer van Coehoorn, developed modern fortification to its pinnacle, refining siege warfare without fundamentally altering it: ditches would be dug; walls would be protected by glacis; and bastions would enfilade an attacker. Both engineers developed their ideas independently but came to similar general rules regarding defensive construction and offensive action against fortifications. Both were skilled in conducting sieges and defences themselves. Before Vauban and Van Coehoorn, sieges had been somewhat slapdash operations. Vauban and Van Coehoorn refined besieging to a science with a methodical process that, if uninterrupted, would break even the strongest fortifications. Examples of their styles of fortifications are Arras (Vauban) and the no-longer existant fortress of op Zoom (Van Coehoorn). The main differences between the two lay in the difference in terrain on which Vauban and Van Coehoorn constructed their defences: Vauban in the sometimes more hilly and mountainous terrain of France, Van Coehoorn in the flat and floodable lowlands of the Netherlands.Planning and maintaining a siege is just as difficult as fending one off.  A besieging army must be prepared to repel both sorties from the besieged area and also any attack that may try to relieve the defenders. It was thus usual to construct lines of trenches and defenses facing in both directions.  The outermost lines, known as the lines of contravallation, would surround the entire besieging army and protect it from attackers.File:Neuf-Brisach 007 850.jpg|thumb|left|180px|Vaubans star-shaped fortified city of Neuf-Brisach.This would be the first construction effort of a besieging army, built soon after a fortress or city had been invested. A line of circumvallation would also be constructed, facing in towards the besieged area, to protect against sorties by the defenders and to prevent the besieged from escaping. The next line, which Vauban usually placed at about 600 meters from the target, would contain the main batteries of heavy cannons so that they could hit the target without being vulnerable themselves. Once this line was established, work crews would move forward creating another line at 250 meters. This line contained smaller guns. The final line would be constructed only 30 to 60 meters from the fortress.  This line would contain the mortars and would act as a area for attack parties once the walls were breached. Van Coehoorn developed a small and easily movable mortar named the coehorn, variations of which were used in sieges until the nineteenth century. It would also be from this line that miners working to undermine the fortress would operate.The trenches connecting the various lines of the besiegers could not be built perpendicular to the walls of the fortress, as the defenders would have a clear line of fire along the whole trench. Thus, these lines (known as saps) needed to be sharply jagged.File:Vienna Battle 1683.jpg|thumb|220px|The of Vienna took place in 1683 after Vienna had been besieged by the Empire for two months.Another element of a fortress was the citadel. Usually a citadel was a mini fortress within the larger fortress, sometimes designed as a reduit, but more often as a means of protecting the garrison from potential revolt in the city. The citadel was used in wartime and peacetime to keep the residents of the city in line.As in ages past, most sieges were decided with very little fighting between the opposing armies. An attackers army was poorly served incurring the high casualties that a direct assault on a fortress would entail. Usually they would wait until supplies inside the fortifications were exhausted or disease had weakened the defenders to the point that they were willing to surrender. At the same time, diseases, especially typhus were a constant danger to the encamped armies outside the fortress, and often forced a premature retreat. Sieges were often won by the army that lasted the longest.An important element of strategy for the besieging army was whether or not to allow the encamped city to surrender. Usually it was preferable to graciously allow a surrender, both to save on casualties, and to set an example for future defending cities. A city that was allowed to surrender with minimal loss of life was much better off than a city that held out for a long time and was brutally butchered at the end. Moreover, if an attacking army had a reputation of killing and pillaging regardless of a surrender, then other cities defensive efforts would be redoubled. Usually a city would surrender (with no honour lost) when its inner lines of defence were reached by the attacker. In case of refusal however, the inner lines would have to be stormed by the attacker and the attacking troops would be justified in sacking the city.Mobile warfareSiege warfare dominated in Western Europe for most of the seventeenth and eighteenth centuries. An entire campaign, or longer, could be used in a single siege (for example, Ostend in 1601&ndash;04; Rochelle in 1627&ndash;28). This resulted in extremely prolonged conflicts. The balance was that while siege warfare was extremely expensive and very slow, it was very successful&mdash;or, at least, more so than encounters in the field. Battles arose through clashes between besiegers and relieving armies, but the principle was a slow grinding victory by the greater economic power. The relatively rare attempts at forcing pitched battles (Adolphus in 1630; the French against the Dutch in 1672 or 1688) were almost always expensive failures.File:Bataille Yorktown.jpg|thumb|left|180px|Storming of Redoubt #10 during the of YorktownThe exception to this rule were the English. During the Civil War anything which tended to prolong the struggle, or seemed like want of energy and avoidance of a decision, was bitterly resented by the men of both sides. In France and Germany, the prolongation of a war meant continued employment for the soldiers, but in England both sides were looking to end the war quickly. Even when in the end the Model Armya regular professional army developedthe original decision-compelling spirit permeated the whole organisation as was seen when pitched against regular professional continental troops the Battle of the Dunes during the Interregnum.() of Badajoz.jpg|thumb|230px|British infantry attempt to scale the walls of Badajoz, Peninsular War, 1812Experienced commanders on both sides in the English Civil War recommended the abandonment of garrisoned fortifications for two primary reasons. The first, as for example proposed by the Royalist Sir Richard Willis to King Charles, was that by abandoning the garrisoning of all but the most strategic locations in ones own territory, far more troops would be available for the field armies and it was the field armies which would decide the conflict. The other argument was that by slighting potential strong points in ones own territory, an enemy expeditionary force, or local enemy rising, would find it more difficult to consolidate territorial gains against an inevitable counter attack. Sir Meldrum put forward just such an argument to the Parliamentary of Both Kingdoms, to justify his slighting of Gainsborough in Lincolnshire.Sixty years later during the of the Spanish Succession the Duke of Marlborough preferred to engage the enemy in pitched battles rather than engage in siege warfare, although he was very proficient in both types of warfare.On 15 April 1746, the day before the of Culloden, at Castle, a party of the William Sutherland, 17th Earl of Sutherlands militia conducted the last siege fought on the mainland of Great Britain against Jacobin members of clan MacLeod.Strategic conceptsIn the French Revolutionary and Wars, new techniques stressed the division of armies into all-arms corps that would march separately and only come together on the battlefield. The less concentrated army could now live off the country and move more rapidly over a larger number of roads.Fortresses commanding lines of communication could be bypassed and would no longer stop an invasion. Since armies could not live off the land indefinitely, Bonaparte always sought a quick end to any conflict by pitched battle. This military revolution was described and codified by Clausewitz.Industrial advances- Engineer Corps, Siege of Anvers, 1832.jpg|thumb|right|French Engineer Corps during the Siege of Antwerp.Advances in artillery made previously impregnable defenses useless. For example, the walls of Vienna that had held off the Turks in the mid-seventeenth century were no obstacle to Napoleon in the late eighteenth.Where sieges occurred (such as the of Delhi and the of Cawnpore during the Rebellion of 1857), the attackers were usually able to defeat the defenses within a matter of days or weeks, rather than weeks or months as previously. The great Swedish white-elephant fortress of Karlsborg was built in the tradition of Vauban and intended as a reserve capital for Sweden, but it was obsolete before it was completed in 1869.Railways, when they were introduced, made possible the movement and supply of larger armies than those that fought in the Napoleonic Wars. It also reintroduced siege warfare, as armies seeking to use railway lines in enemy territory were forced to capture fortresses which blocked these lines.During the War, the battlefield front-lines moved rapidly through France. However, the Prussian and other German armies were delayed for months at the of Metz and the of Paris, due to the greatly increased firepower of the defending infantry, and the principle of detached or semi-detached forts with heavy-caliber artillery. This resulted in the later construction of fortress works across Europe such as the massive fortifications at Verdun. It also led to the introduction of tactics which sought to induce surrender by bombarding the civilian population within a fortress rather than the defending works themselves.The of Sevastopol (18541855) during the War and the of Petersburg  (1864&ndash;1865) during the Civil War showed that modern citadels, when improved by improvised defences, could still resist an enemy for many months. The of Plevna during the War (18771878) proved that hastily-constructed field defences could resist attacks prepared without proper resources, and were a portent of the trench warfare of War I.Advances in firearms technology without the necessary advances in battlefield communications gradually led to the defense again gaining the ascendancy. An example of siege during this time, prolonged during 337 days due to the isolation of the surrounded troops, was the of Baler, in which a reduced group of Spanish soldiers, was besieged in a small church by the Philippine rebels, in the course of the Revolution and the War, until months after the Treaty of Paris, the end of the conflict.Furthermore, the development of steamships availed greater speed to runners,  ships with the purpose of bringing cargo, e.g. food, to cities under blockade, as with South Carolina during the American Civil War.Modern warfareFile:Indian army soldier after siege of Kut q79446.jpg|thumb|160px|right|This sepoy POW shows the conditions of the garrison at Kut at the end of the siege in the First World War.Mainly as a result of the increasing firepower (such as guns) available to defensive forces, First World War warfare briefly revived a form of siege warfare. Although siege warfare had moved out from an urban setting because city walls had become ineffective against modern weapons, trench warfare was nonetheless able to use many of the techniques of siege warfare in its prosecution (sapping, mining, barrage and, of course, attrition) but on a much larger scale and on a greatly extended front.More traditional sieges of fortifications took place in addition to trench sieges. The of Tsingtao was one of the first major sieges of the war, but the inability for significant resupply of the German garrison made it a relatively one-sided battle. The Germans and the crew of an Austro-Hungarian cruiser put up a hopeless defense and after holding out for more than a week surrendered to the Japanese, forcing the East Asia Squadron to steam towards South America for a new coal source.The other major siege outside Europe during the First World War was in Mesopotamia, at the of Kut. After a failed attempt to move on Baghdad, stopped by the Ottomans at the bloody of Ctesiphon, the British and their large contingent of Indian sepoy soldiers were forced to retreat to Kut, where the Ottomans under German General Baron Colmar von der Goltz laid siege. The British attempts to resupply the force via the Tigris river failed, and rationing was complicated by the refusal of many Indian troops to eat cattle products. By the time the garrison fell on 29 April 1916, starvation was rampant. Conditions did not improve greatly under Turkish imprisonment. Along with the of Tanga, the of Sandfontein, the of Gallipoli and the of Namakura, it would be one of Britains numerous embarrassing colonial defeats of the war.The largest sieges of the war, however, took place in Europe. The initial German advance into Belgium produced four major sieges, the of Liege, the of Namur, the of Maubeuge and the of Antwerp. All three would prove crushing German victories, at Liege and Namur against the Belgians, at Maubeuge against the French and at Antwerp against a combined Anglo-Belgian force. The weapon that made these victories possible were the German Big Berthas and the 305 mm Model 1911 siege mortars, one of the best siege mortars of the war, on loan from Austria-Hungary. These huge guns were the decisive weapon of siege warfare in the 20th century, taking part at Przemysl, the Belgian sieges, on the Italian Front and Serbian Front, and even being reused in World War II.At the second of Przemysl, the Austro-Hungarian garrison showed an excellent knowledge of siege warfare, not only waiting for relief, but sending sorties into Russian lines and employing an active defense that resulted in the capture of the Russian General Kornilov. Despite its excellent performance, the garrisons food supply had been requisitioned for earlier offensives, a relief expedition was stalled by the weather, ethnic rivalries flared up between the defending soldiers and a breakout attempt failed. When the commander of the garrison Kusmanek finally surrendered, his troops were eating their horses and the first attempt of large-scale air supply had failed. It was one of the few great victories obtained by either side during the war; 110,000 Austro-Hungarian prisoners were marched back to Russia. Use of aircraft for siege running, bringing supplies to areas under siege, would nevertheless prove useful in many sieges to come.The largest siege of the war, and the arguably the roughest, most gruesome battle in history, was the of Verdun. Whether the battle can be considered true siege warfare is debatable. Under the theories of von Falkenhayn it is more distinguishable as purely attrition with a coincidental presence of fortifications on the battlefield. When considering the plans of Crown Prince Wilhelm, purely concerned with taking the citadel and not with French casualty figures, it can be considered a true siege. The main fortifications were Fort Douaumont, Vaux and the fortified city of Verdun itself. The Germans, through the use of huge artillery bombardments, flamethrowers and infiltration tactics were able to capture both Vaux and Douaumont, but were never able to take the city, and eventually lost most of their gains. It was a battle that, despite the French ability to fend off the Germans, neither side won. The German losses were not worth the potential capture of the city and the French casualties were not worth holding the symbol of her defense.The development of the armoured tank and improved infantry tactics at the end of World War I swung the pendulum back in favour of maneuver, and with the advent of Blitzkrieg in 1939, the end of traditional siege warfare was at hand. The Line would be the prime example of the failure of immobile, postWorld War I fortifications. Although sieges would continue, it would be in a totally different style and on a reduced scale.Second World WarThe Blitzkrieg of the Second World War truly showed that fixed fortifications are easily defeated by maneuver instead of frontal assault or long sieges. The great Line was bypassed and battles that would have taken weeks of siege could now be avoided with the careful application of air power (such as the German paratrooper capture of Eben-Emael, Belgium, early in World War II).The most important siege was the of Leningrad, that lasted over 29 months, about half of the duration of the entire Second World War. Along with the of Stalingrad, the Siege of Leningrad on the Eastern Front was the deadliest siege of a city in history. In the west, apart from the Battle of the Atlantic the sieges were not on the same scale as those on the European Eastern front; however, there were several notable or critical sieges: the island of Malta, for which the population won the Cross, Tobruk and Monte Cassino. In the South-East Asian Theatre there was the siege of Singapore and in the Campaign sieges of Myitkyina, the Admin Box and the of the Tennis Court at the siege of Kohima which was the high-water mark for the Japanese advance into India.The of Sevastopol saw the use of the heaviest and most powerful individual siege engines ever to be used: the German 800mm railway gun and the 600mm siege mortar. Though a single shell could have disastrous local effect, the guns were susceptible to air attack in addition to being slow to move.The airbridge methods which were developed and used extensively in the Burma Campaign for supplying the Chindits and other units, including those in sieges such as Imphal, as well as flying Hump into China, allowed the western powers to develop air lift expertise which would prove vital during the War Blockade.Post Second World WarDuring the War the battles of Dien Bien Phu (1954) and Khe Sanh (1968) possessed siege-like characteristics. In both cases, the Minh and NLF were able to cut off the opposing army by capturing the surrounding rugged terrain.(See for example the challenges noted in ) At Dien Bien Phu, the French were unable to use air power to overcome the siege and were defeated. However, at Khe Sanh a mere 14 years later, advances in air power allowed the United States to withstand the siege. The resistance of US forces was assisted by the PAVN and PLAF forces decision to use the Khe Sanh siege as a strategic distraction to allow their mobile warfare offensive, the first Offensive, to unfold securely.The Siege of Khe Sanh displays typical features of modern sieges, as the defender has greater capacity to withstand the siege, the attackers main aim is to bottle operational forces or create a strategic distraction, rather than take the siege to a conclusion.In neighboring Cambodia, at that time known as the Khmer Republic, the Rouge used siege tactics to cut off supplies from Penh to other government-held enclaves in an attempt to break the will of the government to continue fighting.1972 the Easter offensive, Siege of An Loc Vietnam. ARVN troops and U.S. adisors and airpower successfully defeated communist forces. The Battle of An Loc pitted some 6,350 ARVN men against a force three times that size. During the peak of the battle, ARVN had access to only one 105 mm howitzer to provide close support while the enemy attack was backed by an entire artillery division. ARVN had no tanks, the NVA communist forces had two armored regiments. ARVN prevailed after over two month of continuous fighting. As General Paul Vanuxem, a French veteran of the Indochina War, wrote in 1972 after visiting the liberated city of An Loc: An Loc was the Verdun of Vietnam, where Vietnam received as in baptism the supreme consecration of her will.Police activityDespite the overwhelming might of the modern state, siege tactics continue to be employed in police conflicts.  This has been due to a number of factors, primarily risk to life, whether that of the police, the besieged, bystanders or hostages.  Police make use of trained negotiators, psychologists and, if necessary, force, generally being able to rely on the support of their nations forces if required.One of the complications facing police in a siege involving hostages is the syndrome where sometimes hostages can develop a sympathetic rapport with their captors. If this helps keep them safe from harm this is considered to be a good thing, but there have been cases where hostages have tried to shield the captors during an assault or refused to co-operate with the authorities in bringing prosecutions.The 1993 police siege on the Davidian church in Texas, lasted 51 days, an atypically long police siege. Unlike traditional military sieges, police sieges tend to last for hours or days rather than weeks, months or years.In Britain, if the siege involves perpetrators who are considered by the British Government to be terrorists, and if an assault is to take place, the civilian authorities hand command and control over to the military. The threat of such an action ended the Street Siege in 1975 but the Embassy Siege in 1980 ended in a military assault and the deaths of all but one of the hostage takers.See also* Infiltration* stand* Battleplan (documentary TV series)* Siege engines* Siege equipment;Lists:* of established military terms* of siegesNotesReferences**********************Further reading* Duffy, Christopher. Fire & Stone: The Science of Fortress Warfare (1660&ndash;1860). 1975. 2nd ed. New York: Stackpole Books, 1996.* Duffy, Christopher. Siege Warfare: Fortress in the Early Modern World, 1494&ndash;1660. Routledge and Kegan Paul, 1996.* Duffy, Christopher. Siege Warfare, Volume II: The Fortress in the Age of Vauban and Frederick the Great.  Routledge and Kegan Paul: London, 1985.* Lynn, John A. The Wars of Louis XIV.* May, Timothy. Mongol Arms. Explorations in Empire, Pre-Modern Imperialism Tutorial: the Mongols. University of Wisconsin-Madison. 27 June 2004.*Saltini Antonio, Lassedio della Mirandola. Vita, guerra e amore al tempo di Pico e di papa Giulio, Diabasis, Reggio Emilia 2003.External links*Native American Siege Warfare.*Siege Kits*Scenes of Siege Warfare*Three ancient Egyptian Sieges: Megiddo, Dapur, Hermopolis*The Siege Of The City Biblical perspectives.*Secrets of Lost Empires: Medieval Siege (PBS) Informative and interactive webpages about medieval siege tactics.ar:an:Setiobs:Opsadabg:ca:Setgecs:Oblhnda:Belejringde:Belagerunges:Asedioeo:Sieofa:(militaire)ko:hr:Opsadaio:Siejoid:Pengepunganit:Assediohe:jv:Pangepungan()nl:Belegeringnds-nl:Belegeringeja:no:Beleiringpl:Obleniept:Cercoro:Asediuru:scn:Assdiusimple:Siegesk:Obliehaniesl:Obleganjesr:sh:Opsadafi:Piirityssv:Belgringtr:Kuatmauk:zh:
27118
Strontium
Strontium () is a element with the symbol Sr and the number 38. An earth metal, strontium is a soft silver-white or yellowish metallic element that is highly reactive chemically. The metal turns yellow when exposed to air. It occurs naturally in the minerals celestine and strontianite. While natural strontium is stable, the synthetic 90Sr isotope is present in radioactive fallout and has a half-life of 28.90 years. Both strontium and strontianite are named after Strontian, a village in Scotland near which the mineral was first discovered. Characteristics 1.jpg|thumb|left|Oxidized dendritic strontiumStrontium is a grey, silvery metal that is softer than calcium and even more reactive in water, with which it reacts on contact to produce hydroxide and hydrogen gas. It burns in air to produce both oxide and nitride, but since it does not react with nitrogen below 380 C, at room temperature it will only form the oxide spontaneously.(Because of its extreme reactivity with oxygen and water, this element occurs naturally only in compounds with other elements, such as in the minerals strontianite and celestite. It is kept under a liquid hydrocarbon such as oil or kerosene to prevent oxidation; freshly exposed strontium metal rapidly turns a yellowish color with the formation of the oxide. Finely powdered strontium metal is pyrophoric meaning it will ignite spontaneously in air at room temperature. Volatile strontium salts impart a bright red color to flames, and these salts are used in pyrotechnics and in the production of flares. Natural strontium is a mixture of four stable isotopes.( History Strontium is named after the Scottish village of Strontian (Gaelic Sron an t-Sithein), having been discovered in the ores taken from the lead mines.() In 1790, Crawford, a physician engaged in the preparation of barium, recognised that the Strontian ores exhibited different properties to those normally seen with other heavy spars sources.(Adair Crawford (1790) On the medicinal properties of the muriated barytes, Medical Communications (London), vol. 2, pages 301-359.) This allowed him to conclude ... it is probable indeed, that the scotch mineral is a new species of earth which has not hitherto been sufficiently examined. The new mineral was named strontites in 1793 by Charles Hope, a professor of chemistry at the University of Glasgow.(Although Thomas C. Hope had investigated strontium ores since 1791, he research was published in:  Thomas Charles Hope (1798) Account of a mineral from Strontian and of a particular species of earth which it contains, Transactions of the Royal Society of Edinburg, vol. 4, no. 2, pages 3-39.)() He confirmed the earlier work of Crawford and recounted:  ... Considering it a peculiar earth I thought it necessary to give it an name. I have called it Strontites, from the place it was found; a mode of derivation in my opinion, fully as proper as any quality it may possess, which is the present fashion. The element was eventually isolated by Sir Davy in 1808 by the electrolysis of a mixture containing chloride and oxide, and announced by him in a lecture to the Royal Society on 30 June 1808.(Davy, H. (1808) Electro-chemical researches on the decomposition of the earths; with observations on the metals obtained from the alkaline earths, and on the amalgam procured from ammonia, Philosophical Transactions of the Royal Society of London, vol. 98, pages 333-370.) In keeping with the naming of the other alkaline earths, he changed the name to strontium.()()()(Many other early investigators examined strontium ore, among them:  (1) Martin Heinrich Klaproth, Chemische Versuche ber die Strontianerde (Chemical experiments on strontian ore), Crells Annalen (September 1793) no. ii, pages 189-202 ; and Nachtrag zu den Versuchen ber die Strontianerde (Addition to the Experiments on Strontian Ore), Crells Annalen (February 1794) no. i, page 99 ; also (2) Richard Kirwan (1794) Experiments on a new earth found near Stronthian in Scotland, The Transactions of the Royal Irish Academy, vol. 5, pages 243-256.)The first large scale application of strontium was in the production of sugar from beet. Although a crystallisation process using strontium hydroxide was patented by Dubrunfaut in 1849() the large scale introduction came with the improvement of the process in the early 1870s. The German sugar industry used the process well into the 19th century. Prior to War I the beet sugar industry used  100,000 to 150,000 tons of strontium hydroxide for this process per year.() The strontium hydroxide was recycled in the process, but the demand to substitute losses during production was high enough to create a significant demand initiating mining of strontianite in the Mnsterland. The  mining of strontianite in Germany ended when mining of the celestite deposits in Gloucestershire started.() These mines supplied most of the world strontium supply from 1884 to 1941 () Occurrence According to the Geological Survey, China was the top producer of strontium in 2007, with over two-thirds world share, followed by Spain, Mexico, Turkey, Argentina and Iran.()Strontium commonly occurs in nature, the 15th most abundant element on earth, averaging 0.034% of all igneous rock and is found chiefly as the form of the sulfate mineral celestite (SrSO4) and the carbonate strontianite (SrCO3). Of the two, celestite occurs much more frequently in sedimentary deposits of sufficient size to make development of mining facilities attractive. Strontianite would be the more useful of the two common minerals because strontium is used most often in the carbonate form, but few deposits have been discovered that are suitable for development.() The metal can be prepared by electrolysis of melted chloride mixed with chloride::Sr2+ + 2   Sr:2 Cl  Cl2 (g) + 2 Alternatively it is made by reducing strontium oxide with aluminium in a vacuum at a temperature at which strontium distills off. Three allotropes of the metal exist, with points at 235 and 540 C. Isotopes Strontium has four stable, naturally occurring isotopes:84Sr (0.56%), 86Sr (9.86%), 87Sr (7.0%) and 88Sr (82.58%). Only 87Sr is radiogenic; it is produced by decay from the radioactive alkali metal 87Rb, which has a half-life of 4.88  1010 years. Thus, there are two sources of 87Sr in any material: that formed in stars along with 84Sr, 86Sr and 88Sr, as well as that formed by radioactive decay of 87Rb. The ratio 87Sr/86Sr is the parameter typically reported in geologic investigations; ratios in minerals and rocks have values ranging from about 0.7 to greater than 4.0. Because strontium has an radius similar to that of calcium, it readily substitutes for Ca in minerals.Sixteen unstable isotopes are known to exist. Of greatest importance are 90Sr with a half-life of 28.78 years and 89Sr with a half-life of 50.5 days. 90Sr is a by-product of fission found in fallout and presents a health problem since it substitutes for calcium in bone, preventing expulsion from the body. This isotope is one of the best long-lived high-energy beta emitters known, and is used in SNAP (for Nuclear Auxiliary Power) devices. These devices hold promise for use in spacecraft, remote weather stations, navigational buoys, etc., where a lightweight, long-lived, nuclear-electric power source is required. The 1986 Chernobyl nuclear accident contaminated a vast area with 90Sr. 90Sr confined inside a concave silver plaque is also used for the medical treatment of a resected pterygium.(C. R. Hammond The elements (p. 4-35) in )89Sr is a short-lived artificial radioisotope that is used in the treatment of cancer. In circumstances where cancer patients have widespread and painful bony metastases (secondaries), the administration of 89Sr results in the delivery of radioactive emissions (particles in this case) directly to the area of bony problem (where calcium turnover is greatest). The 89Sr is manufactured as the chloride salt (which is soluble), and when dissolved in normal saline can be injected intravenously. Typically, cancer patients will be treated with a dose of 150 MBq. Patients must take precautions following this because their urine becomes contaminated with radioactivity, so they must sit to urinate and double-flush the toilet. The particles travel about 3.5 mm in bone (energy 0.583 MeV) and 6.5 mm in tissue, so there is no requirement to isolate patients having been treated, except to say they should not have any one (especially young children) sitting in their laps for 1040 days. The variation in time results from the variable clearing time for 89Sr, which depends on renal function and the number of bony metastases. With a lot of bony metastases, the entire 89Sr dose can be taken up into bone and so the radioactivity is retained to decay over a 50.5-day half-life. It takes about 10 half-lives or about 500 days for 99.9% of the radioactive strontium to decay. However, where there are few bony metastases, the large proportion of 89Sr not taken up by the bone will be filtered by the kidney, so that the effective half-life (a combination of the physical and biological half-life) will be much shorter.ApplicationsAs a pure metal strontium is used in strontium 90%-aluminium 10% alloys of an eutectic composition for the modification of aluminium-silicon casting alloys.() Strontium is 2% by weight of AJ62 alloy, a durable, creep-resistant alloy used in car and motorcycle engines by BMW.()Strontium is used in scientific studies of neurotransmitter release in neurons. Like calcium, strontium facilitates vesicle fusion with the synaptic membrane. But, unlike calcium, strontium causes asynchronous vesicle fusion. Therefore, replacing calcium in the culture medium with strontium allows scientists to measure the effects of a single-vesicle fusion event, e.g., the size of the postsynaptic response elicited by the neurotransmitter content of a single vesicle.()()In general, strontium salts carbonate are used in the manufacture of fireworks. This is due to the fact that they impart a deep red colour to the firework.(http://chemistry.about.com/od/fireworkspyrotechnics/a/fireworkcolors.htm)CompoundsThe primary use for strontium compounds is in glass for colour television ray tubes to prevent X-ray emission.( )() All parts of the CRT tube have to absorb X-rays. In the neck and the funnel of the tube, lead glass is used for this purpose, but this type of glass shows a browning effect due to the interaction of the X-rays with the glass. Therefore, the front panel has to use a different glass mixture, in which strontium and barium are the X-ray-absorbing materials. The average values for the glass mixture determined for a recycling study in 2005 is 8.5% oxide and 10% oxide.()Other applications are as follows:*magnets and refining zinc.(*titanate has an extremely high index and an dispersion greater than that of diamond, making it useful in a variety of optics applications. This quality has also led to its being cut into gemstones, in particular as a simulant. However, it is very soft and easily scratches so it is rarely used.(*carbonate, nitrate, and sulfate are commonly used in fireworks for red color, and sometimes for other colors too.*aluminate is used as a bright phosphor with long persistence of phosphorescence.*chloride is sometimes used in toothpastes for sensitive teeth. One popular brand includes 10% total strontium chloride hexahydrate by weight.*oxide is sometimes used to improve the quality of some pottery glazes.*ranelate is used in the treatment of osteoporosis. It is a prescription drug in the EU, but not in the USA.*barium niobate can be used in outdoors holographic 3D displays as a screen.()*Strontium phosphide is an inorganic compound with the formula Sr3P2 and is used as a laboratory reagent and in the manufacture of chemically reactive devices.Radioactive strontium isotopes89Sr is the active ingredient in Metastron (the generic version of Metastron, Generic Strontium Chloride Sr-89 Injection, its manufactured by Bio-Nucleonics Inc.()), a radiopharmaceutical used for bone pain secondary to metastatic cancer. The strontium acts like calcium and is preferentially incorporated into bone at sites of increased osteogenesis. This localization focuses the radiation exposure on the cancerous lesion.90Sr has been used as a power source for thermoelectric generators (RTGs). 90Sr produces about 0.93 watts of heat per gram (it is lower for the form of 90Sr used in RTGs, which is fluoride).() However, 90Sr has a lifetime approximately 3 times shorter and has a lower density than 238Pu, another RTG fuel. The main advantage of 90Sr is that it is cheaper than 238Pu and is found in waste. Soviet Union deployed nearly 1000 of these RTGs on the northern coast as power source for lighthouses and meteorology stations.()90Sr is also used in cancer therapy. Its beta emission and long half-life is ideal for superficial radiotherapy.Because strontium is so similar to calcium, it is incorporated in the bone. All four stable isotopes are incorporated, in roughly similar proportions, as they are found in nature (please see below). However, the actual distribution of the isotopes tends to vary greatly from one geographical location to another. Thus, analyzing the bone of an individual can help determine the region it came from. This approach helps to identify the ancient migration patterns as well as the origin of commingled human remains in battlefield burial sites. Strontium, thus, helps forensic scientists too.87Sr/86Sr ratios are commonly used to determine the likely provenance areas of sediment in natural systems, especially in marine and fluvial environments. Dasch (1969) showed that surface sediments of Atlantic displayed 87Sr/86Sr ratios that could be regarded as bulk averages of the 87Sr/86Sr ratios of geological terranes from adjacent landmasses.() A good example of a fluvial-marine system to which Sr isotope provenance studies have been successfully employed is the River Nile-Mediterranean system,() Due to the differing ages of the rocks that constitute the majority of the Blue and White Nile, catchment areas of the changing provenance of sediment reaching the River Nile delta and East Mediterranean Sea can be discerned through Sr isotopic studies. Such changes are climatically controlled in the Late Quaternary.More recently, 87Sr/86Sr ratios have also been used to determine the source of ancient archaeological materials such as timbers and corn in Chaco Canyon, New Mexico.()() 87Sr/86Sr ratios in teeth may also be used to track animal migrations ()() or in criminal forensics.Effect on the human bodyThe human body absorbs strontium as if it were calcium. Due to the chemical similarity of the elements, the stable forms of strontium might not pose a significant health threat  in fact, the levels found naturally may actually be beneficial (see below) - but the radioactive 90Sr can lead to various bone disorders and diseases, including cancer. The unit is used in measuring radioactivity from absorbed 90Sr.A recent in-vitro study conducted the NY College of Dental Sciences using strontium on osteoblasts showed marked improvement on bone-building osteoblasts.()The drug ranelate, made by combining strontium with acid, was found to aid bone growth, increase bone density, and lessen vertebral, peripheral, and hip fractures.()() Women receiving the drug showed a 12.7% increase in bone density. Women receiving a placebo had a 1.6% decrease. Half the increase in bone density (measured by X-ray densitometry) is attributed to the higher atomic weight of Sr compared with calcium, whereas the other half a true increase in bone mass. Strontium ranelate is registered as a prescription drug in Europe and many countries worldwide. It must be prescribed by a doctor, must be delivered by a pharmacist, and requires strict medical supervision.There is a long history of medical research regarding strontiums benefits, beginning in the 1950s. Studies indicate a lack of undesirable side-effects.()()()()()() Several other salts of strontium such as strontium citrate and strontium carbonate are available in the United States under the Dietary Supplements Health and Education Act of 1994, providing close to the recommended strontium content, about 680 milligrams per day, of strontium ranelate. Their long-term safety and efficacy have not been evaluated on humans in large-scale medical trials.See alsoReferencesExternal links*WebElements.com  Strontium*Chemistry in its element podcast (MP3) from the Society of Chemistrys World: Strontium af:Strontiumar:an:Estroncioaz:Stronsiumbn:be:bs:Stroncijumbg:ca:Estroncicv:ceb:Estronsyocs:Stronciumco:Stronziucy:Strontiwmda:Strontiumde:Strontiumet:Strontsiumel:es:Estroncioeo:Stroncioeu:Estrontziofa:hif:Strontiumfr:Strontiumfur:Stronziga:Strointiamgv:Stroinhumgl:Estronciohak:Sxal:ko:hy:hi:hr:Stroncijio:Stroncioid:Stronsiumis:Strontnit:Stronziohe:jv:Strontiumkn:sw:Strontikv:ht:Estwontymku:Stronsiymla:Strontiumlv:Stroncijslb:Strontiumlt:Stroncislij:Stronsiojbo:jinmrstrontihu:Stronciumml:mr:ms:Strontiummy:mrj:nl:Strontiumja:no:Strontiumnn:Strontiumoc:Estronciuz:Stronsiypnb:nds:Strontiumpl:Strontpt:Estrncioro:Stroniuqu:Istronsyuru:sah:stq:Strontiumscn:Stronziusimple:Strontiumsk:Stronciumsl:Stroncijsr:sh:Stroncijumfi:Strontiumsv:Strontiumtl:Istrontiyota:te:th:tr:Stronsiyumuk:ug:vi:Strontiwar:Estronsyoyi:yo:Strontiumzh-yue:zh:
27283
Economy_of_Senegal
Image:Dakar-Indpendance.jpg|right|thumb|200px|Dakar, Senegals place de lIndpendance: a center of government, banking and trade. In the background is the commercial port and the tourist destination, Gore island.Image:Dakar-BCEAO1.jpg|right|thumb|200px|Headquarters of the Bank of West African States, Dakar.Image:Air Senegal International B737 6V-AHU.jpg|right|thumb|200px|A jet of the national airline, Senegal International.Image:Sucrerie richard toll2.jpg|right|thumb|200px|Sugar processing plant of the Compagnie sucrire sngalaise at Toll.Image:Saly Senegal1.JPG|right|thumb|200px|Main street of the tourist resort town of Saly.Image:Senegal Touba Pneu Thies 800x600.jpg|right|thumb|200px|Many small businesses, like this tyre repair shop in Touba, are financed through the Mouride Islamic brotherhood.right|thumb|200px|Paris Salon international de lAgriculture 2007: the government actively promotes agricultural exports to markets outside the developing world.right|thumb|200px|Small scale fishing for local markets is visible all through the country. Here fishermen return to the beach at Soumbedioun, Dakar.Image:PhosphateSenegal.jpg|right|thumb|200px|phosphate surface mine in western Senegal, near Taba.thumb|left|300px|Senegalese exports in 2006.Predominantly rural and with limited natural resources, the Economy of Senegal gains most of its foreign exchange from fish, phosphates, groundnuts, tourism, and services. Its agricultural sector is highly vulnerable to variations in rainfall and changes in world commodity prices. Dakar, as the former capital of West Africa, is also home to banks and other institutions which serve all of Francophone West Africa, and is a hub for shipping and transport in the region. It also boasts one of the best developed tourist industries in Africa. Senegal still depends heavily on foreign assistance, which in 2000 represented about 32% of overall government spending&mdash;including both current expenditures and capital investments&mdash;or CFA 270.8 billion (U.S.$ 361.0 million). Senegal is a member of the Trade Organization. History The per capita(EarthTrends -> Economics, Business, and the Environment -> Variable -> Searchable Database Results: Economics, Business, and the Environment  GDP: GDP per capita, Units: Current US$ per person) of Senegal shrank by 1.30% in the 60s. However, it registered a peak growth of 158% in the 70s, and still expanded 43% in the turbulent 1980s. However, this proved unsustainable and the economy consequently shrank by 40% in the 90s. IMF and 1990s economic reforms Since the January 1994 CFA franc devaluation, the Monetary Fund (IMF), the Bank, and other multilateral and creditors have been supporting the Government of Senegals structural and sectoral adjustment programs. The broad objectives of the program have been to facilitate growth and development by reducing the role of government in the economy, improving public sector management, enhancing incentives for the private sector, and reducing poverty.In January 1994, Senegal undertook a bold and ambitious economic reform program with the support of the international donor community. This reform began with a 50% devaluation of Senegals currency, the CFA franc, which was linked at a fixed rate to the franc. Government price controls and subsidies have been steadily dismantled as another economic reform. However, this devaluation had severe social consequences, because most of the essentials goods were imported. Overnight, the price of goods such as milk, rice, fertilizer and machinery doubled. As a result, the country suffered a large exodus, with many of the most educated people and those who could afford it choosing to leave the country. After an economic contraction of 2.1% in 1993, Senegal made an important turnaround, thanks to the reform program, with a growth in GDP averaging over 5% annually during 1995-2004. Annual inflation had been pushed down to the low single digits. As a member of the West African Economic and Monetary Union (WAEMU), Senegal is working toward greater regional integration with a unified external tariff and a more stable monetary policy. Senegal still relies heavily upon outside donor assistance, however. Under the IMFs Indebted Poor Countries debt relief program, Senegal will benefit from eradication of two-thirds of its bilateral, multilateral, and private sector debt, contingent on the completion of privatization program proposed by the government and approved by the IMF. Current state of economy External trade and investmentThe fishing sector has replaced the groundnut sector as Senegals export leader. Its export earnings reached U.S.$239 million in 2000. The industrial fishing operations struggle with high costs, and Senegalese tuna is rapidly losing the French market to more efficient Asian competitors.Phosphate production, the second major foreign exchange earner, has been steady at about U.S.$95 million. Exports of peanut products reached U.S.$79 million in 2000 and represented 11% of total export earnings. Receipts from tourism, the fourth major foreign exchange earner, have picked up since the January 1994 devaluation. In 2000, some 500,000 tourists visited Senegal, earning the country $120 million.Senegals new Agency for the Promotion of Investment (APIX) plays a pivotal role in the governments foreign investment program. Its objective is to increase the investment rate from its current level of 20.6% to 30%. Currently, there are no restrictions on the transfer or repatriation of capital and income earned, or investment financed with convertible foreign exchange. Direct U.S. investment in Senegal remains about U.S.$38 million, mainly in petroleum marketing, pharmaceuticals manufacturing, chemicals, and banking. Economic assistance, about U.S.$350 million a year, comes largely from France, the IMF, the World Bank, and the States. Canada, Italy, Japan, and Germany also provide assistance.Senegal has well-developed though costly port facilities, a major international airport serving 23 international airlines, and direct and expanding telecommunications links with major world centers.IndebtednessWith an external debt of U.S.$2,495 million,(2006) and with its economic reform program on track, Senegal qualified for the multilateral relief initiative for Indebted Poor Countries (HIPC). Progress on structural reforms is on track, but the pace of reforms remains slow, as delays occur in implementing a number of measures on the privatization program, governance issues, and the promotion of private sector activity. However, macroeconomic indicators show that Senegal turned in a respectable performance in meeting IMF targets in 2000: annual GDP growth increased to 5.7%, compared to 5.1% in 1999. Inflation was reported to be 0.7% compared to 0.8% in 1999, and the current account deficit (excluding transfers) was held at less than 6% of GDP.Notable Senegalese companiesLarge Senegalese companies include Senelec, the national power company; Sngal International airlines; Sonatel, the principal telecommunications provider in Senegal; and chimique du Sngal, a chemical processing company. Trade unionsSenegalese trade unions include The Confederation of Senegalese Workers (CNTS) and its affiliate the Dem Dikk Workers Democratic Union (Dakar Public Transport workers), TheUnion of Senegalese Workers (UTDS), The Confederation Of Democratic Workers Of Senegal (CGTDS) and the Union of Autonomous Trade Unions of Senegal (UNSAS). Mean wages were $0.99 per manhour in 2009.Stock exchangeSenegals corporations are included in the Bourse Rgionale des Valeurs Mobilires SA (BRVM), a regional exchange serving the following eight West African countries, and located in Cote dIvoire.Regional and International economic groupings        *of African Unity (OAU)/Africa Union*The Zone*The Convention*Community of West African States (ECOWAS)*Union conomique et montaire Ouest Africaine (UEMOA)*The Groundnut Council*the pour la mise en valeur du fleuve SngalStatistics();;GDP (purchasing power parity)U.S.$21.13 billion (2008 est.);;GDP (official exchange rate)U.S.$11.12 billion (2007 est.);;GDP - real growth rate4.6% (2007 est.);;GDP - per capita (PPP)U.S.$1,700 (2007 est.);;GDP - composition by sectoragriculture: 16% industry: 19.4% services: 64.6% (2007 est.);;Population below poverty line43,4% (2010 est.);;Household income or consumption by percentage sharelowest 10%: 2.7% highest 10%: 33.4% (2007);;Inflation rate (consumer prices)5.4% (2008 est.);;Investment (gross fixed)41% of GDP (2006 est.);;Labor force4.876 million (2009 est.);;Labor force - by occupationagriculture: 75% industry and services: 25% (1990 est.);;Unemployment rate48%; note - urban youth 40% (2001 est.);;Distribution of family income - index40 (2005);;Budget;;;revenues: U.S.$2.023 billion ;;;expenditures: U.S.$2.377 billion; including capital expenditures of $357 million (2006 est.);;Public debt22.5% of GDP (2007 est.);;Industriesagricultural and fish processing, phosphate mining, fertilizer production, petroleum refining, construction materials, ship construction and repair ;;Industrial production growth rate5.2% (2007 est.);;Electricity - production2.159 billion kWh (2007);;Electricity - consumption1.859 billion kWh (2007);;Electricity - exports0 kWh (2004);;Electricity - imports0 kWh (2004);;Oil - production (2004 est.);;Oil - consumption (2007 est.);;Natural gas - production50 million cu m (2005 est.);;Natural gas - consumption50 million cu m (2004 est.);;Natural gas - exports0 cu m (2004 est.);;Natural gas - imports0 cu m (2004 est.);;Current Account BalanceU.S.-$1.458 billion (2007 est.);;Agriculture - productspeanuts, millet, maize, sorghum, rice, cotton, tomatoes, green vegetables; cattle, poultry, pigs; fish;;ExportsU.S.$1.65 billion f.o.b. (2007 est.);;Exports - commoditiesfish, groundnuts (peanuts), petroleum products, phosphates, cotton;;Exports - partnersMali 18.4%, France 8.9%, Italy 5.8%, India 5.6% The Gambia 5.1% (2007 est);;ImportsU.S.$3.650 billion f.o.b. (2010 est.);;Imports - commoditiesfood and beverages, capital goods, fuels;;Imports - partnersFrance 22.2%, Netherlands 9.6%, PR of China 7.4%, Thailand 5.2%, Belgium 4.5% (2007);;Reserves of foreign exchange and goldU.S.$1.18 billion (2006 est.);;Debt - externalU.S.$1.88 billion (2010 est.);;Economic aid - recipientU.S.$449.6 million (2003 est.);;Currency (code)Communaute Financiere Africaine franc (XOF); note - responsible authority is the Bank of West African States;;Exchange ratesCommunaute Financiere Africaine francs (XOF) per US dollar - 522.89 (2006), 527.47 (2005), 528.29 (2004), 581.2 (2003), 696.99 (2002).In 2006, 1   655.82 XOF (West-African CFA), or 1 XOF  0.001525  /  to XOF / XOF to ;;Fiscal yearcalendar year  Macro-economic trends This is a chart of trend of gross domestic product of Senegal at market prices estimated by the Monetary Fund with figures in millions of CFA Francs.Average wages in 2007 hover around $45 per day. See also * Senegal* in Senegal* in Senegal* in Senegal* in Senegal* of universities in Senegal* of Africa* franc References External links**  Official Website: Republique du Senegal: MINISTRE DE LECONOMIE ET DES FINANCES.*  Annuaire des services administratifs, Republique du Senegal: MINISTRE DE LECONOMIE ET DES FINANCES.* SENEGAL: CHINESE GOODS STIMULATE INFORMAL TRADING ECONOMY. Interpress Service, Publication Date: 28-AUG-07.* * Franois Boye. A Retrospective Analysis of the Senegalese Economy, December 1990: Conference paper from School of Business, Montclair State University.*Senegal latest trade data on ITC Trade Map* The Senegalese Country Commercial Guide, published by the States government to aid the export of US products to foreign markets, can be found at: Senegalese Country Commercial Guides.* Wages of Senegalese workers* Institute for Security Studies Senegal Economic Summary, 2001.* Senegal Commerce Business and Trading: Republic of Senegal. (/)* Senegal: Economy. Aggregated press articles at OneWorldAfrica* African Studies, Columbia University: Senegal, Banking and investment information.*West African Agricultural Market Observer/Observatoire du March Agricole  (RESIMAO), a project of the West-African Market Information Network (WAMIS-NET),  provides live market and commodity prices from fifty seven regional and local public agricultural markets across Benin, Burkina Faso, Cte dIvoire, Guinea, Niger, Mali, Senegal, Togo, and Nigeria.  Sixty commodities are tracked weekly. The project is run by the Benin Ministry of Agriculture, and a number of European, African, and United Nations agencies. Published works * Amadou Sakho. Senegals slide from model economy to least developed country. Misanet.com / IPS (2001).* Birahim Bouna Niang. A diagnosis of Senegals public external debt, Provisional report. Republic of Senegal Ministry of Economy and Finance, Political Economy Unit (UPE). January 2003.* Pamela Cox. The Political Economy of Underdevelopment: Dependence in Senegal. African Affairs, Volume 79, Number 317. Pp. 603-605* Maghan Keita. The Political Economy of Health Care in Senegal, Journal of Asian and African Studies, Vol. 31, No. 3-4, 145-161 (1996)* John Waterbury and Mark Gersovitz, eds., The political economy of risk and choice in Senegal.Frank Cass & Co. Ltd, London, (1987) ISBN 0-7146-3297X* Christopher L. Delgado, Sidi Jammeh. The Political Economy of Senegal Under Structural Adjustment. School of Advanced International Studies, Johns Hopkins University (1991). ISBN 0-275-93525-6* Cathy L. Jabara, Robert L. Thompson. Agricultural Comparative Advantage under International Price Uncertainty: The Case of Senegal. Journal of Agricultural Economics, Vol. 62, No. 2 (May, 1980), pp. 188-198* Peter Mark. Urban Migration, Cash Cropping, and Calamity: The Spread of Islam among the Diola of Boulouf (Senegal), 1900-1940. African Studies Review, Vol. 21, No. 2 (Sep., 1978), pp. 1-14* Monique Lakroum. Le Travail Inegal: Paysans et Salaries Senegalais Face  la Crise des Annees Trente. Paris (1982).* Ibrahima Thioub, Momar-Coumba Diop, Catherine Boone. Economic Liberalization in Senegal: Shifting Politics of Indigenous Business Interests. African Studies Review, Vol. 41, No. 2 (Sep., 1998), pp. 63-89* Catherine Boone. Merchant Capital and the Roots of State Power in Senegal, 1930-1985, McGill, (1995).*  Jean Copans, Philippe Couty, Jean Roch, G. Rocheteau. Maintenance sociale et changement economique au Senegal I: Doctrine economique et pratique du travail chez les Mourides. Paris (1974).del Senegaldes Senegalde Senegaldu Sngaldo Senegaldi Senegalde SenegalSenegaludo Senegal
27372
Economy_of_South_Africa
spelling             OxfordThe economy of South Africa is ranked as an upper-middle income economy by the Bank, which makes the country one of only four countries in Africa represented in this category (the others being Botswana, Gabon and Mauritius).(South Africa  World Bank) About a quarter of the population is unemployed() and about the same proportion lives on less than US $1.25 a day.()Advanced development is significantly localised around four areas: Town, Elizabeth, Durban, and PretoriaJohannesburg. Beyond these four economic centres, development is marginal and poverty is still prevalent. Consequently, the vast majority of South Africans are poor. However, key marginal areas have experienced rapid growth recently. Such areas include Bay to Bay; Rustenburg area; Nelspruit area; Bloemfontein; Cape West Coast; and the KwaZulu-Natal North Coast.The African rand is the most actively traded market currency in the world. It has joined an elite club of fifteen currencies, the linked settlement (CLS), where forex transactions are settled immediately, lowering the risks of transacting across zones. The rand was the best-performing currency against the United States dollar (USD) between 2002 and 2005, according to the Bloomberg Currency Scorecard.HistoryThe formal economy of South Africa has its beginnings in the arrival of Dutch settlers in 1652, originally sent by the East India Company to establish a provisioning station for passing ships. As the colony increased in size, with the arrival of French Huguenots and German citizens, some of the colonists were set free to pursue commercial farming, leading to the dominance of agriculture in the economy.At the end of the 18th century, the British gained control of the colony, imposing the English language on the colonists, who were now developing a culture of their own. This in turn lead to the Trek, spreading farming deeper into the mainland, as well as the establishment of the independent Boer Republics of Transvaal and the Free State.In 1870 diamonds were discovered in Kimberley, while in 1886 some of the worlds largest gold deposits were discovered in the Witwatersrand region of Transvaal, quickly transforming the economy into a resource-dominated one. The British, seeking the riches of the gold fields, invaded the Boer republics and gained control of them in 1902 after the Boer War. The country also entered a period of industrialisation during this time, including the organisation of the first South African trade unions.The government soon started putting laws distinguishing between different races in place. In 1948 the National Party won the national elections, and immediately started implementing an even stricter race-based policy named Apartheid, effectively dividing the economy into a privileged white one, and an impoverished black one. The policy was widely criticised and led to crippling sanctions being placed against the country in the 1980s.South Africa held its first multi-racial elections in 1994, leaving the newly-elected National Congress (ANC) government the daunting task of trying to restore order to an economy harmed by sanctions, while also integrating the previously-disadvantaged segment of the population into it. The 1994 government inherited an economy wracked by long years of internal conflict and external sanctions.The government refrained from resorting to economic populism. Inflation was brought down, public finances were stabilised, and some foreign capital was attracted.() However, growth was still subpar.( At the start of 2000, then President Mbeki vowed to promote economic growth and investment by relaxing restrictive laws, stepping up the pace of privatisation, and cutting unneeded governmental spending. His policies face strong opposition from labour. From 2004 onward economic growth picked up significantly; both employment and formation increased.(In April 2009, amidst fears that South Africa would soon join much of the rest of the world in recession, Reserve Bank Governor Mboweni and Finance Minister Manuel differed on the matter: whereas Manuel foresaw a quarter of economic growth, Mboweni predicted further decline: technically, he said, thats a recession.(Quoted in Mafirakurewa 2009.)This is a chart of the trend of South Africas gross domestic product at market prices estimated by the Monetary Fund:(International Monetary Fund: World Economic Outlook Database, October 2010)SectorsNatural resourcesMining has been the main driving force behind the history and development of Africas most advanced and richest economy. Large scale and profitable mining started with the discovery of a diamond on the banks of the River in 1867 by Erasmus Jacobs and the subsequent discovery and exploitation of the Kimberley pipes a few years later. Gold rushes to Rest and Barberton were precursors to the biggest discovery of all, the Main Reef/Main Reef Leader on Gerhardus Oosthuizens farm Langlaagte, Portion C, in 1886, the Gold Rush and the subsequent rapid development of the gold field there, the biggest of them all.Diamond and gold production may now be well down from their peaks, though South Africa is still the second largest producer of gold, but South Africa remains a cornucopia of mineral riches.( It is the worlds largest producer of chrome, manganese, platinum, vanadium and vermiculite, the second largest producer of ilmenite, palladium, rutile and zirconium.(Mineral Commodity summaries) It is also the worlds third largest coal exporter.(South Africas coal future looks bright) Mining now accounts for a mere 2.3% of employment and 3% of GDP, down from around 14% in the 1980s.(South Africa, Jobless growth  The Economist)Agriculturethumb|Workers planting on a farm in the central area of Mpumalangathumb|Farm workersSouth Africa has a large agricultural sector and is a net exporter of farming products. There are almost a thousand cooperatives and agribusinesses throughout the country, and agricultural exports have constituted 8% of South African total exports for the past five years. The agricultural industry contributes around 10% of formal employment, relatively low compared to other parts of Africa, as well as providing work for casual labourers and contributing around 2.6% of GDP for the nation.(Human Rights Watch, 2001. Unequal Protection: The State Response to Violent Crime on South African Farms, ISBN 1-56432-263-7.) However, due to the aridity of the land, only 13.5% can be used for crop production, and only 3% is considered high potential land.(Mohamed, Najma. 2000. Greening Land and Agrarian Reform: A Case for Sustainable Agriculture, in At the Crossroads: Land and Agrarian Reform in South Africa into the 21st century, ed. Cousins, Ben. Bellville, School of Government, University of the Western Cape. ISBN 1-86808-467-1.)Although the commercial farming sector is relatively well developed, people in some rural areas still survive on agriculture. It is the eighth largest wine producer in the world, and the eleventh largest producer of sunflower seed. South Africa is a net exporter of agricultural products and foodstuffs, the largest number of exported items being sugar, grapes, citrus, nectarines, wine and deciduous fruit. The largest locally produced crop is maize (corn), and it has been estimated that 9 million tons are produced every year, with 7.4 million tons being consumed. Livestock are also popular on South African farms, with the country producing 85% of all meat consumed. The dairy industry consists of around 4,300 milk producers providing employment for 60,000 farm workers and contributing to the livelihoods of around 40,000 others.()In recent years, the government has introduced several agricultural sector reforms, such as reform and the deregulation of the market for agricultural products. The South African government has set a target of transferring 30% of productive farmland from whites to previously disadvantaged blacks by 2014.(Congo hands land to South African farmers. Telegraph. 21 October 2009.) Land reform has been criticised both by farmers groups and by landless workers, the latter alleging that the pace of change has not been fast enough, and the former alleging racist treatment and expressing concerns that a similar situation to Zimbabwes land reform policy may develop,(South Africas bitter harvest.) a fear exacerbated by comments made by former deputy president Mlambo-Ngcuka.(South Africans long wait for land, BBC News.)(SA to learn from land seizures, BBC News.) The sector continues to face problems, with increased foreign competition and crime being two of the major challenges for the industry. The government has been accused of either putting in too much effort,() or not enough effort,(Farms of Fear, The Sunday Times Magazine.) to tackle the problem of farm attacks as opposed to other forms of violent crime.Another issue which affects South African agriculture is environmental damage caused by misuse of the land and global climate change. South Africa is unusually vulnerable to climate change and resultant diminution of surface waters. Some predictions show surface water supply could decrease by 60% by the year 2070 in parts of the Western Cape.(Climate change to create African water refugees  scientists, Reuters Alertnet. Accessed 21 September 2006.) To reverse the damage caused by land mismanagement, the government has supported a scheme which promotes development and the use of natural resources.(Department of Agriculture South Africa.) Maize production, which contributes to a 36% majority of the gross value of South Africas field crops, has also experienced negative effects due to climate change. The estimated value of loss, which takes into consideration scenarios with and without the carbon dioxide fertilisation effect,(The CO2 fertilization effect: higher carbohydrate production and retention as biomass and seed yield. Retrieved 11 January 2010.) ranges between tens and hundreds of millions of Rands.(Economic Impacts of Climate Change in South Africa: A Preliminary Analysis of Unmitigated Damage Costs, J. Turpie et al. 2002. Joint Center for Political and Economic Studies Inc. Southern Waters Ecological Research & Consulting & Energy & Development Research Centre. 64 pages.)ManufacturingManufacturing is relatively small, providing just 13.3% of jobs and 15% of GDP. Labour costs are low, but not nearly as low as in most other emerging markets, and the cost of transport, communications and general living is much higher.(The South African automotive industry accounts for about 10% of South Africas manufacturing exports, contributes 7.5% to the countrys GDP and employs around 36,000 people. Annual production in 2007 was 535,000 vehicles, out of a global production of 73 million units in the same year. Vehicle exports were in the region of 170,000 units in 2007, exported mainly to Japan (about 29% of the value of total exports), Australia (20%), the UK (12%) and the US (11%). South Africa also exported ZAR 30.3 billion worth of auto components in 2006.(Automotive in South Africa  Key information on the South African motor industry)BMW, Ford, Volkswagen, Daimler-Chrysler and Toyota all have production plants in South Africa. Large component manufacturers with bases in the country are Arvin Exhaust, Bloxwitch, Corning and Senior Flexonics. There are also about 200 automotive component manufacturers in South Africa, and more than 150 others that supply the industry on a non-exclusive basis. The industry is concentrated in two provinces, the Cape and Gauteng.(  Companies producing in South Africa can take advantage of the low production costs and the access to new markets as a result of trade agreements with the European Union and the African Development Community.(Service industryThe domestic telecommunications infrastructure provides modern and efficient service to urban areas, including cellular and internet services. In 1997, Telkom, the South African telecommunications parastatal, was partly privatised and entered into a strategic equity partnership with a consortium of two companies, including SBC, a U.S. telecommunications company. In exchange for exclusivity (a monopoly) to provide certain services for 5 years, Telkom assumed an obligation to facilitate network modernisation and expansion into the unserved areas. A Second Network Operator was to be licensed to compete with Telkom across its spectrum of services in 2002, although this license was only officially handed over in late 2005 and has recently begun operating under the name, Neotel. Five cellular companies provide service to over 20 million subscribers, with South Africa considered to have the 4th most advanced mobile telecommunications network worldwide. The five major cellular providers are Vodacom, MTN, C, 8ta (owned by the parastatal, Telkom) and Virgin Mobile.South Africa is a popular tourist destination, with around 860,000 arrivals per month (March 2008) of which around 210,000 is from outside the African continent.()A revenue equalling between 1% and 3% of GDP is generated by the tourism industry.() Among the main attractions are the diverse and picturesque culture, the game reserves and the highly regarded local wines.Trade and investmentPrincipal international trading partners of South Africabesides other African countriesinclude Germany, the United States, China, Japan, the United Kingdom and Spain.() Chief exports include corn, diamonds, fruits, gold, metals and minerals, sugar, and wool. Machinery and transportation equipment make up more than one-third of the value of the countrys imports. Other imports include chemicals, manufactured goods, and petroleum.thumb|South African exports in 2006As a result of a November 1993 bilateral agreement, the Private Investment Corporation (OPIC) can assist U.S. investors in the South African market with services such as political risk insurance and loans and loan guarantees. In July 1996, the United States and South Africa signed an investment fund protocol for a $120 million OPIC fund to make equity investments in South and Southern Africa. OPIC is establishing an additional fund  the Sub-Saharan Africa Infrastructure Fund, capitalised at $350 million  to investment in infrastructure projects. The Trade and Development Agency also has been actively involved in funding feasibility studies and identifying investment opportunities in South Africa for U.S. businesses.Despite the numerous positive economic achievements since 1994, South Africa has struggled to attract significant direct investment. The situation may have started to change however, with 2005 seeing the largest single FDI into South Africa when Barclays bought a majority share in local bank Group Limited. Deals between the British based Vodafone and South Africas Vodacom have taken place in 2006. In 2010, two multi-billion dollar deals, one by HSBC to acquire Nedbank and one by Walmart to acquire Massmart Holdings, fell through. (Walmart did eventually buy Massmart in 2011)Economic policyGEAR The Government of South Africa demonstrated its commitment to markets, privatisation and a favourable investment climate with its introduction of the Growth, Employment and Redistribution (GEAR) strategy  the neo-liberal economic strategy to cover 19962000. Introduced by Finance Minister Manuel in June 1996, the policy set government the goals of achieving sustained annual real GDP growth of 6% or more by the year 2000 while creating 400,000 new jobs each year. The policy was meant to increase investment, especially Direct Investment, in the country to help achieve these goals.The outcomes of the GEAR strategy have been mixed. It brought greater financial discipline and macroeconomic stability but largely failed to deliver in key areas. Formal employment continued to decline, and despite the ongoing efforts of black empowerment and signs of a fledgling black middle class and social mobility, the countrys wealth remained unevenly distributed along racial lines. The desperately needed FDI also remained elusive, and consequently the ambitious economic growth targets were never realised. The policy came under stringent fire from many critics, especially when growth slumped to only 0.8% (later revised even lower to 0.5% by Statistics South Africa) in 1998.South Africas budgetary reforms such as the Medium-Term Expenditure Framework and the Public Finance Management Act  which aims at better reporting, auditing, and increased accountability  and the structural changes to its monetary policy framework (including inflation targeting) have, however, created transparency and predictability and are widely acclaimed. Trade liberalisation also progressed substantially since the early 1990s. Average import tariffs in South Africa, for example, declined to 14.3% in 1999 from more than 30% in 1990. These efforts, together with South Africas implementation of its Trade Organisation (WTO) obligations and its constructive role in launching the Doha Development Round, show South Africas acceptance of market principles.One of the key pillars of the GEAR macroeconomic strategy was to reduce the fiscal deficit, which had reached over 9% of GDP during the 1993/4 fiscal year. The deficit has remained below 3% since the implementation of the reforms, greatly improving South Africas fiscal health. The Governments 2002 budget called for a moderate increase in spending to promote faster growth and poverty alleviation.Inflation targeting and GDP growthIn the February 2000 Speech, the Minister of Finance, announced a policy of targeting, helping to bring consumer inflation, which had been running in the double digits for over 20 years, under control. Inflation declined from 6.9% in 1998 to less than 6.0% in 2000. The target was set to keep the Consumer Price Index excluding mortgage costs (CPIX)  a key indicator of inflation  between 3% and 6% average per annum. Although initially successful, the Rands rapid depreciation in late 2001 led to greater inflationary pressure and the South African Reserve Bank missed the target during the course of 2002, with inflation coming in at an average of 9.3% for the year.From September 2003 to 2005, however, the CPIX inflation rate has remained consistently within the target range. The average annual rates of CPIX since 2001 were: 2001  6.6%, 2002  9.3%, 2003  6.8%, 2004  4.3%, 2005  4.3%.Success in keeping inflation down allowed the Reserve Bank to reduce the prime lending rate  that determines the interest rate. During 2003 alone interest rates were cut by 550 basis points (5.5%), while between 2002 and 2006 interest rates were cut by a total 650 basis points (6.5%).The cut in interest rates saw consumer spending rise, the construction sector boom and the sale of new vehicles reach record levels. This in turn generated much needed growth in gross domestic product (GDP). Ironically enough, GDP growth started to gather steam just as the end of the GEAR period neared. Since 1999, quarterly GDP growth has been consistently positive and annual GDP growth consistently above 2%. Between 1996 and 2004, GDP growth averaged 3.1%, rising to 4.5% (based on 2005 market prices) in 2004.Not all economist agree with inflation targeting and the dogmatic adherence to this policy in 2006 led an successive increases in the prime lending rate that totalled 5.5%. These increases were in response to rising consumers prices, but critically consumer prices increased due to external factors (world food price crisis and rising oil prices). No increase in the prime lending rate could counteract these external factors and while inflation remained high the housing market and the motor manufacturing and retail sector suffered heavy losses which in turn led to heavy job losses. Even though the prime lending rate had returned to 2006 levels by mid-2009 amid the global crisis of 20072010, it still remains high at 7%. In 2009 the Prize winning economist Stiglitz warned South Africa that inflation targeting should be a secondary concern amid the global financial crisis of 20072009.()Although economic growth has improved, the growth has been largely jobless, and quicker growth is still needed. The South African Government estimates that the economy must achieve growth at an average of 4.5% until 2010 and 6% thereafter to reach its goal of halving South Africas high levels of unemployment, estimated at 26.5% (March 2005  Stats SA), by 2014.Financial policySouth Africa has a sophisticated financial structure with the Securities Exchange, a large and active exchange that ranks 18th in the world in terms of total capitalisation as of March 2009.(WFE  YTD Monthly) The African Reserve Bank (SARB) performs all central banking functions. The SARB is independent and operates in much the same way as Western central banks, influencing interest rates and controlling liquidity through its interest rates on funds provided to private sector banks. Quantitative credit controls and administrative control of deposit and lending rates have largely disappeared. South African banks adhere to the Bank of International Standards core standards.The South African Government has taken steps to gradually reduce remaining exchange controls, which apply only to South African residents. Private citizens are now allowed a one-time investment of up to R2 000 000 in offshore accounts. Since 2001, South African companies may invest up to R750 million in Africa and R500 million elsewhere. Smaller South Africa Companies can also move up to 50 Million Rand without SARB approval, allowing for swifter expansion to overseas markets. South Africa also has a strict policy of reducing its international debt and maintaining a healthy of trade. This has led to recent legislation promoting South African products through the South African campaign and new labelling legislation dictating all products must be labelled with their country of manufacture.Comparison with other emerging marketsSouth Africa compares well to other markets on affordability and availability of capital, market sophistication, business tax rates and infrastructure, but fares poorly on the cost and availability of labour, education, and the use of technology and innovation.(SA fares well in emerging markets study  SouthAfrica.info)In a 2010 survey, South Africa was found to have the second most sophisticated financial market and the second-lowest effective tax rate (business taxes as a percentage of company profits), out of 14 surveyed countries. The country was also ranked fourth for ease of accessing capital, fourth for cost of capital, sixth for its transport infrastructure (considered better than that of China, India, Mexico, Brazil and Poland, but behind that of Korea and Chile), and seventh for direct investment as a percentage of GDP: in 2008 it was over 3% of the GDP.(However, for availability of labour, South Africa is ranked last, and is also the only country of the 14 whose labour force shrunk in 2008 (by over 3%, compared to India, where the workforce grew by almost 3%). The cost of manual labour is ranked fifth out of 11 countries, at about the same level as South Korea, but more expensive than Brazil, India and China. South African factory workers are also better paid than those of Brazil, China, India, Poland and Mexico. South African workers are more productive than workers in Russia, Colombia, Brazil, China and India, but less productive than workers in Korea, Chile and Mexico.(South Africa ranks poorly when it comes to education; only India fares worse when it comes to the percentage of matriculants moving onto higher education in 2007: in Brazil, 30% of matriculants graduated to tertiary institutions in 2007, and the figure was over 50% in Chile and over 90% in Korea, compared to just 15% in South Africa. This is despite the report ranking South Africa fourth for the percentage of GDP it spends on education (over 4% in 2007). The report ranks South Africa 11th out of 14 countries when it comes to the countrys use of technology and innovation, putting the African country behind Korea as well as the countries, but ahead of Colombia, Mexico and Argentina.(Nevertheless, South Africa is falling behind other emerging markets, such as India and China, owing to several factors: the country is relatively small, without the advantage of a huge domestic customer base; it has had for decades an unusually low rate of saving and investment, partly because of political uncertainties; an inadequate education system results in an acute shortage of skilled manpower; a strong and volatile currency deters investors and makes its exports less competitive; the infrastructure, though far better than in the rest of Africa, suffers from severe bottlenecks, including power shortages, and urgently needs upgrading.(In 2011, after a year of observer status, South Africa officially joined the BRICS group of now-five emerging-market nations at the summit held in Sanya, Hainan, China.(Blanchard, Ben and Zhou Xin, reporting; Ken Wills, editing, UPDATE 1-BRICS discussed global monetary reform, not yuan, Reuters Africa, 14 April 2011 9:03 am GMT. Retrieved 2011-04-14.)IssuesSouth Africas problems include crime, corruption, and HIV/AIDS. South Africa suffers from relatively heavy overall regulation burden compared to developed countries. State ownership and interference impose high barriers to entry in many areas.() Restrictive labour regulations have contributed to the unemployment malaise.()UnemploymentSouth Africa has an extreme and persistent high unemployment rate, which interacts with other economic and social problems such as inadequate education, poor health outcomes and crime.(Economic Survey of South Africa 2010  OECD) In the third quarter of 2010, 29.80% of blacks were officially unemployed, compared with 22.30% of coloureds, 8.60 of Asians and 5.10% of whites.(Statistics South Africa  Economic Indicators for 20092010 by Year, Key Indicators and month)The unemployment rate has fuelled crime, inequality and social unrest. The global economic downturn has made the problem worse, wiping out more than a million jobs. In September 2010, over a third of South Africas workforce were out of work, and so were more than half of blacks aged 1534, three times the level for whites.(Wage Laws Squeeze South Africas Poor  NYTimes.com) Some experts contend that higher wages negotiated by politically powerful trade unions have suppressed job growth,( while a study by Harvard economist Dani Rodrik found that the shrinking of the manufacturing sector - rooted in structural problems such as South Africas history of apartheid - was more to blame for rising unemployment and low growth.()In the second quarter of 2010, the jobless rate increased to 25.3%, and the number of people with work fell by 61,000 to 12.7 million. Rising unemployment may curb consumer spending, which accounts for two-thirds of demand in the economy. The biggest decline in employment was recorded in the manufacturing industry, which shed 53,000 workers. Agriculture lost 32,000 jobs, employment in the construction industry fell by 15,000. Over 60% of those who are unemployed have been without jobs for more than a year.(South Africa Loses More Jobs, Undermining Strength of Economys Recovery  Bloomberg)Income inequalitythumb|left|430px|Gini-coefficient of national income distribution around the world (dark blue: 0.60)South Africa is ranked in the top 10 countries in the world for inequality.(Inequality in income or expenditure / Gini index, Development Report 2007/08, UNDP. Retrieved 3 February 2008.)(Distribution of family income  Gini index, World Factbook, CIA, updated on 24 January 2008.)( ) The high level of overall income inequality has further accentuated: the countrys coefficient increased by four percentage points, from 0.66 to 0.70, between 1993 and 2008, and income has become increasingly concentrated in the top decile.(Trends in South African Income Distribution and Poverty since the Fall of Apartheid  Papers  OECD iLibrary) Inequality between urban and rural areas is changing: while rural poverty rates remain substantially higher than those in urban areas, urban poverty rates are rising and rural rates seem to be falling.(While between-race inequality is slowly falling, an increase in intra-race inequality is preventing the aggregate measures from declining. Despite that, between-race inequality also remains a central issue: real incomes have been rising for all groups, but many blacks in the country still live in poverty. At any poverty line, blacks are very much poorer than coloureds, who are very much poorer than Indians, who are poorer than whites.(The demise of apartheid in 1994 left a skewed racial economic hierarchy that placed whites firmly at the top, followed by Indians, coloureds, and then blacks. Since then the African National Congress government has made Black Economic Empowerment (BEE) a policy centre-piece, but by the partys own admission it has failed to improve the lot of the vast majority of black South Africans.(South Africa: Inequality not so black and white  Norwegian Council for Africa)Public sector strikesSince 2007 the South African unions representing public sector workers recurrently went on strike, demanding pay rises significantly above inflation, in a practice that some experts argue is suppressing job growth, harming millions of South Africans who are out of a job.(In August and September 2010, South African unions organised a crippling four-week national strike involving 1.3 million public sector workers, demanding a 8.6% wage increase. The strike ended after the government had raised its 5.2% wage increase to 7.5%. The deal swelled state spending by about 1%.(South African unions suspend public sector strike  The Guardian)Protesters sought to block hospitals, and South African media have reported numerous acts of violence against health and education staff who insisted on going to work. Volunteers and army medics were called in to help at hospitals, and some patients were moved to private medical facilities.(Brain drainThere has been a large degree of human capital flight from South Africa in recent years.(Human Capital Flight: Stratification,Globalization, and the Challenges to Tertiary Education in Africa; Benno J. Ndulu; JHEA/RESA Vol. 2, No. 1, 2004, pp. 5791)(Skilled Labour Migration from Developing Countries: Study on South and Southern Africa) South Africas Bureau of Statistics estimates that between 1 million and 1.6 million people in skilled, professional, and managerial occupations have emigrated since 1994 and that, for every emigrant, 10 unskilled people lose their jobs.( There are a range of causes cited for the migration of skilled South Africans.In mid 1998, the Southern African Migration Project (SAMP) undertook a study to examine and assess the range of factors that contribute to skilled South Africans desire to leave the country: over two-thirds of the sample said that they had given the idea of emigration some thought while 38% said they had given it a great deal of thought. Among the reasons cited for wishing to leave the country was the declining quality of life and high levels of crime. Furthermore, the governments affirmative action policy was identified as another factor influencing the emigration of skilled white South Africans. The results of the survey indicate that skilled whites are strongly opposed to this policy and the arguments advanced in support of it.(However, flight of human capital in South Africa should not be attributed solely to regional factors. For example the demand for skilled labourers in the UK, US, Canada, New Zealand, and Australia has led to active recruitment programs by those countries in South Africa. These countries accounted for 75% (by volume) of recent skilled emigration with the UK receiving approximately half of annual skilled South African emigration from 1990 to 1996.( It has been suggested that the role of domestic socio-political variables may be negligible.( The health sector has been hit particularly hard.(Health Personnel in Southern Africa: Confronting maldistribution and brain drain)A widespread skills drain in South Africa and in the developing world in general is generally considered to be a cause for concern.(World Bank, Centre for Study of African Economies, IMF 2004) While it may be the case that the economy will survive intact, the poor in South Africa undoubtedly suffer the most.Illegal immigrationRefugees from poorer neighbouring countries include many immigrants from the Democratic Republic of the Congo, Mozambique, Zimbabwe, Malawi and others, representing a large portion of the sector. With high unemployment levels amongst poorer South Africans, xenophobia is prevalent and many South Africans feel resentful of immigrants who are seen to be depriving the native population of jobs, a feeling which has been given credibility by the fact that many South African employers have employed migrants from other countries for lower pay than South African citizens, especially in the construction, tourism, agriculture and service industries. Illegal immigrants are also heavily involved in informal trading.() However, many immigrants to South Africa continue to live in poor conditions, and the South African immigration policy has become increasingly restrictive since 1994.()Electricity crisisAfter unsuccessful attempts by the government to encourage private construction of power generation capacity, the state-owned power supplier Eskom started experiencing deficiency in capacity in the electrical generating and reticulation infrastructure in 2007. Such lack led to inability to meet the routine demands of industry and consumers, resulting in countrywide rolling blackouts. Initially, the lack of capacity was triggered by a failure at nuclear power station, but a general lack of capacity due to increased demand has become evident since then. The supplier has been widely criticised for failing to adequately plan for and construct sufficient electrical generating capacity,(Power Failures Outrage South Africa article by Bearak and W. Dugger in New York Times 31 January 2008) although ultimately the government has admitted that it is at fault for refusing to approve funding for investment in infrastructure.()The crisis was resolved within a few months, but the margin between national demand and available capacity is still low (particularly in peak hours), and power stations are under strain, such that another phase of rolling blackouts is probable if parts of the supply are halted for whatever reason. The government and Eskom are currently planning new power stations, at cost to the South African consumer. The power utility plans to have 20,000 megawatts of nuclear power in its grid by 2025.()()ReferencesExternal links* * South African Tax Resources* South African Reserve Bank  Economic and Financial Data* Statistics South Africa  Official Government Statisticsvan Suid-Afrika   de Sud-fricaSdafrikasde Sudfrica de lAfrique du Sudde Sudfricadi Sud-AfrikaAfrika Selatande Sud-AfricaRepubliki Poudniowej Afrykida frica do SulAfricii de Sud- e Afriks Jugoretalous- 
27637
Structural_geology
Structural geology is the study of the three-dimensional distribution of rock units with respect to their deformational histories. The primary goal of structural geology is to use measurements of present-day rock geometries to uncover information about the history of deformation (strain) in the rocks, and ultimately, to understand the field that resulted in the observed strain and geometries. This understanding of the dynamics of the stress field can be linked to important events in the regional geologic past; a common goal is to understand the structural evolution of a particular area with respect to regionally widespread patterns of rock deformation (e.g., mountain building, rifting) due to tectonics.Use and importanceThe study of geologic structures has been of prime importance in geology, both geology and mining geology.() Folded and faulted rock strata commonly form traps for the accumulation and concentration of fluids such as petroleum and gas. Faulted and structurally complex areas are notable as permeable zones for hydrothermal fluids and the resulting concentration areas for base and precious metal ore deposits. Veins of minerals containing various metals commonly occupy faults and fractures in structurally complex areas. These structurally fractured and faulted zones often occur in association with intrusive igneous rocks. They often also occur around geologic reef complexes and collapse features such as ancient sinkholes. Deposits of gold, silver, copper, lead,  zinc, and other metals, are commonly located in structurally complex areas.Structural geology is a critical part of geology, which is cA, for instance). In cases where there is a bedding-plane foliation caused by burial metamorphism or diagenesis this may be enumerated as S0a. If there are folds, these are numbered as F1, F2, etc. Generally the axial plane foliation or cleavage of a fold is created during folding, and the number convention should match. For example, an F2 fold should have an S2 axial foliation.Deformations are numbered according to their order of formation with the letter D denoting a deformation event. For example D1, D2, D3. Folds and foliations, because they are formed by deformation events, should correlate with these events. For example an F2 fold, with an S2 axial plane foliation would be the result of a D2 deformation.Metamorphic events may span multiple deformations. Sometimes it is useful to identify them similarly to the structural features for which they are responsible, e.g.; M2. This may be possible by observing porphyroblast formation in cleavages of known deformation age, by identifying metamorphic mineral assemblages created by different events, or via geochronology.  Intersection lineations in rocks, as they are the product of the intersection of two planar structures, are named according to the two planar structures from which they are formed. For instance, the intersection lineation of a S1 cleavage and bedding is the L1-0 intersection lineation (also known as the cleavage-bedding lineation).Stretching lineations may be difficult to quantify, especially in highly stretched ductile rocks where minimal foliation information is preserved. Where possible, when correlated with deformations (as few are formed in folds, and many are not strictly associated with planar foliations), they may be identified similar to planar surfaces and folds, e.g.; L1, L2. For convenience some geologists prefer to annotate them with a subscript S, for example Ls1 to differentiate them from intersection lineations, though this is generally redundant. Stereographic projections projection of structural strike and dip measurements is a powerful method for analyzing the nature and orientation of deformation stresses, lithological units and penetrative fabrics.Rock macro-structuresOn a large scale, structural geology is the study of the three dimensional relationships of stratigraphic units to one another within terranes of rock or within geological regions. This branch of structural geology deals mainly with the orientation, deformation and relationships of stratigraphy (bedding), which may have been faulted, folded or given a foliation by some tectonic event. This is mainly a geometric science, from which cross sections and three dimensional block models of rocks, regions, terranes and parts of the Earths crust can be generated. Study of regional structure is important in understanding orogeny, tectonics and more specifically in the oil, gas and mineral exploration industries as structures such as faults, folds and unconformities are primary controls on ore mineralisation and oil traps. Modern regional structure is being investigated using tomography and seismic reflection in three dimensions, providing unrivaled images of the Earths interior, its faults and the deep crust. Further information from geophysics such as gravity and airborne magnetics can provide information on the nature of rocks imaged in the deep crust.See: * (geology)* (geology)* (geology)* (geology)Rock microstructuresRock microstructure or texture of rocks is studied by structural geologists on a small scale to provide detailed information mainly about rocks and some features of rocks, most often if they have been folded. Textural study involves measurement and characterisation of foliations, crenulations, metamorphic minerals, and timing relationships between these structural features and mineralogical features. Usually this involves collection of hand specimens, which may be cut to provide petrographic thin sections which are analysed under a microscope.  Microstructural analysis finds application also in multi-scale statistical analysis, aimed to analyze some rock features showing scale invariance (see e.g. Guerriero et al., 2009, 2011).KinematicsGeologists use their measurements of rock geometries to understand histories of strain in the rocks. Strain can take the form of brittle faulting and ductile folding and shearing. Brittle deformation takes place in the shallow crust, and ductile deformation takes place in the deeper crust, where temperatures and pressures are higher.Stress FieldsBy understanding the constitutive relationships between stress and strain in rocks, geologists can translate the observed patterns of rock deformation into a stress field during the geologic past. The following list of features are typically used to determine stress fields from deformational structures.*In perfectly brittle rocks, faulting occurs at 30 to the greatest compressional stress. (Byerlees Law)*The greatest compressive stress is normal to fold axial planes.See also* Crenulation* Geomorphology* of rock textures* restoration* projection* Tectonophysics* (geology)References**** * geografieestructuralgeologiede:Strukturgeologieet:Struktuurigeoloogiaestructuralestrukturalastructuraleestruturalstrukturstrutturalegeologieja:no:Strukturgeologistrukturalnaestruturalgeolgiacht cu tozh:
28343
South_African_Republic
currency  African Republic pondThe South African Republic (, or ZAR), often informally known as the Transvaal Republic, was an independent Boer-ruled country in Africa during the second half of the 19th century. Not to be confused with the present-day Republic of South Africa, it occupied the area later known as the South African province of Transvaal. The ZAR was established in 1852, and was independent from 1856 to 1877, then again from 1881 to 1900 after the Boer War, in which the Boers regained their independence from the Empire.In 1900 the ZAR was annexed by the United Kingdom during the Boer War although the official surrender of the territory only took place at the end of the war, on 31 May 1902. In 1910 it became the Transvaal Province of the of South Africa.The first president of the South African Republic was Wessel Pretorius, elected in 1857, son of the famous Voortrekker leader Pretorius, who commanded the Boers to Victory at the of Blood River.The capital was established at Pretoria (founded 1855), though for a brief period Potchefstroom served as the seat of government. The parliament, the Volksraad, had 24 members.HistoryEarly historyThe Transvaal region was inhabited by the earliest ancestors of modern South Africans, the Khoisan, for thousands of years, and by iron-age ancestors of modern Bantu-language speaking South Africans, such as the Sotho, Swati, Tswana, Pedi, Venda and Transvaal-Ndebele peoples since the mid 4th century AD. By the beginning of the 19th century, the area that would eventually become the South African Republic was home to thousands of human settlements, including chiefdoms, villages and substantial towns such as Dithakong, whose population was comparable in size to that of contemporary early 19th century Cape Town.  The residents of these villages, towns and cities engaged in farming, cattle keeping, iron, copper and tin mining, metal tool making, and long distance direct and indirect trade.  In 1817, the region was invaded by Mzilikazi, originally a lieutenant of Zulu King Shaka who was pushed from his own territories to the west by the Zulu armies.  After a brief alliance with the Transvaal Ndebele, Mzilikazi became leader of the Ndebele people.  (The people of this political and ethnic entity called themselves Ndebele or amaNdebele, but because of linguistic differences, they were called Matebele by the local Sotho-Tswana.)  Mzilikazis invasion of the Transvaal was one part of a vast series of inter-related wars, forced migrations and famines that indigenous people and later historians came to call the Difaqane or mfecane.  In the Transvaal, the Difaqane severely weakened and disrupted the towns and villages of the Sotho-Tswana chiefdoms, their political systems and economies, making them very weak, and easy to colonize by the European settlers who would shortly arrive from the south.As Ndebele moved into Transvaal, the remnants of the Venda retreated north to the Waterberg and Zoutpansberg, while Mzilikazi made his chief kraal north of the Magaliesberg mountains near present day Pretoria, with an important military outpost to guard trade routes to the north at Mosega, not far from the site of the modern town of Zeerust. As the Ndebele conquered the Transvaal they absorbed many members of the conquered Sotho-Tswana and other tribes and established a military despotism. From about 1827 until about 1836, Mzilikazi dominated the southwestern Transvaal.  Before that time the region between the Vaal and Limpopo was scarcely known to Europeans, but in 1829, Mzilikazi was visited at Mosega by Moffat, and between that date and 1836 a few British traders and explorers visited the country and made known its principal features.ColonizationImage:MW Pretorius statue.jpg|thumb|right|Statue of Wessel Pretorius, the first President of the ZAR in Pretoria.In the 1830s and the 1840s, descendants of Dutch and other settlers, collectively known as Boers (farmers) or Voortrekkers (pioneers), left the British Colony, in what was to be called the Trek.  With their military technology, they overcame the local forces with relative ease, and formed several small Boer republics in areas beyond British control, without a central government.From 1835 until 1838, Boer settlers started to cross the Vaal and they had several skirmishes with the Ndebele.  On 16 October 1836, a Boer laager (or fortified circle of wagons) led by Hendrik Potgieter, was attacked by an Ndebele force of about 5,000, who looted all of Potgieters livestock, but were unable to defeat the laager.  One of the Sotho-Tswana chiefs, Chief Moroko of the Barolong people, who had earlier fled the Difaqane to the south to create the settlement of Nchu, sent fresh livestock to Potgieter to draw his partys wagons back to the safety of the Rolong stronghold of Thaba Nchu, where the Sotho-Tswana chief offered the Boers food and protection.  By January 1837, an alliance of 107 Boers, sixty Rolong, and forty Coloured men, organized as a commando under the leadership of Potgieter and Gert Maritz, attacked Mzilikazis settlement at Mosega, which suffered heavy losses, and early in 1838 Mzilikazi fled north beyond the Limpopo (to current day Zimbabwe), never to return to Tranvaal.  Hendrik Potgieter, after the flight of the Ndebele, issued a proclamation in which he declared the country which Mzilikazi had abandoned and forfeited to the emigrant farmers, but also denying land rights to the Sotho-Tswana who had saved him and assisted in the defeat of the Mzilikazi and the Ndebele. After the Ndebele and Sotho-Tswana claims to the territory had been suppressed by the Boer political leadership, many Boer farmers trekked across the Vaal and occupied parts of the Transvaal, often near Sotho-Tswana villages, dividing the population up as forced laborers. Into these areas, still partly populated by remnants of the Ndebele and Sotho-Tswana, there was also a considerable immigration of members of the various Sotho-Tswana chiefdoms who had fled during the Difaqane. The first permanent European settlement north of the Vaal was made by a party under Potgieters leadership. That commandant had in March 1838 gone to Natal, and had endeavoured to avenge the massacre of Piet Retief and his comrades by the Zulus. Jealous, however, of the preference shown by the Dutch farmers in Natal to another commandant, Maritz, Potgieter speedily recrossed the Drakensberg, and in November 1838 he and his followers settled by the banks of the Mooi river, founding a town named Potchefstroom in honour of Potgieter. This party instituted an elementary form of government, and in 1840 entered into a loose confederation with the Republic Boer, and also with the Boers south of the Vaal, whose headquarters were at Winburg. In 1842, however, Potgieters party declined to go to the help of the Natal Boers, then involved in conflict with the British. Up to 1845 Potgieter continued to exercise authority over the Boer communities on both sides of the Vaal. A determination to keep clear of the British and to obtain access to the outer world through an independent channel led Potgieter and a considerable number of the Potchefstroom and Winburg burghers in 1845 to migrate towards Delagoa Bay. Potgieter settled in the Zoutpansberg, while other farmers chose as headquarters a place on the inner slopes of the Drakensberg, where they founded a village called Andries Ohrigstad. It proved fever-ridden and was abandoned, a new village being laid out on higher ground and named Lydenburg in memory of their sufferings at the abandoned settlement. Meanwhile, the southern districts abandoned by Potgieter and his comrades were occupied by other Boers. These were joined in 1848 by Andries W. J. Pretorius, who became commandant of the Potchefstroom settlers. thumb|right|250px|Coat of arms of the South African Republic displayed on Krugers wagonOn 17 January 1852, the Kingdom signed the River Convention treaty with 5,000 or so of the Boer families (about 40,000 white people), recognizing their independence in the region to the north of the River, or the Transvaal. The Free State, a sister Boer republic, was granted independence around the same time.  But while they had obtained independence, they were far from being a united people. When Pretorius conducted the negotiations which led to the signing of the Sand River Convention he did so without consulting the volksraad, and Potgieters party accused him of usurping power and aiming at domination over the whole country. However, the volksraad, at a meeting held at Rustenburg on 16 March 1852, ratified the convention, Potgieter and Pretorius having been publicly reconciled on the morning of the same day. Both leaders were near the end of their careers; Potgieter died in March and Pretorius in July 1853. On the death of Andries Pretorius his son W. Pretorius (q.v.) had been appointed his successor, and to the younger Pretorius was due the first efforts to end the discord and confusion which prevailed among the burghers - a discord heightened by ecclesiastical strife, the points at issue being questions not of faith but of church government. In 1856 a series of public meetings, summoned by Pretorius, was held at different districts in the Transvaal for the purpose of discussing and deciding whether the time had not arrived for substituting a strong central government in place of the petty district governments which had hitherto existed. The result was that a representative assembly of delegates was elected, empowered to draft a constitution.CreationIn December 1856, the Transvaal assembly met at Potchefstroom, and for three weeks was engaged in modelling the constitution 1856 of the country. The name Zuid-Afrikaansche Republiek (South African Republic) was adopted as the title of the state, and the new constitution made provision for a volksraad to which members were to be elected by the people for a period of two years, and in which the legislative function was vested. The administrative authority was to be vested in a president, aided by an executive council. It was stipulated that members both of the volksraad and council should be members of the Reformed Church, and of European blood. No equality of coloured people with the white inhabitants would be tolerated either in church or state. In reviewing an incident so important in the history of the Transvaal as the appointment of the Potchefstroom assembly it is of interest to note the gist of the complaint among the Boers which led to this revolution in the government of the country as it had previously existed. In his History of South Africa Theal says: The community of Lydenburg was accused of attempting to domineer over the whole country, without any other right to pre-eminence than that of being composed of the earliest inhabitants, a right which it had forfeited by its opposition to the general weal. In later years this complaint was precisely that of the Uitlanders at Johannesburg. To conciliate the Boers of Zoutpansberg the new-born assembly at Potchefstroom appointed Stephanus Schoeman, the commandantgeneral of the Zoutpansberg district, commandant-general of the whole country. This offer was, however, declined by Schoeman, and both Zoutpansberg and Lydenburg indignantly repudiated the new assembly and its constitution. The executive council, which had been appointed by the Potchefstroom assembly, with Pretorius as president, now took up a bolder attitude: they deposed Schoeman from all authority, declared Zoutpansberg in a state of blockade, and denounced the Boers of the two northern districts as rebels.Further to strengthen their position, Pretorius and his party unsuccessfully endeavoured to bring about a union with the Free State. Peaceful overtures having failed, Pretorius and Kruger placed themselves at the head of a commando which crossed the Vaal with the object of enforcing union, but the Free State compelled their withdrawal. Within the Transvaal the forces making for union gained strength notwithstanding these events, and by 1860 Zoutpansberg and Lydenburg had become incorporated with the republic. Pretoria, newly founded, and named in honour of the elder Pretorius, was made the seat of government and capital of the country. The ecclesiastical efforts at unity had not been equally successful. The Separatist Reformed Church of Holland had sent out a young expositor of its doctrines named Postma, who, in November 1858, became minister of Rustenburg. In the following year a general church assembly endeavoured to unite all the congregations in a common government, but Postmas consistory rejected these overtures, and from that date the Separatist (or Dopper) Church has had an independent existence. Paul Kruger, who lived near Rustenburg, became a strong adherent of the new church. Pretorius, while still president of the Transvaal, had been elected, through the efforts of his partisans, president of the Orange Free State. He thereupon (in February 1860) obtained six months leave of absence and repaired to Bloemfontein, in the hope of peacefully bringing about a union between the two republics. He had no sooner left the Transvaal than the -old Lydenburg party, headed by Cornelis Potgieter, landdrost of Lydenburg, protested that the union would be much more beneficial to the Free State than to the people of Lydenburg, and followed this up with the contention that it was illegal for any one to be president of the South African Republic and the Free State at the same time. At the end of the six months Pretorius, after a stormy meeting of the volksraad, apparently in disgust at the whole situation, resigned the presidency of the Transvaal. J. H. Grobelaar, who had been appointed president during the temporary absence of Pretorius, was requested to remain in office. The immediate followers of Pretorius now became extremely incensed at the action of the Lydenburg party, and a mass meeting was held at Potchefstroom (October 1860), where it was resolved that: (a) the volksraad no longer enjoyed its confidence; (b) that Pretorius should remain president of the South African Republic, and have a years leave of absence to bring about union with the Free State; (c) that Schoeman should act as president during the absence of Pretorius; (d) that before the return of Pretorius to resume his duties a new volksraad should be elected. In 1865 an empty exchequer called for drastic measures, and the volksraad determined to endeavour to meet their liabilities and provide for further contingencies by the issue of notes. Paper money was thus introduced, and in a very short time fell to a considerable discount. In this same year the farmers of the Zoutpansberg district were driven into laagers by a native rising which they were unable to suppress. Schoemansdal, a village at the foot of the Zoutpansberg, was the most important settlement of the district, and the most advanced outpost in European occupation at that time in South Africa. It was just within the tropics, and was situated in a well-watered and beautiful country. It was used as a base by hunters and traders with the interior, and in its vicinity there gathered a number of settlers of European origin, many of them outcasts from Europe or Cape Colony. They earned the reputation of being the most lawless white inhabitants in the whole of South Africa. When called upon to go to the aid of this settlement, which in 18651866 was sore pressed by one of the mountain Bantu tribes known as the Baramapulana, the burghers of the southern Transvaal objected that the white inhabitants of that region were too lawless and reckless a body to merit their assistance. In 1867 Schoemansdal and a considerable portion of the district were abandoned on the advice of Commandant-general Paul Kruger, and Schoemansdal finally was burnt to ashes by a party of natives. It was not until 1869 that peace was patched up, and the settlement arrived at left the mountain tribes in practical independence. Meanwhile the public credit and finances of the Transvaal went from bad to worse. The paper notes already issued had been constituted by law legal tender for all debts, but in 1868 their power of actual purchase was only 30% compared with that of gold, and by 1870 it had fallen as low as 25%. Civil servants, who were paid in this depreciated scrip, suffered considerable distress. The revenue for 1869 was stated as 31,511; the expenditure at 30,836. The discovery of gold at Tati led President Pretorius in April 1868 to issue a proclamation extending his territories on the west and north so as to embrace the goldfield and portion of Bechuanaland. The same proclamation extended Transvaal territory on the east so as to include part of Delagoa Bay. The eastern extension claimed by Pretorius was the sequel to endeavours made shortly before, on the initiative of a Scotsman, to develop trade along the rivers leading to Delagoa Bay. It was also in accord with the desire of the Transvaal Boers to obtain a seaport, a desire which had led them as early as 1860 to negotiate with the Zulus for the possession of St Lucia Bay. That effort had, however, failed. And now the proclamation of Pretorius was followed by protests on the part of the British high commissioner, Sir Edmond Wodehouse, as well as on the part of the consul-general for Portugal in South Africa. The boundary on the east was settled by a treaty with Portugal in 1869, the Boers abandoning their claim to Delagoa Bay; that on the west was dealt with in 1871.Boer WarsImage:PKruger 1898 VA0952.jpg|thumb|200px|left|State President Kruger at his fourth inauguration, Pretoria, 1898In 1877, before the 1886 Gold Rush, Britain annexed the Transvaal.  The Boers viewed this as an act of aggression, and protested.  In 16 December 1880 the independence of the republic was proclaimed again, leading to the Boer War. The Convention of 1881 gave the Boers self-rule in the Transvaal, under British oversight, and the republic was restored with full independence in 1884 with the London Convention, but not for long. The Gold rush also brought an influx of non-Boer European settlers (called uitlanders, outlanders, by the Boers), leading to a destabilization of the republic.In 1895, Cape Premier Rhodes planned to support an uitlander dtat against the Transvaal government. Starr Jameson carried out this plan, without publicly-acknowledged British authorization, in December of that year  in the ill-fated Raid. After the failed raid, there were rumors that Germany offered protection to the Boer republic, something which alarmed the British.  In 1899 British forces were gathering on the borders of the Boer Republics of Transvaal and the Orange Free State and fearing Britains imminent annexation, the Boers launched a preemptive strike against the nearby British colonies in 1899, a strike which became the Boer War.The Second Boer War was a watershed for the Army in particular and for the Empire as a whole.  It was here that the British first used concentration camps in a war setting (the first general use being by the Spanish during the Cuban insurrections of the 1890s).By May 1902, the last of the Boer troops surrendered mourning the deaths of 26,000 mainly women and children who died in British internment. The independent Boer republic in the Transvaal was no more - the region became part of the Empire. In 1910 the Transvaal became a province of the newly created of South Africa, a British Dominion.PoliticsOfficials* of the South African Republic* Secretary of the Transvaal* Attorney of the TransvaalFlagThe national flag of the ZAR featured three horizontal stripes of red, white, and blue (mirroring the Dutch national flag), with a vertical green stripe at the hoist, and was known as the Vierkleur (lit. four colours). The former national of South Africa (from 19271994) had, as part of a feature contained within its central white bar, a horizontal flag of the Transvaal Republic (ZAR).See also* Africa* of South Africa* (disambiguation)* Free State* Republic* VolkstaatExternal links* Chronology South Africa* The discovery of gold and the Jewish communityRepubliekdel TransvaalrepublikRepublikSudafricanasud-africaine du TransvaalRepublykfi:TransvaalRepublikaTransvaaldel TransvaalRepubliekja:republikkpl:TranswalSul-Africanarepublikenzh:
28898
Special_Operations_Executive
battle_honoursThe Special Operations Executive (SOE) was a War II organisation of the Kingdom. It was officially formed by Prime Minister Churchill and of Economic Warfare Dalton on 22 July 1940, to conduct warfare against the powers and to instruct and aid local resistance movements. On its formation, it was ordered by Churchill to set Europe ablaze. Its mission was to encourage and facilitate espionage, sabotage and reconnaissance behind enemy lines and in its early days, to serve as the core of the Units, a British resistance movement which would act in case of a German invasion of Britain.Being a clandestine organisation, few people were openly aware of its existence. To those who were part of it or liaised with it, it was sometimes referred to as the Street Irregulars, after the location of its London headquarters. It was also known as Churchills Secret Army or The Ministry of Ungentlemanly Warfare. For security purposes, various branches, and sometimes the organisation as a whole, were concealed behind names such as the Joint Technical Board or the Inter-Service Research Bureau.SOE operated in all countries or former countries occupied by or attacked by the Axis forces, except where demarcation lines were agreed with Britains principal allies (the Union and the States). It also made use of neutral territory on occasion, or made plans and preparations in case neutral countries were attacked by the Axis. The organisation directly employed or controlled just over 13,000 people, about 3,200 of whom were women.(Foot, S.O.E, p.62) It is estimated that SOE supported or supplied about 1,000,000 operatives worldwide. HistoryOriginsThe organisation was formed from the merger of three existing secret departments, which had been formed shortly before the outbreak of the Second World War. Immediately after Germany annexed Austria (the Anschluss) in March 1938, the Office created a propaganda organisation known as Department EH (after House, its headquarters), run by Canadian newspaper magnate Sir Stuart. Later that month, the Intelligence Service (SIS, also known as MI6) formed a section known as Section D, under Major Grand, to investigate the use of sabotage, propaganda and other irregular means to weaken an enemy. In the autumn of the same year, the Office set up a department, nominally for the purpose of research into warfare and known initially as GS (R), headed by Major C. Holland. GS (R) was renamed MI R in early 1939.These three departments worked with few resources until the outbreak of war. There was much overlap between their activities and Section D and EH duplicated much of each others work. On the other hand, Section D and MI R shared information. Their heads were both officers of the Engineers and knew each other.(Foot, S.O.E, p.12) They agreed a rough division of their activities; MI R researched irregular operations which could be undertaken by regular uniformed troops, while Section D dealt with truly undercover work.(During the early months of the war, Section D was based at the Metropole Hotel in London.() The Section attempted unsuccessfully to sabotage deliveries of vital strategic materials to Germany from neutral countries by mining the Iron Gate on the Danube.(Foot, S.O.E, pp.15-16) MI R meanwhile produced pamphlets and technical handbooks for guerrilla leaders. MI R was also involved in the formation of the Independent Companies, autonomous units formed from within second-line Territorial Army divisions which were intended for sabotage and guerrilla operations behind enemy lines and which later developed into the Commandos; and the Units, stay-behind resistance groups which would act in the event of an Axis invasion of Britain, as seemed possible in the early years of the war.(Foot, p.17)FormationOn 13 June 1940, at the instigation of newly-appointed Prime Minister Churchill, Lord Hankey (who held the Cabinet post of of the Duchy of Lancaster) persuaded Section D and MI R that their operations should be coordinated. On 1 July, a Cabinet level meeting arranged the formation of a single sabotage organisation. On 16 July, Dalton, the of Economic Warfare, was appointed to take political responsibility for the new organisation, which was formally created on 22 July. Dalton used the Republican Army (IRA) during the war of Independence as a model for the organisation.(((Hugh Dalton letter to Lord Halifax 2/7/1940; quoted in M. R. D. Foot, SOE in France, 8.}) One department of MI R, MI R(C), which was involved in the development of weapons for irregular warfare, was not integrated into the SOE but became an independent body codenamed MD1. (It was nicknamed Churchills Toyshop from the Prime Ministers close interest in it and his enthusiastic support.) Majors Grand and Holland both returned to service in the regular army and Campbell Stuart left the organisation.LeadershipThe Director of SOE was usually referred to by the initials CD. The first Director to be appointed was Sir Frank Nelson, a former head of a trading firm in India, a back bench Conservative of Parliament and Consul in Basel, Switzerland.Dalton was replaced as Minister of Economic Warfare by Lord Selborne in February 1942. Selborne in turn retired Nelson, who had suffered ill health as a result of his hard work, and appointed Sir Hambro, head of the English banking firm Hambros to replace him. Hambro had been a close friend of Churchills before the war and had won the Cross in the First World War. Selborne also transferred Gladwyn Jebb who, as one of Daltons senior civil servants had run the Ministrys day-to-day dealings with S.O.E., back to the Foreign Office.(Foot, S.O.E. p.31)Selborne and Hambro cooperated closely until August 1943, when they fell out over the question of whether S.O.E. should remain a separate body or coordinate its operations with those of the Army in several theatres of war. Hambro felt that this loss of control would cause a number of problems for S.O.E. in the future. At the same time, Hambro was found to have failed to pass on vital information to Selborne. He was dismissed as Director, and became head of a materials purchasing commission in D.C., which was involved in the exchange of nuclear information.(Foot, S.O.E., p.32)As part of the subsequent closer ties between the Imperial General Staff and S.O.E., Hambros replacement as Director from September 1943 was the former Deputy Director, General Gubbins. Gubbins had wide experience of commando and operations and had played a major part in MI Rs early operations. He also put in practice many of the lessons he learned from the I.R.A. during the War of Independence.(OrganisationThe organisation of S.O.E. continually evolved and changed during the war. Initially, it consisted of three broad departments: SO1, which dealt with propaganda; SO2 (Operations); and SO3 (Research). SO3 was quickly overloaded with paperwork(Foot, S.O.E., p.22) and was merged into SO2. In August 1941, following quarrels between the Ministry of Economic Warfare and the Ministry of Information over their relative responsibilities, SO1 was removed from S.O.E. and became an independent organisation, the Warfare Executive.(Foot, S.O.E., pp.24-25)Thereafter there was a single, broad Operations department which controlled the Sections operating into enemy and sometimes neutral territory, and the selection and training of agents. Sections were assigned to a single country. Some enemy-occupied countries had two or more sections assigned to deal with politically disparate resistance movements. (France had no less than six).Four departments and some smaller groups were controlled by the Director of Scientific Research (Professor Maurice Newitt), and were concerned with the development or acquisition and production of special equipment.(Boyce and Everett (2003), pp.23-45) A few other sections were involved with economic research and administration, although S.O.E. had no central registry or filing system.The Director of S.O.E. had either a Deputy from the Army, or (once Gubbins became Director) an officer as of Staff. The main controlling body of S.O.E. was its Council, consisting of around fifteen heads of departments or sections. About half of the Council were from the forces (although some were specialists who were only commissioned after the outbreak of war), the rest were various civil servants, lawyers, or business or industrial experts.Several subsidiary S.O.E. headquarters and stations were set up to manage operations which were too distant for London to control directly. S.O.E.s operations in the East and Balkans were controlled from a headquarters in Cairo, which was notorious for poor security, infighting and conflicts with other agencies. It finally became known in April 1944 as Special Operations (Mediterranean), or SO(M). A subsidiary headquarters initially known as Force 133 was later set up in Bari in Italy under the Cairo headquarters to control operations in the Balkans(Foot, S.O.E., pp.40-41) and Italy. There was also a station near Algiers, established in late 1942 and codenamed Massingham, which operated into France.An S.O.E. station, which was first called the India Mission, and was subsequently known as GS I(k) was set up in India late in 1940. It subsequently moved to Ceylon so as to be closer to the headquarters of the Allied East Asia Command and became known as 136. A Singapore Mission was set up at the same time as the India Mission but was unable to overcome official opposition to its attempts to form resistance movements in Malaya before the Japanese overran Singapore. Force 136 took over its surviving staff and operations.There was also a branch office in New York, formally titled Security Coordination, and headed by the Canadian businessman Sir Stephenson. This branch office, located at Room 3603, 630 Avenue, Center, coordinated the work of S.O.E., SIS and MI5 with the American F.B.I. and of Strategic Services.RelationshipsS.O.E. cooperated fairly well with Operations Headquarters during the middle years of the war, usually on technical matters as S.O.E.s equipment was readily adopted by commandos and other raiders. This support was lost when Admiral Louis Mountbatten left Combined Operations, though by this time S.O.E. had its own transport and had no need to rely on Combined Operations for resources. On the other hand, the Admiralty objected to S.O.E. developing its own underwater vessels, and the duplication of effort this involved.(Boyce and Everett, SOE: The Scientific Secrets, pp.129-158)S.O.E.s relationships with the Office and with SIS, which the Foreign Office controlled, were usually more difficult. Where SIS preferred placid conditions in which it could gather intelligence and work through influential persons or authorities, S.O.E. promised turbulent conditions and often backed anti-establishment organisations, such as the Communists, in several countries. At one stage, SIS actively hindered S.O.E.s attempts to infiltrate agents into enemy-occupied France.(Foot, S.O.E., p.87)S.O.E.s activities in enemy-occupied territories also brought it into conflict with the Foreign Office on several occasions, as various governments in exile protested at operations taking place without their knowledge or approval, which sometimes resulted in Axis reprisals against civilian populations. S.O.E. nevertheless generally adhered to the rule, No bangs without Foreign Office approval.(Foot, S.O.E., pp.35-36)DissolutionTowards the end of the war, Lord Selborne advocated keeping SOE, or a similar body, in being. He proposed that the organisation could be useful against the Russian menace and the smouldering volcanoes of the Middle East,() and that it would report to the Ministry of Defence. The Foreign Secretary, Eden, insisted that his ministry, already responsible for MI6, should control SOE or its successors. Selborne retorted that To have SOE run by the Foreign Office would be like inviting an abbess to supervise a brothel.( Churchill took no decision, and after he lost the general election in 1945, the matter was dealt with by the Labour Prime Minister, Attlee.Selborne told Attlee that SOE still possessed a worldwide network of clandestine radio networks and sympathisers. Attlee replied that he had no wish to own a British Comintern, and closed Selbornes network down at 48 hours notice.(Foot, S.O.E., p.245) SOE was dissolved officially on 15 January 1946. Most of its personnel reverted to their peacetime occupations (or regular service in the armed forces), but 280 personnel were taken into the Special Operations Branch of MI6. Some of these had served as agents in the field, but MI6 was most interested in SOEs training and research staff.() Sir Menzies, the head of MI6 (who was generally known simply as C) soon decided that a separate branch was unsound, and merged it into the general body of MI6.(LocationsSOE maintained a large number of training, research and development or administrative centres. It was a joke that SOE stood for Stately omes of England, after the large number of country houses and estates it requisitioned and used.After working from temporary offices in Central London, the headquarters of SOE was moved on 31 October 1940 into Baker Street (hence the nickname the Street Irregulars). Ultimately, SOE occupied much of the western side of Baker Street.Another important London base was Aston House, where weapons and tactics research were conducted. However, the main weapons and devices research was carried out by two establishments; The Firs, near Aylesbury in Buckinghamshire, and IX at Frythe, a former hotel outside Garden City where, under the cover name of ISRB (Inter Services Research Bureau), SOE developed radios, weapons, explosive devices and traps.Station XV, at the Barn near Borehamwood, was devoted to camouflage, which usually meant equipping agents with authentic local clothing, equipment. Various sub-stations in London, and Station XIV near Roydon in Essex which specialised in forgery of identity papers, rations books and so on, were also involved in this task.The initial training centres of the SOE were at country houses such as Wanborough Manor, Guildford. Agents destined to serve in the field underwent commando training at Arisaig in Scotland, where they were taught armed and unarmed combat skills by E. Fairbairn and A. Sykes, former Inspectors in the Municipal Police. They then attended courses in security and tradecraft at Group B schools around Beaulieu in Hampshire. Finally, they received specialist training in skills such as demolition techniques or code telegraphy at various country houses in England and parachute training (if necessary) by STS 51 and 51a situated near Altrincham, Cheshire with the assistance of No.1 Parachute Training School RAF,() at Ringway (later Airport).A commando training centre similar to Arisaig was later set up at Oshawa, for Canadian members of SOE and members of the American organisation, the of Strategic Services.(Foot, SOE, p.65)AgentsA variety of people from all classes and pre-war occupations served SOE in the field. In most cases, the primary quality required was a deep knowledge of the country in which the agent was to operate, and especially its language, if the agent was to pass as a native of the country. nationality was often a prized attribute. This was particularly so of France. Many of the agents in F Section were of class origin (some even reputedly from the criminal underworld).In other cases, especially in the Balkans, a lesser degree of fluency was required as the resistance groups concerned were already in open rebellion and a clandestine existence was unnecessary. A flair for diplomacy combined with a taste for rough soldiering was more necessary. Some regular army officers proved adept as envoys, although others (such as the former diplomat Fitzroy Maclean or the classicist Christopher Woodhouse) were commissioned only during wartime.Exiled or escaped members of the armed forces of some occupied countries were obvious sources of agents. This was particularly true of Norway and the Netherlands. In other cases (such as Frenchmen owing loyalty to de Gaulle and especially the Poles), the agents first loyalty was to their leaders or governments in exile, and they treated SOE only as a means to an end. This could occasionally lead to mistrust and strained relations in Britain.SOE employed many Canadians; the Canadian government recruited Canadian volunteers for clandestine service to either SOE or MI9.The organisation was prepared to ignore almost any contemporary social convention in its fight against the Axis. It employed (for example) known homosexuals,(Foot, SOE, p.169) people with records or bad conduct records in the armed forces, Communists and anti-British nationalists. Although some of these might have been considered a security risk, there is practically no known case of an SOE agent wholeheartedly going over to the enemy.CommunicationsMost of the resistance networks which SOE formed or liaised with were controlled by radio directly from Britain or one of SOEs subsidiary headquarters. The main transmitting and receiving stations in Britain were at Underwood and Poundon, both in Buckinghamshire (and near the SIS-controlled Park; the location and topography were suitable for all three sites).(Foot, p.110) All resistance circuits contained at least one wireless operator, and except for early exploratory missions sent blind into enemy-occupied territory, all drops or landings were arranged by radio.This made SOE highly dependent upon the security of radio transmissions. There were three factors involved in this: the physical qualities and capabilities of the radio sets, the security of the transmission procedures and the provision of proper ciphers.SOEs first radios were supplied by SIS. They were large, clumsy and required large amounts of power. SOE acquired a few, much more suitable, sets from the Poles in exile, but eventually designed and manufactured their own, such as the Paraset. Some of these, together with their batteries, weighed only , and could fit into a small case, although larger sets were required to work over ranges greater than about .(Foot, pp.108-111)Operating procedures were insecure at first. Operators were forced to transmit verbose messages on fixed frequencies and at fixed times and intervals. This allowed German finding teams time to triangulate their positions. After several operators were captured or killed, procedures were made more flexible and secure.(Foot, p.106) The SOE wireless operators were also known as The Pianists.As with their first radio sets, SOEs first ciphers were inherited from SIS. Marks, SOEs chief cryptographer, was responsible for the development of better codes to replace the insecure codes. Eventually, SOE settled on single use ciphers, printed on silk. Unlike paper, which would be given away by rustling, silk would not be detected by a casual search if it was concealed in the lining of clothing.The BBC also played its part in communications with agents or groups in the field. During the war, it broadcast to almost all Axis-occupied countries, and was avidly listened to, even at risk of arrest. The BBC included various personal messages in its broadcasts, which could include lines of poetry or apparently nonsensical items. They could be used, for example, to announce the safe arrival of an agent or message in London, or be instructions to carry out operations on a given date.(Foot, pp.99, 142-143)In the field, agents could sometimes make use of the postal services, though these were slow, not always reliable and letters were almost certain to be opened and read by the Axis security services. In training, agents were taught to use a variety of easily-available substances to make invisible ink, though most of these could be detected by a cursory examination, or to hide coded messages in apparently innocent letters. The telephone services were even more certain to be intercepted and listened to by the enemy, and could be used only with great care.The most secure method of communication in the field was by courier. In the earlier part of the war, most women sent as agents in the field were employed as couriers, on the assumption that they would be less likely to be suspected of illicit activities.(Foot, p.60)EquipmentSOE was forced by circumstances to develop a wide range of equipment for clandestine use. Among products developed at Station IX were a miniature folding motorbike (the Welbike) for use by parachutists, a silenced pistol (the Welrod) and several miniature submersible craft (the submarine and Sleeping Beauty). A sea trials unit was set up in Wales at Goodwick, by Fishguard (station IXa) where these craft were tested. In late 1944 craft were dispatched to Australia to the Intelligence Bureau (SRD), for tropical testing.()Although SOE used some silenced assassination weapons such as the Welrod and the Lisle carbine, it took the view that weapons issued to resisters should not require extensive training or care. The crude and cheap Sten was a favourite. For issue to large forces such as the Partisans, SOE used captured German or Italian weapons. These were available in large quantities after the surrender of Italy, and the partisans could acquire ammunition for these weapons (and the Sten) from enemy sources. Most agents received training on captured enemy weapons before being sent into enemy-occupied territory. Ordinary SOE agents were also armed with handguns acquired abroad, such as, from 1941, a variety of US pistols, and a large quantity of the Spanish Llama ACP in 1944. Such was SOEs demand for weapons, a consignment of 8,000 Ballester-Molina .45 calibre weapons was purchased from Argentina, apparently with the mediation of USA.(Seaman (2006), p. 27)SOE also adhered to the principle that resistance fighters would be handicapped rather than helped by heavy equipment such as mortars or anti-tank guns. These were awkward to transport, almost impossible to conceal and required much training in their use. Later in the war however, when the resistance groups staged open rebellions against enemy occupation, some heavy weapons were dispatched, for example to the du Vercors.SOE developed a wide range of explosive devices for sabotage, such as mines, shaped charges and time fuses. These were later also used by commando units. SOE pioneered the use of explosive. (The term plastique comes from SOE packaged plastic explosive originally destined for France but taken to the United States instead.) It was used in everything from bombs, to exploding rats designed to destroy coal fired boilers.() Other, more subtle sabotage methods included lubricants laced with grinding materials, incendiaries disguised as innocuous objects and so on.SOE developed crossbows powered by multiple rubber bands to shoot incendiary bolts. There were two types, known as Big Joe and Lil Joe respectively. They had tubular alloy skeleton stocks and were designed to be collapsible for ease of concealment. Some of the other more imaginative devices invented by SOE included exploding pens with enough explosive power to blast a hole in the bearers body, guns concealed in tobacco pipes, explosive material concealed in coal piles to destroy locomotives, and land mines disguised as cow or elephant dung. For specialised operations or use in extreme circumstances, SOE issued small fighting knives which could be concealed in the heel of a hard leather shoe or behind a coat lapel. Given the likely fate of agents captured by the Gestapo, SOE also disguised pills as coat buttons.Some devices were designed specifically to mark landing strips and dropping zones. Such sites could be marked by an agent on the ground with bonfires or bicycle lamps, but this required good visibility, not only for the pilot of an aircraft to spot the ground signals, but also to navigate by landmarks to correct dead reckoning. Many landings or drops were thwarted by poor weather. To overcome these problems, SOE and Allied airborne forces used the transponding radar; this enabled an aircraft to home in on a point on the ground even in thick weather, but was difficult to carry or conceal. SOE developed the S-Phone, which allowed a pilot or radio operator to communicate by voice with the reception committee. Sound quality was good enough for voices to be recognisable; a mission could be aborted if there was any doubt of an agents identity.(Foot, pp.103-104)TransportWith the continent of Europe closed to normal travel, SOE had to rely on its own air or sea transport for movement of people, arms and equipment.Marshal Harris (Bomber Harris), the Commander-in-Chief of Bomber Command, resented the diversion of bombers to SOE purposes (or indeed any purposes other than the offensive against German cities), but he was overruled and by April 1942, SOE had the services of 138 and 161 squadrons at Tempsford.(Foot, S.O.E., p.95)The aircraft used by SOE included the Lysander, which could carry up to three passengers and two panniers loaded with stores, and had an effective range of . It could use rough landing strips only  in length, or even less. Lysanders were used to transport 101 agents to and 128 agents from Nazi-occupied Europe.() The Hudson had a range  greater and could carry more passengers (ten or more), but required landing strips twice as long as those needed for the Lysander.To deliver agents and stores by parachute, SOE could use several aircraft originally designed as bombers: the Whitworth Whitley until November 1942, the Page Halifax and the Stirling. The Stirling could carry a particularly large load, but only the Halifax had the range to reach dropping zones in Poland (and even then, only from bases in Southern Italy).(Foot, S.O.E, pp.95, 101-103) Later in the war, SOE also used the American-designed C47, which was often landed at airfields in territory held by partisans in the Balkans.Stores were usually parachuted in cylindrical containers. The C type was  long and when fully loaded could weigh up to . The H type was the same size overall but could be broken down into five smaller sections. This made it easier to carry and conceal but made it impossible to carry long loads such as rifles. Some stores such as boots and blankets were free-dropped i.e. simply thrown out of the aircraft bundled together without a parachute, often to the hazard of any receiving committee on the ground.(Foot, S.O.E, pp.95-96)SOE also experienced difficulties with the Navy, which also was usually unwilling to allow SOE to use its submarines or torpedo boats to deliver agents or equipment. Submarines were regarded as too valuable to risk within range of enemy coastal defences, and MTBs were in any case often too noisy and conspicuous for clandestine landings. However, SOE often used clandestine craft such as local boats or caiques and eventually ran quite large fleets of these, from Algiers, the Islands (a service termed the Bus), Ceylon etc.OperationsFranceSOEs operations were usually mounted in order to feel out resistance groups willing to work with the Allies in preparation for invasion. In France, personnel were directed by two London-based country sections. F Section was under British control, while RF Section was linked to General de Gaulles French government in exile. Most native French agents served in RF. There were also two smaller sections: EU/P Section, which dealt with the Polish community in France, and the DF Section which was responsible for establishing escape routes. During the latter part of 1942 another section known as AMF was established in Algiers, to operate into France.On 5 May 1941, Bgu (19111993) became the first SOE agent dropped into German occupied France. He then set up radio communications and met the next agents parachuted into France. Between Bgus first drop in May 1941 and August 1944, more than four hundred F Section agents were sent into occupied France. They served in a variety of functions including arms and sabotage instructors, couriers, circuit organisers, liaison officers and radio operators. RF sent about the same number; AMF sent 600 (although not all of these belonged to SOE). EU/P and DF sent a few dozen agents each.(Foot, S.O.E., p.214)SOE included a number of women (who were often commissioned into womens branches of the armed forces such as the Aid Nursing Yeomanry). F Section alone sent 39 female agents into the field, of whom 13 did not return. The SOE Memorial was unveiled at Valenay in the Indre dpartement of France on 6 May 1991, marking the fiftieth anniversary of the despatch of F Sections first agent to France. The memorials roll of honour lists the names of the 91 men and 13 women members of the SOE who gave their lives for Frances freedom.To support the Allied invasion of France on Day in June 1944, three-man parties were dropped into various parts of France as part of Jedburgh, to coordinate widespread overt (as opposed to clandestine) acts of resistance. A total of 100 men were eventually dropped, together with 6,000 tons of military stores (4,000 tons had been dropped during the years before D-Day.)(Foot, S.O.E., pp.222-223) At the same time, all the various sections operating in France (except EU/P) were nominally placed under a London-based HQ titled tat-major des Forces Franaises de lIntrieur (EMFFI).PolandSOE did not need to instigate Polish resistance, because unlike the French the Poles overwhelmingly refused to collaborate with the Nazis. Early in the war the Poles established the Home Army, led by a clandestine resistance government known as the Secret State. Nevertheless, there were many Polish members of SOE and much cooperation between the SOE and the Polish resistance.SOE assisted the government in exile with training facilities and logistical support for its 605 special forces operatives known as the Cichociemni, or The Dark and Silent. Members of the unit, which was based in End House, Essex, were rigorously trained before being parachuted into Poland. Because of the distance involved in air travel to Poland, customised aircraft with extra fuel capacity were used in Polish operations such as Wildhorn III. Ryder chose the title Ryder of Warsaw in honour of these operations.Intelligence Service member Skarbek (nom de guerre Christine Granville) was a founder member of SOE and helped establish a cell of Polish spies in Europe. She ran several operations in Poland, Egypt, Hungary (with Kowerski) and France, often using the staunchly anti-Nazi Polish expatriate community as a secure international network. cover agents Zawacka and Nowak-Jezioranski perfected the Gibraltar courier route out of Europe. Kalenkiewicz was parachuted into Poland, only to be killed by the Soviets. A Polish agent was integral to SOEs Foxley, the plan to assassinate Hitler.Thanks to cooperation between SOE and the Home Army, the Poles were able to deliver the first Allied intelligence on the Holocaust to London. Pilecki of the Polish Home Army designed a joint operation with SOE to liberate Auschwitz, but the British rejected it as infeasible. Joint Anglo-Polish operations provided London with vital intelligence on the rocket, German troops movements on the Eastern Front, and the repressions of Polish citizens.RAF Special Duties Flights were sent to Poland to assist the Uprising against the Nazis. The rebellion was defeated with a loss of 200,000 casualties (mostly German executions of Polish civilians) after the nearby Army refused military assistance to the Home Army. RAF Special Duties Flights were refused landing rights at Soviet-held airfields near Warsaw, even when requiring emergency landings after battle damage. These flights were also attacked by Soviet fighters, despite the U.S.S.R.s officially Allied status.(Orpen, Neil, Airlift to Warsaw ISBN 0806119136)GermanyDue to the dangers and lack of friendly population few operations were conducted in Germany itself. The German and Austrian section of SOE was run by Lt. Col. Ronald Thornley for most of the war and was mainly involved with propaganda and administrative sabotage in collaboration with the German section of the Warfare Executive. After D-Day, the section was re-organised and enlarged with Major General Templer heading the Directorate, with Thornley as his deputy.Several major operations were planned, including Foxley, a plan to assassinate Hitler, and Operation Periwig, an ingenious plan to simulate the existence of a large-scale anti-Nazi resistance movement within Germany. Foxley was never carried out but Periwig went ahead despite restrictions placed on it by SIS and SHAEF. Several German prisoners of war were trained as agents, briefed to make contact with the anti-Nazi resistance and to conduct sabotage. They were then parachuted into Germany in the hope that they would either hand themselves in to the Gestapo or be captured by them, and reveal their supposed mission. Fake coded wireless transmissions were broadcast to Germany and various pieces of agent paraphernalia such as code books and wireless receivers were allowed to fall into the hands of the German authorities.The NetherlandsSection N of SOE ran operations in the Netherlands. They committed some of SOEs worst blunders in security, which allowed the Germans to capture many agents and much sabotage material, in what the Germans called the Englandspiel. SOE apparently ignored the absence of security checks in radio transmissions, and other warnings from their chief cryptographer, Marks, that the Germans were running the supposed resistance networks.Eventually, two captured agents escaped to Switzerland in August 1943. The Germans sent messages over their controlled sets that they had gone over to the Gestapo, but SOE was at last more wary.SOE partly recovered from this disaster to set up new networks, which continued to operate until the Netherlands were liberated at the end of the war.BelgiumSection T established some effective networks in Belgium, in part orchestrated by fashion designer Amies, who rose to the rank of Lieutenant Colonel. Amies adapted names of fashion accessories for use as code words, while managing some of the most murderous and ruthless agents in the field.(glbtq >> arts >> Amies, Sir Hardy)In the aftermath of the Battle of Normandy, British armoured forces liberated the country in less than a week, giving the resistance little time to stage an uprising. They did assist British forces to bypass German rearguards, and this allowed the Allies to capture the vital docks at Antwerp intact.After Brussels was liberated, Amies outraged his superiors by setting up a Vogue photo-shoot in Belgium.() In 1946, he was Knighted in Belgium for his service with SOE, being a Named Officier de lOrdre de la Couronne.ItalyAs both an enemy country, and supposedly a monolithic fascist state with no organised opposition which SOE could use, SOE made little effort in Italy before mid-1943, when Mussolinis government collapsed and Allied forces already occupied Sicily. In April 1941, in a mission codenamed Yak, Peter Fleming attempted to recruit agents from among the many thousands of Italian prisoners of war captured in the Desert Campaign. He met with no response.()In the aftermath of the Italian collapse, SOE helped build a large resistance organisation in the cities of Italy, and in the Alps. Italian partisans harassed German forces in Italy throughout the autumn and winter of 1944, and in the 1945 offensive in Italy they captured Genoa and other cities unaided by Allied forces.Late in 1943, SOE established a base at Bari in Italy, from which they operated their networks and agents in the Balkans. This organisation had the codename Force 133. This later became Force 266, reserving 133 for operations run from Cairo rather than the heel of Italy. Flights from Brindisi were run to the Balkans and Poland, particularly once control had been wrested from Cairo and passed to Gubbins. Close to Brindisi Air base SOE established a new packing station for the parachute containers along the lines of those created at Saffron Walden. This was ME 54, a factory employing hundreds, the American (OSS) side of which was known as Paradise Camp.(Special Operations:  Aid to European Resistance Movements Major Harris G Warren)YugoslaviaIn the aftermath of the German invasion in 1941, the of Yugoslavia fragmented. In Croatia, there was a substantial pro-Axis movement, the Ustae. In Croatia as well as the remainder of Yugoslavia, two resistance movements formed; the royalist Chetniks under Mihailovi, and the Communist Partisans under Broz Tito.Mihailovi was the first to attempt to contact the Allies, and SOE despatched a party on 20 September 1941 under Major Marko Hudson. Hudson also encountered Titos forces. Through the royalist government in exile, SOE at first supported the Chetniks. Eventually, however, due to reports that the Chetniks were less effective and even collaborating with German and Italian forces on occasion, British support was redirected to the Partisans, even before the Conference in 1943.Although relations were often touchy throughout the war, it can be argued that SOEs unstinting support was a factor in Yugoslavias maintaining a neutral stance during the War. However, accounts vary dramatically between all historical works on the Chetnik controversy.HungarySOE was unable to establish links or contacts in Hungary before the regime of Horthy aligned itself with the Powers. Distance and lack of such contacts prevented any effort being made by SOE until the Hungarians themselves dispatched a diplomat (Lszl Veress) in a clandestine attempt to contact the Allies. SOE facilitated his return, with some radio sets. Before the Allied governments could agree terms, Hungary was placed under German military occupation and Veress was forced to flee the country.Two missions subsequently dropped blind i.e. without prior arrangement for a reception party, failed. So too did an attempt by Davidson to incite a partisan movement in Hungary, after he made his way there from northeastern Yugoslavia.GreeceGreece was overrun by the Axis after a desperate defence lasting several months. In the aftermath, SIS and another intelligence organisation, SIME, discouraged attempts at sabotage or resistance as this might imperil relations with Turkey,(Ball (2009), p.104) although SOE maintained contacts with resistance groups in Crete. When an agent, Odysseus, a former tobacco-smuggler, attempted to contact potential resistance groups in Greece, he reported that no group was prepared to cooperate with the monarchist government in exile in Cairo.In late 1942, at the armys instigation, SOE mounted its first operation, codenamed Harling, into Greece in an attempt to disrupt the railway which was being used to move materials to the Panzer Army Africa. A party under Colonel (later Brigadier) Eddie Myers, assisted by Christopher Woodhouse, was parachuted into Greece and discovered two guerrilla groups operating in the mountains: the pro-Communist ELAS and the republican EDES. On 25 November 1942, Myerss party blew up one of the spans of the railway viaduct at Gorgopotamos, supported by 150 Greek partisans from these two organisations who engaged Italians guarding the viaduct. This cut the railway linking Thessaloniki with Athens and Piraeus.Relations between the resistance groups and the British soured. When the British needed once again to disrupt the railway across Greece as part of the deception operations preceding Husky, the Allied invasion of Sicily, the resistance groups refused to take part, rightly fearing German reprisals against civilians. Instead, a six-man commando party from the British and New Zealand armies carried out the destruction of the Asopos viaduct on 21 June 1943.EDES received most aid from SOE, but ELAS secured many weapons when Italy collapsed and Italian military forces in Greece dissolved. ELAS and EDES fought a vicious war in 1943 until SOE brokered an uneasy armistice (the Plaka agreement).A lesser known, but important function of the SOE in Greece was to inform the Cairo headquarters of the movement of the German military aircraft that were serviced and repaired at the two former Greek military aircraft facilities in and around Athens.Eventually, the Army occupied Athens and Piraeus in the aftermath of the German withdrawal, and fought a street-by-street battle to drive ELAS from these cities and impose an interim government under Damaskinos. SOEs last act was to evacuate several hundred disarmed EDES fighters to Corfu, preventing their massacre by ELAS.(Foot, S.O.E, p.236)CreteIn Crete, unlike mainland Greece, there were several resistance groups and Allied stay-behind parties after the Germans occupied the island in the of Crete. SOEs operations on Crete involved figures such as Leigh Fermor, John Lewis, Tom Dunbabin, Rendel, John Houseman, Fielding and Bill Stanley Moss. Some of the most famous moments included the abduction of General Heinrich Kreipe led by Leigh Fermor and Moss, and the sabotage of Damasta led by Moss.AlbaniaAlbania had been under Italian influence since 1923, and was occupied by the Army in 1939. In 1943, a small liaison party entered Albania from northwestern Greece. SOE agents who entered Albania then or later included Julian Amery, Quayle, Smiley and Neil Billy McLean. They discovered another internecine war between the Communist partisans under Hoxha, and the republican Kombtar. As the latter had collaborated with the Italian occupiers, Hoxha gained Allied support.SOEs envoy to Albania, Brigadier Trotsky Davies, was captured by the Germans early in 1944. Some SOE officers warned that Hoxhas aim was primacy after the war, rather than fighting Germans. They were ignored, but Albania was never a major factor in the effort against the Germans.CzechoslovakiaSOE sent many missions into the Czech areas of the so-called of Bohemia and Moravia, and later into Slovakia. The most famous mission was Anthropoid, the assassination of SS leader Heydrich in Prague. From 1942 to 1943 the Czechoslovaks had their own Special Training School (STS) at Chicheley Hall in Buckinghamshire. In 1944, SOE sent men to support the National Uprising.NorwayIn March 1941 a group performing commando raids in Norway, Independent Company 1 (NOR.I.C.1) was organised under leadership of Captain Linge. Their initial raid in 1941 was Archery, the best known raid was probably the heavy water sabotage. Communication lines with London were gradually improved so that by 1945, 64 radio operators were spread throughout Norway.DenmarkMost of the actions conducted by the resistance were railway sabotage to hinder German troop and material movements from and to Norway. However, there were examples of sabotage on a much larger scale especially by BOPA. In all over 1,000 operations were conducted from 1942 and onwards.In October 1943 the Danish resistance also saved nearly all of the Danish Jews from certain death in German camps. This was a massive overnight operation and is to this day recognised among Jews as one of the most significant displays of public defiance against the Germans.The Danish resistance assisted SOE in its activities in neutral Sweden. For example, SOE was able to obtain several shiploads of vital ball-bearings which had been interned in Swedish ports. The Danes also pioneered several secure communications methods; for example, a burst transmitter/receiver which transcribed code onto a paper tape faster than a human operator could handle.There are a series of Historic Notes written by David Lampe in his The Danish Resistance also called The Savage Canary.RomaniaIn 1943 an SOE delegation was parachuted into Romania to instigate resistance against the Nazi occupation at any cost (Autonomous). The delegation, including Colonel Gardyne de Chastelain, Captain Silviu Meianu and Porter, was captured by the Romanian Gendarmerie and held until the night of Michaels Coup on 23 August 1944.Other operations in EuropeThrough cooperation with the Special Operations Executive and the intelligence service, a group of Jewish volunteers from Palestine were sent on missions to several countries in Nazi-occupied Europe from 1943 to 1945.AbyssiniaAbyssinia was the scene of some of SOEs earliest and most successful efforts. SOE organised a force of Ethiopian irregulars under Charles Wingate in support of the exiled Emperor Selassie. This force (named Force by Wingate) caused heavy casualties to the Italian occupation forces, and contributed to the successful British campaign there. Wingate was to use his experience to create the Chindits in Burma.Southeast AsiaAs early as 1940, SOE was preparing plans for operations in Asia. As in Europe, after initial Allied military disasters, SOE built up indigenous resistance organisations and guerrilla armies in enemy (Japanese) occupied territory. SOE also launched Operation Remorse (194445), which was ultimately aimed at protecting the economic and political status of Kong. Through 136, SOE engaged in covert trading of goods and currencies in China. Its agents proved remarkably successful, raising 77m through their activities, which were used to provide assistance for Allied prisoners of war and, more controversially, to buy influence locally in order to facilitate a smooth return to pre-war conditions.Later analysis and commentariesThe mode of warfare encouraged and promoted by SOE is considered by several modern commentators to have established the modern model that many alleged terrorist organisations emulate,()(The Irish to the example set by Collins and followed by the SOE can thus claim that their resistance provide the originating impulse for resistance to tyrannies worse than any they had to endure themselves. And the Irish resistance as Collins led it, showed the rest of the world an economical way to fight wars the only sane way they can be fought in the age of the Nuclear bomb. M.R.D Foot, as quoted in Geraghty, The Irish War, p.347)(We must recognise that our response to the scourge of terrorism is compromised by what we did through SOE. The justification... That we had no other means of striking back at the enemy...is exactly the argument used by the red brigades, the baader meinhoff gang, the PFLP, the IRA and every other half articulate terrorist organisation on Earth. Futile to argue that we were a Democracy and Hitler a Tyrant. Means besmirch ends. SOE besmirched Britain. Keegan, as quoted in Geraghty, The Irish War, p.346) pioneering most of the tactics, techniques and technologies that are the mainstays of terrorism as it is commonly known today.(Churchills Secret Army, Channel 4 television UK)Fiction featuring or based on SOEFilm* Now It Can Be Told (aka School for Danger) (1946): Filming began in 1944 and starred real-life SOE agents Captain Re and Jacqueline Nearne. The film tells the story of the training of agents for SOE and their adventures in France. The training sequences were filmed using the SOE equipment at the training schools at Traigh and Garramor (South Morar) and at Ringway.* The Fight over the Heavy Water (1948): A French/Norwegian black and white docu-film titled La Bataille de leau lourde/Kampen om tungtvannet (trans. Fight Over the Heavy Water), featured some of the original cast, so to speak. Joachim Rnneberg has stated; The Fight over Heavy Water was an honest attempt to describe history. On the other hand Heroes of Telemark had little to do with reality.* Odette (1950): Based on the book by Tickell about Sansom, starring Neagle and Howard. The film includes an interview with Buckmaster, head of F-Section, SOE.* Met by Moonlight (film) (1957): The and Pressburger film, (released as Night Ambush in the States), based on the book by Stanley Moss, starring Bogarde and Goring. It dramatises the true story of the capture of a German general by Leigh Fermor and W. Stanley Moss.* on the River Kwai (1957) is a well-known classic British-made war-drama set in Burma during World War II, during the construction of the SiamBurma railway through virgin jungle and endless hills and gorges, using malnourished, mistreated allied prisoners of war. A counter-story in the film, which collides with the main story at the climax, relates to a mission to destroy the newly-constructed railway bridge by a fictitious cloak and dagger sabotage organisation called Force 316, whose training base is in Ceylon. In fact, this is a thinly-disguised reference to the real-life 136, part of SOE, who indeed had wartime jungle-training facilities in Ceylon at M.E. 25Horona. * Her Name with Pride (1958): Based on the book by R.J. Minney about Szabo, starring Scofield and McKenna.* The Guns of Navarone (1961): Based on a well-known 1957 novel about World War II by Scottish thriller writer MacLean. It starred Peck, Niven and Quinn, along with Quayle (the same Anthony Quayle listed above as serving with SOE in Albania) and Baker.  The book and the film share the same basic plot: the efforts of an Allied commando team to destroy a seemingly impregnable German fortress that threatens Allied naval ships in the Aegean Sea, and prevents 2,000 isolated British troops from being rescued, that were holed up on the island of Kheros in the Aegean, near Turkey.* Moonstrike (1963): A BBC television drama series comprising self-contained episodes of SOEs work in occupied Europe.* Heroes of Telemark (1965): Based on an SOE operation to sabotage the water plant at Rjukan, Norway in 1943.* Operation Crossbow (1965): A spy thriller and World War II film, made from a story from Duilio Coletti and Vittoriano Petrilli. It is a highly fictionalised account of the real-life Crossbow, but it does touch on the main aspects of the operation.* Eagles Dare (1968): A spy film directed by G. Hutton and featuring Burton, Eastwood, and Ure. The films screenplay and eponymous 1967 best-selling novel were written almost simultaneously by Alistair MacLean.* Daybreak (1976): Based upon a true, dangerous operation in May 1942 to drop a small group of Czech and Slovak S.O.E. agents into their own occupied country with the singular deadly mission to assassinate Reichsfhrer-SS Heinrich Himmlers protg, Heydrich, Reichsprotektor (representing the Nazi protectorate over the Czech puppet-state) of Bohemia and Moravia, hated as The Butcher of Prague. The mission succeeded, but with tragic results.* Nancy Wake Codename: The White Mouse (1987): A docudrama about Wakes work for SOE, partly narrated by herself.* Me Luck (1987): A television series that was broadcast between 1987 and 1990 featuring the exploits of the women and, less frequently, the men of SOE, which was renamed the Outfit.* Charlotte Gray, (2001): Based on a novel by Faulks.*Churchills Secret Army:A Documentary about the SOE broadcast on Channel 4 in 2001.* War, episode The French Drop (2004): Foyle, a detective in England during WWII, investigates what turns out to be domestic activity of the SOE. The series is known for its attention to historical detail, and many aspects of the real-life SOE are shown.* Robert and the Shadows, French Documentary on France Television (2004): Did General De Gaulle tell the whole truth about the French resistance ? This is the purpose of this documentary. Jean Marie Barrere, the french director, uses the story of his own grand father (Robert) to tell the French what SOE did at that time. Robert, was a french teacher based in the south west of France and he worked with the famous SOE agent George Reginald Starr (Hilaire, Wheelwright circuit).* The 11th Day (2006): A documentary film, with recreation, of the Resistance, on the island of Crete, during the Second World War. Includes a detailed interview with Sir Leigh Fermor with recreation of the kidnapping of German Major General Kreipe.*The Bonzos (2008): A BBC documentary film about the men sent to rescue Hitlers hoard of looted artincluding works by Titian, Tintoretto and Van Goghwhich the Nazis had stripped from Europes greatest galleries and museums and hidden in a salt mine in the town of Alt Aussee in Austria. Including archive footage, eyewitness testimony and contributions from historians.*Femmes de lOmbre: A French film about five SOE female agents and their contribution towards the D-Day invasions.*Of Heroes (2011): A film about the formation of a special operations team and their mission to destroy Nazi radar equipment in Norway during WWII.Novels* Author Fleming, who knew both Buckmaster and Atkins, is reputed to have used at least parts of them to create M, and Moneypenny in his Bond books. In his first Bond novel, Casino Royale, Fleming is said to have based the Vesper Lynd character on the SOE agent, Granville. Other agents that Fleming used for his Bond character were Hudson and Croft. Chief of SOE Technical Branch and later GS Branch MI6, Charles Bovill was represented in the Bond books as Q.()* Powers Declare and Strosss Atrocity Archives. Fictional versions of SOE turn up as the organisation in charge of occult activities in these books.*Rainbow by Pynchon.*Jackdaws by Follett. Felicity Clairet, a female SOE agent leads an all women team into France to blow up a telephone exchange.*of the Fox, Harbour and of Eagles by Higgins.*The Tiger Claw by Singh Baldwin features an SOE agent based on Inayat Khan.*The Secret Army by Muchamore features Air Vice Marshall Walker who is the Head of the SOE.*Double Cross Blind by Joel Ross, an American helps a female SOE agent stop a Nazi plot that could turn the tide of the war.Other Media* In the 2003 video game Weapons Over Normandy, the main protagonist, James Chase, is a member of the Battlehawks, an elite RAF squadron assigned to the SOE.* The 2009 video game Saboteur, which takes place in German-occupied Paris circa 1940, revolves around Sean Devlin, an analogue of real SOE agent Grover-Williams. Devlin is depicted, however, as a member of the Resistance, who works unofficially for the SOE in exchange for information. In addition, supply crates from the SOE are hidden all over Paris and serve as an in-game collectible.* A Secret Army Exhibition at Beaulieu in Hampshire, UK tells the story of the British and overseas members of the Special Operations Executive (SOE) who completed their secret training at the Beaulieu Finishing School during World War llSee also* of SOE Agents* of SOE establishments* during World War II* Cichociemni* Charaszkiewicz* Dolphin CBE* MI5* MI6* military history* military history of World War II* Allied Airborne Reconnaissance Force* CIAs Activities Division* Special Unit* Secret Army Exhibition at BeaulieuNotesReferencesOfficial publications / academic histories* :Covers Commando and SOE training in the Highlands of Scotland. It describes the origins of the irregular warfare training at Inverailort House under MI(R) then the move of SOE training to the nearby Arisaig and Morar area.* :SOE had its own laboratories and workshops inventing and developing new weapons, explosives and sabotage techniques.* :Official history commissioned 1980, companion to Foot, SOE, with access to papers (though researched 20 years later than Foots book, when many participants had died, see Preface)* * :The best book to read for an overview of SOE and its methods. Foot won the Croix de Guerre as a SAS operative in Brittany, later becoming Professor of Modern History at Manchester University and an official historian of the SOE. All his SOE books are well worth reading.* :(orig. 1966, Government Official Histories, pub Frank Cass revised edition 2000, further edition 2004. Written with access to F Section files, (according to Ian Dear, see below) later revised* :Written at the end of WW2 for the British Governments own use without any intention of publicationin effect a confidential official history.* :Authentic training manuals used to prepare agents covering the clandestine skills of disguise, surveillance, burglary, interrogation, close combat, and assassination. Also published as How to be a Spy.* :Professor David Stafford has written several books on resistance and the secret war, and contributed the foreword for MFD Foots book.* :First results of a research on the newly released Austrian SOE files of the Public Record Office Kew* * First-hand accounts by those who served with SOE* Baden-Powell. They Also Serve: An SOE Agent in the WRNS (Robert Hale Ltd 2004 ISBN 978-0709077152):A first hand account of one womans experiences during World War Two within the Special Operations Executive and the WRNS.* Spencer Chapman. Jungle is Neutral (Chatto and Windus 1949):Chapman set up first jungle warfare school and operated in Malaya behind Japanese lines. Key figure in SOE in Far East.* Arthur Christie. Mission Scapula SOE in the Far East ISBN 0-9547010-0-3.:A true story about an ordinary soldier seconded into MI5 and sent on a mission to Singapore just before it fell. With Freddy Spencer-Chapman* Davidson. Special Operations Europe: Scenes from the Anti-Nazi War. Irwin Pub, 1980 ISBN 0-575-02820-3* Davidson. Partisan Picture. Bedford, 1946.* Sir Patrick Leigh Fermor. The 11th Day (Archangel Films 2006):Firsthand documentary account of the kidnapping of Major General Heinrich Kreipe, the German army commander on Crete.* Patrick Howarth. Undercover (Routledge, Kegan Paul 1980 ISBN 0-7100-0573-3, Phoenix Press 2000 ISBN 1-84212-240-1):Covers the stories of a number of operatives, many known personally by Howarth, who was one of SOEs founding members responsible for sevearl years for organising agent training in UK. Invaluable seven page bibliography of histories and memoirs.* David Howarth. The Shetland Bus. (Thomas Nelson and Sons Ltd 1950):Account of the Norwegian vessels which kept Britain in touch with the Norwegian resistance* Andre Hue. The Next Moon (Viking 2004 ISBN 0-670-91478-9, Penguin 2005 ISBN 0-14-101580-2) Foreword MRD Foot.:First hand story of agent dropped into Brittany to organise resistance activities before and after D-Day.* Fitzroy Maclean. Eastern Approaches (Jonathan Cape 1949, Penguin 1991 ISBN 0-14-013271-6):Author witnessed SOEs campaign with Yugoslav partisans as Churchills representative to Tito.* Marks. Between Silk and Cyanide (Harper Collins 1998 ISBN 0-00-255944-7): Marks was the Head of Codes at SOE. He gives easily comprehensible introduction to codes, their practical use in the field, and his struggle to improve encryption methods. Engaging accounts of agents including Noor Khan, Szabo, and a great deal of information on his friend Yeo-Thomas.* William Stanley Moss. Met by Moonlight (Harrap 1950):Firsthand account of Moss and Patrick Leigh Fermors kidnapping of Major General Heinrich Kreipe, the German army commander on Crete. Later turned into a film of the same title.* Rootham. Miss-Fire (Chatto & Windus 1946):Account of the SOEs mission to Yugoslavia in support of Mihailovi and the Chetniks.* Smiley. Albanian Assignment (Sphere Books Ltd. 1984 ISBN 0-7221-7933-2):Account of SOEs missions to Albania.* Sweet-Escott, Bickham. Baker Street Irregular. London: Methuen & Co. Ltd., 1965.* Wake. The White Mouse: The Autobiography of the Woman the Gestapo called The White Mouse (Macmillan 1986 ISBN 978-0333400999):Account of a female SOE field agents experiences in the F Section.Biographies / popular books by authors without personal SOE experience* Nigel Perrin Spirit of Resistance: The Life of SOE Agent Harry Peulev DSO MC (Pen and Sword 2008) ISBN 978-1844158553:Biography of the remarkable F Section agent Peulev, who undertook two missions in France and was one of the few to escape concentration camp.* Stevenson (Canadian writer) Spymistress: The Life of Vera Atkins, the Greatest Female Secret Agent of World War II Arcade Publishing (2006) ISBN 978-1559707633 biography of Atkins, of whom Bond creator Fleming said, In the real world of spies, Atkins was the boss.* * Binney The Women Who Lived For Danger HarperCollins (2003) ISBN 0-06-054087-7* Escott A Quiet Courage: The story of SOEs women agents in France (Patrick Stevens Ltd 1991) ISBN 978-1852602895* Franks Double Mission: Fighter Pilot and SOE Agent, Manfred Czernin (William Kimber, London, 1976) ISBN 0 7183 02540* Jones Mission Improbable: Salute to the Royal Air Force Women of Special Operations Executive in Wartime France (Bantam Press 1990) ISBN 978-0593016633* Minney.Her Name with Pride (1956), tells the story of Szabo.* Tickell. The story of a British agent (1949), tells the story of Odette Sansom-Hallowes.* Overton Fuller. The Starr Affair, tells the story of Renshaw Starr.* Ian Dear. Sabotage and Subversion (Arms and Armour 1996, Cassell Military Paperbacks 1999, ISBN 0-304-35202-0):General chapters on origins, recruitment and training, and then describes in detail thirteen operations in Europe and around the world, some involving the OSS.* Bruce Marshall. The White Rabbit (Evans Bros 1952, Cassell Military Paperbacks 2000, ISBN 0-304-35697-2): Famous biography of Wing Commander Yeo-Thomas who made secret trips to France to meet senior Resistance figures. Epic story of capture, torture and escape, written as told by Tommy to Marshall (who was himself on the HQ staff of RF section).* Mark Seaman. Bravest of the Brave: True Story of Wing Commander Tommy Yeo-Thomas - SOE Secret Agent Codename, the White Rabbit (Michael OMara Books 1997) ISBN 978-1854796509* Mark Seaman. Special Operations Executive: a new instrument of war. Routledge, 2006. ISBN 0415384559* Ray Mears, The Real Heroes of Telemark: The True Story of the Secret Mission to Stop Hitlers Atomic Bomb, ISBN 0-340-83015-8, Hodder & Stoughton 2003:Associated with a three part BBC TV series, Ray Mears followed the route taken in 1943 along with some present day members of Royal Marines and Norwegian Army.* Inside Camp X by Lynn Philip Hodgson, with a foreword by Secret Agent Andy Durovecz (2003). ISBN 0-9687062-0-7* Saward. The Grand Prix Saboteurs (Morienval Press 2006, ISBN 978-0-9554868-0-7)*  Gives tangential account of SOEs operations in the Mediterranean and its quarrels with other intelligence agenciesCommentariesExternal links* The Special Operations Executive (Official Document - British Foreign & Commonwealth Office Website)* Profiles of Special Operations Executive Agents in France by Nigel Perrin* Colin Gubbins, Leo Marks and the SOE* Imperial War Museum (London) IWM Secret War exhibition.* Imperial War Museum Collections Online IWM Collections Irregular Warfare, for many written materials, photos, audio files on SOE.* Mission Scapula Special Operations Executive in the Far East.* Target near Glasnacardoch Lodge STS22a* The Violette Szabo Museum* 64 Baker Street, the women of SOE* Canadian Secret Agents in the Second World War* Operation BRADDOCK - A joint SOE/PWE plan to air-drop concealable explosive devices across Europe* Roll of honour, awards and images.* SOE sites around of Milton Keynes* The 11th Day Documentary film about the Resistance, on the island of Crete, during the Second World War including SOE efforts and Sir Leigh Fermor* Gladiators of World War II - Episode 2, Special Operations Executive YouTube article* Interview with secret agent Francis Cammaerts in the Leicester Mercury*  An account of SOE training around the Arisaig area.*SOE: An Amateur Outfit?Operations ExecutiveOperations ExecutiveOperations ExecutiveOperations Executivede Operaciones EspecialesOperations ExecutiveOperations ExecutiveOperations Executive Operations ExecutiveOperations ExecutiveOperations ExecutiveOperations ExecutiveOperations ExecutiveOperations Executive Operations ExecutiveOperations Executive
29324
Signal_processing
Signal processing is an area of engineering, engineering and mathematics that deals with operations on or analysis of signals, in either discrete or continuous time, to perform useful operations on those signals. Signals of interest can include sound, images, time-varying measurement values and sensor data, for example biological data such as electrocardiograms, system signals, telecommunication transmission signals, and many others. Signals are analog or digital electrical representations of time-varying or spatial-varying physical quantities. In the context of signal processing, arbitrary binary data streams and on-off signalling are not considered as signals, but only analog and digital signals that are representations of analog physical quantities.Typical operations and applicationsProcessing of signals includes the following operations and algorithms with application examples:(Mathematical Methods and Algorithms for Signal Processing, Todd K. Moon, Wynn C. Stirling, Hall, 2000, ISBN 0-201-36186-8, page 4.)* Filtering (for example in tone controls and equalizers)* Smoothing, deblurring (for example in enhancement)* filtering (for example for echo-cancellation in a conference telephone, or denoising for aircraft identification by radar)* Spectrum analysis (for example in resonance imaging, reconstruction and OFDM modulation)* Digitization, reconstruction and compression (for example, compression, sound coding and other coding)* Storage (in delay lines and reverb)* Modulation (in modems and radio receivers and transmitters)* synthesis (in modems and music synthesizers)* extraction (for example speech-to-text conversion and character recognition)* recognition and correlation analysis (in spectrum receivers and vision)* Prediction* A variety of other operationsIn communication systems, signal processing may occur at OSI layer 1, the Layer (modulation, equalization, multiplexing, etc.) in the seven layer OSI model, as well as at OSI layer 6, the Layer (source coding, including analog-to-digital conversion and compression).HistoryAccording to V. Oppenheim and W. Schafer, the principles of signal processing can be found in the classical analysis techniques of the 17th century.  They further state that the digitalization or digital refinement of these techniques can be found in the digital systems of the 1940s and 1950s.()Mathematical topics embraced by signal processing*Linear signals and systems, and theory*identification and classification*Calculus*equations*spaces and algebra*analysis*Probability and processes*theory*theory*Optimization*Programming*Numerical methods*methodsCategories of signal processingAnalog signal processingAnalog signal processing is for signals that have not been digitized, as in classical radio, telephone, radar, and television systems. This involves linear electronic circuits such as filters, filters, additive mixers, integrators and lines. It also involves non-linear circuits such as compandors, multiplicators (mixers and amplifiers), filters, oscillators and loops.Discrete time signal processingDiscrete time signal processing is for sampled signals that are considered as defined only at discrete points in time, and as such are quantized in time, but not in magnitude. Analog discrete-time signal processing is a technology based on electronic devices such as and hold circuits, analog time-division multiplexers, delay lines and feedback shift registers. This technology was a predecessor of digital signal processing (see below), and is still used in advanced processing of gigahertz signals. The concept of discrete-time signal processing also refers to a theoretical discipline that establishes a mathematical basis for digital signal processing, without taking error into consideration.Digital signal processingDigital signal processing is the processing of digitised discrete time sampled signals. Processing is done by general-purpose computers or by digital circuits such as ASICs, gate arrays or specialized signal processors (DSP chips). Typical arithmetical operations include fixed-point and floating-point, real-valued and complex-valued, multiplication and addition. Other typical operations supported by the hardware are buffers and tables. Examples of algorithms are the Fourier transform (FFT), impulse response (FIR) filter, impulse response (IIR) filter, and filters such as the Wiener and filters.Fields of signal processing* signal processing &mdash; analyzing and extracting information from signals and noise based on their stochastic properties* signal processing &mdash; for electrical signals representing sound, such as speech or music* signal processing &mdash; for processing and interpreting spoken words* processing &mdash; in digital cameras, computers, and various imaging systems* processing &mdash; for interpreting moving pictures* processing &mdash; for processing signals from arrays of sensors* Time-frequency signal processing &mdash; for processing non-stationary signals(Boashash, B. (ed.), (2003) Time-Frequency Signal Analysis and Processing: A Comprehensive Reference, Elsevier Science, Oxford, 2003; ISBN 0080443354)* Filtering &mdash; used in many fields to process signals* Seismic signal processing* mining.See also* subspaceNotes and referencesExternal links* Signal Processing for Communications &mdash; free online textbook by Paolo Prandoni and Martin Vetterli (2008)* Signal Processing and Recognition Groupaf:Seinverwerking de senyalssignluda:Signalbehandlingde:Signalverarbeitunget:Signaalittlusde sealeseo:Signal-prilaboradodu signaldei segnaliisyaratnl:Signaalverwerkingja:nn:Signalhandsamingsygnawde semnalprocessingsinyalsv:Signalbehandlingth:ilemezh:
29816
Technology
the mid 20th century, humans had achieved a mastery of technology sufficient to leave the atmosphere of the Earth for the first time and explore space.Technology is the making, usage, and knowledge of tools, machines, techniques, crafts, systems or methods of organization in order to solve a problem or perform a specific function. It can also refer to the collection of such tools, machinery, and procedures. The word technology comes ; .() The term can either be applied generally or to specific areas: examples include construction technology, medical technology, and information technology. Technologies significantly affect human as well as other animal species ability to control and adapt to their natural environments. The human species use of technology began with the conversion of natural resources into simple tools. The prehistorical discovery of the ability to control fire increased the available sources of food and the invention of the wheel helped humans in travelling in and controlling their environment. Recent technological developments, including the press, the telephone, and the Internet, have lessened physical barriers to communication and allowed humans to interact freely on a global scale. However, not all technology has been used for peaceful purposes; the development of weapons of ever-increasing destructive power has progressed throughout history, from clubs to weapons.Technology has affected society and its surroundings in a number of ways. In many societies, technology has helped develop more advanced economies (including todays global economy) and has allowed the rise of a leisure class. Many technological processes produce unwanted by-products, known as pollution, and deplete natural resources, to the detriment of the Earth and its environment. Various implementations of technology influence the values of a society and new technology often raises new ethical questions. Examples include the rise of the notion of efficiency in terms of human productivity, a term originally applied only to machines, and the challenge of traditional norms.Philosophical debates have arisen over the present and future use of technology in society, with disagreements over whether technology improves the condition or worsens it. Neo-Luddism, anarcho-primitivism, and similar movements criticise the pervasiveness of technology in the modern world, opining that it harms the environment and alienates people; proponents of ideologies such as transhumanism and techno-progressivism view continued technological progress as beneficial to society and the human condition. Indeed, until recently, it was believed that the development of technology was restricted only to human beings, but recent scientific studies indicate that other primates and certain dolphin communities have developed simple tools and learned to pass their knowledge to other generations.Definition and usageFile:Handtiegelpresse von 1811.jpg|thumb|left|upright|The invention of the press made it possible for scientists and politicians to communicate their ideas with ease, leading to the of Enlightenment; an example of technology as a cultural force.The use of the term technology has changed significantly over the last 200 years. Before the 20th century, the term was uncommon in English, and usually referred to the description or study of the arts.(For ex., George Crabb, Universal Technological Dictionary, or Familiar Explanation of the Terms Used in All Arts and Sciences, Containing Definitions Drawn From the Original Writers, (London: Baldwin, Cradock and Joy, 1823), s.v. technology.) The term was often connected to technical education, as in the Massachusetts Institute of Technology (chartered in 1861).(Julius Adams Stratton and Loretta H. Mannix, Mind and Hand: The Birth of MIT (Cambridge: MIT Press, 2005), 190-92. ISBN0262195240.) Technology rose to prominence in the 20th century in connection with the industrial revolution. The meanings of technology changed in the early 20th century when American social scientists, beginning with Veblen, translated ideas from the German concept of Technik into technology. In German and other European languages, a distinction exists between Technik and Technologie that is absent in English, as both terms are usually translated as technology. By the 1930s, technology referred not to the study of the industrial arts, but to the industrial arts themselves.(Eric Schatzberg, Technik Comes to America: Changing Meanings of Technology Before 1930, Technology and Culture 47 (July 2006): 486-512.) In 1937, the American sociologist Read Bain wrote that technology includes all tools, machines, utensils, weapons, instruments, housing, clothing, communicating and transporting devices and the skills by which we produce and use them.(Read Bain, Technology and State Government, American Sociological Review 2 (December 1937): 860.) Bains definition remains common among scholars today, especially social scientists. But equally prominent is the definition of technology as applied science, especially among scientists and engineers, although most social scientists who study technology reject this definition.(Donald A. MacKenzie and Judy Wajcman, Introductory Essay in The Social Shaping of Technology, 2nd ed. (Buckingham, England : Open University Press, 1999) ISBN 0-335-19913-5.) More recently, scholars have borrowed from European philosophers of technique to extend the meaning of technology to various forms of instrumental reason, as in Foucaults work on of the self (techniques de soi).Dictionaries and scholars have offered a variety of definitions. The Merriam-Webster dictionary offers a definition of the term: the practical application of knowledge especially in a particular area and a capability given by the practical application of knowledge.( Franklin, in her 1989 Real World of Technology lecture, gave another definition of the concept; it is practice, the way we do things around here.() The term is often used to imply a specific field of technology, or to refer to technology or just electronics, rather than technology as a whole.() Stiegler, in and Time, 1, defines technology in two ways: as the pursuit of life by means other than life, and as organized inorganic matter.( Stiegler has more recently stated that biotechnology can no longer be defined as organized inorganic matter, given that it is, rather, the reorganization of the organic. )Technology can be most broadly defined as the entities, both material and immaterial, created by the application of mental and physical effort in order to achieve some value. In this usage, technology refers to tools and machines that may be used to solve real-world problems. It is a far-reaching term that may include simple tools, such as a crowbar or wooden spoon, or more complex machines, such as a station or accelerator. Tools and machines need not be material; virtual technology, such as software and methods, fall under this definition of technology.()The word technology can also be used to refer to a collection of techniques. In this context, it is the current state of humanitys knowledge of how to combine resources to produce desired products, to solve problems, fulfill needs, or satisfy wants; it includes technical methods, skills, processes, techniques, tools and raw materials. When combined with another term, such as medical technology or space technology, it refers to the state of the respective fields knowledge and tools. State-of-the-art technology refers to the technology available to humanity in any field.Technology can be viewed as an activity that forms or changes culture.() Additionally, technology is the application of math, science, and the arts for the benefit of life as it is known. A modern example is the rise of communication technology, which has lessened barriers to human interaction and, as a result, has helped spawn new subcultures; the rise of cyberculture has, at its basis, the development of the Internet and the computer.() Not all technology enhances culture in a creative way; technology can also help facilitate political oppression and war via tools such as guns. As a cultural activity, technology predates both science and engineering, each of which formalize some aspects of technological endeavor.Science, engineering and technologyThe distinction between science, engineering and technology is not always clear. Science is the reasoned investigation or study of phenomena, aimed at discovering enduring principles among elements of the phenomenal world by employing formal techniques such as the method.() Technologies are not usually exclusively products of science, because they have to satisfy requirements such as utility, usability and safety.Engineering is the goal-oriented process of designing and making tools and systems to exploit natural phenomena for practical human means, often (but not always) using results and techniques from science. The development of technology may draw upon many fields of knowledge, including scientific, engineering, mathematical, linguistic, and historical knowledge, to achieve some practical result.Technology is often a consequence of science and engineering  although technology as a human activity precedes the two fields. For example, science might study the flow of electrons in conductors, by using already-existing tools and knowledge. This new-found knowledge may then be used by engineers to create new tools and machines, such as semiconductors, computers, and other forms of advanced technology. In this sense, scientists and engineers may both be considered technologists; the three fields are often considered as one for the purposes of research and reference.()The exact relations between science and technology in particular have been debated by scientists, historians, and policymakers in the late 20th century, in part because the debate can inform the funding of basic and applied science. In the immediate wake of War II, for example, in the United States it was widely considered that technology was simply applied science and that to fund basic science was to reap technological results in due time. An articulation of this philosophy could be found explicitly in Bushs treatise on postwar science policy, ScienceThe Endless Frontier: New products, new industries, and more jobs require continuous additions to knowledge of the laws of nature... This essential new knowledge can be obtained only through basic scientific research. In the late-1960s, however, this view came under direct attack, leading towards initiatives to fund science for specific tasks (initiatives resisted by the scientific community). The issue remains contentiousthough most analysts resist the model that technology simply is a result of scientific research.(.)(.) History  Paleolithic (2.5 million  10,000 BC) of Dmanisi.png|thumb|right|A primitive chopperThe use of tools by early humans was partly a process of discovery, partly of evolution. Early humans evolved from a species of foraging hominids which were already bipedal,() with a brain mass approximately one third that of modern humans.() Tool use remained relatively unchanged for most of early human history, but approximately 50,000 years ago, a complex set of behaviors and tool use emerged, believed by many archaeologists to be connected to the emergence of fully modern language.() Stone tools File:Biface de St Acheul MHNT.jpg|thumb|left|upright|Hand axes from the Acheulian periodFile:Clovis Point.jpg|upright|thumb|A point, made via pressure flakingHuman ancestors have been using stone and other tools since long before the emergence of sapiens approximately 200,000 years ago.() The earliest methods of tool making, known as the Oldowan industry, date back to at least 2.3 million years ago,() with the earliest direct evidence of tool usage found in Ethiopia within the Rift Valley, dating back to 2.5 million years ago.() This era of stone tool use is called the Paleolithic, or Old stone age, and spans all of human history up to the development of agriculture approximately 12,000 years ago.To make a stone tool, a core of hard stone with specific flaking properties (such as flint) was struck with a hammerstone. This flaking produced a sharp edge on the core stone as well as on the flakes, either of which could be used as tools, primarily in the form of choppers or scrapers.() These tools greatly aided the early humans in their hunter-gatherer lifestyle to perform a variety of tasks including butchering carcasses (and breaking bones to get at the marrow); chopping wood; cracking open nuts; skinning an animal for its hide; and even forming other tools out of softer materials such as bone and wood.()The earliest stone tools were crude, being little more than a fractured rock. In the Acheulian era, beginning approximately 1.65 million years ago, methods of working these stone into specific shapes, such as axes emerged. The Paleolithic, approximately 300,000 years ago, saw the introduction of the technique, where multiple blades could be rapidly formed from a single core stone.( The Paleolithic, beginning approximately 40,000 years ago, saw the introduction of pressure flaking, where a wood, bone, or antler punch could be used to shape a stone very finely.() Fire The discovery and utilization of fire, a simple energy source with many profound uses, was a turning point in the technological evolution of humankind.() The exact date of its discovery is not known; evidence of burnt animal bones at the of Humankind suggests that the domestication of fire occurred before 1,000,000 BC;() scholarly consensus indicates that erectus had controlled fire by between 500,000 BC and 400,000 BC.()() Fire, fueled with wood and charcoal, allowed early humans to cook their food to increase its digestibility, improving its nutrient value and broadening the number of foods that could be eaten.() Clothing and shelter Other technological advances made during the Paleolithic era were clothing and shelter; the adoption of both technologies cannot be dated exactly, but they were a key to humanitys progress. As the Paleolithic era progressed, dwellings became more sophisticated and more elaborate; as early as 380,000 BC, humans were constructing temporary wood huts.()() Clothing, adapted from the fur and hides of hunted animals, helped humanity expand into colder regions; humans began to migrateout of Africa by 200,000 BC and into other continents, such as Eurasia.() Neolithic through Classical Antiquity (10,000BC  300AD) Mans technological ascent began in earnest in what is known as the Neolithic period (New stone age). The invention of polished axes was a major advance because it allowed forest clearance on a large scale to create farms. The discovery of agriculture allowed for the feeding of larger populations, and the transition to a sedentist lifestyle increased the number of children that could be simultaneously raised, as young children no longer needed to be carried, as was the case with the nomadic lifestyle. Additionally, children could contribute labor to the raising of crops more readily than they could to the hunter-gatherer lifestyle.()()With this increase in population and availability of labor came an increase in labor specialization.() What triggered the progression from early Neolithic villages to the first cities, such as Uruk, and the first civilizations, such as Sumer, is not specifically known; however, the emergence of increasingly hierarchical social structures, the specialization of labor, trade and war amongst adjacent cultures, and the need for collective action to overcome environmental challenges, such as the building of dikes and reservoirs, are all thought to have played a role.() Metal tools Continuing improvements led to the furnace and bellows and provided the ability to smelt and forge native metals (naturally occurring in relatively pure form).() Gold, copper, silver, and lead, were such early metals. The advantages of copper tools over stone, bone, and wooden tools were quickly apparent to early humans, and native copper was probably used from near the beginning of Neolithic times (about 8000 BC).() Native copper does not naturally occur in large amounts, but copper ores are quite common and some of them produce metal easily when burned in wood or charcoal fires. Eventually, the working of metals led to the discovery of alloys such as bronze and brass (about 4000 BC). The first uses of iron alloys such as steel dates to around 1400 BC. Energy and Transport File:Wheel Iran.jpg|thumb|left|upright|The wheel was invented circa 4000 BC.Meanwhile, humans were learning to harness other forms of energy. The earliest known use of wind power is the sailboat.() The earliest record of a ship under sail is shown on an Egyptian pot dating back to 3200 BC.() From prehistoric times, Egyptians probably used the power of the Nile annual floods to irrigate their lands, gradually learning to regulate much of it through purposely built irrigation channels and catch basins. Similarly, the early peoples of Mesopotamia, the Sumerians, learned to use the Tigris and Euphrates rivers for much the same purposes. But more extensive use of wind and water (and even human) power required another invention.According to archaeologists, the wheel was invented around 4000 B.C. probably independently and nearly-simultaneously in Mesopotamia (in present-day Iraq), the Northern Caucasus (culture) and Central Europe. Estimates on when this may have occurred range from 5500 to 3000 B.C., with most experts putting it closer to 4000 B.C. The oldest artifacts with drawings that depict wheeled carts date from about 3000 B.C.; however, the wheel may have been in use for millennia before these drawings were made. There is also evidence from the same period of time that wheels were used for the production of pottery. (Note that the original potters wheel was probably not a wheel, but rather an irregularly shaped slab of flat wood with a small hollowed or pierced area near the center and mounted on a peg driven into the earth. It would have been rotated by repeated tugs by the potter or his assistant.) More recently, the oldest-known wooden wheel in the world was found in the Ljubljana marshes of Slovenia.()The invention of the wheel revolutionized activities as disparate as transportation, war, and the production of pottery (for which it may have been first used). It didnt take long to discover that wheeled wagons could be used to carry heavy loads and fast (rotary) potters wheels enabled early mass production of pottery. But it was the use of the wheel as a transformer of energy (through water wheels, windmills, and even treadmills) that revolutionized the application of nonhuman power sources. Medieval and Modern history (300 AD ) Innovations continued through the Ages with new innovations such as silk, the collar and horseshoes in the first few hundred years after the fall of the Empire. technology saw the use of machines (such as the lever, the screw, and the pulley) being combined to form more complicated tools, such as the wheelbarrow, windmills and clocks. The Renaissance brought forth many of these innovations, including the press (which facilitated the greater communication of knowledge), and technology became increasingly associated with science, beginning a cycle of mutual advancement. The advancements in technology in this era allowed a more steady supply of food, followed by the wider availability of consumer goods.File:USAF F-16A F-15C F-15E Desert Storm edit2.jpg|thumb|F-15 and F-16 flying over a burning field in Kuwait in 1991.Starting in the United Kingdom in the 18th century, the Revolution was a period of great technological discovery, particularly in the areas of agriculture, manufacturing, mining, metallurgy and transport, driven by the discovery of power. Technology later took another step with the harnessing of electricity to create such innovations as the motor, bulb and countless others. Scientific advancement and the discovery of new concepts later allowed for powered flight, and advancements in medicine, chemistry, physics and engineering. The rise in technology has led to the construction of skyscrapers and large cities whose inhabitants rely on automobiles or other powered transit for transportation. Communication was also improved with the invention of the telegraph, telephone, radio and television.The second half of the 20th century brought a host of new innovations. In physics, the discovery of fission has led to both weapons and power. Computers were also invented and later miniaturized utilizing transistors and circuits. These advancements subsequently led to the creation of the Internet. Humans have also been able to explore space with satellites (later used for telecommunication) and in manned missions going all the way to the moon. In medicine, this era brought innovations such as open-heart surgery and later stem cell therapy along with new medications and treatments. Complex manufacturing and construction techniques and organizations are needed to construct and maintain these new technologies, and entire industries have arisen to support and develop succeeding generations of increasingly more complex tools. Modern technology increasingly relies on training and education  their designers, builders, maintainers, and users often require sophisticated general and specific training. Moreover, these technologies have become so complex that entire fields have been created to support them, including engineering, medicine, and science, and other fields have been made more complex, such as construction, transportation and architecture.Technology and philosophyTechnicismGenerally, technicism is a reliance or confidence in technology as a benefactor of society. Taken to extreme, technicism is the belief that humanity will ultimately be able to control the entirety of existence using technology. In other words, human beings will someday be able to master all problems and possibly even control the future using technology. Some, such as V. Monsma,() connect these ideas to the abdication of religion as a higher moral authority.OptimismOptimistic assumptions are made by proponents of ideologies such as transhumanism and singularitarianism, which view technological development as generally having beneficial effects for the society and the human condition. In these ideologies, technological development is morally good. Some critics see these ideologies as examples of scientism and techno-utopianism and fear the notion of enhancement and singularity which they support. Some have described Marx as a techno-optimist.()Skepticism and Critics of TechnologyOn the somewhat skeptical side are certain philosophers like Marcuse and Zerzan, who believe that technological societies are inherently flawed. They suggest that the inevitable result of such a society is to become evermore technological at the cost of freedom and psychological health.Many, such as the Luddites and prominent philosopher Heidegger, hold serious, although not entirely deterministic reservations, about technology (see Question Concerning Technology()). According to Heidegger scholars Dreyfus and Charles Spinosa, Heidegger does not oppose technology. He hopes to reveal the essence of technology in a way that in no way confines us to a stultified compulsion to push on blindly with technology or, what comes to the same thing, to rebel helplessly against it. Indeed, he promises that when we once open ourselves expressly to the essence of technology, we find ourselves unexpectedly taken into a freeing claim.(Martin Heidegger, The Question Concerning Technology, in The Question Concerning Technology and Other Essays, trans. W. Lovitt, New York, Harper Torchbooks, 1977, pp. 256.) What this entails is a more complex relationship to technology than either techno-optimists or techno-pessimists tend to allow.(Hubert Dreyfus and Charles Spinosa, Further Reflections on Heidegger, Technology, and the Everyday, in Nikolas Kompridis, ed. Philosophical Romanticism, New York: Routledge, 2006, 265-281.)Some of the most poignant criticisms of technology are found in what are now considered to be dystopian literary classics, for example Aldous Huxleys New World and other writings, Anthony Burgesss Clockwork Orange, and George Orwells Eighty-Four. And, in Faust by Goethe, Fausts selling his soul to the devil in return for power over the physical world, is also often interpreted as a metaphor for the adoption of industrial technology. More recently, modern works of science fiction, such as those by K. Dick and Gibson, and films (e.g. Runner, in the Shell) project highly ambivalent or cautionary attitudes toward technologys impact on human society and identity.The late cultural critic Postman distinguished tool-using societies from technological societies and, finally, what he called technopolies, that is, societies that are dominated by the ideology of technological and scientific progress, to the exclusion or harm of other cultural practices, values and world-views.(Neil Postman, Technopoly: The Surrender of Culture to Technology, New York: Vintage, 1993.)Darin Barney has written about technologys impact on practices of citizenship and democratic culture, suggesting that technology can be construed as (1) an object of political debate, (2) a means or medium of discussion, and (3) a setting for democratic deliberation and citizenship. As a setting for democratic culture, Barney suggests that technology tends to make ethical questions, including the question of what a good life consists in, nearly impossible, because they already give an answer to the question: a good life is one that includes the use of more and more technology.(Darin Barney, One Nation Under Google, Toronto: House of Anansi Press, 2007.)Kompridis has also written about the dangers of new technology, such as engineering, nanotechnology, biology and robotics. He warns that these technologies introduce unprecedented new challenges to human beings, including the possibility of the permanent alteration of our biological nature. These concerns are shared by other philosophers, scientists and public intellectuals who have written about similar issues (e.g. Fukuyama, Habermas, Joy, and Sandel).(Nikolas Kompridis, Technologys Challenge to Democracy, Parrhesia 8 (2009), 20-33.)Another prominent critic of technology is Dreyfus, who has published books On the Internet and What Computers Still Cant Do.Another, more infamous anti-technological treatise is Industrial Society and Its Future, written by Kaczynski (aka The Unabomber) and printed in several major newspapers (and later books) as part of an effort to end his bombing campaign of the techno-industrial infrastructure.Appropriate technologyThe notion of technology, however, was developed in the 20th century (e.g., see the work of Ellul) to describe situations where it was not desirable to use very new technologies or those that required access to some centralized infrastructure or parts or skills imported from elsewhere. The eco-village movement emerged in part due to this concern.Technology and competitivenessIn 1983 a classified program was initiated in the intelligence community to reverse the US declining economic and military competitiveness.  The program, Socrates, used all source intelligence to review competitiveness worldwide for all forms of competition to determine the source of the US decline.  What Project Socrates determined was that technology exploitation is the foundation of all advantage and that the source of the US declining competitiveness was the fact that decision-making through the US both in the private and public sectors had switched from decision making that was based on technology exploitation (i.e., technology-based planning) to decision making that was based on money exploitation (i.e., economic-based planning) at the end of World War II. Technology is properly defined as any application of science to accomplish a function. The science can be leading edge or well established and the function can have high visibility or be significantly more mundane but it is all technology, and its exploitation is the foundation of all competitive advantage.  Technology-based planning is what was used to build the US industrial giants before WWII (e.g., Dow, DuPont, GM) and it what was used to transform the US into a superpower.  It was not economic-based planning.Project Socrates determined that to rebuild US competitiveness, decision making through out the US had to readopt technology-based planning.  Project Socrates also determined that countries like China and India had continued executing technology-based (while the US took its detour into economic-based) planning, and as a result had considerable advanced the process and were using it to build themselves into superpowers.  To rebuild US competitiveness the US decision-makers needed adopt a form of technology-based planning that was far more advanced than that used by China and India.Project Socrates determined that technology-based planning makes an evolutionary leap forward every few hundred years and the next evolutionary leap, the Automated Innovation Revolution, was poised to occur.  In the Automated Innovation Revolution the process for determining how to acquire and utilize technology for a competitive advantage (which includes R&D) is automated so that it can be executed with unprecedented speed, efficiency and agility. Project Socrates developed the means for automated innovation so that the US could lead the Automated Innovation Revolution in order to rebuild and maintain the countrys economic competitiveness for many generations.()()()Other animal speciesFile:Gorilla tool use.png|right|thumbnail|This adult gorilla uses a branch as a stick to gauge the waters depth; an example of technology usage by primates.The use of basic technology is also a feature of other animal species apart from humans. These include primates such as chimpanzees, some dolphin communities,()() and crows.()() Considering a more generic perspective of technology as ethology of active environmental conditioning and control, we can also refer to animal examples such as beavers and their dams, or bees and their honeycombs.The ability to make and use tools was once considered a defining characteristic of the genus Homo.() However, the discovery of tool construction among chimpanzees and related primates has discarded the notion of the use of technology as unique to humans. For example, researchers have observed wild chimpanzees utilising tools for foraging: some of the tools used include leaf sponges, termite fishing probes, pestles and levers.() West African chimpanzees also use stone hammers and anvils for cracking nuts,() as do monkeys of Vista, Brazil.(Nut-cracking monkeys find the right tool for the job, New Scientist, 15 January 2009)Future technologyof technology often attempt to predict the future of technology based on the technology and science of the time.See also* Stiegler* hammer* of technology* of science and technology* economy* Mumford* Luddite* construction* assessment* of historic inventions* convergence* and society* tree* -ology* and technology* and technology in Argentina* Technological superpowersTheories and concepts in technology* technology* of innovations* Paradigm* of technology* Posthumanism* principle* of technology* Techno-progressivism* Technocentrism* Technocracy* Technocriticism* evolution* determinism* nationalism* readiness level* singularity* Technological society* Technorealism* revival* Transhumanism* ManagementEconomics of technology* (bureaucratic)* Technocapitalism* Technological diffusion* acceptance model* lifecycle* transfer* accounting* Nanosocialism* Post-scarcityTechnology journalism* The Verge* Engadget* TechCrunch* (magazine)ReferencesFurther reading* .* Popper (2007) From Technological to Virtual Art, Leonardo Books, Press* Gere (2005) Art, Time and Technology: Histories of the Disappearing Body, Berg* *Kelly. Technology Wants. New York, Press, October 14, 2010, hardcover, 416 pages. ISBN 9780670022151External links* W5H of Technology Technology for Kids* Science and Technology in the Southern world* RedHerring.com ~ The Business of Technology* WiTEC - The European Association for Women in Science, Engineering and Technology (SET)af:Tegnologieam:ar:an:Tecnolochaas:ast:Teunoloxaynakaaz:Texnologiyabn:zh-min-nan:Ki-sutmap-bms:Teknologiba:be:be-x-old:bs:Tehnologijabr:Teknologiezhbg:ca:Tecnologiaceb:Teknolohiyacs:Technologiecy:Technolegda:Teknologide:Technologieet:Tehnoloogiael:es:Tecnologaeo:Teknologioeu:Teknologiafa:fr:Technologiefy:Technologyfur:Tecnologjiega:Teicneolaochtgd:Teicnelasgl:Tecnoloxagan:ko:hy:hi:hr:Tehnologijaio:Teknologiona Uzuid:Teknologiia:Technologia /sanarrutiit atuutingitalu qaujimajauningais:Tkniit:Tecnologiahe:jv:Tknologikn:krc:ka:kk:ky:sw:Teknolojiaht:Teknolojilo:la:Technologialv:Tehnoloijalt:Technologijahu:Technolgiamg:Teknljiaml:ms:Teknologimwl:Tecnologiemn:my:nah:mantcaytlnl:Technologiene:ja:no:Teknologinn:Teknologinrm:Technologieoc:Tecnologiamhr:pa:pnb:pap:Teknologiaps:km:pl:Technologiapt:Tecnologiaro:Tehnologiekamayrue:ru:sah:sq:Teknologjiasi:simple:Technologysk:Technolgiasl:Tehnologijasr:sh:Tehnologijasu:Thnologifi:Teknologiasv:Teknologitl:Teknolohiyata:tt:tet:Teknolojiath:tg:tr:Teknolojiuk:ur:vec:Tegnoogianghfiu-vro:Teknoloogiavls:Technologiewar:Teknolohiyayi:yo:Tknljdiq:Portal:Teknolociyebat-smg:Teknuoluogjzh:
30133
Economy_of_Thailand
spelling The economy of Thailand is a industrialized economy. It is a heavily export-dependent economy, with exports accounting for more than two thirds of domestic product (GDP).Recently, Thailand experienced GDP growth by 8.0% in 2010 making it one of the fastest growing economies in Asia and the fastest growing economy in South East Asia. The country has a GDP net worth of 9.5 trillion Baht (on a power parity (PPP) basis), or US$584 billion (PPP) making it the 24th largest economy in the world. This classifies Thailand as the 2nd largest economy in Southeast Asia after Indonesia. Despite this, Thailand ranks midway in the wealth spread in Southeast Asia as it is the 4th richest nation according to GDP per capita, after Singapore, Brunei and Malaysia.  Thailands nominal economic output as of June 2010 is $313.8 billion USD,(Thailands public debt stands at 42 pct of GDP by end-April - Peoples Daily Online) while holding some $172 billion in foreign exchange assets which ranks 11th in world. Thailand has strong automobile industry which grew by  63% in 2010 with 1.6 million cars produced ranking it as 13th in the motor vehicle producing countries in the world. Experts predict that by the year 2015 Thailand will be one of the top 10 motor vehicle producing countries in the world.(Foreign Exchange Reserves)  Thailands economy functions as an economy for the neighboring economies of Laos, Burma, and Cambodia. Thailands recovery from the 19971998 financial crisis depended mainly on exports, among various other factors. Thailand ranks high among the worlds automotive export industries along with manufacturing of electronic goods.Tourism revenues are on the rise and contributing to about 6% of GDP. The GDP growth of Thailand was 8.0% in 2010, higher than previous highs of 5-7% under the previous civilian administration. Thailand enjoys high foreign investment and consumer confidence. Unemployment is at 1.2% as year 2010, with  estimations of falling to 1% by the year 2012 therefore Thailand has one of the lowest unemployment rates in the world. Decades of economic growth reduced poverty in Thailand. Thailand enjoys one of the lowest poverty rates in Asia. In 2010, Thailand, along with Japan, Korea, Taiwan, Brunei and Malaysia were the only countries in Asia with less than 2% of the countrys total population living under $1.25 per day. Due to rising oil and food prices, the annual inflation rate for 2010 shot up to 3.5% in July, but it will unlikely reach higher rates as oil and food prices are stabilizing and Thailand is receiving high foreign reserves and capital investment.History Pre-modern Before the modern time, Thailand or, known as Siam, opened to foreign contact. Despite the scarcity of sources, the ports and cities on the coast and at the river mouth were among the early economic centers, welcoming the foreign merchants from Persia, Arab countries, India and China. The rise of Ayutthaya in the fourteenth century has been viewed as the response to reborn Chinese commercial activity. Needless to say, Ayutthaya became one of the most prosperous centers of trade in Asia.  Early Modern  In the nineteenth century, when the capital of the kingdom moved to Bangkok, the foreign trade, particularly with China, became the focus of the government. Chinese merchants came to trade, yet some settled down and received the official positions. Numbers of Chinese merchants and migrants became high dignitaries in the court. On the other hand, European merchants became active from the mid-nineteenth century. The Treaty signed in 1855, guaranteed the privileges of British traders. Bangkok became one of the most important trading centers in East Asia. However, the domestic market slowly developed. Some academics suggest that because of the control of serfs was the root of the domestic stagnation. Most of male population in Siam were in service of court officials while their wives and daughters might do some small-scale trade in local markets. Moreover many who were indebted, became slaves. Siam eventually lacked of labors and national entrepreneurs. V thus abolished serfdom and slaves status in 1901 and 1905 respectively.From early twentieth century to the end of World War II, economy of Thailand gradually became a part of global system. Major entrepreneurs were ethnic Chinese, who eventually became Siamese nationals. Export of agricultural products, especially rice, is the most important. Thailand has been among the top of rice exporters in the world until today. However, due to the Great Depression in world economy in 1920s-1930s, economy of Thailand suffered greatly. The result culminated in the Revolution in 1932, which ended the absolute rule of the Crown.After the war and domestic turmoils, despite the military rule, Thailand economy continued to rely on foreign trade with the financial aid from the United States. New cash crops like corns, tapioca, sugar canes and rubber were among the most important exports. Modern time Thailand had historically been a economy with average growth rates of 10.4% from 1985 to 1996. The administration under prime minister Tinsulanonda in power from 1980 to 1988 began to open up the countrys economy to international trade.However, after the 19971998 Asian currency crisis, gigantic financial institutions crumbled, millions of people became unemployed or bankrupted. It wasnt until 2001 that Thailand regained momentum over the baht and economy.Thailands 23rd prime minister, businessman Thaksin took office in February 2001 with the intention of increasing domestic activity and reducing Thailands reliance on foreign trade and investment. Since then, the Thaksin administration has refined its economic message, embracing a dual track economic policy that combines increased domestic activity with Thailands traditional promotion of open markets and foreign investment.This set of policies is popularly known as Thaksinomics. Weak export demand held 2001 GDP growth to 2.2%. In 2002/03/04, however, increased domestic activity and an export revival fueled better performance, with real GDP growth at 5.3%, 7.1% and 6.3% respectively. However, in 2005, under rising oil prices and trade deficits, severe droughts and floods, the Southern Thailand Insurgency reaching its peak, uncertainty of the future of Thaksins government and the tourism aftershocks of the Indian Ocean Earthquake Tsunami on December 26, 2004, economic growth slumped to 4.5%.In 2005 Thailand also had a current account deficit of -4.3% of GDP, or US$ -7.6 billion. Ever since 2006 Thailand has once again a surplus in its current account and in 2006 the economy was buoyed by strong export growth, however, the military coup dtat on September 19, 2006, which ousted the prime minister and abrogated the 1997 constitution, along with the December 2007 elections, cast uncertainty.The present elected civilian administration under Sundaravej in power since January 29, 2008 estimates that the economy will have grown by about 5.5% to 6%. The rapid growth of the industrial and financial sectors over the last decades, agriculture and tourism are not the most important sources of revenue.Macro-economic trendThis is a chart of trend of gross domestic product of Thailand at market prices estimated by the International Monetary Fund with figures in millions of Thai Baht.For purchasing power parity comparisons, the US Dollar is exchanged at 22.34 Baht only.Before the 1997 financial crisis, the Thai economy had years of manufacturing-led economic growthaveraging 9.4% for the decade up to 1996. Relatively abundant and inexpensive labor and natural resources, fiscal conservatism, open foreign investment policies, and encouragement of the private sector underlay the economic success in the years up to 1997.The economy of Thailand is an advocate of the enterprise system. Certain services, such as power generation, transportation, and communications, are state-owned and operated, but the government has considered privatizing them in the wake of the financial crisis.The Royal Thai Government welcomes foreign investment, and investors who are willing to meet certain requirements can apply for special investment privileges through the Board of Investment. To attract additional foreign investment, the government has modified its investment regulations.The labor movement remains weak and divided in Thailand; only 4% of the labor force is unionized. In 2000, the State Enterprise Labor Relations Act (SELRA) was passed, giving public sector employees similar rights to those of private sector workers, including the right to unionize.49% of Thailands labor force is employed in agriculture, however this is less than the 70% employed in 1980.( Agriculture has been experiencing a transition from labour intensive and transitional methods into a more industrialised and competitive sector.( Rice is the countrys most important crop; Thailand is the #1 exporter in the world rice market. Other agricultural commodities produced in significant amounts include fish and fishery products, tapioca, rubber, grain, and sugar. Exports of processed foods such as canned tuna, pineapples, and frozen shrimp are on the rise.Thailands increasingly diversified manufacturing sector made the largest contribution to growth during the economic boom. Industries registering rapid increases in production included computers and electronics, garments and footwear, furniture, products, canned food, toys, plastic products, gems, and jewelry. High-technology products such as integrated circuits and parts, electrical appliances, and vehicles are now leading Thailands strong growth in exports.IndustriesAgriculture, forestry, and fishingDevelopments in agriculture since the 1960s, have supported Thailands transition to a industrialised economy.( As recently as 1980 agriculture represented 70% of employment.(Henri Leturque and Steve Wiggins 2010.Thailands progress in agriculture: Transition and sustained productivity growth. London: Development Institute) In 2008 agriculture, forestry, and fishing contributed only 8.4% percent to GDP and even in rural areas farm jobs represent only half of employment.( Thailand is the worlds leading exporter of rice and a major exporter of shrimp. Other crops include coconuts, corn, rubber, soybeans, sugarcane and tapioca.()In 1985 Thailand officially designated 25 percent of the nations land area for protected forests and 15 percent for timber production. Protected forests have been set aside for conservation and recreation, while production forests are available for the forestry industry. Between 1992 and 2001, exports of logs and sawn timber increased from 50,000 cubic meters to 2 million cubic meters per year.The regional avian flu outbreak led to a contraction of Thailands agricultural sector during 2004, and the tsunami disaster of December 26, 2004, devastated the west coast fisheries industry. In 2005 and 2006 agricultural GDP was stated to have contracted by 10 percent.(Thailand country profile. of Congress Research Division (July 2007). This article incorporates text from this source, which is in the domain.)Mining and mineralsThailands major minerals include fluorite, gypsum, lead, lignite, natural gas, tantalum, tin and tungsten. The tin mining industry has declined sharply since 1985, and so Thailand has become a net importer of tin. As of 2008, the main mineral export was gypsum.Thailand is the worlds second largest exporter of gypsum after Canada, even though government policy limits gypsum exports to prevent price cuts. In 2003 Thailand produced more than 40 types of minerals with an annual value of about US$740 million. However, more than 80 percent of these minerals were consumed domestically.In September 2003, in order to encourage foreign investment in the mining industry, the government relaxed severe restrictions on mining by foreign companies and reduced mineral royalties payable to the state.(Industry and manufacturingImage:SPS Intertech factory13.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Production line workers at a factory in Chachoengsao.In 2007 industry contributed 43.9% of gross domestic product (GDP) but employed only 14% of the workforce. This proportion is the opposite of the one applying to agriculture. Industry expanded at an average annual rate of 3.4 percent during the 19952005 period. The most important subsector of industry is manufacturing, which accounted for 34.5 percent of GDP in 2004.Thailand is becoming a center of automobile manufacturing for the Association of Southeast Asian Nations (ASEAN) market. By 2004 automobile production had reached 930,000 units, more than twice as much as in 2001. Two automakers active in Thailand are Toyota and Ford. The expansion of the automotive industry has led to a boom in domestic steel production.Thailands electronics industry faces competition from Malaysia and Singapore, while its textile industry faces competition from China and Vietnam.( But now according to the Journal reported that the Thai Textile Association president Chung SHA said that although the global economic downturn, but the emerging markets leading role and the Thai-Japanese free trade agreement (FTA) signed, with Thai exports of textiles and garments for good.()EnergyIn 2004 Thailands total energy consumption was estimated at 3.4 quadrillion British thermal units, representing about 0.7 percent of total world energy consumption. Thailand is a net importer of oil and natural gas, but the government is promoting the use of ethanol to reduce imports of petroleum and the gasoline additive methyl tertiary butyl ether.In 2005 daily oil consumption of  exceeded domestic production of . Thailands four oil refineries have a combined capacity of . Thailands government is considering establishing a regional oil processing and transportation hub, serving the needs of south-central China. In 2004 natural gas consumption of  exceeded domestic production of .Also in 2004, estimated coal consumption of 30.4 million short tons exceeded coal production of 22.1 million short tons. As of January 2007, proven oil reserves totaled , and proven natural gas reserves were . In 2003 recoverable coal reserves totaled 1,492.5 million short tons.(In 2005 Thailand consumed about 117.7 billion kilowatt-hours of electricity. Electricity consumption rose by 4.7 percent in 2006 to 133 billion kilowatt-hours. According to the state electricity utility, the Generating Authority of Thailand, power consumption by residential consumers has been increasing because of more favorable rates given to residential customers over the industry and business sectors. Thailands state-controlled electric utility and petroleum monopolies are undergoing restructuring.ServicesIn 2007 the services sector, which ranges from tourism to banking and finance, contributed 44.7% of gross domestic product and employed 37 percent of the workforce.(TourismTourism makes a larger contribution to Thailands economy (typically about 6 percent of gross domestic product) than that of any other Asian nation. Most tourists come to Thailand for various reasonsmostly for the beaches and relaxation, although with the ongoing insurgency in the deep South, Bangkok has seen a large increase in tourism over the past years.Also, a sharp increase in tourism from other Asian countries has contributed largely to Thailands economy even though the Baht has gained strength compared to most other currencies in the past two years. In 2007 some 14 million tourists visited Thailand. The Thai tourism industry includes a thriving sex industry. Successive Thai governments, however, continue to neglect sex workers rights under labor laws persist in the criminalization of sex workers, allowing corrupt authorities and employers to exploit sex-workers labor.(empower foundation)The easing of the monetary crisis, the renewed vigorous growth of the Chinese economy, the relatively stable internal political situation following the Thai political crisis, and the flu pandemic having less of an impact as initially feared, have changed the tourism outlook for 2010. Thailand experienced a decrease of international visitors of 16% over the first six months of 2009 but the last four months of 2009 have seen a return of foreign tourists to Thailand with a marked increase in the months of November and December. The provisional numbers for 2009 have now been revised upwards to close to 14 million international visitors, which is a decrease of only 4% compared to 2008.(THAILAND TOURISM OVERVIEW FOR 2009 AND TOURISM GOALS AND TRENDS FOR 2010)Banking and financesDangerous levels of nonperforming assets at Thai banks helped trigger the attack on the Thai baht by currency speculators that led to the Asian financial crisis in 19971998. By 2003 nonperforming assets had been cut in half to about 30 percent.Despite a return to profitability, however, Thailands banks continue to struggle with the legacy of the financial crisis in the form of unrealized losses and inadequate capital. Therefore, the government is considering various reforms, including establishing an integrated financial regulatory agency that would free up the of Thailand to focus on monetary policy.In addition, the Thai government is attempting to strengthen the financial sector through the consolidation of commercial, state-owned, and foreign-owned institutions. Specifically, the governments Financial Sector Reform Master Plan, which was first introduced in early 2004, provides tax breaks to financial institutions that engage in mergers and acquisitions.The reform program has been deemed successful by outside experts. In 2007, there were three state-owned commercial banks and five state-owned specialized banks, 15 Thai commercial banks, and 17 foreign banks in Thailand.(The Bank of Thailand sought to stem the flow of foreign funds into the country in December 2006. This led within one day to the largest drop in stock prices on the Exchange of Thailand since the Asian Financial Crisis. The massive selling by foreign investors amounted more than US$708 million.(LaborThailands labor force was estimated at 36.9 million in 2007. About 49% were employed in agriculture, 37% in services, and 14% in industry. In 2005 women constituted 48 percent of the labor force and held an increasing share of professional jobs. Less than 4% of the workforce is unionized, but 11% of industrial workers and 50% of state enterprise employees are unionized.Although laws applying to private-sector workers rights to form and join trade unions were unaffected by the September 19, 2006, military coup and its aftermath, workers who participate in union activities continue to have inadequate legal protection. According to the U.S. Department of State, union workers are inadequately protected. Thailands unemployment rate lies at 1.5% percent of the labor force.(External tradethumb|left|Thai exports in 2006The United States is Thailands largest export market and second-largest supplier after Japan. While Thailands traditional major markets have been America, Japan, and Europe, economic recovery among Thailands regional trading partners has helped Thai export growth.Recovery from the financial crisis depended heavily on increased exports to the rest of Asia and the States. Since 2005, the rapid ramp-up in export of automobiles of Japanese makes (esp. Toyota, Nissan, Isuzu) has helped to dramatically improve the trade balance, with over 1 million cars produced annually since then. As such, Thailand has joined the ranks of the worlds top ten automobile exporting nations.Machinery and parts, vehicles, electronic integrated circuits, chemicals, oil and fuels, and iron and steel are among Thailands principal imports. The recent increase in import levels reflects the need to fuel the production of high-technology items and vehicles.Thailand is a member of the Trade Organization (WTO) and the Cairns Group of agricultural exporters. Thailand is part of the Free Trade Area (AFTA). Thailand has actively pursued free trade agreements. A China-Thailand Free Trade Agreement (FTA) commenced in October 2003. This agreement was limited to agricultural products, with a more comprehensive FTA to be agreed upon by 2010. Thailand also has a limited Free Trade Agreement with India, which commenced in 2003; and a comprehensive Free Trade Agreement which started 1 January 2005.Thailand started free trade negotiations with Japan in February 2004, and an in-principle agreement was agreed in September 2005. Negotiations for a US-Thailand Free Trade Agreement are underway, with the fifth round of meetings held in November 2005.Tourism contributes significantly to the Thai economy, and the industry has benefited from the bahts depreciation and Thailands stability. Tourist arrivals in 2002 (10.9 million) reflected a 7.3% increase from the previous year (10.1 million in 2001).Bangkok is one of the most prosperous parts of Thailand, and heavily dominates the national economy, with the infertile northeast being the poorest. An overriding concern of successive Thai Governments, and a particularly strong focus of the recently ousted Thaksin government, has been to reduce these regional disparities, which have been exacerbated by rapid economic growth in Bangkok and the financial crisis.Although little economic investment reaches other parts of the country except for tourist zones, the government has been successful in stimulating provincial economic growth in the Seaboard of Thailand, and the Mai area. Despite much talk of other regional developments, these 3 regions and other tourist zones still dominate the national economy.Although the economy has demonstrated moderate positive growth since 1999, future performance depends on continued reform of the financial sector, corporate debt restructuring, attracting investment, and increasing exports. Telecommunications, roadways, electricity generation, and ports showed increasing strain during the period of sustained economic growth and may pose a future challenge. Thailands growing shortage of engineers and skilled technical personnel may limit its future technological creativity and productivity.Mergers & AcquisitionsBetween 1997 and 2010, 4306 mergers & acquisitions with a total known value of 81 bil. USD with the involvement of Thai firms have been announced.(Statistics on Mergers & Acquisitions (M&A) - M&A Courses | Company Valuation Courses | Mergers & Acquisitions Courses) The year 2010 was a new record in terms of value with 12 bil. USD of transactions. The largest transaction with involvement of Thai companies has been: PTT Chemical PCL merged with PTT Aromatics and Refining PCL valued at 3.8 bil. USD in 2011.(PTT Chemical, PTT Aromatics Boards Approve Merger Plan - Businessweek)Other statisticsInvestment (gross fixed):26.8% of GDP (2007 est.)Household income or consumption by percentage share:* lowest 10%: 2.7%* highest 10%: 33.4% (2002)Distribution of family income - index:42 (2002)Agriculture - products:rice, cassava (tapioca), rubber, corn, sugarcane, coconuts, soybeansIndustries:tourism, textiles and garments, agricultural processing, beverages, tobacco, cement, light manufacturing such as jewelry, electric appliances and components, computers and parts, integrated circuits, furniture, plastics, worlds second-largest tungsten producer, and third-largest tin producerIndustrial production growth rate:5.4% (2007 est.)Electricity:* production: 124.6 billion kWh (2005)* consumption: 117.7 billion kWh (2005)* exports: 642 million kWh (2005)* imports: 4.419 billion kWh (2005)Electricity - production by source:* fossil fuel: 91.3%* hydro: 6.4%* other: 2.4% (2001)* nuclear: 0%Oil:* production:  (2005 est.)* consumption:  (2005 est.)* exports:  (2004)* imports:  (2004)* proved reserves:  (1 January 2006 est.)Natural gas:* production: 22.73 km (2005 est.)* consumption: 31.23 km (2005 est.)* exports: 0 m (2005 est.)* imports: 8.497 km (2005)* proved reserves: 400.7 km (1 January 2006 est.)Current account balance:$14.92 billion (2007 est.)Exports - commodities:textiles and footwear, fishery products, rice, rubber, jewelry, automobiles, computers and electrical appliancesImports - commodities:capital goods, intermediate goods and raw materials, consumer goods, fuelsReserves of foreign exchange and gold:$100 billion (February 2008)See also* Exchange of Thailand* of shopping malls in Thailand* aid to ThailandNotesExternal links* Bank of Thailand* Thai Ministry of Finance* Thai Ministry of Commerce* Thailand business newsde Tailndiade Tailandiade la Thalandede Tailandiadi TailandoThailandThailandvan Thailandde Tailndiada Tailndiath:t Thi Lan
30892
Truro
Truro (; ) is a city and civil parish in Cornwall, England, United Kingdom. The city is the centre for administration, leisure and retail in Cornwall, with a population recorded in the 2001 census of 17,431.(Office for National Statistics : Census 2001 : Parish Headcounts : Carrick. Retrieved 3 February 2010.)  Truro urban statistical area, which includes parts of surrounding parishes, has a 2001 census population of 20,920.() It is the only city in the county, and the most southern city in Britain. People from Truro are known as Truronians.Truro initially grew as an important centre of trade from its port and then as a town for the mining industry. The city is well known for its cathedral (completed in 1910), cobbled streets, open spaces and architecture. Places of interest include the Cornwall Museum, the for Cornwall, Cornwalls Courts of Justice and Council. Toponymy The origin of Truros name is debated. It is said to be derived from the Cornish tri-veru meaning three rivers, but references such as the Oxford  Dictionary of English Place Names reject this theory. At best, the tru part could mean three, though this is doubtful. An expert on Cornish place-names, Padel, in his book A popular dictionary of Cornish place-names wrote that the three rivers meaning is possible.(Padel, O. J. (1988) A Popular Dictionary of Cornish place-names, Penzance, A. Hodge ISBN 0-906720-15-X) History The earliest records and archaeological findings of a permanent settlement in the Truro area originate from Norman times  . A castle was built in the 12th century by de Luci, Chief Justice of England in the reign of Henry II, who was granted land in Cornwall for his services to the court, including the area surrounding the confluence of the two rivers. He planted the town in the shadow of the castle and awarded it borough status to further economic activity. (The castle has long since gone).By the start of the 14th century Truro was an important port,   thanks firstly to its inland location away from invaders and its prosperity from the fishing industry, but also to its new role as one of Cornwalls towns for the official assaying and stamping of locally-produced tin and copper in Cornish mines. However, the Death soon arrived and with it, a trade recession, resulting in a mass exodus of the population and, as such the town was left in a very neglected state    .Trade returned to Truro with help from the government and the town was very prosperous during the Tudor period. Self-governance was awarded in 1589 by the granting of a new charter by I  , which gave Truro an elected mayor and control over the port of Falmouth.During the Civil War in the 17th century, Truro raised a sizable force to fight for the King   and a royalist mint was set up in the town. However, defeat to the Parliamentary troops came in 1646   and the mint was moved to Exeter. Further disheartenment came later in the century when Falmouth was awarded its own charter giving it rights to its harbour, starting a long rivalry between the two towns. The dispute was eventually settled in 1709   with control of the Fal being divided between Truro and Falmouth.Truro prospered greatly during the 18th and 19th centuries. Industry flourished thanks to improved mining methods and higher prices for tin, and the town soon became the place to be for wealthy mine owners. Elegant Georgian and Victorian townhouses were builtsuch as those seen today on Lemon Street, named after the mining magnate and local MP Sir Lemonand Truro became the centre for high society in the county, being mentioned as the London of Cornwall.()Throughout these prosperous times Truro remained a social centre and many notable people hailed from it. One of the most noteworthy residents was Richard Lander, an explorer who discovered the source of the Niger in Africa and was awarded the first gold medal of the Geographical Society. Others include Davy, educated in Truro and inventor of the miners safety lamp, and Foote, an actor and playwright from Boscawen Street.Truros importance increased later in the 19th century and it had its own iron smelting works, potteries, and tanneries. The Western Railway arrived in Truro in the 1860s with a direct line from Paddington, and the of Truro bill was passed in 1876 which gave the town a bishop, then a cathedral. The next year Victoria granted Truro city status.The start of the 20th century saw the decline of the mining industry, however the city remained prosperous as its previous role as a market town shifted to being the administrative and commercial centre of Cornwall, and saw substantial development. Today, Truro continues its role as the retail centre of Cornwall but, like many other cities, faces concerns over the disappearance of many of its renowned speciality shops for national stores, the eroding of its identity, and also over how to accommodate future expected growth in the 21st century. Geography riverandboat.jpg|thumb|left|The Truro River and one of the Enterprise Boats fleet transporting passengers to FalmouthTruro is located in the centre of western Cornwall approximately 9 miles (14 km) from the south coast on the confluence of the rivers Kenwyn and Allen, which both combine to become the River, one of a series of creeks, rivers and drowned valleys leading into the Fal and then onto the large natural harbour of Roads. The river valleys form a bowl surrounding the city on the north, east and west and open to the Truro River in the south. The fairly steep-sided bowl in which Truro is located, along with high precipitation swelling the rivers and a tide in the River Fal, were major factors in the cause of floods seen in 1988 which caused large amounts of damage to the city centre. Since then, flood defences have been constructed around the city, including an emergency dam at New Mill on the River Kenwyn and a tidal barrier on the Truro River, to prevent future problems.The city is surrounded by a number of protected natural areas such as the historic parklands at Pencalenick, and larger areas of ornamental landscape, such as Garden and Tregothnan further down the Truro River. An area south-east of the city, around and including Calenick Creek, has been designated an of Outstanding Natural Beauty. Other protected areas include an Area of Great Landscape Value comprising agricultural land and wooded valleys to the north east, and Daubuz Moors, a Nature Reserve located alongside the River Allen close to the city centre.Truro has mainly grown and developed around the historic city centre in a nucleated fashion along the slopes of the bowl valley, with an exception being fast linear development along the A390 to the west, towards Threemilestone. As Truro has grown, itlike any other cityhas incorporated a number of settlements, turning them into suburbs or unofficial districts. These include Kenwyn and Moresk to the north, Trelander to the east, Newham to the south, and Highertown, Treliske and Gloweth to the west as a result of the far stretching development in that area. Demographics and economy Truros popularity within Cornwall as the number one destination for retail and leisure, and its role as the administrative centre of the county, is unusual compared to other cities in the country given that it is the fourth most populous settlement in Cornwall.( Furthermore, population growth has been slow compared to other Cornish towns and Cornwall as a whole, at 10.5% during the 19711998 period.There are approximately 22,000 jobs available in Truro; major employers in the city include the Cornwall Hospital, Council, and College.  The number of jobs is more than twice the number of economically active people living in the city, at 9,500.  This results in a large amount of commuting which is a major factor in the traffic congestion problems from which the city suffers.  Earnings on average are higher than the rest of Cornwall.Housing prices in Truro are at an all-time high, also being 8% more expensive than the rest of Cornwall. Truro was named in 2006 as the top small city in the Kingdom for increasing house prices, at 262% since 1996.() There is a large demand for new housing in the city, and a call for inner city properties to be converted into flats or houses to encourage city centre living and to alleviate the dependence on cars. Skinners brewery A brewery, Skinners, was founded in Truro in 1997 by Steve and Sarah Skinner.() The company produce ales and bottled beers, the names of which may come from Cornish folklore.() The beers have won a number of for Real Ale (CAMRA) and SIBA awards.() The companys pub, the Skinners Ale House in Newquay, was sold, and is now called Leadbellys.() The company sponsor the Skinners Brewery Cornwall Cup.() Culture  Attractions Truros most recognisable feature is its gothic-revival Cathedral, designed by architect Loughborough Pearson and rising  above the city at its highest spire.() It took 30 years to build, from 1880 to 1910, and was built on the site of the old St. Marys Church, consecrated over 600 years earlier. Enthusiasts of architecture are well catered for in the city, with terraces and townhouses along Walsingham Place and Lemon Street often said to be the finest examples of Georgian architecture west of the city of Bath.()The main attraction for local residents in the region is the wide variety of shops. Truro has a selection of stores, speciality shops and markets, which reflect its historic tradition as a town. The indoor Pannier Market is open year-round with many stalls and small businesses. The city is also popular for its eateries, including cafs and bistros. Additionally, it has emerged as a popular destination for nightlife with many bars, clubs and restaurants opening. Truro is also known for the for Cornwall, a performing arts and entertainment venue.The Cornwall Museum is the oldest and premier museum in Cornwall for exhibitions detailing Cornish history and culture, with a wide range of collections such as archaeology, art and geology. Among the exhibits of the museum there is the so called Arthurs inscribed stone. Truro is also noted for its parks and open spaces, including Victoria Gardens, Boscawen Park and Daubuz Moors. Events The piazza at Lemon Quay is the centre of most festivities in Truro, which attracts visitors year-round with numerous different events.In April, Truro prepares to partake in the in Bloom competition, with many floral displays and hanging baskets dotted around the city throughout the summer. A continental market also comes to Truro during the season and features food and craft stalls from all over Europe including France, Spain, Italy, Germany, Belgium, the Netherlands and Greece.Cornwalls first Pride event took place in Truro in August 2008, and the Truro City Carnival takes place every September over a weekend, including various arts and music performances, childrens activities, a fireworks display, food and drinks fairs, a circus, and a parade. A half-marathon also takes place in September, with hundreds of participants running from the city centre into the countryside towards Shortlanesend, and returning to finish at Lemon Quay.File:HIGHX1.JPG|thumb|right|upright|A cross near the CathedralTruro celebrates the Christmas season with its Winter Festival, which includes a lantern parade known as the City of Lights Procession.  Participants in this procession include many local primary schools as well as the involvement of colleges, community and youth groups.  There has been active involment by students from College Falmouth in the creation of large lanterns, complementing the work of the core artists team.  Christmas lights throughout the city centre as well a big switch-on event, speciality products and crafts fairs, late-night shopping evenings, various events at the Cathedral and a fireworks display on Years Eve. A tree is put up on the Piazza, and another outside the Cathedral at High Cross. One notable Christmas celebration was the Winter Festival of 2006, which, after a badly executed fundraising operation left the city with underwhelming decorations the year before, featured extensive festivities and decoration including an ski slope constructed on Lemon Quay, resulting in a much more successful festival. Sports Truro was temporarily the home to union club Pirates, but the team is currently located at its historical base in Penzance. Discussions are currently in progress about the possible construction of a for Cornwall, planned for Threemilestone.() The city is also home to City F.C., a football team in the South, the only Cornish club ever to reach this tier of the football pyramid. The club achieved national recognition when they won the Vase in 2007, beating Totton 31 in only the second ever final at the new Stadium, and becoming the first Cornish side ever to win the FA Vase.  County Cricket Club play some of their home fixtures at Park, which is also the home ground of Cricket Club.  Other sporting amenities include a centre, golf course, and tennis courts. Media Truro is the centre of Cornwalls local media. The county-wide weekly newspapers, West Briton and the Guardian, are based in the city and serves the Truro area with its Truro and Mid-Cornwall edition. The city is also home to the broadcasting studios of the county-wide radio station Radio Cornwall, and the studios of the West district of ITV Westcountry, whose main studio is now located in Bristol after ITV Westcountry merged with ITV West, the studio in Plymouth was closed and Live was replaced by West Country Tonight.CustomsA mummers play text which had, until recently, been attributed to Mylor, Cornwall (much quoted in early studies of folk plays, such as The Mummers Play by R. J. E. Tiddy  published posthumously in 1923  and The English Folk-Play (1933) by E. K. Chambers), has now been shown, by genealogical and other research, to have originated in Truro, Cornwall, around 1780.(The Truro cordwainers play: a new eighteenth-century Christmas play  Research article at BNET.com)(Truro (Formerly Mylor): A Play for Christmas, 1780s (Full text and notes)) Climate  Administration Truro City Council, a parish council, is situated within City Hall in Boscawen Street, and is responsible for parks, gardens and planting, mayoral and civic events, support of its overseas twinning, tourist information, and the liaising with Council over planning, infrastructure, development and environmental issues, over which the unitary council administers. The city is divided into four wards - Boscawen, Moresk, Tregolls and Trehaverne, with 24 councillors elected for four-year terms.() The current mayor is Rob Nolan, newly elected in May 2011.(http://cornwall.be/st/36955/truro-and-mayor-making) Twinning Truro is twinned with Boppard, in the Rhineland-Palatinate region of Germany, and  Morlaix in Brittany, France, after which Morlaix Avenue in Truro is named.()The town of Truro in the Province of Nova Scotia, Canada is named after Truro, as is the town of Truro in the US state of Massachusetts. Transport  Roads and bus services Truro is 6 miles (9 km) from the A30 road, to which it is connected by the A39 leading from Falmouth and Penryn. Wrapping the citys south side is the A390, stretching from Redruth in the west to Liskeard in the east where it connects to the A38, which then goes on to Plymouth and further to Exeter and the motorway. Truro is the most southerly city in the United Kingdom, situated just under 232 miles (373 km) west south-west of Cross, London.The city and surrounding area is served by extensive bus services offering routes in and out of the city in all directions, usually starting and terminating at the bus station near Lemon Quay. The headquarters of the mid-Cornwall bus operator Truronian are also located there, as are the starting points for many of the Group services covering a wider area. A permanent and Ride scheme, known as Park for Truro, began operation in August 2008. Based at Langarth Park in Threemilestone, buses carry commuters into the city centre via College, the Cornwall Hospital Treliske, County Hall, railway station, the Royal Cornwall Museum and Victoria Square. Coach services including Truronian and Express also operate from Truro, providing transport to and from larger cities up-country. Railways File:Carvedras Viaduct.jpg|right|thumb|Carvedras Viaduct, built in 1859 by Kingdom Brunel. It was replaced by a stone viaduct in 1904.railway station is a short walk from the city centre and is part of the Main Line, giving the city a direct connection to Paddington. North-east of the station is a 28 metre (92 ft) high stone viaduct offering expansive views over the city, cathedral, and Truro River in the distance. The viaductthe longest on the linereplaced Kingdom Brunels wooden Carvedras Viaduct in 1904. Connecting to the main line at Truro station is the Line, a line which travels south and terminates at Falmouth.City of Turo nameplate.jpg|thumb|left|The nameplate of GWR City of Truro, built in 1903 and still operational in 2009Truros first railway station was at Highertown, which was opened in 1852 by the Cornwall Railway and from where trains ran to Redruth and Penzance. It was known as Truro Road Station & was located just west of Highertown Tunnel on the up side.The line was extended to the Truro River at Newham in 1855.Then Truro Road Station closed and Newham served as the Terminus. When the Railway connected the line to Plymouth, their trains ran to a new station above the city centre,where the present station is now. The West Cornwall Railway (WCR) then diverted most of its passenger trains to the new station, leaving Newham mainly as a goods station until it closed in 1971. The WCR became part of the Western Railway. The route from Highertown to Newham is now a path which takes a leisurely loop through the countryside on the south side of the city. Truro is also known as the namesake of the famous steam locomotive, the City of Truro, built in 1903 and still operational on UK mainline and preserved railways.. Air and river transport Newquay Airport is Cornwalls main airport and is located 12 miles (19 km) north of Truro. One of the fastest-growing regional airports in the UK, the services and destinations are constantly expanding. The airport offers regular flights to and from Gatwick, Stansted and other cities around the country, the of Scilly and Dsseldorf in Germany, winter services to Geneva in Switzerland and  Chambry in France and summer services to Alicante and Girona in Spain, Zurich in Switzerland and Saint-Brieuc in France.Also available is a boat link to Falmouth along the Rivers Truro and Fal, four times daily, tide permitting. The small fleet run by Enterprise Boats and part of the River Links also stops at Malpas, Trelissick, Tolverne and Mawes. Churches The old parish church of Truro was St Marys, incorporated into the cathedral in the later 19th century. Parts of the town were in the parishes of Kenwyn and St Clement (Moresk) until the mid 19th century when other parishes were created. St Georges church in Truro, designed by the Reverend William Haslam, vicar of Baldhu, was built in 1855 (the parish was formed from part of Kenwyn in 1846). In 1865 two more parishes were created: St Johns from part of Kenwyn and St Pauls from part of St Clement.(Cornish Church Guide (1925) Truro: Blackford; pp. 210-11)()St Johns Church (dedicated to St John the Evangelist) was built in 1828 (architect P. Sambell) in the Classical style on a rectangular plan and with a gallery. Considerable alterations were carried out in the 1890s.St Pauls Church was built in 1848. The chancel was replaced in 1882-84, the new chancel being the work of J. D. Sedding. The tower is broad and strong (Pevsner) and the exterior of the aisles are ornamented in Seddings version of the Perpendicular style.(Pevsner, N. (1970) Cornwall; 2nd ed. Penguin Books; pp. 234-35) In the parish of St Paul is the former Convent of the Epiphany (Anglican) at Alverton House, Tregolls Road, an early 19th century house. The house was extended for the convent and the chapel was built in 1910 by E. H. Sedding.( The sisterhood was founded by the Bishop of Truro, Howard Wilkinson in 1883 and came to an end in 2008 with the death of the last nun.(Article by Richard Savill Last surviving nun of 127 year-old order (p. 7) Telegraph Tuesday 4 November 2008) The sisters were involved in pastoral and educational work and the care of the cathedral and St Pauls Church.(Cornish Church Guide. Truro: Blackford; pp. 325-26) St Pauls church, built with a tower on a river bed with poor foundations, has fallen into disrepair, and is no longer in use. Worship is now undertaken in the united benefices of st. paul & st. clement and st george & st john, truro. There is a Quaker Meeting House built in granite (ca. 1830) and among the Methodist chapels is that in Union Place which has a broad granite front (1830, but since enlarged). Education Educational institutions in Truro include:*Archbishop Benson - A Of England Voluntary Aided Primary School*Polwhele House Preparatory School  now educates the choristers from Truro Cathedral School.*School  a public school founded in 1880.*High School for Girls  a female-only public school, for ages 318.*School  a school, co-educational science college, for children aged 1116.*Lander School  a state school, co-educational technology college, for children aged 1116.*St. Michaels Catholic Small School  a small, privately run co-educational school for children aged 316.*College  A further and education college. Part of the Universities in Cornwall.The former Truro County Grammar School has been converted into a bar.() Development Truro has many proposed development schemes and plans, the majority of which are intended to counter the main problems it faces, notably congestion and lack of housing.Major proposals include the construction of a distributor road to carry traffic away from the very busy Threemilestone-Treliske-Highertown corridor, reconnecting at either Green Lane or Morlaix Avenue. This road will also serve the new housing planned for that area.()Major changes are also proposed for the city centre, such as pedestrianisation of the main shopping streets and beautification of a list of uncharacteristic storefronts built in the 1960s.( Also, new retail developments on the current Carrick District Council site and Garras Wharf waterfront site will provide more space for shops, open spaces and public amenities and also turn rather ugly areas of the city into attractive new destinations.( Along with the redevelopment of the waterfront, a tidal barrier is planned to dam water into the Truro River which is currently blighted by unsightly mud banks which appear at tide.(Controversial developments include the construction of a new stadium for City F.C. and the Pirates, and the relocation of the citys course to make way for more housing. A smaller project is the addition of two large sculptures in the Piazza.() Notable residents File:Richard Lander portrait.jpg|thumb|Lemon Lander. A monument to him stands at the top of Lemon Street.*16th century**Farnaby  a madrigalist of the age.*18th century**Boscawen  an admiral of the Navy. A cobbled street at the centre of Truro and a park are named in his honour.*18th/19th century**Martyn  Cambridge mathematician, missionary in India and Persia, translated the Bible into local languages.*19th century**Foster Barham physician and writer on public health**Charlton Bastian  physiologist and neurologist**Chorley journalist and man of letters**Antonio Emidy  a former slave turned violinist.**Henry Fynn sometimes James Henry Finn  a recipient of the Cross.**Foote  an actor and playwright.**Lemon Lander  an explorer of Africa. A local school is named in his honour and a monument to his memory stands at the top of Lemon Street.**Spurr - a cabinet maker and lay preacher who was imprisoned for his part in leading the political movement Chartism. A large allotment in the town was dedicated to his memory in 2011.**Trevail  a well known local architect*20th century**Etherington  a professional football player playing for City.**Louis Gibson  an expert in medical uses of infrared and pioneer of its use in detecting cancer.**Robert Goddard  novelist.** Hunkin  bishop of Truro()**Meddows-Taylor  drummer from the rock band  Queen.** Nate Valentino - Producer/DJ**Nieland  a Commonwealth Games javelin gold medallist.**Thomas  professional female bodybuilder.**Voyce  a former London Wasps and England rugby union footballer who now plays at wing or fullback for RFC.**Barbara Joyce West  second to last survivor of the Titanic.**James Marsh  film director and winner of the Academy Award. See also * of Truro* Boscawen* of topics related to Cornwall* People from Truro* Lemon Lander* Truro* Cathedral References  External links **Truro City Council website*Cornwall Record Office Online Catalogue for Truro*Truro - historic characterisation for regeneration (CSUS)**Enjoy Truro - official guide to the city, including latest news and events (provided by Totally Truro, the local not-for-profit Business Improvement District)br:Trurucs:Trurocy:Truroda:Truro(Cornwall)el:es:Truroeo:Truroeu:Trurofa:(Cornouailles)gv:Trurugd:Truro- Truruio:TruroInggrisos:it:Trurokw:Trurula:Trurohu:Truro(Engeland)no:Truronn:Truropnb:pl:Truropt:Truroro:Truroru:sco:Trurosimple:Truroszl:Trurofi:Trurosv:Trurotl:Trurotr:Trurovo:Trurowar:Trurozh:
31718
Utopia
Utopia  is an ideal community or society possessing a perfect socio-politico-system. The word was imported from Greek by Thomas More for his 1516 book Utopia, describing a fictional island in the Atlantic Ocean. The term has been used to describe both intentional communities that attempt to create an ideal society, and fictional societies portrayed in literature. It has spawned other concepts, most prominently dystopia.The word comes from the  (not) and  (place) and means no place. The English homophone eutopia, derived from the Greek  (good or well) and  (place), means good place. This, due to the identical pronunciation of utopia and eutopia, gives rise to a meaning.VarietiesFile:Hieronymus Bosch - The Garden of Earthly Delights - The Earthly Paradise (Garden of Eden).jpg|thumbnail|right|200px|Left panel (The Earthly Paradise  of Eden) from Boschs Garden of Earthly Delights.Chronologically, the first recorded utopian proposal is Platos Republic.(More, Travis; Rohith Vinod(1989))  Part conversation, part fictional depiction, and part policy proposal, it proposes a categorization of citizens into a rigid class structure of golden, silver, bronze and iron socioeconomic classes. The golden citizens are trained in a rigorous 50-year long educational program to be benign oligarchs, the philosopher-kings. The wisdom of these rulers will supposedly eliminate poverty and deprivation through fairly distributed resources, though the details on how to do this are unclear. The educational program for the rulers is the central notion of the proposal.  There is a general pacifism or pacifist attitude. However, the people of the Republic are all ready to defend themselves or to compete militarily for resources (such as land) if necessary. It has few laws, no lawyers and rarely sends its citizens to war, but hires mercenaries from among its war-prone neighbors (these mercenaries were deliberately sent into dangerous situations in the hope that the more warlike populations of all surrounding countries will be weeded out, leaving peaceful peoples).In the sixteenth century, Thomas Mores book Utopia proposed an ideal society of the same name.  Some readers, including utopian socialists, have chosen to accept this imaginary society as the realistic blueprint for a working nation, while others have postulated that More intended nothing of the sort.  Some maintain the position that Mores Utopia functions only on the level of a satire, a work intended to reveal more about the England of his time than about an idealistic society.  This interpretation is bolstered by the title of the book and nation, and its apparent confusion between the Greek for no place and good place: utopia is a compound of the syllable ou-, meaning no, and topos, meaning place. But the homophonic prefix eu-, meaning good, also resonates in the word, with the implication that the perfectly good place is really no place.Another version of this concept is found in the Panchaea island, of the Sacred History book of Euhemerus, a writer from the 3rd century BC.This idea was long before never tried in India in terms of the Caste system, as a result their system slowly got corrupt and made things worse.  Hence the use of the word Satanic toward Desi (South Asian) culture by many theologists of fame.EcologyEcological utopian society describes new ways in which society should relate to nature. They react to a perceived widening gap between the modern Western way of living that destroys nature and the traditional way of living that is thought to be more in harmony with nature. According to the Dutch philosopher Marius de Geus, ecological utopias could be sources of inspiration for green political movements.(Geus, Marius de (1996). Ecologische utopien- Ecotopias en het milieudebat. Uitgeverij Jan van Arkel.)In the novelette Rumfuddle (1973), Vance presents a novel twist on the ecological utopia. His hero invents paratime travel and becomes effectively the ruler of earth by giving everyone their own alternate-earth wilderness worlds as vacation retreats/suburbs without neighbors. However, he requires them to work during the week cleaning up the original Earth and restoring its pristineness. A typical job is driving a bulldozer that shoves the detritus of industrial civilization through a portal into the oceans of a paratime garbage world.EconomicsEconomic utopias are based on economics. Most intentional communities attempting to create an economic utopia were formed in response to the harsh economic conditions of the 19th century.Particularly in the early 19th century, several utopian ideas arose, often in response to their belief that social disruption was created and caused by the development of commercialism and capitalism. These are often grouped in a greater utopian socialist movement, due to their shared characteristics: an egalitarian distribution of goods, frequently with the total abolition of money, and citizens only doing work which they enjoy and which is for the good, leaving them with ample time for the cultivation of the arts and sciences.  One classic example of such a utopia was Bellamys Backward.  Another socialist utopia is Morris from Nowhere, written partially in response to the top-down (bureaucratic) nature of Bellamys utopia, which Morris criticized.  However, as the socialist movement developed it moved away from utopianism; Marx in particular became a harsh critic of earlier socialism he described as utopian. (For more information see the of Socialism article.) Also consider Frank Russells book Great Explosion (1963) whose last section details an economic and social utopia. This forms the first mention of the idea of Exchange Trading Systems (LETS). Utopias have also been imagined by the opposite side of the political spectrum. For example, A. Heinleins Moon Is a Harsh Mistress portrays an individualistic and libertarian utopia. Capitalist utopias of this sort are generally based on market economies, in which the presupposition is that private enterprise and personal initiative without an institution of coercion, government, provides the greatest opportunity for achievement and progress of both the individual and society as a whole. Another view that capitalist utopias do not address is the issue of failure, any more than socialist utopias address the issue of planning failure. Thus a blend of socialism and capitalism is seen by some as the type of economy in a utopia. For example, one such idea is to have small, community-owned enterprises working under a market-based model of economy. Such a model of market-based Communism itself was in theory supposed to create a classless utopia, but no nation has ever reached that point. During the late-20th century, many economic utopias sprang up around the United States in response to various political conservative movements.  They were largely dubbed communes. Politics & historyA global utopia of peace is often seen as one of the possible endings of history. Within the localized political structures or spheres it presents, polyculturalism is the model-based adaptation of possible interactions between different cultures and identities in accordance with the principles of participatory society.()The Soviet writer Ivan Efremov produced during the Thaw period the science-fiction utopia Andromeda (1957) in which a united humanity communicates with a galaxy-wide Great Circle and develops its technology and culture within a social framework characterized by vigorous competition between alternative philosophies.Religious utopiaFile:New Harmony by F. Bate (View of a Community, as proposed by Robert Owen) printed 1838.jpg|300px|right|thumb|New Harmony, a utopian attempt; depicted as proposed by OwenReligious utopias can be intra-religious or inter-religious.The inter-religious utopia borders on a concept like Polyculturalism and is not deemed possible in the near future or the near-far future. Fledgling theories are generally canceled as impossible, but the ideology of God and Religion used in inter-religious utopia is commonly stated by many people as their view of God. Inter-religious utopia is a condition where the leaders of different religions accept science as a part of human-living and agree to abolish all baseless superstitious beliefs. In more extended theories it goes up to the level of different religious leaders setting-aside their differences and accepting harmony, peace and understanding to unite all religions within one another, thereby forming an utopian religion or a religion of Humans with God being defined as Science or the (supposed) supernatural force that reigned before the birth of the universe. Religion and God being used as a self-motivating factor for people to believe in and raise themselves out of difficult situations.Intra-Religious utopias are based on religious ideals, and are to date those most commonly found in human society. Their members are usually required to follow and believe in the particular religious tradition that established the utopia. Some permit non-believers or non-adherents to take up residence within them; others (such as the Community at Qumran) do not.The Islamic, Jewish, and Christian ideas of the of Eden and Heaven may be interpreted as forms of utopianism, especially in their folk-religious forms. Such religious utopias are often described as gardens of delight, implying an existence free from worry in a state of bliss or enlightenment. They postulate freedom from sin, pain, poverty, and death, and often assume communion with beings such as angels or the houri. In a similar sense the Hindu concept of Moksha and the Buddhist concept of Nirvana may be thought of as a kind of utopia. In Hinduism or Buddhism, however, utopia is not a place but a state of mind. A belief that if we are able to practice meditation without continuous stream of thoughts, we are able to reach enlightenment. This enlightenment promises exit from the cycle of life and death, relating back to the concept of utopia.In Thomas Mores Utopia, there is a rule in Utopia of religious tolerance, the penalty for breaking it is slavery or exile. The only despised people are atheists, as they do not believe in a reward for good behaviour.However, the usual idea of utopia, which is normally created by human effort, is more clearly evident in the use of these ideas as the bases for religious utopias, as members attempt to establish/reestablish a society which reflects the virtues and values they believe have been lost or which await them in the Afterlife.In the United States and Europe during the Great Awakening of the 19th century and thereafter, many radical religious groups formed utopian societies in which all aspects of peoples lives could be governed by their faith. Among the best-known of these utopian societies were the Shakers, which originated in England in the 18th century but moved to America shortly afterward.  A number of religious utopian societies from Europe came to the United States from the 18th century throughout the 19th century, including the Society of the Woman in the Wilderness (led by Kelpius), the Cloister, and the Society, among others.  The Society was a theosophy and pietist group founded in Iptingen, Germany, in 1785. Due to religious persecution by the Lutheran Church and the government in Wrttemberg,(Robert Paul Sutton, Communal Utopias and the American Experience: Religious Communities (2003) p. 38) the society moved to the United States on October 7, 1803, settled in Pennsylvania, and on February 15, 1805, they, together with about 400 followers, formally organized the Harmony Society, placing all their goods in common.  The group lasted until 1905, making it one of the longest-running financially successful communes in American history.  The Community, founded by Humphrey Noyes in New York, was a utopian religious commune that lasted from 1848 to 1881. Although this utopian experiment is better known today for its manufacture of Oneida silverware, it was one of the longest-running communes in American history.  The Colonies were communal settlements in Iowa, started by radical German pietists, which lasted from 1855 to 1932.  The Corporation, manufacturer of refrigerators and household appliances, was originally started by the group.  Other examples are Fountain Grove, Rikers Holy City and other Californian utopian colonies between 1855 and 1955 (Hine), as well as Sointula() in Columbia, Canada.Science and technologyFile:Early flight 02561u (2).jpg|thumb|Utopian flying machines, France, 1890-1900 (chromolithograph card).Scientific and technological utopias are set in the future, when it is believed that advanced science and technology will allow utopian standards; for example, the absence of death and suffering; changes in nature and the condition. Technology has affected the way humans have lived to such an extent that normal functions, like sleep, eating or even reproduction, have been replaced by artificial means. Other examples include a society where humans have struck a balance with technology and it is merely used to enhance the human living condition (e.g. Trek). In place of the static perfection of a utopia, transhumanists envision an extropia, an open, evolving society allowing individuals and voluntary groupings to form the institutions and social forms they prefer.Fuller presented a theoretical basis for utopianism and set out to develop a variety of technologies ranging from maps to designs for cars and houses which might lead to the development of such a utopia.One notable example of a technological and socialist utopia is Scottish author Banks Culture.Opposing this optimism is the prediction that advanced science and technology will, through deliberate misuse or accident, cause environmental damage or even humanitys extinction. Critics, such as Ellul and Mitchell advocate precautions against the premature embrace of new technologies, raising questions on responsibility and freedom brought by of labour. Authors such as Zerzan and Jensen consider that modern technology is progressively depriving humans of their autonomy, and advocate the collapse of the industrial civilization, in favor of small-scale organization, as a necessary path to avoid the threat of technology on human freedom and sustainability.There are many examples of techno-dystopias portrayed in mainstream culture, such as the classics New World and Eighty-Four, which have explored some of these topics.FeminismUtopias have been used to explore the ramification of gender being either a societal construct, or a hard-wired imperative.() The fictional aliens in Gentles Witchbreed start out as gender-neutral children and do not develop into men and women until puberty, and gender has no bearing on social roles. In contrast, Lessings Marriages Between Zones Three, Four and Five (1980) suggests that mens and womens values are inherent to the sexes and cannot be changed, making a compromise between them essential. In My Own Utopia (1961) by Mann Borghese, gender exists but is dependant upon age rather than sex  genderless children mature into women, some of whom eventually become men.(Utopic worlds or single-sex societies have long been one of the primary ways to explore implications of gender and gender-differences.( In speculative fiction, female-only worlds have been imagined to come about by the action of disease that wipes out men, along with the development of technological or mystical method that allow female parthenogenic reproduction. The resulting society is often shown to be utopian by feminist writers. Many influential feminist utopias of this sort were written in the 1970s;(Attebery, p. 13.)(Gatan Brulotte & John Phillips,Encyclopedia of Erotic Literature, Science Fiction and Fantasy, p.1189, CRC Press, 2006, ISBN 1-57958-441-1)( the most often studied examples include Russs Female Man and McKee Charnass to the End of the World and Motherlines.(Martha A. Bartter, The Utopian Fantastic, Momutes, Robin Anne Reid, p.101 ISBN 0-313-31635-X) Utopias imagined by male authors have generally included equality between sexes, rather than separation.(Martha A. Bartter, The Utopian Fantastic, Momutes, Robin Anne Reid, p.102 ISBN)  Such worlds have been portrayed most often by lesbian or feminist authors; their use of female-only worlds allows the exploration of female independence and freedom from patriarchy. The societies may not necessarily be lesbian, or sexual at all  a famous early sexless example being Herland (1915) by Perkins Gilman.( Charlene Ball writes in Womens studies encyclopedia that use of speculative fiction to explore gender roles in future societies has been more common in the United States compared to Europe and elsewhere.(UtopianismIn many cultures, societies, religions, and cosmogonies, there is some myth or memory of a distant past when humankind lived in a primitive and simple state, but at the same time one of perfect happiness and fulfillment. In those days, the various myths tell us, there was an instinctive harmony between man and nature. Mens needs were few and their desires limited. Both were easily satisfied by the abundance provided by nature. Accordingly, there were no motives whatsoever for war or oppression. Nor was there any need for hard and painful work. Humans were simple and pious, and felt themselves close to the gods. According to one anthropological theory, hunter-gathers were the affluent society.These mythical or religious archetypes are inscribed in all the cultures and resurge with special vitality when people are in difficult and critical times. However, the projection of the myth does not take place towards the remote past, but either towards the future or towards distant and fictional places, imagining that at some time of the future, at some point of the space or beyond the death must exist the possibility of living happily.These myths of the earliest stage of humankind have been referred to by various religions:Golden AgeThe Greek poet Hesiod, around the 8th century BC, in his compilation of the mythological tradition (the poem and Days), explained that, prior to the present era, there were other four progressively more perfect ones, the oldest of which was the age.Plutarch, the Greek historian and biographer of the 1st century, dealt with the blissful and mythic past of the humanity.Arcadia, e.g. in Philip Sidneys prose romance The Old Arcadia (1580). Originally a region in the Peloponnesus, Arcadia became a synonym for any rural area that serves as a pastoral setting, as a locus amoenus (delightful place):The Biblical Garden of EdenThe Biblical of Eden as depicted in Genesis 2 (Authorized Version of 1611):And the Lord God planted a garden eastward in Eden; and there he put the man whom he had formed. And out of the ground made the Lord God to grow every tree that is pleasant to the sight, and good for food; the tree of life also in the midst of the garden, and the tree of knowledge of good and evil. ...And the Lord God took the man, and put him into the garden of Eden to dress it and to keep it. And the Lord God commanded the man, saying, Of every tree of the garden thou mayest freely eat: but of the tree of the knowledge of good and evil, thou shalt not eat of it: for in the day that thou eatest thereof thou shalt surely die. ...And the Lord God said, It is not good that the man should be alone; ... And the Lord God caused a deep sleep to fall upon Adam, and he slept: and he took one of his ribs, and closed up the flesh instead thereof; and the rib, which the Lord God had taken from man, made he a woman, and brought her unto the man.The Land of CokaygneThe Land of Cokaygne spelled Cockaygne or Cockaigne (in the German tradition referred to as Schlaraffenland:de:Schlaraffenland) has been aptly called the poor mans heaven, being a popular fantasy of pure hedonism and thus a foil for the innocent and instinctively virtuous life that is depicted in all the other accounts mentioned above. Cockaygne is a land of extravagance and excess rather than simplicity and piety. There is freedom from work, and every material thing is free and available. Cooked larks fly straight into ones mouth; the rivers run with wine; sexual promiscuity is the norm; and there is a fountain of youth which keeps everyone young and active.There is a medieval poem (c. 1315) written in rhyming couplets which is entitled The Land of Cokaygne:Far in the sea, to the west of Spain,Is a country called Cokaygne.Theres no land not anywhere,In goods or riches to compare.Though Paradise be merry and brightCokaygne is of far fairer sight....These myths also express some hope that the idyllic state of affairs they describe is not irretrievably and irrevocably lost to mankind, that it can be regained in some way or other.One way would be to look for the paradisea place like Shangri-La, hidden in the Tibetan mountains and described by Hilton in his utopian novel Lost Horizon (1933). Such paradise on earth must be somewhere if only man were able to find it. Columbus followed directly in this tradition in his belief that he had found the Garden of Eden when, towards the end of the 15th century, he first encountered the World and its indigenous inhabitants.Another way of regaining the lost paradise (or Lost, as 17th century English poet Milton calls it) would be to wait for the future, for the return of the Golden Age. According to Christian theology, the Fall from Paradise, caused by Man alone when he disobeyed God (but of the tree of the knowledge of good and evil, thou shalt not eat of it), has resulted in the wickedness of character that all human beings have been born with since (sin).In a scientific approach to finding utopia, the Scenario Group, an international group of scientists founded by Raskin, used analysis and backcasting to map out a path to an environmentally sustainable and socially equitable future. Its findings suggest that a global citizens movement is necessary to steer political, economic, and corporate entities toward this new sustainability paradigm.List of utopian literaturePre-20th century*The Republic (written around 380 BCE) by Plato is one of the earliest conceptions of a utopia.*The City of God (written 413426 AD) by of Hippo, describes an ideal city, the eternal Jerusalem, the archetype of all Christian utopias.*Hua Yuan, (421) is a utopia for Chinese intellects.*al-Fadila, written by Al-Farabi (874-950), where he theorized an ideal state as in Platos The Republic. Al-Farabi represented religion as a symbolic rendering of truth, and, like Plato, saw it as the duty of the philosopher to provide guidance to the state.*Utopia (1516) by More.*Christianopolis (1619) by Johann Valentin Andre, describes a Christian utopia inhabited by a community of scholar-artisans and run as a democracy.*City of the Sun (1623) by Campanella depicts a theocratic and egalitarian society.*Atlantis (1627) by Francis Bacon.*Erewhon (1872) by Samuel Butler, constitute a satiric romp through a hidden utopia (with dystopian elements) in the mountains of New Zealand.*from Nowhere by Morris (1892), Shows Nowhere, a place without politics, a future society based on common ownership and democratic control of the means of production.()*Backward (1888) by Bellamy.*Gloriana, or the Revolution of 1900 (1890) by Florence Dixie. The female protagonist poses as a man, Hector lEstrange, is elected to the House of Commons, and wins women the vote. The book ends in the year 1999, with a description of a prosperous and peaceful Britain governed by women.(Gates, Barbara T. (ed.), In Natures Name: An Anthology of Womens Writing and Illustration, 1780-1930 of Chicago Press, 2002)20th century*End(1954) by Arthur C. Clarke, alien beings guide humanity towards a more economically productive and technologically advanced society, allowing humans to broaden their mental capacities.*Modern Utopia (1905) by G. Wells*Islandia (1942), by Tappan Wright, an imaginary island in the Southern Hemisphere, a utopia containing many Arcadian elements, including a policy of isolation from the outside world and a rejection of industrialism. (In three sequels by Saxton, including Islar (1969), below.)*In the film to Utopia (1943), it was suggested (comically) that a personal Utopia could be obtained from the wealth of gold mines in Alaska, USA.*Two (1948) by F. Skinner, a community in which every aspect of living is put to rigorous scientific testing. A professor and his colleagues question the effectiveness of the community started by an eccentric man named T.E. Frazier.*Planet (1957), by Vance, depicts a world in which attempts by utopian misfits to set up new societies have gone haywire after many revert to savagery and violence. But one city, Kirstendale, sets up a successful order in which citizens constantly shift their status, titles and duties (from servant to aristocrat and back again) according to an elaborate schedule.*Island (1962) by Huxley follows the story of Will Farnaby, a cynical journalist, who shipwrecks on the fictional island of Pala and experiences their unique culture and traditions which create a utopian society.*Islar (1969), the Islandians develop a modern air force to fend off hostile communist-allied neighbors, and debate whether to join the UN.*Lathe of Heaven (1971), by K. Le Guin, a man is able to effectively dream, changing waking reality. A psychologist to whom he goes for treatment tries to use the mans talent to improve society but finds that each of his solutions has disastrous unintended consequences.*Dispossessed (1974), by K. Le Guin, the story of two planets, one very much like the capitalist, materialistic, profligate United States and the other a nonpropertarian society in which private ownership is unknown and people merely uses as much of natural resources or finished goods as they need. The two worlds are walled off (as were the capitalist and Communist world at the time of its writing). A physicist named Shevek travels between the two worlds and compares in a literary structure much like that of Tolstoys War and Peace.*Ecotopia: The Notebooks and Reports of William Weston (1975) by Callenbach, ecological utopia in which the Pacific Northwest has seceded from the union to set up a new society.*on the Edge of Time (1976) by Piercy, the story of a middle-aged Hispanic woman who has visions of two alternative futures, one utopian and the other dystopian.*Probability Broach (1980), by Neil Smith, presents both utopian and dystopian views of present day North America, through alternative outcomes of the American War for Independence.*Coming Home (1985), by K. Le Guin, a combination of fiction and fictional anthropology about a society in California in the distant future.*Fifth Sacred Thing (1993), by Starhawk, a post-apocalyptic novel depicting two societies, one a economy based on social justice, and its neighbor, a militaristic and intolerant theocracy.*Giver (1993), a Young Adult novel by Lowry*Utopia, is the eleventh episode of the third revived series of cult science-fiction show Who. The episode focused around an attempted voyage to the planet Utopia.21st Century*Moon (2009), directed by Duncan Jones, depicts a future where 70% of the worlds energy output is met by mining helium 3 from Earths moon.See also*mobile*intelligenceNotesReferences* Kumar, Krishan (1991) Utopianism (Milton Keynes: Open University Press) ISBN 0-335-15361-5* Manuel, Frank & Manuel, Fritzie (1979) Utopian Thought in the Western World (Oxford: Blackwell) ISBN 0-674-93185-8* Hine, Robert V. (1983) Californias Utopian Colonies (University of California Press)  ISBN 0-520-04885-7* Kumar, K (1987) Utopia and Anti-utopia in Modern Times (Oxford: Blackwell) ISBN 0-631-16714-5* Shadurski, Maxim I. (2007) Literary Utopias from More to Huxley: The Issues of Genre Poetics and Semiosphere. Finding an Island (Moscow: URSS) ISBN 978-5-382-00362-7External links* The Utopian - Magazine about contemporary politics, art and culture that takes from utopian thought a spirit of free inquiry and open-mindedness* Utopia - The Columbia Encyclopedia, Sixth Edition, 2001* Society for Utopian Studies - an international, interdisciplinary association devoted to the study of utopianism, with a particular emphasis on literary and experimental utopias.* History of 15 Finnish utopian settlements in Africa, the Americas, Asia, Australia and Europe.* Towards Another Utopia of The City Institute of Urban Design, Bremen, Germany* Utopias - a learning resource from the Library* Utopia and Utopianism - an academic journal* Utopia of the GOOD An essay on Utopias and their nature.* Review of Ehud Ben ZVI, Ed. (2006). Utopia and Dystopia in Prophetic Literature. Helsinki: The Finish Exegetical Society. A collection of articles on the issue of utopia and dystopia.ar:az:Utopiyabo:bg:ca:Utopiacs:Utopieda:Utopide:Utopieet:Utoopiael:es:Utopaeo:Utopioeu:Utopiafa:fr:Utopieko:hi:io:Utopioid:Utopiais:tpait:Utopiahe:kn:kk:la:Utopialb:Utopielt:Utopijahu:Utpiaml:arz:nl:Utopieja:no:Utopinn:Utopioc:Utopiapl:Utopiapt:Utopiaro:Utopieru:sq:Utopiasimple:Utopiask:Utpiasr:fi:Utopiasv:Utopita:te:tr:topyauk:khng tngbat-smg:Utuopjzh:
31940
United_Nations_Convention_on_the_Law_of_the_Sea
 wikisource           United Nations Convention on the Law of the SeaThe United Nations Convention on the Law of the Sea (UNCLOS), also called the Law of the Sea Convention or the Law of the Sea treaty, is the international agreement that resulted from the third Nations Conference on the Law of the Sea (UNCLOS III), which took place from 1973 through 1982. The Law of the Sea Convention defines the rights and responsibilities of nations in their use of the worlds oceans, establishing guidelines for businesses, the environment, and the management of marine resources.  The Convention, concluded in 1982, replaced four 1958 treaties. UNCLOS came into force in 1994, a year after Guyana became the 60th state to sign the treaty.( To date, 161 countries and the Community have joined in the Convention. However, it is uncertain as to what extent the Convention codifies international law.While the Secretary General of the United Nations receives instruments of ratification and accession and the UN provides support for meetings of states party to the Convention, the UN has no direct operational role in the implementation of the Convention. There is, however, a role played by organizations such as the Maritime Organization, the Whaling Commission, and the Seabed Authority (the latter being established by the UN Convention). Historical background The UNCLOS replaces the older and weaker of the seas concept, dating from the 17th century: national rights were limited to a specified belt of water extending from a nations coastlines, usually three nautical miles, according to the cannon shot rule developed by the Dutch jurist van Bynkershoek. All waters beyond national boundaries were considered waters: free to all nations, but belonging to none of them (the mare liberum principle promulgated by Grotius).In the early 20th century, some nations expressed their desire to extend national claims: to include mineral resources, to protect stocks, and to provide the means to enforce pollution controls. (The of Nations called a 1930 conference at Hague, but no agreements resulted.) Using the customary international law principle of a nations right to protect its natural resources, President Truman in 1945 extended States control to all the natural resources of its shelf. Other nations were quick to follow suit. Between 1946 and 1950, Argentina, Chile, Peru, and Ecuador extended their rights to a distance of 200 miles to cover their Current fishing grounds. Other nations extended their territorial seas to 12 nautical miles.By 1967, only 25 nations still used the old three-mile limit, while 66 nations had set a 12-mile territorial limit and eight had set a 200-mile limit.  As of May 28, 2008, only two countries still use the three-mile limit: Jordan and Palau.() That limit is also used in certain Australian islands, an area of Belize, some Japanese straits, certain areas of New Guinea, and a few Overseas Territories, such as Anguilla. UNCLOS I In 1956, the United Nations held its first Conference on the Law of the Sea (UNCLOS I) at Geneva, Switzerland. UNCLOS I resulted in four treaties concluded in 1958:* on the Territorial Sea and Contiguous Zone, entry into force: 10 September 1964* on the Continental Shelf, entry into force: 10 June 1964* on the High Seas, entry into force: 30 September 1962* on Fishing and Conservation of Living Resources of the High Seas, entry into force: 20 March 1966Although UNCLOS I was considered a success, it left open the important issue of breadth of territorial waters. UNCLOS II In 1960, the United Nations held the second Conference on the Law of the Sea (UNCLOS II); however, the six-week Geneva conference did not result in any new agreements. Generally speaking, developing nations and third world countries participated only as clients, allies, or dependents of United States or the Soviet Union, with no significant voice of their own. UNCLOS III The issue of varying claims of territorial waters was raised in the UN in 1967 by Pardo, of Malta, and in 1973 the Third United Nations Conference on the Law of the Sea was convened in York. In an attempt to reduce the possibility of groups of nation-states dominating the negotiations, the conference used a consensus process rather than majority vote. With more than 160 nations participating, the conference lasted until 1982. The resulting convention came into force on November 16, 1994, one year after the sixtieth state, Guyana, ratified the treaty.The convention introduced a number of provisions. The most significant issues covered were setting limits, navigation, archipelagic status and transit regimes, economic zones (EEZs), continental shelf jurisdiction, deep seabed mining, the exploitation regime, protection of the marine environment, scientific research, and settlement of disputes.The convention set the limit of various areas, measured from a carefully defined baseline. (Normally, a sea baseline follows the low-water line, but when the coastline is deeply indented, has fringing islands or is highly unstable, straight baselines may be used.) The areas are as follows:; waters: Covers all water and waterways on the landward side of the baseline. The coastal state is free to set laws, regulate use, and use any resource. Foreign vessels have no right of passage within internal waters.; waters: Out to 12 nautical miles from the baseline, the coastal state is free to set laws, regulate use, and use any resource. Vessels were given the right of passage through any territorial waters, with strategic straits allowing the passage of military craft as passage, in that naval vessels are allowed to maintain postures that would be illegal in territorial waters. Innocent passage is defined by the convention as passing through waters in an expeditious and continuous manner, which is not prejudicial to the peace, good order or the security of the coastal state. Fishing, polluting, weapons practice, and spying are not innocent, and submarines and other underwater vehicles are required to navigate on the surface and to show their flag. Nations can also temporarily suspend innocent passage in specific areas of their territorial seas, if doing so is essential for the protection of its security.; Archipelagic waters: The convention set the definition of Archipelagic States in Part IV, which also defines how the state can draw its territorial borders. A baseline is drawn between the outermost points of the outermost islands, subject to these points being sufficiently close to one another. All waters inside this baseline are designated Archipelagic Waters. The state has full sovereignty over these waters (like internal waters), but foreign vessels have right of innocent passage through archipelagic waters (like territorial waters).; zone: Beyond the 12 nautical mile limit there was a further 12 nautical miles or 24 nautical miles from the territorial sea baselines limit, the contiguous zone, in which a state could continue to enforce laws in four specific areas: pollution, taxation, customs, and immigration.; economic zones (EEZs): These extend from the edge of the territorial sea out to 200 miles from the baseline. Within this area, the coastal nation has sole exploitation rights over all natural resources. In casual use, the term may include the territorial sea and even the continental shelf. The EEZs were introduced to halt the increasingly heated clashes over fishing rights, although oil was also becoming important. The success of an offshore platform in the of Mexico in 1947 was soon repeated elsewhere in the world, and by 1970 it was technically feasible to operate in waters 4000 metres deep. Foreign nations have the freedom of navigation and overflight, subject to the regulation of the coastal states. Foreign states may also lay submarine pipes and cables.; shelf: The continental shelf is defined as the prolongation of the land territory to the margins outer edge, or 200 nautical miles from the coastal states baseline, whichever is greater. A states continental shelf may exceed 200 nautical miles until the natural prolongation ends. However, it may never exceed 350 nautical miles from the baseline; or it may never exceed 100 nautical miles beyond the 2,500 meter isobath (the line connecting the depth of 2,500 meters). Coastal states have the right to harvest mineral and non-living material in the subsoil of its continental shelf, to the exclusion of others.  Coastal states also have exclusive control over living resources attached to the continental shelf, but not to creatures living in the water column beyond the exclusive economic zone.Aside from its provisions defining ocean boundaries, the convention establishes general obligations for safeguarding the marine environment and protecting freedom of scientific research on the high seas, and also creates an innovative legal regime for controlling mineral resource exploitation in deep seabed areas beyond national jurisdiction, through an Seabed Authority and the heritage of mankind principle.(Jennifer Frakes, The Common Heritage of Mankind Principle and the Deep Seabed, Outer Space, and Antarctica: Will Developed and Developing Nations Reach a Compromise? Wisconsin International Law Journal. 2003; 21:409)Landlocked states are given a right of access to and from the sea, without taxation of traffic through transit states. Part XI and the 1994 Agreement Part XI of the Convention provides for a regime relating to minerals on the seabed outside any states territorial waters or EEZ (Exclusive Economic Zones). It establishes an Seabed Authority (ISA) to authorize seabed exploration and mining and collect and distribute the seabed mining royalty.The United States objected to the provisions of Part XI of the Convention on several grounds, arguing that the treaty was unfavorable to American economic and security interests. Due to Part XI, the United States refused to ratify the UNCLOS, although it expressed agreement with the remaining provisions of the Convention.From 1983 to 1990, the United States accepted all but Part XI as customary international law, while attempting to establish an alternative regime for exploitation of the minerals of the deep seabed. An agreement was made with other seabed mining nations and licenses were granted to four international consortia. Concurrently, the Preparatory Commission was established to prepare for the eventual coming into force of the Convention-recognized claims by applicants, sponsored by signatories of the Convention. Overlaps between the two groups were resolved, but a decline in the demand for minerals from the seabed made the seabed regime significantly less relevant. In addition, the decline of Socialism and the fall of Communism in the late 1980s had removed much of the support for some of the more contentious Part XI provisions.In 1990, consultations were begun between signatories and non-signatories (including the United States) over the possibility of modifying the Convention to allow the industrialized countries to join the Convention. The resulting 1994 Agreement on Implementation was adopted as a binding international Convention. It mandated that key articles, including those on limitation of seabed production and mandatory technology transfer, would not be applied, that the United States, if it became a member, would be guaranteed a seat on the Council of the International Seabed Authority, and finally, that voting would be done in groups, with each group able to block decisions on substantive matters. The 1994 Agreement also established a Finance Committee that would originate the financial decisions of the Authority, to which the largest donors would automatically be members and in which decisions would be made by consensus.On February 1, 2011, the Seabed Disputes Chamber of the International Tribunal for the Law of the Sea (ITLOS) issued an advisory opinion concerning the legal responsibilities and obligations of States Parties to the Convention with respect to the sponsorship of activities in the Area in accordance with Part XI of the Convention and the 1994 Agreement.(Case No. 17 - Responsibilities and Obligations of States Sponsoring Persons and Entities With Respect to Activities in the Area - Advisory Opinion, Seabed Disputes Chamber of the International Tribunal for the Law of the Sea (1 February 2011)) The advisory opinion was issued in response to a formal request made by the International Seabed Authority following two prior applications the Authoritys Legal and Technical Commission had received from the Republics of Nauru and Tonga regarding proposed activities (a plan of work to explore for polymetallic nodules) to be undertaken in the Area by two State-sponsored contractors (Nauru Ocean Resources Inc. (sponsored by the Republic of Nauru) and Tonga Offshore Mining Ltd. (sponsored by the Kingdom of Tonga). The advisory opinion set forth the international legal responsibilities and obligations of Sponsoring States AND the Authority to ensure that sponsored activities do not harm the marine environment, consistent with the applicable provisions of UNCLOS Part XI, Authority regulations, ITLOS case law, other international environmental treaties, and Principle 15 of the UN Rio Declaration.( International Tribunal on the Law of the Sea Finally Renders Advisory Opinion Establishing that the Precautionary Principle is Incorporated Within UNCLOS Law, ITSSD Journal on the UN Law of the Sea Convention (March 22, 2011)) Signature and ratification The convention was opened for signature on December 10, 1982 and entered into force on November 16, 1994 upon deposition of the 60th instrument of ratification.( The convention is ratified by 161 states (including the Islands and Niue) and the Union.; Countries that have signed, but not yet ratified: (17) Afghanistan, Bhutan, Burundi, Cambodia, African Republic, Colombia, Salvador, Ethiopia, Iran, Peoples Republic of Korea, Libya, Liechtenstein, Niger, Rwanda, Swaziland, Arab Emirates, States.; Countries that have not signed: (17) Andorra, Azerbaijan, Ecuador, Eritrea, Israel, Kazakhstan, Kyrgyzstan, Peru, Marino, Sudan, Syria, Tajikistan, Timor-Leste, Turkey, Turkmenistan, Uzbekistan, Venezuela (and excluding the states with limited recognition).; Non-Voting Member State: City; Non-State Observer: Liberation OrganizationAlthough the United States helped shape the Convention and its subsequent revisions, and though it signed the 1994 Agreement on Implementation, it has not ratified the Convention.(Roger Rufe, President of the Ocean Conservancy. Statement before the Senate Committee on Foreign Relations, October 21, 2003)(V Bantz, La Question De IAdhesion Par Les Etats-Unis a La Convention Des Nations Unies Sur Le Droit De La Mer (2003) 8 Annuaire Du Droit De La Mer 9-54) See also * Tribunal for the Law of the Sea* of salvage* Security Regimes* Convention Regarding the Regime of the Turkish Straits* waters* Law of Cyber-Space* States non-ratification of the UNCLOS* Joint Statement on Uniform Acceptance of Rules of International Law Governing Innocent Passage* Sharp Guard* assessments of the Gaza flotilla raid References  External links * Text of the treaty* List of countries that have ratified Law of the Sea Conventions* International Tribunal for the Law of the Sea* Permanent Court of Arbitration - Past and Pending Cases* Decisions of the World Court Relevant to the UNCLOS (2010) and Contents & Indexes* United Nations Division for Ocean Affairs and the Law of the Sea* UN Commission on the Limits of the Continental Shelf* * UNEP Shelf Programme, UN organisation set up to assist States in delineating their continental shelf beyond 200 nautical miles (370 km)* UNCLOS Italian Database* EEZ/CS Boundaries Canadian Database* VLIZ Maritime Boundaries Database* SOPAC Maritime Boundaries Databasede les Nacions Unides sobre el Dret de la Marde:Seerechtsbereinkommende las Naciones Unidas sobre el Derecho del Mar     des Nations unies sur le droit de la merdas Nacins Unidas sobre o Dereito do Mar       Ujedinjenih naroda o pravu moraPerserikatan Bangsa-Bangsa tentang Hukum Lautdelle Nazioni Unite sul diritto del mare teiss konvencijanl:VN-zeerechtverdragja:no:Havrettskonvensjonennn:Havrettstraktatenmorzadas Naes Unidas sobre o Direito do MarNaiunilor Unite asupra dreptului mrii   nationernas havsrttskonvention.. 1982c Lin Hip Quc v Lut binzh:
32379
Demographics_of_Vietnam
This article is about the demographic features of the population of Vietnam, including density, ethnicity, education level, health of the populace, economic status, religious affiliations and other aspects of the population.Originating in what is now southern China and northern Vietnam, the people pushed southward over two millennia to occupy the entire eastern seacoast of the Indochinese Peninsula. Ethnic Vietnamese, or Viet (known officially as Kinh), live in the lowlands and speak the language. This group dominates much of the cultural and political landscape of Vietnam.The Vietnamese government recognizes 54 ethnic groups, of which the Viet is the largest; according to official Vietnamese figures (1999 census), ethnic Vietnamese account for 86% of the nations population. The ethnic Vietnamese inhabit a little less than half of Vietnam, while the ethnic minorities inhabit the majority of Vietnams land (albeit the least fertile parts of the country).The Krom  are found in the delta of the River, in the south of Vietnam, where they form in many areas the majority of the rural population. They live in an area which was previously part of Cambodia and which Vietnam conquered in the 17th and 18th centuries. Official Vietnamese figures put the Khmer Krom at 1.3 million people. However, estimates vary from 1.1 to 7 million.Vietnams approximately 1 million ethnic Chinese, constitute one of Vietnams largest minority groups. Long important in the Vietnamese economy, Vietnamese of Chinese ancestry have been active in rice trading, milling, real estate, and banking in the south and shopkeeping, stevedoring, and mining in the north. Restrictions on economic activity following reunification in 1975 and the subsequent but unrelated general deterioration in Vietnamese-Chinese relations sent chills through the Chinese-Vietnamese community.The relation between China and Vietnam also declined in this period, with Vietnam siding with the Union against China in the Chinese-Soviet split. Tensions peaked when Vietnam invaded Cambodia, an ally of China, to depose Pot, resulting in a Chinese invasion of Vietnam in 1979. In 1978-79, some 450,000 ethnic Chinese left Vietnam by boat as refugees (many officially encouraged and assisted) or were expelled across the land border with China. However in recent years the government has performed an about turn and is encouraging overseas Hoa to return and invest.The central highland peoples commonly termed Degar or Montagnards (mountain people) comprise two main ethnolinguistic groups--Malayo-Polynesian and MonKhmer. About 30 groups of various cultures and dialects are spread over the highland territory.Other minority groups include the Cham--remnants of the once-mighty Champa Kingdom, conquered by the Vietnamese in the 15th century, Hmong, and Tai (Thi).Vietnamese is the official language of the country. It is a language pertaining to the Austroasiatic language family, a language family also including Khmer, Mon, etc. Vietnamese was spoken by 65.8 million people in Vietnam at the 1999 census. Another 1.6 million Vietnamese speakers are found outside of Vietnam. Thus Vietnamese is the most spoken language of the Austroasiatic family, being spoken by three times more people than the second most spoken language of the family, Khmer. Both languages, however, are extremely different: under the influence of Chinese, Vietnamese has become a language, while Khmer has remained non-tonal. Vietnamese was heavily influenced by Chinese and a great part of the Vietnamese vocabulary is Chinese, while Khmer was heavily influenced by Sanskrit and Pali and a great part of its vocabulary is now made up of Indian words, so that both languages look very dissimilar on the surface. Since the early 20th century, the Vietnamese have used a Romanized script introduced by the French. (See language). CIA World Factbook demographic statistics The following demographic statistics are from the World Factbook, unless otherwise indicated.PopulationImage:Vietnam-demography.png|thumb|550px|right|Demographics of Vietnam, Data of FAO, year 2005 ; Number of inhabitants in thousands.Source: CIA Factbooks 2000-2010.Age structure: 014 years: 25.6% (male 11,418,642/female 10,598,184): 1564 years: 68.6% (male 29,341,216/female 29,777,696): 65 years and over: 5.8% (male 1,925,609/female 3,055,212)(2008 est.)Birth rate16.47 births/2 population (2008 est.)Death rate6.18 deaths/1,000 population (2008 est.)Net migration rate-0.39 migrant(s)/1,000 population (2008 est.)Sex ratio: at birth: 1.07 male(s)/female: under 15 years: 1.08 male(s)/female: 1564 years: 0.98 male(s)/female: 65 years and over: 0.63 male(s)/female: total population: 0.98 male(s)/female(2008 est.)Infant mortality rate: total: 23.61 deaths/1,000 live births: male: 24.01 deaths/1,000 live births: female: 23.19 deaths/1,000 live births(2008 est.)Life expectancy at birth: total population: 71.33 years: male: 68.52 years: female: 74.33 years(2008 est.)Total fertility rate: 1.86 children born/woman (2008 est.): 1.93 children born/woman (2010 est.)Nationality: noun: Vietnamese (singular and plural): adjective: VietnameseEthnic groupsKinh (Viet) 86.2%, Tay 1.9%, Thai 1.7%, Muong 1.5%, Khmer 1.4%, Hoa 1.1%, Nng 1.1%, Hmong 1%, others 4.1% (1999 census)Religions(APEC - Vietnam)(Encyclopedia of the Nations - Vietnam)(Vietnam travel and holidays - Vietnams religions)(Religion of the Vietnamese)()* Buddhism, 85%(Embassy of Vietnam - Beliefs and religions)(CIA Factbook- Vietnam)** Secular/triple religion, 80%** Hao, 3%** Buddhism, 2%* Christianity, 8%** Catholic, 7%** Protestant, 1%* Dai, 3%* Other religions, 4%LanguagesVietnamese (official), English (most taught second language in schools), French, Russian, tribal languages (TaiKadai, Cham, and Malayo-Polynesian)Literacy: definition: age 15 and over can read and write: total population: 94% (2004 consensus): male: 96.9%: female: 91.9% (2012) Sources * 2006 Vietnams population estimates* 1999 Census results* Socioeconomic Atlas of Vietnam References http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Khmer_peoplehttp://www.khmerkrom.org/node/31 See also * of ethnic groups in Vietnam  du Vit Namgyventojaitin nhn khu hc Vit Namzh:
32658
Visegrd_Group
gni per capita                      $20 840 USDThe Visegrd Group, also called the Visegrd Four or V4, is an alliance of four European states &ndash; the Republic, Hungary, Poland and Slovakia &ndash; for the purposes of cooperation and furthering their integration. The Groups name in the languages of the four countries is Visegrdsk tyka or Visegrdsk skupina (Czech); Visegrdi Egyttmkds or Visegrdi ngyek (Hungarian); Grupa Wyszehradzka (Polish); and Vyehradsk skupina or Vyehradsk tvorka (Slovak). It is also sometimes referred to as the Visegrd Triangle, since it was an alliance of three states at the beginning &ndash; the term is not valid now, but appears sometimes even after all the years since the dissolution of Czechoslovakia in 1993.The Group originated in a meeting of the heads of state or government of Czechoslovakia, Hungary and Poland held in the Hungarian castle town of Visegrd() on 15 February 1991 (not to be mistaken with Vyehrad, a castle in Prague, the capital city of the Republic, or with the town of Viegrad in and Herzegovina).The Republic and Slovakia became members after the of Czechoslovakia in 1993. All four members of the Visegrd Group became part of the Union on 1 May 2004. Historical inspiration Image:Visegrad102.jpg|thumb|right|The Royal Palace in Visegrd.The name of the Group is derived, and the place of meeting selected, from a meeting of the Bohemian, Polish and Hungarian rulers in Visegrd in 1335. I of Hungary, III of Poland and the Bohemian king, John of Luxembourg, agreed to create new commercial routes to bypass the port Vienna and obtain easier access to other European markets. A second meeting took place in 1339, where the new king of Poland was decided upon and the Visegrd Three (V3) group was formed. Economies All of the Visegrd Group have relatively developed free market economies and have enjoyed more or less steady growth since the of 1989. In 2009, Slovakia adopted the euro as official currency.The Visegrad Group is the seventh largest economy in Europe and the 13th in the world.The most developed country is the Czech Republic (USD 25,500 per capita), followed by Slovakia (USD 22,000 per capita). Hungary and Poland both have USD 19,000 per capita. The average for the entire group is USD 20,000 per capita.The largest economy is Poland (GDP total USD 727,086, or 19th in the world). Poland was one of the more advanced countries of the Eastern bloc. Now according to the UN and the Bank it is a very highly developed and high income country.(http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Human_Development_Index)(http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/High_income_economy)The largest component of its economy is the service sector 67,3% followed by industry 28,1% and agriculture at 4,6% Its main problem is an inadequate infrastructure, and economic disparities between 5 eastern regions and the rest of the country.The main industries are mining, machinery (cars, buses, ships), metallurgy, chemical, electrical, textile and food industries.High technology sector is also growing. With investors like Toshiba, Dell, GE, LG and Sharp Poland is a producer of many electronic devices and components.(http://www.ecoustics.com/electronics/products/new/277485.html) Minerals extracted include black and brown coal, copper, lead, zinc, salt, sulfur, magnesite, kaolin and small amounts of oil and natural gas. The recently made available Department of Energy report revealed that the largest reserves of gas in Europe are in Poland and it is expected that its production will play highly important role in Polish economy in the near future.(http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Shale_gas#Poland) In the sphere of agriculture, crop production is more important than livestock. Arable land accounts for nearly half the area of the country, meadows and pastures 13%, and forest 30%. Wheat, rye, barley, flax, oats, potatoes, sugar beets, canola, hops, fruit and vegetables are grown. Polands production of rye, flax, potatoes and sugar beet is the second largest in Europe (after Russia). Pigs, cattle, sheep, horses and poultry are bred. Fishing industry is also important. Wool, honey and fish products are produced.The second largest economy in the group is the Czech Republic (GDP of USD 261.294 billion total, 42nd in world ranking). Before the Second World War, the Czech Republic was one of the most advanced countries in the world. The subsequent 41 years of communist rule greatly damaged the economy. Since the fall of communism, the Czech Republic has successfully transformed itself into a market economy. Now it belongs among the 30 most developed countries (according to the World Bank). The Czech Republic is a highly industrialized country. The main problems are corruption, and inequality between regions.The main industries in the Czech Republic are chemicals, machinery, food processing and smelting. Other major industry sectors are energy, construction and consumer. Less important are the arms industry and glass, but these have a long tradition in Bohemia. Industry accounts for 35% of the Czech economy. The Czech Republic produces per capita the most cars in the world and about the same amount as in Italy. Main producers are Skoda, Peugeot-Citroen, Toyota and Hyundai.The key minerals mined are black and brown coal, clay, graphite, limestone and other building materials. Uranium deposits are found near the village of Lower. In South Moravia, oil and natural gas are extracted, but larger amounts are imported from Russia. Since one third of the country is covered with forest, wood is also an important export.Cereals (wheat, barley, maize), potatoes, sugar beets, other flax crops, and canola are grown. Hops, fruit growing and viticulture are also important. The basis of livestock is cattle, pigs and poultry, as well as beekeeping or freshwater fish (especially carp).The third economy is Hungary (total GDP of USD 185.873 billion, 52nd in the world). Hungary was one of the more developed economies of the Eastern bloc. Now it is an industrial agricultural state. The main problem is generally declining economic performance and high debt.The main industries are engineering, mechanical engineering (cars, buses), chemical, electrical, textile and food industries.Wheat, rye, barley, flax, oats, potatoes, sugar beets, canola, hops, fruit and vegetables are grown. Livestock bred include pigs, cattle, sheep, horses and poultry. Wool, honey and fish products are produced.The smallest V4 economy is Slovakia (GDP of USD 115.098 billion total, 60th in the world). Along with the Czech Republic, Slovakia was the most developed country of the Eastern Bloc. The first years after the revolution in 1989 saw stagnation. At the end of the 1990s, the economy grew and attracted much investment. Today Slovakia is an advanced industrial nation.The automotive industry is important to the Slovak economy. Cars produced are Volkswagen, Peugeot, Citroen and Kia. Another important industry is electronics. Near the city of Nitra is Sonys Japanese factory. The Korean company Samsung also has a factory in Slovakia. The metals, mining and quarrying and food-processing industries are important. Slovak industry has good prospects and is expected to grow rapidly.Slovakia has a developed agriculture. Mostly grown is corn, but also wine, especially in Bratislava and the surrounding Tokaj region. In the Tatra Mountains and other high land there is breeding of domestic animals - sheep and cattle. Peppers and potatoes are grown. Demography  ah ah ah ahThe population is 64,301,710 inhabitants, which would rank 22nd largest in the world and 4th in Europe if V4 was a single country.Most people live in Poland (38 million), followed by Czechia (nearly 11 million), Hungary (nearly 10 million) and Slovakia (5.5 million).File:Suza drotarska.jpg|right|thumb|SZA in Bratislava, seat of the International Visegrd Fund Rotating presidency The country holding the Groups presidency changes each year, in June: International Visegrd Fund thumb|Visegrd.The only institution of the Visegrd co-operation is the International Visegrad Fund, established in 1999, with its seat in Bratislava. According to a decision of the prime ministers, the Fund has an annual budget of EUR 5 million since 2007 onwards. In 11 annual deadlines the Fund awards grants, scholarships and artist residencies. Initiatives Visegrd BattlegroupOn 12 May 2011, Polish Defence Minister Bogdan Klich said that Poland will lead a new battlegroup of the Visegrad Group. The decision was made at the V4 defense ministers meeting in Levoca, Slovakia, and the battlegroup would become operational and be placed on standby in the first half of 2016. The ministers also agreed that the V4 militaries should hold regular exercises under the auspices of the NATO Response Force, with the first such exercise to be held in Poland in 2013.Visegrd Scholarship ProgramThe continually expanding Visegrd Scholarship Program awards grants from the International Visegrd Fund for students of Masters or postgraduate levels. Students from the following countries are eligible for the scholarships: the Visegrd Group countries (the Czech Republic, Hungary, Poland and Slovakia), also Albania, Belarus, Bosnia and Herzegovina, Croatia, the Republic of Macedonia, Moldova, Montenegro, Serbia, Russia and Ukraine.Expert Working Group on EnergyIn 2002, Hungary initiated establishment of an Expert Working Group on Energy. This expert group meets once or twice a year in V4 capitals on a rotation basis, and the head of the host country delegation always chairs the meeting.On 27 April 2006, the V4 WG on Energy met in Prague with the aim of discussing recommendations for V4 energy ministers concerning topics negotiated at ministerial level meetings. The WG elaborated recommendations concerning four groups of problems:* Recommendations of general nature in the sphere of policy, including energy research and development.* Recommendation to consider development of emergency gas storage.* Recommendation to consider construction of new gas and oil pipelines and of new naval LNG terminals.* Recommendations in the field of interconnecting transmission grids.See also* SixReferencesExternal links* Official portal of the Visegrd Group* International Visegrd Fund official homepage* The Visegrad Review - Interdisciplinary Journal* Cooperation of Visegrd Four Member Countries (V-4) in energy* Visegrd Summer School in Villa Decius, Krakow, Polandlist skupinade:Visegrd-GruppegruppVisegrdgrupode VisegrdVisegrdVisegrddi VisegrdVisegrdlb:Visegrd-GruppEgyttmkdsnl:Visegrdgroepja:no:VisegrdgruppenWyszehradzkade Visegrdde la VisegrdGroupskupinaskupinafi:Visegrd-ryhmsv:Visegradgruppenzh:
33112
World_War_I_reparations
300px|altA train taking with a load of machinery|thumb|right|Delivery of reparations (1920)World War I reparations refers to the payments and transfers of property and equipment that Germany was forced to make under the of Versailles (1919) following its defeat during War I. Article 231 of the Treaty (the war guilt clause) declared Germany and its allies responsible for all loss and damage suffered by the Allies during the war and provided the basis for reparations.In January 1921, the total sum due was decided by an Reparations Commission and was set at 269 billion gold marks (the equivalent of around 100,000 tonnes of pure gold), about 13 billion or US$64 billion(Historical conversions between currencies are based on the nominal standards of each currency: one gold mark   kg pure gold; one sterling  113 grains pure gold; one U.S. dollar   grains gold at  fineness ( 23.22 grains pure gold).) ($ {{formatnum:|-| Plan 1929      | aligncenter | 112     | aligncenter | 26.6    | aligncenter |   {{formatnum:|}There was extensive debate about the justice and likely impact of the reparations demands both before and after the publication and signing of the Treaty of Versailles and other Treaties in 1919. Most famously, the principal representative of the British Treasury at the Paris Peace Conference, Maynard Keynes, resigned from the Treasury in June 1919 in protest at the scale of the reparations demands, and subsequently protested publicly in the best-selling The Economic Consequences of the Peace (1919).()The 1924 Plan modified Germanys reparation payments. The Americans D. Young and Parker Gilbert were appointed to implement this plan. In May 1929, the Plan reduced further payments to 112 billion Gold Marks, US$26.6 billion over a period of 59 years (1988). In addition, the Young Plan divided the annual payment, set at two billion Gold Marks, US$473 million, into two components, one unconditional part equal to one third of the sum and a postponable part for the remaining two-thirds.However, the Street Crash of 1929 and the onset of the Depression resulted in calls for a moratorium. On June 20, 1931, realizing that Austria and Germany were on the brink of financial collapse, U.S. President Hoover proposed a one-year world moratorium on reparations and inter-governmental debt payments. Britain quickly accepted this proposal, but it met with stiff resistance and seventeen days of delay by Premier Tardieu of France.(Sherwood Eddy to Secretary Stimson: Berlin, September 1, 1931., GK 862.00/2616, MS, Department of State.)) During this delay the situation in Germany as well as renewed fears of hyperinflation had resulted in a countrywide run, draining some $300,000,000. As a result, all German banks had to close temporarily.The worsening economic distress within Germany resulted in the Lausanne Conference, which voted to cancel reparations. By this time Germany had paid one eighth of the sum required under the Treaty of Versailles. However, the Lausanne agreement was contingent upon the United States agreeing to also defer payment of the war debt owed them by the Western European governments. The plan ultimately failed not because of the Congress refusal to go along but because it became irrelevant upon Hitlers rise to power and his refusal to pay any reparations.  The Germans had paid a total of 20 billion marks and historian Kitchen argues that the impression the country was crippled by the reparations was a myth.()  Kitchen argues that, instead of a weak Germany, the reverse was true; that Germany was strong enough to win substantial concessions and a reduced reparation amount.(As viewed within GermanyIn the German public, there was little acceptance that the German army had been defeated in war. The German High Command, which could claim that the army had not been defeated in the field, evaded responsibility for the defeat, and blame was attributed by many to civilian elements, particularly Socialists, Communists, and Jews. This became known as the Dolchstolegende (myth).()  There was also little acceptance of German responsibility for the war and little sense that Germany had done anything wrong. Accordingly, there was growing resentment at the reparations, which were perceived as harsh, partly because of deliberate misrepresentation by German leaders.()Impact on the German economyThe economic problems that the payments brought, and German resentment at their imposition are usually cited as one of the more significant factors that led to the end of the Republic and the beginning of the dictatorship of Hitler. The British economist Maynard Keynes in his best-selling 1919 book Economic Consequences of the Peace argued that reparations threatened to destabilize the German economy, and hence German politics. The majority of historians, such as the Canadian historian MacMillan in her 2001 book The Paris Peace Conference of 1919 and Its Attempt to End War, have since disagreed with this assertion. The French economist Mantoux in his 1946 book The Carthaginian Peace, or the Economic Consequences of Mr. Keynes established that Germany could have paid all of the reparations had they wanted to, and that the problem was not the Germans were unable to pay, but rather that they were unwilling to pay.()  The American historian Sally Marks commented that Keynes had fallen in love with Melchior, a member of the German delegation, and that views on reparations ...were shaped by his passion for Carl Melchior, the German financier and reparations expert whom he met during negotiations at Spa shortly after the armistice.()In opposition to Keynes, Mantoux held that justice demanded that Germany should pay for the whole damage caused by the war, and he set out to prove that many of Keynes forecasts were not verified by subsequent events. For example, Keynes believed European output in iron would decrease, but by 1929 iron output in Europe was up 10% from the 1913 figure. Keynes predicted that German iron and steel output would decrease, but by 1927 steel output increased by 30% and iron output increased by 38% from 1913 (within the pre-war borders). Keynes also argued that German coal mining efficiency would decrease but labour efficiency by 1929 had increased on the 1913 figure by 30%. Keynes contended that Germany would be unable to export coal immediately after the Treaty but German net coal exports were 15 million tons within a year and by 1926 the tonnage exported reached 35 million. He also put forward the claim that German national savings in the years after the Treaty would be less than 2 billion marks; however, in 1925 the German national savings figure was estimated at 6.4 billion marks and in 1927, 7.6 billion marks. Keynes also believed that Germany would be unable to pay the more than 2 billion marks in reparations for the next 30 years, but Mantoux contends that German rearmament spending was seven times as much as that figure in each year between 1933 and 1939Economists such as Keynes assert that payment of the reparations would have been economically impossible. However, according to the American historian William R. Keylor in his essay Versailles and International Diplomacy from the book The Treaty of Versailles: A Reassessment after 75 Years, An increase in taxation and reduction in consumption in the Weimar Republic would have yielded the requisite export surplus to generate the foreign exchange needed to service the reparation debt.() However this export surplus and the resulting export deficit for those collecting reparations could have created a politically difficult situation. Indeed, this was one of the causes of the General Strike of 1926.The American historian Sally Marks commented the figure of 132 billion marks of reparations imposed by the London Conference of May 1921 was a highly misleading one() Reparations were divided into A, B, and C bonds( The bulk of the reparations were assigned to the C bonds, which were as Marks called chimerical as the Allies did not intend to collect the C bonds, which only existed to give the impression to French public opinion that substantial sums were going to be collected( The Allies intended to collect only the A and B bonds, which totaled 50 billion marks, which was an amount that was slightly smaller than the 51 billion marks that the Germans had offered to pay( Marks noted that as long as the French occupied the Dsseldorf area in 1921 as an incentive to pay, the Germans paid all of their reparations in full and on time, and it was only after the French pulled out of Dsseldorf in 1922, that the Germans started to default on a regular basis.()  By late 1922, the German defaults on payments had grown so serious and regular that a crisis engulfed the Reparations Commission as the French and Belgian delegates urging the seizure of the Ruhr as an way of encouraging the Germans to make more effort to pay, and the British delegate urging a lowering of the payments.()  As a consequence of an enormous German default on timber deliveries in December 1922, the Reparations Commission declared Germany in default, which led to the of the Ruhr in January 1923.()  Particularly galling to the French was that the timber quota which the Germans had defaulted was based on a German assessment of their capacity to deliver and then had subsequently been lowered from below the German assessment.() There was little doubt among the Allies that the government of Chancellor Cuno had defaulted on the timber deliveries deliberately as a provocation intended to test the willingness of the Allies to enforce reparations if the Germans should chose not to pay.( Providing more fuel for the fire was a German default on coal deliveries in early January 1923, which was the thirty-fourth coal default in the last thirty-six months.() The French Premier Poincar was deeply reluctant to order the Ruhr occupation, and had only taken this step after the British had rejected his proposals for more moderate sanctions against Germany.()  Frustrated at Germanys unwillingness to pay reparations, Poincar hoped for joint Anglo-French economic sanctions against Germany in 1922 and opposed military action. However by December 1922 he was faced with Anglo-American-German hostility and saw coal for French steel production and money for reconstructing the devastated industrial areas draining away. Poincar was exasperated with British failure to act, and wrote to the French ambassador in London:Judging others by themselves, the English, who are blinded by their loyalty, have always thought that the Germans did not abide by their pledges inscribed in the Versailles Treaty because they had not frankly agreed to them. ... We, on the contrary, believe that if Germany, far from making the slightest effort to carry out the treaty of peace, has always tried to escape her obligations, it is because until now she has not been convinced of her defeat. ... We are also certain that Germany, as a nation, resigns herself to keep her pledged word only under the impact of necessity.()Poincar decided to occupy the Ruhr in 11 January 1923 to extract the reparations himself. This was profitable and caused neither the German hyperinflation, which began in 1922 and ballooned because of German responses to the Ruhr occupation, nor the francs 1924 collapse, which arose from French financial practices and the evaporation of reparations.()  The profits, after Ruhr-Rhineland occupation costs, were nearly 900 million gold marks.() The real issue during the Ruhrkampf (Ruhr struggle) in 1923 as the Germans labeled the battle against the French occupation was not the German defaults on coal and timber deliveries, but the sanctity of the Versailles treaty()  Poincar often argued to the British that if the Germans could get away with defying Versailles in regards to the reparations, then a precedent would be created , and inevitably the Germans would proceed to dismantle the rest of the Versailles treaty.()  Finally, Poincar argued that once the chains that had bound Germany in Versailles had been destroyed, then it was inevitable that Germany would once more plunge the world back into another world war.(In order to pay for the passive resistance in the Ruhr, the German government began the hyper-inflation that destroyed the German economy in 1923.( In 2008, the British historian J. Evans argued that Keynes was simply wrong about reparations being unpayable, and instead contended that the responsibility for the great inflation of 1923 lay with the German government who preferred hyper-inflation to paying reparations() Although the French did succeed in making their occupation of the Ruhr pay, the Germans through their passive resistance in the Ruhr and the Hyperinflation which wrecked their economy, won the worlds sympathy, and under heavy Anglo-American financial pressure (the simultaneous decline in the value of the franc made the French very open to pressure from Wall Street and the City), the French were forced to agree to the Plan of April 1924, which substantially lowered German reparations payments.()  Under the Dawes Plan, Germany paid only 1 billion marks in 1924, and then increasing large sums for the next three years, until the total was to rise to 2 and quarter billion by 1927.()  After 1927, Germany was to make an annual payment of 2 and half billion marks.( Even under the reduced payments under the Dawes Plan, Germany continued to default in reparations payments.()  To deal with the implementation of the Dawes Plan, a conference took place in London in JulyAugust 1924.()  The British Prime Minister J. Ramsay MacDonald, who accepted Keyness view of reparations as impossible to pay successfully pressured the French Premier Herriot into a whole series of concessions to Germany.( A British onlooker, the diplomat Sir Phipps commented that The London Conference was for the French man in the street one long Calvaryas he saw M. Herriot abandoning one by one the cherished possessions of French preponderance on the Reparations Commission, the right of sanctions in the event of German default, the economic occupation of the Ruhr, the French-Belgian railroad Rgie, and finally, the military occupation of the Ruhr within a year.(  The Dawes Plan was a momentous moment in European history as it marked the first time that Germany had succeeded in defying Versailles, and revised an aspect of the treaty in its favour. The London conference was the first major triumph of British Appeasement.Following German complaints that reparations payments under the Dawes Plan were too high, the Plan of 1928, under which the Germans were to pay annuities of various amounts, but none to be higher than two and a quarter billion until 1988.()  Under the Young Plan, transfer protection was reduced while the Reparations Commission was abolished.(  The commission was replaced by the for International Settlements.()  The task of executing the Young Plan was assigned to an international conference in the Hague which took place in August 1929.()  During the conference, the German Foreign Minister Stresemann demanded that an unconditional Rhineland evacuation five years ahead of schedule as the German condition for accepting the Young Plan.( In this, Stresemann was strongly supported by the British, and as an result of strong Anglo-German pressure, the French agreed to evacuate the Rhineland in June 1930, five years ahead of schedule as the price of reducing German reparations.()  Labour had been returned to power in the 1929 elections, and as a result, MacDonald returned to his policy of 1924 of pressuring France into concessions to Germany with little regard for French concerns.( Although the Young Plan did not come into effect until January 1930 owning largely to difficulties over the Rhineland evacuation, it was made retroactive to September 1, 1929 the date it was scheduled to come into effect, and as a result the Germans paid less than half of what they would have under the Dawes Plan from September 1929.( Despite these concessions to Germany, a referendum was called in that country in December 1929 in an attempt to pass the so-called Liberty Law, which would had cancelled the Young Plan and tried those German politicians who accepted the plan for high treason.(Starting in September 1930, the German Chancellor Brning claimed that the reparations payments under the Young Plan were too high, and demanded the total and unconditional cancellation of reparations.() Though Brning claimed that Germany could not pay reparations because of the Depression, his real reason was to seek a foreign policy success that might bolster his highly unpopular government. At the same time, Brning started to demand gleichberechtigung (equality of status), that is doing away with Part V of Versailles, which had disarmed Germany. Brning never explained why Germany was so impoverished by the Depression that she could not afford to pay reparations, even under the reduced rate of the Young Plan while at the same time stating that Germany could afford tanks, air force, heavy artillery, conscription, submarines, and the rest of weapons forbidden by Part V.Marks has argued that the Germans could have easily paid the 50 billion marks in reparations, but instead chose to repeatedly default on reparations payments as part of a political strategy of undermining Versailles.() Marks also points out that Article 231 of the Versailles treaty, the so-called war guilt clause says no such thing, and all that the clause does say is the responsibility of Germany and her Allies for causing all the loss and damage to which the Allied and Associated Governments and their nationals have been subjected as a consequence of the war imposed upon them by the aggression of Germany and her allies () The claim that Article 231 implies war guilt was the work of various German politicians and apologists who misinterpreted Article 231 as saying that as a way of gaining international sympathy.() Moreover, Marks points out that the next article, Article 232 of the Versailles treaty limits German responsibility to pay only for civilian damages, and that when a conference was called in London in 1921 to determine how much Germany should pay, the Allies calculated on the basis of Germany could pay, not on their needs.(It has been argued by some that it is a fallacy to consider the reparations as the primary source of the economic condition in Germany from 1919 to 1939. This perspective argues that Germany paid a small portion of the reparations and the hyper-inflation of the early 1920s was a result of the political and economic instability of the Weimar Republic. In fact, the of the Ruhr by the French (which began when Germany failed to supply a required delivery of telegraph poles) did more damage to the economy than the reparations payments. Another fallacy is that these reparations were the single cause of the economic condition that saw Hitlers rise to power. Germany was in fact doing remarkably well after its hyper-inflation of 1923, and was once more one of the worlds largest economies.The economy continued to perform reasonably well until the foreign investments funding the economy, and the loans funding reparations payments, were suddenly withdrawn with the Stock Market Crash of 1929. This collapse was magnified by the volume of loans provided to German companies by US lenders. Even the reduced payments of the Dawes plan were primarily financed through a large volume of international loans. From 1924 onward German officials were virtually flooded with loan offers by foreigners. ()  When these debts suddenly came due it was as if years of reparations payments were compressed into a few short weeks.Also of note are the ideas of the British historian J. P. Taylor from his 1961 book The Origins of the Second World War, in which he claims that the settlement had been too indecisive: it was harsh enough to be seen as punitive, without being crippling enough to prevent Germany regaining its big power status, and can thus be blamed for the rise of the Reich under Hitler within decades.()The British economic historian Ferguson in his 1998 book The Pity of War argued that Germany could have paid reparations had there been the political will. Ferguson began his argument by noting that all of the belligerent countries in World War I had endured significant economic losses, not just Germany, and that in 192021, German net national product grew at 17%.()  Ferguson has argued that the German trade deficit of 1920 was caused by speculation promoted in turn by the amalgamation of rapid economic growth in Germany and a weak exchange rate for the mark, and not by the prospect of reparations.() Ferguson has contended that the rise in the value of the mark after March 1920 was caused by speculators buying up the mark, and this revaluation of the mark led to inflation becoming a serious problem in Germany from 1921 onwards( Ferguson has maintained that the ratio of total German debts in 1921 to the gross national product was less than the ratio of total British debts to the British G.N.P in the same period.() Likewise, Ferguson has argued that the total annuity of 3 billion marks imposed by the London conference in 1921, which totalled 47% of German national income was far less than the worries expressed by Keynes of 2550% of German national income being handled over in reparations.( Similarly, Ferguson has argued that France paid 4,933 million francs in reparations to Germany between 1871 and 1873 totalling 25% of French national net income without causing national bankruptcy, and has argued that German claims in the 1920s that reparations payments threatened Germany with bankruptcy were just an excuse to try to get out of paying reparations.() Ferguson has argued that the plan called by the Young Committee in 1929 for Germany to pay reparations until 1988 is a far less than the 163 billion marks paid by Germany to the Economic European Community between 1958 and 1998 without experiencing a drastic collapse in living standards, and as such, the Plan was not the economically unviable plan as often depicted.( The American historian Stephen Schuker has argued that the Germans received in much in American loans which they never repaid as Germany paid in reparations.() Schuker has noted that between 1921 and 1931, Germany paid 19.1 billion marks in reparations, and in the same time, took in 27 billion marks in loans from the United States, which Germany defaulted on in 1932.( Ferguson has argued the principle problem with reparations was not that the sum, but rather that the Allies entrusted the Germans with responsibility for paying reparations voluntarily without occupying significant amounts of German territory as an initiative to pay.() Since German politicians were reluctant to raise the necessary taxes to pay for reparations, successive German governments chose to default on reparations out the hope that the Allies were not serious about collecting reparations.() Even without reparations, total public spending in Germany between 1920 and 1923 comprised 33% of German net national product, and Ferguson has argued that even if no reparations had been imposed, Germany would still had significant problems caused by the need to pay World War I debts combined with the demands of voters for more social services.() As a result of inflation, German debts by 1922 were reduced down to where they had been in 1914.() Ferguson has argued that German inflation in the 1920s was not caused by reparations, but rather were a conscious political decision on the part of the German government to employ this particular economic strategy to deal with World War I debts and reparations.()Under the Moratorium of June 1931 issued by the American president Hoover, which was designed to deal with the world-wide financial crisis caused by the bankruptcy of the Creditanstalt in May 1931, Germany ceased paying reparations.() At the Lausanne Conference of June 1932, reparations were formally cancelled.() Marks calculates that between 1921 and 1931, Germany paid a total of 20 billion marks in reparations, most of which came from American loans that the Germans repudiated in 1932.() In this way, the Germans largely escaped paying for World War I, and instead shifted the costs onto American investors.( The American historian Weinberg commented about the way the Germans used reparations to avoid paying the costs of World War I that The shifting of the burden of reparations from her shoulders to those of her enemies served to accentuate this disparity in the economic strength of the Allies, which struggled to pay their heavy World War I debts and the other costs of the war and Germany, which paid neither reparations nor its World War I debts.(Reasons for the size of the reparations demandsIn many ways, the Versailles reparations were a reply to the reparations placed upon France by Germany through the 1871 Treaty of Frankfurt, signed after the War. Indemnities of the Treaty of Frankfurt were in turn calculated, on the basis of population, as the precise equivalent of the indemnities demanded by Napoleon after the defeat of Prussia.Infrastructure damage caused by the retreating German troops was also cited. In her book, Peacemakers: The Paris Peace Conference of 1919 and Its Attempt to End War, MacMillan described the significance of the claims for French and Belgium: From the start, France and Belgium argued that claims for direct damage should receive priority in any distribution of reparations. In the heavily industrialized north of France, the Germans had shipped out what they wanted for their own use and destroyed much of the rest. Even as German forces were retreating in 1918, they found time to blow up Frances most important mine.()  Belgium, however, received none of the financial reparations promised under the treaty, as France and Britain failed to redistribute any of the payments they received.Current statusAfter Germanys defeat in World War II, payment of the reparations was not resumed. There was, however, outstanding German debt that the Weimar Republic had used to pay the reparations. An international conference decided (on German External Debts, 1953) that Germany would pay some parts of the remaining debt only after the country was reunified, at that time an event thought very unlikely to happen. Germany paid off the remainder by 1980. According to the agreement, the debt would be serviced for 20 years, leading to the last payments being due on 3 October 2010, the 20th anniversary of reunification. About 10% of this debt, about 20 million euro, has not been claimed yet.()See also* reparations for World War IIFootnotesReferences;Notes;References* - Total pages: 862 * - Total pages: 623 * - Total pages: 606 * - Total pages: 688 * - Total pages: 456 * - Total pages: 688 * - Total pages: 574 ** - Total pages: 688 * - Total pages: 278 * - Total pages: 294 * - Total pages: 445 * - Total pages: 357 * - Total pages: 316 See also* Plan* Plan* of the Ruhr* of World War I* on German External Debts  Reparationen nach dem Ersten Weltkrieg  herstelbetalingen na de Eerste Wereldoorlogetter frste verdenskrigWar I reparationsth:
33498
Wire
thumb|Wires overheadA wire is a single, usually cylindrical, flexible strand or rod of metal. Wires are used to bear mechanical loads and to carry electricity and telecommunications signals. Wire is commonly formed by drawing the metal through a hole in a die or plate. Standard sizes are determined by various gauges. The term wire is also used more loosely to refer to a bundle of such strands, as in multistranded wire, which is more correctly termed a rope in mechanics, or a cable in electricity.Although usually circular in cross-section, wire is also made in square or flattened rectangular cross-section, either for decorative purposes, or for technical purposes such as high-efficiency coils in loudspeakers. Edge-wound()  springs, such as the Slinky toy, are made of special flattened wire.HistoryImage:IMG 4417.JPG|thumb|wrapped jewelryIn antiquity, jewelry often contains, in the form of chains and applied decoration, large amounts of wire that is accurately made and which must have been produced by some efficient, if not technically advanced, means. In some cases, strips cut from metal sheet were made into wire by pulling them through perforations in stone beads. This causes the strips to fold round on themselves to form thin tubes. This strip drawing technique was in use in Egypt by the Dynasty.  From the middle of the millennium BC most of the gold wires in jewellery are characterised by seam lines that follow a spiral path along the wire.  Such twisted strips can be converted into solid round wires by rolling them between flat surfaces or the strip wire drawing method. The strip twist wire manufacturing method was superseded by drawing in the ancient Old World sometime between about the 8th and 10th centuries AD.(Jack Ogden, Classical Gold wire: Some Aspects of its Manufacture and Use, Jewellery Studies, 5, 1991, pp. 95105.) There is some evidence for the use of drawing further East prior to this period.(Jack Ogden, Connections between Islam, Europe, and the Far East in the Medieval Period: The Evidence of the Jewelry Technology. Eds P. Jett, J Douglas, B. McCarthy,  J Winter. Scientific Research in the Field of Asian Art. Fiftieth-Anniversary Symposium Proceedings. Archetype Publications, London in association with the Freer Gallery of Art, Smithsonian Institution, 2003.)Square and hexagonal wires were possibly made using a swaging technique. In this method a metal rod was struck between grooved metal blocks, or between a grooved punch and a grooved metal anvil. Swaging is of great antiquity, possibly dating to the beginning of the 2nd millennium BC in Egypt and in the Bronze and Ages in Europe for torches and fibulae.Twisted square section wires are a very common filigree decoration in early Etruscan jewellery.In about the middle of the 2nd millennium BC a new category of decorative tube was introduced which imitated a line of granules. True beaded wire, produced by mechanically distorting a round-section wire, appeared in the Eastern Mediterranean and Italy in the seventh century BC, perhaps disseminated by the Phoenicians. Beaded wire continued to be used in jewellery into modern times, although it largely fell out of favour in about the tenth century AD when two drawn round wires, twisted together to form what are termed ropes, provided a simpler-to-make alternative. A forerunner to beaded wire may be the notched strips and wires which first occur from around 2000 BC in Anatolia.Wire was drawn in England from the medieval period. The wire was used to make wool cards and pins, manufactured goods whose import was prohibited by IV in 1463.(H. R. Schubert, The wiredrawers of Bristol Journal Iron & Steel Institute 159 (1948), 16-22.) The first wire mill in Great Britain was established at Tintern in about 1568 by the founders of the of Mineral and Battery Works, who had a monopoly on this.(M. B. Donald, Elizabethan Monopolies: Company of Mineral and Battery Works (Olver & Boyd, Edinburgh 1961), 95-141.) Apart from their second wire mill at nearby Whitebrook,(D. G. Tucker, The seventeenth century wireworks at Whitebrook, Monmouthshire Bull. Hist. Metall. Gp 7(1) (1973), 28-35.) there were no other wire mills before the second half of the 17th century. Despite the existence of mills, the drawing of wire down to fine sizes continued to be done manually.Wire is usually drawn of cylindrical form; but it may be made of any desired section by varying the outline of the holes in the draw-plate through which it is passed in the process of manufacture. The draw-plate or die is a piece of hard cast-iron or hard steel, or for fine work it may be a diamond or a ruby. The object of utilising precious stones is to enable the dies to be used for a considerable period without losing their size, and so producing wire of incorrect diameter. Diamond dies must be rebored when they have lost their original diameter of hole, but the metal dies are brought down to size again by hammering up the hole and then drifting it out to correct diameter with a punch.UsesWire has many uses. It forms the raw material of many important manufacturers, such as the wire-net industry, wire-cloth making and wire-rope spinning, in which it occupies a place analogous to a textile fiber. Wire-cloth of all degrees of strength and fineness of mesh is used for sifting and screening machinery, for draining paper pulp, for window screens, and for many other purposes. Vast quantities of aluminium, copper, nickel and steel wire are employed for telephone and data wires and cables, and as conductors in power transmission, and heating. It is in no less demand for fencing, and much is consumed in the construction of suspension bridges, and cages, etc. In the manufacture of stringed musical instruments and scientific instruments wire is again largely used. Among its other sources of consumption it is sufficient to mention pin and hair-pin making, the needle and fish-hook industries, nail, peg and rivet making, and carding machinery; indeed there are few industries into which it does not enter.Not all metals and metallic alloys possess the physical properties necessary to make useful wire.  The metals must in the first place be ductile and strong in tension, the quality on which the utility of wire principally depends. The metals suitable for wire, possessing almost equal ductility, are platinum, silver, iron, copper, aluminium and gold; and it is only from these and certain of their alloys with other metals, principally brass and bronze, that wire is prepared. By careful treatment extremely thin wire can be produced. Special purpose wire is however made from other metals (e.g. tungsten wire for bulb and tube filaments, because of its high melting temperature). Copper wires are also plated with other metals, such as tin, nickel, and silver to handle different temperatures, provide lubrication, provide easier stripping of rubber from copper.Productionthumb|Wire mill (1913)Wire is often reduced to the desired diameter and properties by repeated drawing through progressively smaller dies, or traditionally holes in plates. After a number of passes the wire may be annealed to facilitate more drawing or, if it is a finished product, to maximise ductility and conductivity.Finishing, jacketing, and insulatingElectrical wires are usually covered with insulating materials, such as plastic, rubber-like polymers, or varnish. Insulating and jacketing of wires and cables is nowadays done by passing them through an extruder. Formerly, materials used for insulation included treated cloth or paper and various oil-based products. Since the mid-1960s, plastic and polymers exhibiting properties similar to rubber have predominated.Two or more wires may be wrapped concentrically, separated by insulation, to form cable. The wire or cable may be further protected with substances like paraffin, some kind of preservative compound, bitumen, lead, aluminum sheathing, or steel taping. Stranding or covering machines wind material onto wire which passes through quickly. Some of the smallest machines for cotton covering have a large drum, which grips the wire and moves it through toothed gears; the wire passes through the centre of disks mounted above a long bed, and the disks carry each a number of bobbins varying from six to twelve or more in different machines. A supply of covering material is wound on each bobbin, and the end is led on to the wire, which occupies a central position relatively to the bobbins; the latter being revolved at a suitable speed bodily with their disks, the cotton is consequently served on to the wire, winding in spiral fashion so as to overlap. If a large number of strands are required the disks are duplicated, so that as many as sixty spools may be carried, the second set of strands being laid over the first.Image:RG-59.jpg|thumb|cable, one example of a jacketed and insulated wire.For heavier cables that are used for light and power as well as submarine cables, the machines are somewhat different in construction. The wire is still carried through a hollow shaft, but the bobbins or spools of covering material are set with their spindles at right angles to the axis of the wire, and they lie in a circular cage which rotates on rollers below. The various strands coming from the spools at various parts of the circumference of the cage all lead to a disk at the end of the hollow shaft. This disk has perforations through which each of the strands pass, thence being immediately wrapped on the cable, which slides through a bearing at this point. Toothed gears having certain definite ratios are used to cause the winding drum for the cable and the cage for the spools to rotate at suitable relative speeds which do not vary. The cages are multiplied for stranding with a large number of tapes or strands, so that a machine may have six bobbins on one cage and twelve on the other. Solid versus stranded Image:Stranded lamp wire.jpg|thumb|Stranded copper wireSolid wire, also called solid-core or single-strand wire, consists of one piece of metal wire. Stranded wire is composed of a bundle wires to make a larger conductor.Stranded wire is more flexible than solid wire of the same total cross-sectional area. Solid wire is  cheaper to manufacture than stranded wire and is used where there is little need for flexibility in the wire.  Solid wire also provides mechanical ruggedness; and, because it has relatively less surface area which is exposed to attack by corrosives, protection against the environment. Stranded wire is used when higher resistance to fatigue is required. Such situations includeconnections between circuit boards inmulti-printed-circuit-board devices, where the rigidity of solidwire would produce too much stress as a result of movement duringassembly or servicing; A.C. line cords forappliances; musical instrument cables; computer mouse cables; welding electrode cables; control cables connecting moving machine parts; mining machine cables; trailing machine cables; and numerous others.At high frequencies, current travels near the surface of the wire because of the effect, resulting in increased power loss in the wire. Stranded wire might seem to reduce this effect, since the total surface area of the strands is greater than the surface area of the equivalent solid wire, but ordinary stranded wire does not reduce the skin effect because all the strands are short-circuited together and behave as a single conductor.  A stranded wire will have higher resistance than a solid wire of the same diameter because the cross-section of the stranded wire is not all copper, there are unavoidable gaps between the strands (this is the packing problem for circles within a circle).  A stranded wire with the same cross-section of conductor as a solid wire is said to have the same equivalent gauge and is always a larger diameter.However, for many high-frequency applications, proximity effect is more severe than skin effect, and in some limited cases, simple stranded wire can reduce proximity effect.  For better performance at high frequencies, wire, which has the individual strands insulated and twisted in special patterns, may be used. Number of strands The more individual wire strands in a wire bundle, the more flexible, kink-resistant, break-resistant, and stronger the wire is. But more strands cost more.The lowest number of strands is 7: one in the middle, 6 surrounding it.The next level up is 19, which is another layer of 12 strands on top of the 7. After that the number varies, but 37 and 49 are common, then in the 70 to 100 range (the number is no longer exact). Even larger numbers than that are typically found only in very large wires.For application where the wire moves, 19 is the lowest that should be used (7 should only be used in applications where the wire is placed and then does not move), and 49 is much better. For applications with constant repeated movement, such as assembly robots, and headphone wires, 70 to 100 is mandatory.For applications that need even more flexibility (welding is the usual example, but also any need to move wire in tight areas), even more strands are used. One example is a 2/0 wire made from 5,292 strands of #36 gauge wire. The strands are organized by first creating a bundle of 7 strands. Then 7 of these bundles are put together into super bundles. Finally 108 super bundles are used to make the final cable. Each group of wires is wound in a helix so that when the wire is flexed, the part of a bundle that is stretched moves around the helix to a part that is compressed to allow the wire to have less stress.Varieties* Hook-up wire is small-to-medium gauge, solid or stranded, insulated wire, used for making internal connections inside electrical or electronic devices. It is often tin-plated to facilitate soldering.* Magnet wire is solid wire, usually copper, which, to allow closer winding when making electromagnetic coils, is insulated only with varnish, rather than the thicker plastic or other insulation commonly used on electrical wire. It is used for the winding of motors, transformers, inductors, generators, speaker coils, etc.* wire is wire with higher than normal resistivity, often used for elements or for making wire-wound resistors. Nichrome wire is the most common type.See also*For transmission see: cable, voltage cable and HVDC*wire*Cable*wire* connector*wiring*wire*wire*THHN*wire*gauge*netting*rope*wrapped jewelry*wireReferences*External links* Wire Gauge to DiameterDiameter to Wire Gauge Converter - Online calculator converts gauge to diameter or diameter to gauge for any wire size.ar:br:Orjalca:Filferrocs:Drtde:Drahtes:Alambreeo:Drato()hr:icaid:Kawatit:Filoht:Fillt:Vielanl:IJzerdraadja:pl:Drutpt:Fioru:simple:Wiresk:Drtfi:Shkjohtota:uk:yi:
34053
Water_turbine
File:Water turbine (en).svg|thumb|260px|turbine and generator cut-away view. A water turbine is a engine that takes energy from moving water.Water turbines were developed in the 19th century and were widely used for industrial power prior to grids.  Now they are mostly used for power generation.  They harness a clean and energy source.Historywheels have been used for thousands of years for industrial power.  Their main shortcoming is size, which limits the flow rate and head that can be harnessed.The migration from water wheels to modern turbines took about one  hundred years. Development occurred during the revolution, using scientific principles and methods.  They also made extensive use of new materials and manufacturing methods developed at the time. Swirl The word turbine was introduced by the French engineer Bourdin in the early 19th century  and is derived from the Latin word for whirling or a vortex. The main difference between early water turbines and water wheels is a swirl component of the water which passes energy to a spinning rotor. This additional component of motion allowed the turbine to be smaller than a water wheel of the same power. They could process more water by spinning faster and could harness much greater heads. (Later, impulse turbines were developed which didnt use swirl). Time line File:Roman mill at Chemtou.jpg|thumb|Roman turbine mill at Chemtou, Tunisia. The tangential water inflow of the millrace made the submerged horizontal wheel in the shaft turn like a true turbine.(File:Water turbine grandcoulee.jpg|thumb|A turbine runner, rated at nearly one million hp (750 MW), being installed at the Coulee Dam, United States.The earliest known water turbines date to the Empire. Two helix-turbine mill sites of almost identical design were found at Chemtou and Testour, modern-day Tunisia, dating to the late 3rd or early 4th century AD. The horizontal water wheel with angled blades was installed at the bottom of a water-filled, circular shaft. The water from the mill-race entered tangentially the pit, creating a swirling water column which made the fully submerged wheel act like a true turbine.(; ; )Andrej Segner developed a reactive water turbine in the mid-18th century.  It had a horizontal axis and was a precursor to modern water turbines. It is a very simple machine that is still produced today for use in small hydro sites. Segner worked with Euler on some of the early mathematical theories of turbine design.In 1820, Poncelet developed an inward-flow turbine.In 1826, Fourneyron developed an outward-flow turbine. This was an efficient machine (~80%) that sent water through a runner with blades curved in one dimension. The stationary outlet also had curved guides.In 1844, A. Boyden developed an outward flow turbine that improved on the performance of the Fourneyron turbine. Its runner shape was similar to that of a turbine.In 1849, B. Francis improved the inward flow reaction turbine to over 90% efficiency. He also conducted sophisticated tests and developed engineering methods for water turbine design.  The turbine, named for him, is the first modern water turbine.  It is still the most widely used water turbine in the world today. The Francis turbine is also called a radial flow turbine, since water flows from  the outer circumference towards the centre of runner.Inward flow water turbines have a better mechanical arrangement and all modern reaction water turbines are of this design. As the water swirls inward, it accelerates, and transfers energy to the runner. Water pressure decreases to atmospheric, or in some cases subatmospheric, as the water passes through the turbine blades and loses energy.Around 1890, the modern bearing was invented, now universally used to support heavy water turbine spindles.  As of 2002, fluid bearings appear to have a time between failures of more than 1300 years.Around 1913, Kaplan created the turbine, a propeller-type machine. It was an evolution of the Francis turbine but revolutionized the ability to develop low-head hydro sites. A new concept All common water machines until the late 19th century (including water wheels) were basically reaction machines; water pressure head acted on the machine and produced work.  A reaction turbine needs to fully contain the water during energy transfer.In 1866, California millwright Samuel Knight invented a machine that took the impulse system to a new level.(W. A. Doble, The Tangential Water Wheel, Transactions of the American Institute of Mining Engineers, Vol. XXIX, 1899.)(W. F. Durrand, The Pelton Water Wheel, Stanford University, Mechanical Engineering, 1939.) Inspired by the high pressure jet systems used in hydraulic mining in the gold fields, Knight developed a bucketed wheel which captured the energy of a free jet, which had converted a high head (hundreds of vertical feet in a pipe or penstock) of water to kinetic energy. This is called an impulse or tangential turbine. The waters velocity, roughly twice the velocity of the bucket periphery, does a u-turn in the bucket and drops out of the runner at low velocity.In 1879, Lester Pelton (1829-1908), experimenting with a Knight Wheel, developed a double bucket design, which exhausted the water to the side, eliminating some energy loss of the Knight wheel which exhausted some water back against the center of the wheel. In about 1895, William Doble improved on Peltons half-cylindrical bucket form with an elliptical bucket that included  a cut in it to allow the jet a cleaner bucket entry. This is the modern form of the Pelton turbine which today achieves up to 92% efficiency. Pelton had been quite an effective promoter of his design and although Doble took over the Pelton company he did not change the name to Doble because it had brand name recognition.Turgo and Crossflow turbines were later impulse designs. Theory of operation Flowing water is directed on to the blades of a turbine runner, creating a force on the blades. Since the runner is spinning, the force acts through a distance (force acting through a distance is the definition of  work). In this way, energy is transferred from the water flow to the turbineWater turbines are divided into two groups; reaction turbines and impulse turbines.The precise shape of water turbine blades is a function of the supply pressure of water, and the type of impeller selected. Reaction turbines Reaction turbines are acted on by water, which changes pressure as it moves through the turbine and gives up its energy. They must be encased to contain the water pressure (or suction), or they must be fully submerged in the water flow.Newtons third law describes the transfer of energy for reaction turbines.Most water turbines in use are reaction turbines and are used in low (300m/984 ft) head applications . Power The power available in a stream of water is;P\eta\cdot\rho\cdot g\cdot h\cdot\dot qwhere:*P     power (J/s or watts)*\eta  turbine efficiency*\rho  density of water (kg/m)*g     acceleration of gravity (9.81 m/s)*h     head (m). For still water, this is the difference in height between the inlet and outlet surfaces. Moving water has an additional component added to account for the kinetic energy of the flow. The total head equals the pressure head plus velocity head.*\dot q flow rate (m/s) Pumped storage Some water turbines are designed for storage hydroelectricity. They can reverse flow and operate as a pump to fill a high reservoir during off-peak electrical hours, and then revert to a turbine for power generation during peak electrical demand. This type of turbine is usually a Deriaz or Francis in design. Efficiency Large modern water turbines operate at mechanical efficiencies greater than 90% (not to be confused with efficiency). Types of water turbines Reaction turbines:*Francis*Kaplan, Propeller, Bulb, Tube, Straflo*Tyson*GorlovImpulse turbine*Waterwheel*Pelton*Turgo*Michell-Banki (also known as the Crossflow or Ossberger turbine)*turbine*overshot water-wheel*Archimedes screw turbine Design and application Turbine selection is based mostly on the available water head, and less so on the available flow rate.  In general, impulse turbines are used for high head sites, and reaction turbines are used for low head sites. Kaplan turbines with adjustable blade pitch are well-adapted to wide ranges of flow or head conditions, since their peak efficiency can be achieved over a wide range of flow conditions.Small turbines (mostly under 10 MW) may have horizontal shafts, and even fairly large bulb-type turbines up to 100 MW or so may be horizontal.  Very large Francis and Kaplan machines usually have vertical shafts because this  makes best use of the available head, and makes installation of a generator more economical.  Pelton wheels may be either vertical or horizontal shaft machines because the size of the machine is so much less than the available head.  Some impulse turbines use multiple water jets per runner to increase specific speed and balance shaft thrust. Typical range of heads  Hydraulic wheel turbine screw turbine Kaplan Francis Pelton Turgo0.2 1 2 10 50 50  Specific speed The specific speed  n_s  of a turbine characterizes the turbines shape in a way that is not related to its size. This allows a new turbine design to be scaled from an existing design of known performance. The specific speed is also the main criteria for matching a specific hydro site with the correct turbine type.The specific speed is the speed with which the turbine turns for a particular discharge Q, with unit head and thereby is able to produce unit power. Affinity laws Laws allow the output of a turbine to be predicted based on model tests.  A miniature replica of a proposed design, about one foot (0.3 m) in diameter, can be tested and the laboratory measurements applied to the final application with high confidence. Affinity laws are derived by requiring similitude between the test model and the application.Flow through the turbine is controlled either by a large valve or by wicket gates arranged around the outside of the turbine runner.  Differential head and flow can be plotted for a number of different values of gate opening, producing a hill diagram used to show the efficiency of the turbine at varying conditions. Runaway speed The runaway speed of a water turbine is its speed at full flow, and no shaft load. The turbine will be designed to survive the mechanical forces of this speed. The manufacturer will supply the runaway speed rating. Maintenance File:Turbine Francis Worn.JPG|thumb|left|250px|A turbine at the end of its life showing cavitation pitting, fatigue cracking and a catastrophic failure. Earlier repair jobs that used stainless steel weld rods are visible.Turbines are designed to run for decades with very little maintenance of the main elements; overhaul intervals are on the order of several years. Maintenance of the runners and parts exposed to water include removal, inspection, and repair of worn parts.Normal wear and tear includes pitting from cavitation, fatigue cracking, and abrasion from suspended solids in the water. Steel elements are repaired by welding, usually with steel rods. Damaged areas are cut or ground out, then welded back up to their original or an improved profile. Old turbine runners may have a significant amount of stainless steel added this way by the end of their lifetime. Elaborate welding procedures may be used to achieve the highest quality repairs.(Cline, Roger:Mechanical Overhaul Procedures for Hydroelectric Units (Facilities Instructions, Standards, and Techniques, Volume 2-7); United States Department of the Interior Bureau of Reclamation, Denver, Colorado, July 1994 (800KB pdf).)Other elements requiring inspection and repair during overhauls include bearings, packing box and shaft sleeves, servomotors, cooling systems for the bearings and generator coils, seal rings, wicket gate linkage elements and all surfaces.(United States Department of the Interior Bureau of Reclamation; Duncan, William (revised April 1989): Turbine Repair (Facilities Instructions, Standards & Techniques, Volume 2-5) (1.5 MB pdf).) Environmental impact Water turbines are generally considered a clean power producer, as the turbine causes essentially no change to the water. They use a renewable energy source and are designed to operate for decades. They produce significant amounts of the worlds electrical supply.Historically there have also been negative consequences, mostly associated with the dams normally required for power production.  Dams alter the natural ecology of rivers, potentially killing fish, stopping migrations, and disrupting peoples livelihoods. For example, American Indian tribes in the Northwest had livelihoods built around salmon fishing, but aggressive dam-building destroyed their way of life. Dams also cause less obvious, but potentially serious consequences, including increased evaporation of water (especially in arid regions), build up of silt behind the dam, and changes to water temperature and flow patterns. Some people believe that it is possible to construct hydropower systems that divert fish and other organisms away from turbine intakes without significant damage or loss of power; historical performance of diversion structures have been poor. In the States, it is now illegal to block the migration of fish, for example the endangered great white sturgeon in North America, so ladders must be provided by dam builders. The actual performance of fish ladders is often poor. See also * screw* turbine* helical turbine* Hydroelectricity* Hydropower* wheel References  Sources *** External links * Introductory turbine math* European Union publication, Laymans hydropower handbook,12 MB pdf* Selecting Hydraulic Reaction Turbines, US Bureau of Reclamation publication, 48 MB pdf* Laboratory for hydraulique machines, Lausanne (Switzerland)* DoradoVista, Small Hydro Power Informationdaiguaturbnade:Wasserturbineet:Hdroturbiinhidrulicahydrauliqueturbinaairidraulicahu:Vzturbinaturbineja:no:Vannturbinnn:Vassturbinwodnahidrulicahidraulicturbineturbinafi:Vesiturbiinisv:Vattenturbinth:bin nc
34415
Zambia
calling_code260Zambia (), officially the Republic of Zambia, is a country in Africa. The neighbouring countries are the Republic of the Congo to the north, Tanzania to the north-east, Malawi to the east, Mozambique, Zimbabwe, Botswana and Namibia to the south, and Angola to the west. The capital city is Lusaka, located in the south-central part of the country. The population is concentrated mainly around the capital Lusaka in the south and the Copperbelt to the northwest.Originally inhabited by Khoisan peoples, the region of what is now Zambia was reached by the expansion by ca.  the 12th century. After visits by European explorers starting in the 18th century, Zambia became the British colony of Rhodesia towards the end of the nineteenth century. For most of the colonial period, the country was governed by an administration appointed from London with the advice of the South Africa Company.On 24 October 1964, the country declared independence from the Kingdom and prime minister Kaunda became the first head of state.Zambia was governed by Kaunda of the socialist National Independence Party (UNIP) from 1964 until 1991. From 1972 to 1991 Zambia was a one-party state with UNIP the sole legal political party. From 1991 to 2002, Zambia was governed by president Chiluba of the social-democratic for Multi-Party Democracy during which the country saw a rise in social-economic growth and increased decentralisation of government. Mwanawasa was the third President of Zambia. He presided over the country from January 2002 until his death in August 2008. He is credited with having initiated a campaign to rid the country of corruption, and increasing standards of living from the levels left by Frederick T.J. Chiluba.The World Bank in 2010 named Zambia as one of the worlds fastest economically reforming countries. The headquarters of COMESA are in the capital Lusaka.EtymologyThe territory of what is now Zambia was known as Rhodesia from 1911.It was renamed to Zambia on the occasion of its independence, in 1964.The new name of Zambia was derived from the Zambezi river (Zambezi may mean Gods river) which flows through the western region of the country.HistoryThe area of modern Zambia was inhabited by Khoisan hunter-gatherers until around AD 300, when more technologically advanced migrating ethnic groups began to displace or absorb them.() In the 12th century, major waves of Bantu-speaking immigrants arrived during the expansion. Among them, the Tonga people (also called Ba-Tonga, Ba- meaning woman) were the first to settle in Zambia and are believed to have come from the east near the big sea.The Nkoya people also arrived early in the expansion, coming from the LubaLunda kingdoms located in the southern parts of the modern Republic of the Congo and northern Angola, followed by a much larger influx, especially between the late 12th and early 13th centuries. In the early 19th century, the Nsokolo people settled in the Mbala district of Northern Province. During the 19th century, the Ngoni and peoples arrived from the south. By the late 19th century, most of the various peoples of Zambia were established in the areas they currently occupy.  The arrival of Europeans was just yet another such influx.Image:Livingstone statue2.jpg|thumb|left|A statue of Livingstone on the Zambian side of Falls.The earliest account of a European visiting the area was de Lacerda in the late 18th century, followed by other European visitors in the 19th century. The most prominent of these was Livingstone, who had a vision of ending the slave trade through the 3 Cs (Christianity, Commerce and Civilization).He was the first European to see the magnificent waterfalls on the Zambezi River in 1855, naming them Falls after Queen Victoria.  Locally the falls are known as Mosi-o-Tunya or (the) thundering smoke (in the Lozi or Kololo dialect). The town of Livingstone, near the falls, is named after him. Highly publicised accounts of his journeys motivated a wave of European visitors, missionaries and traders after his death in 1873.In 1888, the South Africa Company (BSA Company), led by Rhodes, obtained mineral rights from the Litunga, the king of the Lozi or Ba-rotse for the area which later became Rhodesia.() To the east, in December 1897 a section of the Angoni or Ngoni (originally from Zululand) under Tsinco, the son of King Mpezeni, rebelled, but the rebellion was put down,() and Mpezeni accepted the Britannica. That part of the country then came to be known as Rhodesia. In 1895, Rhodes asked his American scout Russell Burnham to look for minerals and ways to improve river navigation in the region, and it was during this trek that Burnham discovered major copper deposits along the River.()thumb|175px|Liberation statue in front of a government buildingNorth-Eastern Rhodesia and North-Western Rhodesia were administered as separate units until 1911 when they were merged to form the British Colony of Rhodesia. In 1923, the BSA Company ceded control of Northern Rhodesia to the British Government after the government decided not to renew the Companys charter.That same year, Rhodesia (now Zimbabwe), a conquered territory which was also administered by the BSA Company, became a self-governing British Dominion. In 1924, after negotiations, administration of Northern Rhodesia transferred to the British Colonial Office. In 1953, the creation of the of Rhodesia and Nyasaland grouped together Northern Rhodesia, Southern Rhodesia and Nyasaland (now Malawi) as a single semi-autonomous region. This was undertaken despite opposition from a sizeable minority of Africans, who demonstrated against it in 196061.() Northern Rhodesia was the centre of much of the turmoil and crisis characterizing the federation in its last years. Initially, Nkumbulas African National Congress (ANC) led the campaign that Kaundas United National Independence Party (UNIP) subsequently took up.A two-stage election held in October and December 1962 resulted in an African majority in the legislative council and an uneasy coalition between the two African nationalist parties. The council passed resolutions calling for Northern Rhodesias secession from the federation and demanding full internal self-government under a new constitution and a new National Assembly based on a broader, more democratic franchise. The federation was dissolved on 31 December 1963, and in January 1964, Kaunda won the first and only election for Prime Minister of Northern Rhodesia. The Colonial Governor, Sir Evelyn Hone, was very close to Kaunda and urged him to stand for the post. Soon after, there was an uprising in the north of the country known as the Lumpa Uprising led by Lenshina &ndash; Kaundas first internal conflict as leader of the nation.Northern Rhodesia became the Republic of Zambia on 24 October 1964, with Kaunda as the first president.At independence, despite its considerable mineral wealth, Zambia faced major challenges. Domestically, there were few trained and educated Zambians capable of running the government, and the economy was largely dependent on foreign expertise. There were over 70,000 British in Zambia in 1964, who were of great economic importance.(1964: President Kaunda takes power in Zambia. BBC On This Day.) During the next decade, Kaundas regime supported movements such as UNITA in Angola; the African Peoples Union (ZAPU); the National Congress (ANC) in South Africa; and the West Africa Peoples Organization (SWAPO).Kaunda developed close relations with communist regimes in the Union and the Peoples Republic of China. Kaunda also developed a close friendship with Iraqi dictator Hussein.(Kaunda and Southern Africa by Stephen Chan)Conflict with Rhodesia resulted in the closure of the border with that country in 1973 and severe problems with international transport and power supply. However, the Kariba hydroelectric station on the Zambezi River provided sufficient capacity to satisfy the countrys requirements for electricity (despite the fact that the control centre was on the Rhodesian side of the border). A railway to the Tanzanian port of es Salaam, built with Chinese assistance, reduced Zambian dependence on railway lines south to South Africa and west through an increasingly troubled Angola. Until the completion of the railway, however, Zambias major artery for imports and the critical export of copper was along the TanZam Road, running from Zambia to the port cities in Tanzania. The Tazama oil pipeline was also built from Dar-es-Salaam to Ndola in Zambia.By the late 1970s, Mozambique and Angola had attained independence from Portugal. Zimbabwe achieved independence in 1980 in accordance with the 1979 House Agreement. Zambias problems, however, were not solved. Civil war in the former Portuguese colonies created an influx of refugees and caused continuing transportation problems. The railway, which extended west through Angola, was essentially closed to traffic from Zambia by the late 1970s. Zambias strong support for the ANC (despite both the Zambian ANC and the SA ANC being banned within Zambia), which had its external headquarters in Lusaka, created security problems as South Africa raided South African ANC military training camps in Zambia.In the mid-1970s, the price of copper, Zambias principal export, suffered a severe decline worldwide. In Zambias situation, the cost of transporting the copper great distances to market was an additional strain. Zambia turned to foreign and international lenders for relief, but, as copper prices remained depressed, it became increasingly difficult to service its growing debt. By the mid-1990s, despite limited debt relief, Zambias per capita foreign debt remained among the highest in the world.Image:Mwata Kazembe XVII Zambia 1961.jpg|thumb|upright|Mwata Kazembe XVII Paul Kanyembo Lutaba, chief of the Lunda people in Zambia in 1961.In June 1990 riots against Kaunda accelerated. Many protesters were killed by the regime in breakthrough June 1990 protests. Kaunda faced one coup attempt in 1990. In 1991, Kaunda agreed to re-institute multiparty democracy (having instated one party rule under the Chona Commission of 1972) and was replaced by multiparty elections.In the 2000s, the economy stabilized, attaining single-digit inflation in 20062007, real GDP growth, decreasing interest rates, and increasing levels of trade. Much of its growth is due to foreign investment in Zambias mining sector and higher copper prices on the world market. All this led to Zambia being courted enthusiastically by aid donors, and saw a surge, in investor confidence in the country reflected in a growing number of investors.PoliticsZambian politics take place in a framework of a presidential representative democratic republic, whereby the of Zambia is both of state and of government in a pluriform system. The government exercises executive power, while legislative power is vested in both the government and parliament. Zambia became a republic immediately upon attaining independence in October 1964. Zambias current president is H.E. Michael Sata Subdivisionsthumb|left|The provinces of Zambia into nine provinces, each administered by an appointed deputy minister. Each province is subdivided into several districts with a grand total of 72 districts. The provinces are:Geographythumb|left|Map of ZambiaImage:Victoria Falls Zambezi.jpg|thumb|250px|Falls is by some measures the largest waterfall in the worldZambia is a landlocked country in southern Africa, with a climate and consists mostly of high plateau, with some hills and mountains, dissected by river valleys. At  it is the 39th-largest country in the world (after Chile) and slightly larger than the US state of Texas. The country lies mostly between latitudes 8 and 18S, and longitudes 22 and 34E.Zambia is drained by two major river basins: the Zambezi basin in the south covering about three-quarters of the country; and the Congo basin in the north covering about one-quarter of the country. A very small area in the northeast forms part of the internal drainage basin of Rukwa in Tanzania.In the Zambezi basin, there are a number of major rivers flowing wholly or partially through Zambia: the Kabompo, Lungwebungu, Kafue, Luangwa, and the Zambezi itself, which flows through the country in the west and then forms its southern border with Namibia, Botswana and Zimbabwe. Its source is in Zambia but it diverts into Angola, and a number of its tributaries rise in Angolas central highlands. The edge of the River floodplain (not its main channel) forms Zambias southwestern border, and via the River that river contributes very little water to the Zambezi because most is lost by evaporation.(Richard Beilfuss & David dos Santos: Patterns of Hydrological Change in the Zambezi Delta, Mozambique. Working Paper No 2 Program for the Sustainable Management of Cahora Bassa Dam and The Lower Zambezi Valley (2001).)Two of the Zambezis longest and largest tributaries, the Kafue and the Luangwa, flow mainly in Zambia. Their confluences with the Zambezi are on the border with Zimbabwe at Chirundu and Luangwa town respectively. Before its confluence, the Luangwa River forms part of Zambias border with Mozambique. From Luangwa town, the Zambezi leaves Zambia and flows into Mozambique, and eventually into the Channel.The Zambezi falls about  over the  wide Falls, located in the south-west corner of the country, subsequently flowing into Kariba. The Zambezi valley, running along the southern border, is both deep and wide. From Lake Kariba going east it is formed by grabens and like the Luangwa, Mweru-Luapula, Mweru-wa-Ntipa and Lake Tanganyika valleys, is a valley.thumb|left|275px|A type of landscape in ZambiaThe north of Zambia is very flat with broad plains. In the west the most notable being the Floodplain on the Zambezi, which floods from December to June, lagging behind the annual rainy season (typically November to April). The flood dominates the natural environment and the lives, society and culture of the inhabitants and those of other smaller, floodplains throughout the country.In Eastern Zambia the plateau which extends between the Zambezi and Lake Tanganyika valleys is tilted upwards to the north, and so rises imperceptibly from about  in the south to  in the centre, reaching  in the north near Mbala. These plateau areas of northern Zambia have been categorised by the Wildlife Fund as a large section of the Zambezian Miombo woodlands ecoregion.Eastern Zambia shows great diversity. The Luangwa Valley splits the plateau in a curve north east to south west, extended west into the heart of the plateau by the deep valley of the River. Hills and mountains are found by the side of some sections of the valley, notably in its north-east the Nyika Plateau () on the Malawi border, which extend into Zambia as the Mafinga Hills, containing the countrys highest point, Kongera (). The Muchinga Mountains, the watershed between the Zambezi and Congo drainage basins, run parallel to the deep valley of the Luangwa River and form a sharp backdrop to its northern edge, although they are almost everywhere below . Their culminating peak Mumpu is at the western end and at  is the highest point in Zambia away from the eastern border region. The border of the Pedicle was drawn around this mountain.The southernmost headstream of the Congo River rises in Zambia and flows through its north firstly as the Chambeshi and then, after the Bangweulu Swamps as the Luapula, which forms part of the border with the Republic of the Congo. The Luapula flows south then west before it turns north until it enters Mweru. The lakes other major tributary is the River, which flows into it from the east. The River drains Lake Mweru, flowing out of the northern end to the River (Upper Congo River).Tanganyika is the other major hydrographic feature that belongs to the Congo basin. Its south-eastern end receives water from the River, which forms part of Zambias border with Tanzania. This river has Africas second highest uninterrupted waterfall, the Falls.ClimateThe climate of Zambia is tropical modified by elevation. In the climate classification, most of the country is classified as subtropical or tropical wet and dry, with small stretches of semi-arid climate in the south-west and along the Zambezi valley.There are two main seasons, the season (November to April) corresponding to summer, and the season (May/June to October/November), corresponding to winter. The dry season is subdivided into the cool dry season (May/June to August), and the hot dry season (September to October/November). The modifying influence of altitude gives the country pleasant subtropical weather rather than tropical conditions during the cool season of May to August.(Camerapix: Spectrum Guide to Zambia. Camerapix International Publishing, Nairobi, 1996.) However, average monthly temperatures remain above  over most of the country for eight or more months of the year.DemographicsZambia is one of the most highly urbanized countries in Africa with 44% of the population concentrated in a few urban areas along the major transport corridors, while rural areas are sparsely populated. Unemployment and underemployment in urban areas are serious problems, while most rural Zambians are subsistence farmers. The population comprises approximately 72 ethnic groups, most of which are Bantu-speaking.Almost 90% of Zambians belong to the nine main ethnolinguistic groups: the Nyanja-Chewa, Bemba, Tonga, Tumbuka, Lunda, Luvale, Kaonde, Nkoya and Lozi. In the rural areas, each ethnic group is concentrated in a particular geographic region of the country and many groups are very small and not as well known. However, all the ethnic groups can be found in significant numbers in Lusaka and the Copperbelt.Image:A small girl from small village - Zambia.jpg|thumb|left|150px|Girl in a small village on the road between the town Kafue in the south and the capital city Lusaka  ZambiaExpatriates, mostly British or South African, as well as some white Zambian citizens, live mainly in Lusaka and in the Copperbelt in northern Zambia, where they are either employed in mines, financial and related activities or retired. There were 70,000 Europeans in Zambia in 1964, but many have since left the country.( Zambia also has a small but economically important Asian population, most of whom are Indians and Chinese. An estimated 80,000 Chinese are resident in Zambia.(Zambians wary of exploitative Chinese employers. Irinnews.org. November 23, 2006.) In recent years, several hundred dispossessed white farmers have left Zimbabwe at the invitation of the Zambian government, to take up farming in the Southern province.()()According to the World Refugee Survey 2008 published by the Committee for Refugees and Immigrants, Zambia has a population of refugees and asylum seekers numbering approximately 113,200. The majority of refugees in the country came from the Republic of Congo (55,400 refugees from the DRC living in Zambia in 2007), Angola (40,800; see in Zambia) and Rwanda (4,000).(Beginning in May 2008, the number of in Zambia also began to increase significantly; the influx consisted largely of Zimbabweans formerly living in South Africa who were fleeing xenophobic violence there.() Nearly 60,000 refugees live in camps in Zambia, while 50,000 are mixed in with the local populations. Refugees who wish to work in Zambia must apply for official permits which can cost up to $500 per year.();Population of major citiesThe Europeans in the Colony numbered 14,000 at the 1931 census and the Africans 1,400,000, or just one hundred times as many. Of the Europeans, more than 10,000 had entered the country in the previous ten years, since the census in 1921(The Colour Bar in the Copper Belt by Julius Lewin, SA IRR, 1941)() (mostly to work on the copper mines).  In 1938 there were only eight doctors in the entire country.LanguagesThe official language of Zambia is English, which is used to conduct official business and is the medium of instruction in schools. The main local language, especially in Lusaka, is Nyanja. However, Bemba and Nyanja are spoken in the urban areas in addition to other indigenous languages which are commonly spoken in Zambia. Estimates of the total number of languages spoken in Zambia add up to 72,() thirteen (13) dialects are counted as languages in their own right which brings this number to 85.The process of urbanisation has had a dramatic effect on some of the indigenous languages, including the assimilation of words from other indigenous languages and English. Urban dwellers sometimes differentiate between urban and rural dialects of the same language by prefixing the rural languages with deep.Most will thus speak Bemba and Nyanja on the Copperbelt; Nyanja is dominantly spoken in Lusaka and Eastern Zambia. English is used in official communications and is the chosen language at home among - now common - intertribal families.  If one does visit Zambia it becomes evident that language continuously evolves and has led to slang which can be heard in daily life throughout Lusaka and other major cities. As a member of the SADC, Portuguese was introduced in the nation as an instruction in its primary school system, especially that there is a strong Angolan population in the nation.(Zambia to introduce Portuguese into school curriculum.)ReligionImage:Linvingstone church.jpg| The Museum, Zambia|thumb|rightZambia is officially a Christian nation according to the 1996 constitution,(http://www.scribd.com/doc/3713564/Constitution-of-Zambia-1991Amended-to-1996) but a wide variety of religious traditions exist. Traditional religious thoughts blend easily with Christian beliefs in many of the countrys syncretic churches. Christian denominations include: Roman Catholic, Anglican, Pentecostal, Apostolic Church, Lutheran, Seventh-day Adventist, Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints, Witnesses and a variety of Evangelical denominations. These grew, adjusted and prospered from the original missionary settlements (Portuguese and Catholicism in the east from Mozambique) and Anglicanism (English and Scottish influences) from the south. Except for some technical positions (e.g. physicians), Western missionary roles have been assumed by native believers. After Chiluba (a Pentecostal Christian) became President in 1991, Pentecostal congregations expanded considerably around the country.()Approximately 87% of the population are Christians. Approximately 1% of the population are Muslims with most living in urban areas.(International Religious Freedom Report 2010 - Zambia) There is also a small Jewish community, composed mostly of Ashkenazis. Notable Jewish Zambians have included Zukas, retired Minister, MP and a member of for Democracy and Development and earlier on the for Multiparty Democracy (MMD) and National Independence Party. Additionally, the economist Fischer, currently the governor of the of Israel and formerly Deputy Managing Director of the Monetary Fund (IMF) also was born and partially raised in Zambias Jewish community. The Bahai population of Zambia is over 160,000,() or 1.5% of the population. The William Mmutle Masetlha Foundation() run by the Bahai community is particularly active in areas such as literacy and primary health care.EconomyImage:Chisokone Market Kitwe.jpg|thumb|250px|Chisokone Market in Kitwe, ZambiaImage:ZM-Nkana-headgear-Kitwe.jpg|thumb|250px|The major Nkana open copper mine, Kitwe.About 68% of Zambians live below the recognised national line,() with rural poverty rates standing at about 78%() and urban rates of 53%.() Zambia ranked 117th out of 128 countries on the 2007 Competitiveness Index, which looks at factors that affect economic growth.() Per capita annual incomes are currently at about one-half their levels at independence and, at $395, place the country among the worlds poorest nations. Social indicators continue to decline, particularly in measurements of life expectancy at birth (about 40.9 years) and maternal mortality (830 per 100,000 pregnancies).() The countrys rate of economic growth cannot support rapid population growth or the strain which HIV/AIDS related issues place on the economy.During the decades of Kaundas socialist policies, Zambia fell into poverty, especially after international copper prices declined in the 1970s. The socialist regime made up for falling revenue with several abortive attempts at Monetary Fund adjustment programmes (SAPs). After the dictatorship ended, successive governments have begun limited reforms. The economy stagnated until late 1990s. In 2007 Zambia recorded ninth consecutive year of economic growth. Inflation was 8.9%, down from 30% in 2000.(Zambia is still dealing with economic reform issues such as the size of the sector and improving Zambias social sector delivery systems.() Economic regulations and tape are extensive, and corruption is widespread. Zambias total foreign debt exceeded $6 billion when the country qualified for Indebted Poor Country Initiative (HIPC) debt relief in 2000, contingent upon meeting certain performance criteria. Initially, Zambia hoped to reach the HIPC completion point, and benefit from substantial debt forgiveness, in late 2003.In January 2003, the Zambian government informed the Monetary Fund and Bank that it wished to renegotiate some of the agreed performance criteria calling for privatisation of the Zambia National Commercial Bank and the national telephone and electricity utilities. Although agreements were reached on these issues, subsequent overspending on civil service wages delayed Zambias final HIPC debt forgiveness from late 2003 to early 2005, at the earliest. In an effort to reach HIPC completion in 2004, the government drafted an austerity budget for 2004, freezing civil service salaries and increasing a number of taxes. The tax hike and public sector wage freeze prohibited salary increases and new hires. This sparked a nationwide strike in February 2004.(The World Bank and IMFs long shadow in Zambias copper mines)The Zambian economy has historically been based on the mining industry. Output of copper had fallen, however, to a low of 228,000 metric tons in 1998, after a 30 year decline in output due to lack of investment, low copper prices, and uncertainty over privatisation. In 2002, following privatisation of the industry, copper production rebounded to 337,000 metric tons. Improvements in the world copper market have magnified the effect of this volume increase on revenues and foreign exchange earnings.The Zambian government is pursuing an economic diversification program to reduce the economys reliance on the copper industry. This initiative seeks to exploit other components of Zambias rich resource base by promoting agriculture, tourism, gemstone mining, and hydro-power.Agriculture plays a very important part in Zambias economy providing much more jobs than the mining industry. Private local company Zambeef Products Ltd. is the leading agri-business in Zambia with over 4.000 employees, producing row crops (5.000 ha irrigated, 1.500 ha non-irrigated), cattle (Zambeef), pork (Master Pork), chicken (ZamChick), eggs (ZamChick Egg), dairy products, leather, fish, feedstock (Novatek) and edible oil (Zamanita). Zambeef is operating 8 abattoirs as well as 4 farms and numerous retail stores (also in cooperation with Shoprite) and a fast-food chain (ZamChick Inn) throughout the country.In 2003, exports of nonmetals increased by 25% and accounted for 38% of all export earnings, previously 35%. The Zambian government has recently been granting licenses to international resource companies to prospect for minerals such as nickel, tin, copper and uranium.()It is hoped that nickel will take over from copper as the countrys top metallic export. In 2009, Zambia has been badly hit by the world economic crisis.(Chinese keep low profile to cash in on the slump in Zambia. The Times. January 24, 2009.)Zambia was ranked the 127th safest investment destination in the world in the March 2011 Euromoney Country Risk rankings.()Social protection in ZambiaZambia officially has extensive protection targeted at low-capacity households, including social assistance (protection) and insurance programmes (prevention), and programmes to improve economic productivity (promotion). However, these programmes face immense challenges and the actual coverage is very low and, in some cases, actually declining.(Rebecca Holmes and Rachel Slater (2010) Social protection for low capacity households in Zambia Development Institute) Some analysts describe the programmes coverage as patchy and transitory and not especially coherent or logical.(Public works, such as PUSH, and transfers are the main instruments used to protect consumption among low-capacity households by providing (1) seasonal safety nets to address cyclical poverty and vulnerability at times of need by offering employment and (2) community assets that are beneficial for productive activities.( In practice, however, the programme prioritises food transfers to areas affected by natural disasters where vulnerability is acute and infrastructure development has remained a secondary objective.( NGOs also have implemented short-term public works programmes implemented by NGOs, such as CAREs agricultural inputs-for-assets (AICA) programme.(Social insurance initiatives, such as micro-insurance, insurance and other contributory schemes exist, but these are very limited in their membership. Formal sector workers are protected by well-resourced pension, sickness and disability benefits, but most low-capacity households, especially in rural areas, work outside the formal sector.(The emphasis on protection of the expense of prevention and promotion means that households move out of poverty only very slowly because they are unable to invest in activities that have greater returns. They remain highly at risk of sliding back into poverty and applying negative coping strategies.( A balance between protection, prevention and promotion, however can only be achieved through more and consistent resources.( Further improvements might also include*improved implementation of existing programmes; and*better coordination between different implementers and programmes.EducationIn 2003, the literacy rate was estimated to be 80.6% (86.8% male and 74.8% female).(https://www.cia.gov/library/publications/the-world-factbook/fields/2103.html)Education in Zambia is provided at two levels: basic education (years 1 to 9), and upper secondary (years 10 to 12). Some schools provide a basic education covering years 1 to 9, as year 9 is considered to be a decent level of education for the majority of children. However, tuition is only free up to year 7, and UNESCO estimated that 80% of children of primary school age in 2002 were enrolled.() Most children drop out after year 7 when fees must be paid.Both government and private schools exist in Zambia. The private school system began largely as a result of Christian mission efforts during the late 19th and early 20th centuries.Educational opportunities beyond secondary school are limited in Zambia. After secondary school, most students study at the various colleges, around the country. There are three main universities: the of Zambia (UNZA), University (MU) and the University (CBU). Normally they all select students on the basis of ability; competition for places is intense. The introduction of fees in the late 1990s has made university level education inaccessible for some, although the government does provide state bursaries.Copperbelt University opened in the late 1980s, taking over most of the former Zambia Institute of Technology site in Kitwe. Other centres of education include the Public Administration College (NIPA), the Northern Technical College (NORTEC), the National Resources Development College (NRDC), the Evelyn Hone College, and Northrise University. There are also several teacher training colleges offering two-year training programmes, whilst missionary hospitals around the country offer internationally acceptable training for nurses. Several Christian schools offer seminary-level training.HealthHIV prevalence exceeds 10%.Public expenditure on health was at 3.4 of the GDP in 2004. Expenditure on health was at 2.9 % in the same year. Health expenditure was at US$ 63 (PPP) in 2004. Infant mortality was at 102 per 1,000 in 2005.Maternal and Child Health CareIn June 2011, the Nations Population Fund released a report on The State of the Worlds Midwifery. It contained new data on the midwifery workforce and policies relating to newborn and maternal mortality for 58 countries. The 2010 maternal mortality rate per 100,000 births for Zambia is 470.  This is compared with 602.9 in 2008 and 594.2 in 1990. The under 5 mortality rate, per 1,000 births is 145 and the neonatal mortality as a percentage of under 5s mortality is 25. The aim of this report is to highlight ways in which the Development Goals can be achieved, particularly Goal 4  Reduce child mortality and Goal 5  improve maternal death. In Zambia the number of midwives per 1,000 live births is 5 and 1 in 38 shows us the lifetime risk of death for pregnant women.  ()CultureThe culture of Zambia is mainly indigenous Bantu culture mixed with European influences. Prior to the establishment of modern Zambia, the natives lived in independent tribes, each with their own ways of life. One of the results of the colonial era was the growth of urbanization. Different ethnic groups started living together in towns and cities, influencing each other as well as adopting a lot of the culture. The original cultures have largely survived in the rural areas. In the urban setting there is a continuous integration and evolution of these cultures to produce what is now called Zambian culture.Image:Nsima Relishes.JPG|thumb|Nshima (top right corner) with three relishesTraditional culture is very visible through colourful annual traditional ceremonies. Some of the more prominent are: Kuomboka and Kathanga (Western Province), Mutomboko (Luapula Province), Ncwala (Eastern Province), Lwiindi and Shimunenga (Southern Province), Lubanza (North Western), Lyamize (North Western), Kumushi (Central Province), Pa Ngwena (Northern Province).Popular traditional arts are mainly in pottery, basketry (such as baskets), stools, fabrics, mats, wooden carvings, ivory carvings, wire craft and copper crafts. Most Zambian traditional music is based on drums (and other percussion instruments) with a lot of singing and dancing. In the urban areas foreign genres of music are popular, in particular Congolese rumba, African-American music and Jamaican reggae. Several psychedelic rock artists emerged in the 1970s to create a genre known as Zamrock, including The Witch, Musi-O-Tunya, Rikki Ililonga, Amanaz, the Peace, Chrissy Zebby Tembo, Blackfoot, and the Ngozi Family.The Zambian staple diet is based on maize. It is normally eaten as a thick porridge, called Nshima (Nyanja Word), prepared from maize flour commonly known as mealie meal. This may be eaten with a variety of vegetables, beans, meat, fish or sour milk depending on geographical location/origin. Nshima is also prepared from cassava, a staple food in some parts of the country. Sports Zambia declared its independence on the day of the closing ceremony of the Summer Olympics, thereby becoming the first country ever to have entered an Olympic games as one country, and left it as another.Football is the most popular sport in Zambia, and the national football team has had its triumphant moments in football history. At the Olympics of 1988, the national team defeated the Italian national team by a score of 40. Bwalya, Zambias most celebrated football player and one of Africas greatest football talents had a hat trick in that match. However, to this day, many pundits say the greatest team Zambia has ever assembled was the one that perished on 28 April 1993 in a plane crash at Gabon. Despite this, in 1996, Zambia was ranked 15th on the official FIFA World Football Team rankings, the highest attained by any Southern African team. The national team is currently ranked 86th on the rankings.Zambia also produced the first black African (Muthiya) to play in the States Golf Open, one of the four major golf tournaments.Rugby, boxing and cricket are also popular sports in Zambia. Notably, at one point in the early 2000s, the Australia and South Africa national rugby teams were captained by players born in the same Lusaka hospital, Gregan and Krige. Zambia boasts having the highest rugby poles in the world, located at Sports Complex in Luanshya. union in Zambia is a minor but growing sport. They are currently ranked 73rd by the IRB and have 3,650 registered players and three formally organised clubs.(IRB Zambia page. Retrieved 2009-07-05.) Zambia used to play cricket as part of Rhodesia. Zambia has also strangely provided a shinty international, Zambian-born Tembo representing Scotland in the rules Shinty/Hurling game against Ireland in 2008.(Tembos return is boost for Glen.)In 2011, Zambia was due to host the tenth All-Africa Games, for which three stadiums were to be built in Lusaka, Ndola, and Livingstone.() The Lusaka stadium will have a capacity of 70,000 spectators while the other two stadiums will hold 50,000 people each. The government is encouraging the private sector to get involved in the construction of the sports facilities because of a shortage of public funds for the project. Zambia has since revoked its bid to host the 2011 All-Africa Games, citing a lack of funds. Instead, Mozambique will be hosting.Zambia took part in the Summer Olympics in Beijing.See also*of Nations*of countries by copper mine productionReferencesFurther reading*.*.External links*****listlistaf:Zambials:Sambiaam:ar:an:Zambiafrp:Zambieast:Zambiaaz:Zambiyabm:Zanbiabn:bjn:Zambiazh-min-nan:Zambiabe:be-x-old:bcl:Sambyabo:bs:Zambijabr:Zambiabg:ca:Zmbiacv:ceb:Zambiacs:Zambieny:Zambiatum:Zambiacy:Zambiada:Zambiade:Sambiadv:et:Sambiael:es:Zambiaeo:Zambioext:Zmbiaeu:Zambiafa:hif:Zambiafr:Zambiefy:SambiatSaimbiaTambiagag:Zambiyagd:Saimbiagl:Zambiahak:Tsan-p-ko:hi:hr:Zambijaio:Zambiailo:Zambiabpy:id:Zambiaie:Zambiaos:zu:IZambiais:Sambait:Zambiahe:jv:Zambiapam:Zambiaka:ks:kk:kw:Zambirw:Zambiyasw:Zambiakg:Zambiaht:Zanbiku:Zambiyamrj:ltg:Zambejala:Zambialv:Zambijalb:Sambialt:Zambijalij:Zambiali:Zambialn:Zambiajbo:zambiaslmo:Zambiahu:Zambiamk:ml:mt:ambjamr:arz:mzn:ms:Zambiamn:my:nah:Zambianl:Zambiaja:no:Zambiann:Zambianov:Zambiaoc:Zambiauz:Zambiyapnb:pap:Zambiaps:km:pms:Zambiands:Sambiapl:Zambiapt:Zmbiakaa:Zambiyacrh:Zambiyaro:Zambiaqu:Sambyaru:sah:se:Zmbiasa:sg:Zambisc:Zmbiasco:Zambiestq:Sambiatn:Zambiasq:Zambiascn:Zambiasimple:Zambiass:IZambiyask:Zambiasl:Zambijaszl:Zambijoso:Saambiyackb:sr:sh:Zambijafi:Sambiasv:Zambiatl:Sambyata:te:th:ti:tg:tr:Zambiyauk:ur:ug:vec:Zanbiavi:Zambiavo:Zambiynfiu-vro:Sambiazh-classical:war:Zambiawo:Saambiwuu:ts:Zambiayi:yo:Smbzh-yue:diq:Zambiyabat-smg:Zambjzh:
34653
1900
__NOTOC__Year 1900 (MCM) was an exceptional year starting on Monday (link will display the full calendar) of the calendar and a year starting on Saturday of the calendar. As a result, the Julian calendar was 12 days behind the Gregorian until Wednesday, 28 (O.S. 16) and has been 13 days behind since Thursday, 1 (O.S. 17). It was the 1900th year of the Domini or the Era designation, the 900th year of the millennium, and the last year of the century but the first year of the 1900s. Events  January * 1 &ndash; Hawaii asks for a delegate at the U.S. National Convention.* 2** The first bus becomes operational in York City.** Secretary of State Hay announces the Door Policy to promote American trade with China.* 3 &ndash; The States Census estimates the countrys population to be about 70 million people.* 4 &ndash; Strikes in Belgium and Germany lead to mining riots.* 5** The Irish leader Edward Redmond calls for a revolt against British rule.** Dr. Henry A. Rowland of Hopkins University announces a theory about the cause of the Earths magnetism.* 6 &ndash; Boer War: Boers attack the town of South Africa, killing over 1,000 people.* 8 &ndash; President McKinley of the States places Alaska under military governance.* 9 &ndash; The first through train goes from Cairo to Khartoum.* 14** The opera Tosca premieres in Rome, Italy.** The Senate accepts the British-German treaty of 1899, in which the Kingdom renounced its claims to the Samoa portion of the Islands.* 17 &ndash; H. Roberts of Utah is not seated by the House of Representatives because of his plural marriage.* 23 &ndash; 5,000 Austrian miners go on strike.File:Boers at Spion Kop, 1900 - Project Gutenberg eText 16462.jpg|thumb|Boer War: Boers at Spion Kop, 1900* 24 &ndash; The Boer War: At the of Spion Kop, Boer troops defeat the Army.* 26 &ndash; The Labor League Conference opens in Sydney, Australia, with plans to form a Federal Labor Party. This is spelled Labor even in Australia.* 27 &ndash; Rebellion: Foreign diplomats in Peking, China demand that the Boxer rebels be disciplined.* 29 &ndash; The League of Professional Baseball Clubs is organized in Pennsylvania with eight founding teams.* 30 &ndash; Governor William Goebel of Kentucky shot by several assassins. February recording the location of the formation of the British Labour Party in 1900.* 1 &ndash; Australia announced its refusal to join the Federation unless it is given five more years of fiscal freedom.* 3** Governor Goebel of Kentucky dies of wounds after being shot by several assassins on January 30. Goebel, who had prevailed in a dispute over the winner of the election in November 1899, had been sworn in on his deathbed. The former of State of Kentucky Powers is later found guilty in the  conspiracy to kill Goebel.** Strikers in Aachen, Vienna, and Brussels demand an eight-hour working day and higher wages.* 5** The Kingdom and the States sign a treaty for the building of a Central American shipping canal across America in Nicaragua.** Boer War: The House of Commons vote of censure over the governments handling of the war is defeated.* 6 &ndash; The international arbitration court at Hague is created when the Netherlands Senate ratifies an 1899 conference decree.* 8 &ndash; Boer War: British troops are defeated by the Boers at Ladysmith.* 9 &ndash; F. Davis creates the Cup tennis tournament.* 14** Russia responds to international pressure to free Finland by tightening imperial control over the country.** Boer War &ndash; of Paardeberg: 20,000 British troops invade the Free State.* 15 &ndash; Boer War: The of Kimberley is lifted.* 17 &ndash; Boer War: of Paardeberg: British troops defeat the Boers.* 27** The British Labour Party is formed.** Boer War: British military leaders accept the unconditional notice of surrender from Boer General Cronje.** MacDonald is appointed secretary of the newly formed Labour Party.** Bayern Munich, football club, is founded. March * 2 (beginning) &ndash; Groups of officials inspect towns around Australia in order to find a location the new Federal capital.* 5 &ndash; Two Navy cruisers are sent to America to protect American interests in a dispute between Nicaragua and Rica.* 6** Baby-farmer Ada Williams is hanged at Newgate Prison for murdering a 21-month old girl.** A mine explosion in Virginia kills 50 miners.* 7 &ndash; A fire at Palace destroys part of its roof.* 8 &ndash; Londoners celebrate as Victoria makes a rare visit to the city.* 9 &ndash; Women in Germany demand the right to participate in university entrance exams.* 14 &ndash; The botanist de Vries rediscovers Mendels Laws of Heredity.* 15 &ndash; The Standard Act is ratified, placing the States currency on the standard.* 16 &ndash; The British archaeologist Sir Arthur Evans purchases the land on Crete on which the ruins of the palace of Knossos stand. He begins to unearth some of the palace three days later.* 24 &ndash; The Mayor of York, Van Wyck, breaks ground for a new underground Rapid Transit Railroad that will link Manhattan with Brooklyn.* 27 &ndash; The arrival of a Russian naval fleet in Korea causes concern to the Japanese government.* 28 &ndash; Over 1,000 tonnes of waste are removed from demolished buildings in Australia, in areas affected by an outbreak of the plague.* 31 &ndash; In France, the length of a legal workday for women and children is limited to 11 hours. April * 1** The Guards are formed by Victoria.** King George of Greece becomes absolute monarch of Crete.* 4 &ndash; An anarchist shoots at the Prince of Wales during his visit to Belgium.* 14 &ndash; The Paris World Exhibition opens.* 22 &ndash; of Koussri: French forces secure their domination of Chad. Warlord az-Zubayr is defeated and killed.* 26 &ndash; The Great Lumber Fire of OttawaHull kills 7 and leaves 15,000 homeless.* 30 &ndash; Hawaii becomes an official U.S. territory. May * 1 &ndash; An explosion of blasting powder in coal mine in Utah kills 200.* 3  &ndash; Fella Stevani travelled to France to quell the up rising of turnip farmers.* 14 &ndash; The second Olympic Games opens in Paris (as part of the Paris World Exhibition).* 17** Boer War: British troops relieve the Mafeking.** Rebellion: Boxers destroy 3 villages near Peking and kill 60 Chinese Christians.* 18 &ndash; The Kingdom proclaims a protectorate over Tonga.* 21 &ndash; Russia invades Manchuria.* 23 &ndash; Sergeant Harvey Carney is awarded the of Honor for heroism in 1863, as the first American to have been awarded this medal.* 24 &ndash; Boer War: The British annex the Free State as the River Colony.* 28 &ndash; Rebellion: The Boxers attack Belgians in the Fengtai railway station.* 29 &ndash; NDjamena, the capital city of Chad, is founded as Fort-Lamy by French commander Gentil.* 31 &ndash; Rebellion: Peacekeepers from various European countries arrive in China. June * 1 &ndash; Nation begins her crusade to demolish saloons.* 5 &ndash; Boer War: British soldiers take Pretoria.* 14 &ndash; The Reichstag approves a second law that allows the expansion of the navy.* 20 &ndash; Rebellion: Boxers gather about 20,000 people near Peking and kill hundreds of European citizens, including the German ambassador.* 30 &ndash; A wharf fire at the docks in New Jersey owned by the German Lloyd Steamship line spreads to German ships , , and .  The fire engulfs the adjacent piers and nearby ships, killing 326 people.File:Map of Australia.png|thumb|150px|9: Australia, founded. July * 2 &ndash; The first zeppelin flight is carried out over Constance near Friedrichshafen, Germany.* 5 &ndash; The of Australia Constitution Act passes the Parliament.* 9 &ndash; Victoria gives her royal assent to the Commonwealth of Australia Constitution Act.* 12 &ndash; A German liner, the SS Deutschland, breaks the record for the Riband for the first time with an average speed of .* 19 &ndash; The first line of the Mtro is opened.* 25 &ndash;  The Charles Riots break out in Orleans, Louisiana.* 29 &ndash; King I of Italy is assassinated by the Italian-born anarchist Bresci. August * 4 - Bowes-Lyon the Queen Mother was Born in London .* 14 &ndash; Rebellion: An international contingent of troops, under British command, invades Peking and frees the Europeans taken hostage. September * 8 &ndash; A powerful hurricane hits Texas killing about 8,000  people.* 13 &ndash; War: Filipino resistance fighters defeat a large American column in the of Pulang Lupa.* 17 &ndash; Philippine-American War: Filipinos under Cailles defeat the Americans under Colonel Benjamin F. Cheatham at Mabitac.* 25 &ndash; In the British general election, the recently formed Labour Party gains two seats. Churchill is also elected to Parliament for the first time. October  November * 3 &ndash; The first automobile show in the States opens at York Citys Madison Square Garden.* 6 &ndash; presidential election, 1900: Republican incumbent McKinley is reelected by defeating Democratic challenger Jennings Bryan. December * 7 &ndash; Planck announces his discovery of the law of body emission, marking the birth of physics. Date unknown * U.S. Haven, CT Louis Lassen of Lunch makes the first modern-day hamburger sandwich.* Japan participates with the European powers in occupying Beijing to suppress the Rebellion.* Kouang-Tchou-Wan added to Indochina.* First Guide published.* service consists of fewer than 3,500 top officials for a population of 300 million in India.* 4 out of every 1,000 residents of India die of cholera each year. World population * population: 1,650,000,000** Africa: 133,000,000** Asia: 947,000,000*** Japan: c. 45,000,000** Europe: 408,000,000** Latin-America: 74,000,000** America: 82,000,000** Oceania: 6,000,000 Births  January * 1 &ndash; Borboni, Italian film actress, stroke (d. 1995)** Cugat, Cuban bandleader, failure (d. 1990)** Maxwell, English actor (d. 1971)** Rich, English silent film actress (d. 1954)** Sugihara, Japanese diplomat (d. 1986)* 2 &ndash; Haines, American actor (d. 1973)** Itami, Japanese film director, tuberculosis (d. 1946)* 3 &ndash; Jaubert, French composer, wounded in combat (d. 1940)** Neubach, Austrian screenwriter, producer, and director (d. 1968)* 4 &ndash; James Bond, American ornithologist (d. 1989)** William Young, British veteran of World War I (d. 2007)* 5 &ndash; Magrill, American film actor (d. 1952)** Tanguy, French painter (d. 1955)* 6 &ndash; John Sinclair, American actor (d. 1945)* 8 &ndash; Adams, American character actress (d. 1988)** de Menthon, French politician and professor of law (d. 1984)* 9 &ndash; dAstier de La Vigerie, French journalist and politician (d. 1969)** Halliburton, American adventurer and writer (d. 1939)* 10 &ndash; Gehret, Swedish actor and director (d. 1956)* 11 &ndash; Chase, American writer (d. 1971)** French, American director, disease (d. 1950)* 16 &ndash; Frank, German-Dutch mother of Frank (d. 1945)* 23 &ndash; Ifor Jones, Welsh conductor and organist (d. 1988)* 24 &ndash; Dobzhansky, Ukrainian geneticist and evolutionary biologist (d. 1975)* 26 &ndash; Ristenpart, German conductor (d. 1967)* 27 &ndash; Rickover, American admiral (d. 1986)* 28 &ndash; Tondaiman, King of Pudukkottai (d. 1950)* 30 &ndash; Hunt, Argentine-born British actress (d. 1969) February * 4 &ndash; Prvert, French lyricist and author (d. 1977)* 5 &ndash; Adlai Stevenson, American politician (d. 1965)* 11 &ndash; Gadamer, German philosopher (d. 2002)* 12 &ndash; J. Traynor, American judge (d. 1983)* 12 &ndash; Vasily_Chuikov,the most Human Marshal of soviet union of world war 2 . * 22 &ndash; Buuel, Spanish film director (d. 1983)* 25 &ndash; Richard M. Hollingshead, Jr., American inventor of the drive-in theatre (d. 1975)* 28 &ndash; Hirth, German pilot and aircraft designer (d. 1959) March * 4 &ndash; Biberman, American screenwriter and film director (d. 1971)* 7 &ndash; Dods, Australian medical pioneer (d. 1981)* 9 &ndash; Aiken, American computing pioneer (d. 1973)* 13 &ndash; Seferis, Greek poet, recipient of the Prize in Literature (d. 1971)* 19 &ndash; Joliot, French physicist, recipient of the Prize in Chemistry (d. 1958)* 23 &ndash; Fromm, German-born psychologist and philosopher (d. 1980)* 29 &ndash; McEwen, Prime Minister of Australia (d. 1980)* 31 &ndash; Henry, Duke of Gloucester (d. 1974) April * 2 &ndash; Arlt, Argentine writer (d. 1942)* 3** Ingham, English mathematician (d. 1967)** Walsh, Lieutenant Governor of Newfoundland (d. 1958)* 5 &ndash; Tracy, American actor (d. 1967)* 8 &ndash; Byles, Australian solicitor (d. 1979)* 16 &ndash; Adler, Russian author (d. 1962)* 21 &ndash; Fritzsche, German Nazi official (d. 1953)* 25 &ndash; Ernst Pauli, Austrian-born physicist, Nobel Prize laureate (d. 1958)* 26 &ndash; Richter, American geophysicist and inventor (d. 1985)* 27 &ndash; Koern, Estonian statesman and diplomat (d. 1989)* 28 &ndash; Thorez, French Communist Leader (d. 1964)* 30 &ndash; Lefort, English World War II heroine (d. 1945) May * 1 &ndash; Silone, Italian author (d. 1978)* 2 &ndash; Lawrence, a British leading authority on classical sculpture and architecture (d. 1991)* 6 &ndash; Zheng Ji, Chinese nutritionist and biochemist (d. 2010)* 12 &ndash; Weigel, Austrian actress (d. 1971)* 23 &ndash; Frank, German Nazi official (d. 1946)* 27 &ndash; Zylka, Belarusian poet (d. 1933)* 28 &ndash; Ladnier, American jazz trumpeter (d. 1939) June * 3** Fisher, American temperance activist (d. 1982)** Picard, German-born Israeli geologist (d. 1997)* 4 &ndash; George Watkins, American baseball player (d. 1970)* 5 &ndash; Gabor, Hungarian physicist, Nobel Prize laureate (d. 1979)* 7 &ndash; Gray, American saxophonist (d. 1963)* 11 &ndash; Marechal, Argentine writer (d. 1970)* 15 &ndash; Mares, American jazz trumpeter (d. 1949)* 17 &ndash; Bormann, German Nazi official (d. 1945)* 25 &ndash; Mountbatten, 1st Earl Mountbatten of Burma, Viceroy of India (d. 1979)* 29 &ndash; de Saint-Exupery, French pilot and writer (d. 1944) July * 4 &ndash; Desnos, French poet (d. 1945)* 6 &ndash; Sagor Maas, American playwright, essayist, and author* 13 &ndash; George Lewis, American jazz clarinetist (d. 1968)* 23 &ndash; Babcock, last surviving World War I veteran of the Canadian military (d. 2010)* 29 &ndash; Johnson, Swedish writer, Nobel Prize laureate (d. 1976) August * 3 &ndash; Pyle, American journalist (d. 1945)* 4 &ndash; Elizabeth Bowes-Lyon, queen consort of VI of the United Kingdom (d. 2002)* 6 &ndash; H. Green, British-born geophysicist and businessman (d. 2003)* 10 &ndash; Espie Porritt, New Zealand politician and athlete (d. 1994)* 11** Philip Phillips, American archaeologist (d. 1994)** Mosolov, Russian composer (d. 1973)* 18 &ndash; Albert Black, American archaeologist (d. 1964)* 19** Moore, American actress (d. 1988)** Ryle, British philosopher (d. 1976)* 22 &ndash; Ozhegov, Russian lexicographer (d. 1964)* 25 &ndash; Sir Adolf Krebs, German physician and biochemist, recipient of the Prize in Physiology or Medicine (d. 1981)* 26 &ndash; Walter, German engineer and inventor (d. 1980) September * 3 &ndash; Kekkonen, President of Finland (d. 1986)* 6 &ndash; Bennett, Canadian politician (d. 1979)* 12 &ndash; Thiman, English composer (d. 1975)* 18 &ndash; Darden, American Rear admiral, 37th of American Samoa (d. 1961)* 22 &ndash; H. Emmett, American chemical engineer (d. 1985)* 23 &ndash; Nevelson, Ukrainian-born American sculptor (d. 1988)* 29 ** Alemn Valds, President of Mexico (d. 1983)** van Pels, German-Dutch mother of Peter van Pels, housemate of Anne Frank (d. 1945) October * 1 &ndash; Goddard, English cricketer (d. 1966)* 6 &ndash; Nichols, English cricketer (d. 1961)* 7 &ndash; Himmler, German Nazi official and SS head (d. 1945)* 17 &ndash; Arthur, American Actress (d. 1991)* 30 &ndash; Granit, Finnish neuroscientist, recipient of the Prize in Physiology or Medicine (d. 1991) November * 4 &ndash; Ptrcanu, Romanian communist activist and sociologist (d. 1954)* 5** Dies, Jr., American politician (d. 1972)** Schafer, American actress (d. 1991)* 6 &ndash; Prosser, American actor (d. 1952)* 8** Paddock, American athlete (d. 1943)** Mitchell, American writer (Gone With The Wind) (d. 1949)* 11** Konopacka, Polish athlete (d. 1989)** Lawton, 9th of the Office of Management and Budget (d. 1975)* 13 &ndash; Marshall Williams, American inventor (d. 1975)* 14 &ndash; Copland, American composer (d. 1990)* 16 &ndash; Pogodin, Soviet playwright (d. 1962)* 22 &ndash; Tom Macdonald, Welsh journalist and novelist (d. 1980)* 25 &ndash; H, German Nazi official (d. 1947) December * 3** Inderbinen, Swiss mountain guide (d. 2004)** Kuhn, Austrian chemist, Nobel Prize laureate (d. 1967)* 4 &ndash; Axon, British railwayman (d. 1957)* 6 &ndash; Moorehead, American actress (Bewitched) (d. 1974)* 10 &ndash; Costa, Australian politician (d. 1976)* 12 &ndash; Davis, Sr., American dancer (d. 1988)* 20 &ndash; van der Goes van Naters, Dutch politician (d. 2005) Deaths  January&ndash;June * 20 &ndash; Ruskin, English writer and social critic (b. 1819)* 31 &ndash; Sholto Douglas, 9th Marquess of Queensberry, Scottish nobleman and boxer (b. 1844)* 18 &ndash; L. Merriam, American politician (b. 1824)* 6** Daimler, German inventor and automotive pioneer (b. 1834)** Carl Bechstein, German piano maker (b. 1826)* 10 &ndash; Peter Emilius Hartmann, Danish composer (b. 1805).* 5** Louis Franois Bertrand, French mathematician (b. 1822)** Nuri Paa, Ottoman military leader (b. 1832)* 12 &ndash; Richard Cocke, American physician, homeopath, and a pioneer hypnotherapist (b. 1863).* 17 &ndash; George Curry, Wild West robber (Wild Bunch)  (shot) (b. 1864)* 19 &ndash; James Dawson, Australian activist (b. 1806)* 22 &ndash; Lamy, French soldier (b. 1858) (killed in battle)* 24 &ndash; Douglas Campbell, 8th Duke of Argyll, British politician (b.1823)* 30 &ndash; Jones, American railway engineer (b. 1863)* 1 &ndash; Munkcsy, Hungarian painter (b. 1844)* 9 &ndash; Brosbll, Danish author (b. 1816)* 18 &ndash; Gaspard Felix Ravaisson-Mollien, French philosopher (b. 1813)* 2** Ture, West African empire-builder (b. 1830)** Cook, American critic and writer (b. 1828)* 3 &ndash; Kingsley, English explorer and writer (b. 1862)* 5 &ndash; Crane, American author (b. 1871)* 11 &ndash; Boyd, American Confederate spy and actress (b. 1843)* 19 &ndash; Josephine of Baden (b. 1813) July&ndash;December * 5 &ndash;  Barnard, American educationalist (b. 1811)* 8 &ndash;  D. Cogswell, American philanthropist (b. 1820)* 29 &ndash; Umberto I, King of Italy (assassinated) (b. 1844)* 31 &ndash; Duke of Saxe-Coburg and Gotha, second son of Queen Victoria (b. 1844)* 7 &ndash; Liebknecht, German Social Democratic politician (b. 1826)* 10 &ndash; Russell, Baron Russell of Killowen, Lord Chief Justice of England (b. 1832)* 12 &ndash; Steinitz, Austrian-born chess player (b. 1836)* 16 &ndash; Maria de Ea de Queiroz, Portuguese writer (b. 1845)* 23 &ndash; Kiyotaka, Prime Minister of Japan (b. 1840)* 25 &ndash; Nietzsche, German philosopher and writer (b. 1844)* 23** Marsh Rice, American philanthropist and university founder (b. 1816)** Martnez Campos, Spanish revolutionary (b. 1831)* 29 &ndash; Fenton Cary, American politician (b. 1814)* 15 &ndash; Fibich, Czech composer (b. 1850)* 20 &ndash; Dudley Warner, American writer (b. 1829)* 22 &ndash; John Sherman, American politician (b.1823)* 28 &ndash; Mller, German philologist and Orientalist (b. 1823)* 22 &ndash; Sir Arthur Sullivan. English composer (b. 1842)* 30 &ndash; Wilde, Irish writer (b. 1854) References * Appletons annual cyclopaedia and register of important events...1900 (1901), vast compendium of data; global coverage online edition* Herbert C. Fyfe, Magazine, 1900: How Will The World End?* 1900 Coin Picturesaf:1900...ar::1900an:1900frp:1900ast:1900gn:1900av:1900ay:1900az:1900bn:nmap-bms:1900be:1900be-x-old:1900bh:bcl:1900bs:1900br:1900bg:1900ca:1900cv:1900cs:1900cbk-zam:1900co:1900cy:1900da:1900de:1900et:1900el:1900es:1900eo:1900eu:1900()hif:1900fo:1900fr:1900fy:1900ga:1900gv:1900gd:1900gl:1900gan:1900ko:1900hy:1900hi:hsb:1900hr:1900.io:1900ilo:1900id:1900ia:1900is:1900it:1900he:1900jv:1900kn:pam:1900ka:1900csb:1900kw:1900sw:1900(almanak gregoryen)ku:1900la:1900gadslb:1900m.lij:1900li:1900lmo:1900hu:1900mk:1900mg:1900mi:1900arz:1900ms:1900mn:1900nah:1900nl:1900 ja:1900nap:1900no:1900nn:1900nrm:1900nov:1900oc:1900mhr:1900uz:1900pa:pi:pnb:1900nds:1900pl:1900pt:19001900ro:1900qu:1900rue:1900sah:1900se:1900sq:1900scn:1900simple:1900sk:1900sl:1900so:1900ckb:srn:1900sr:1900sh:1900su:1900fi:1900sv:1900tl:1900ta:1900te:1900tet:19002443tr:1900tk:1900uk:1900ur:1900vec:1900vi:1900vo:1900fiu-vro:1900wa:1900vls:1900war:1900yi:1900yo:1900zh-yue:1900diq:1900bat-smg:1900zh:1900
34750
1965
__NOTOC__Year 1965 (MCMLXV) was a year starting on Friday (link will display the full calendar) of the calendar. Events  January * 1 &ndash; The ship SS Catala is driven onto the beach in Shores, Washington, stranding her.* 4 &ndash; U.S. President B. Johnson proclaims his Society during his of the Union Address.* 9 &ndash; The Cadet College formally opens for academic activities in East Pakistan (now Bangladesh).* 12 &ndash; Beach Murders: The bodies of two 15-year-olds, Christine Sharrock and Marianne Schmidt, are found at Beach, Sydney.* 14 &ndash; The Prime Minister of Ireland and the Taoiseach of the of Ireland meet for the first time in 43 years.* 19 &ndash; The unmanned 2 is launched on a suborbital test of various spacecraft systems.* 20 &ndash; B. Johnson is sworn in for his own full term as President.* 26 &ndash; Anti-Hindi agitations break out in India, because of which Hindi does not get National Language status and remains one of the 23 official languages of India.* 30 &ndash; State funeral of Sir Winston Churchill takes place with the largest assembly of statesmen in the world until the 2005 funeral of John Paul II.() February File:Flag of Canada.svg|thumb|180px|The newly adopted of Canada* 6 &ndash; Sir Matthews plays his final First Division game, at the record age of 50 years and 5 days.* 12 &ndash; African and Malagasy Common Organization (OCAM) (Organization Commune Africaine et Malgache) formed as successor to the Afro-Malagasy Union for Economic Cooperation (Union Africaine et Malgache de Cooperation Economique; UAMCE), formerly the African and Malagasy Union (Union Africaine et Malgache; UAM)).* 15 &ndash; A new red and white maple leaf design is inaugurated as the of Canada, replacing the Flag and the Red Ensign.* 18 &ndash; Gambia becomes independent from the Kingdom.* 20** 8 crashes into the Moon, after a successful mission of photographing possible landing sites for the program astronauts.** Hayri rgpl forms the new (interim) government of Turkey (29th government)* 22 &ndash; A new, revised, color production of and Hammersteins Cinderella airs on CBS. Ann Warren makes her TV debut in the title role. The show becomes an annual tradition. March * 2 &ndash; The Sound of Music premieres at the Rivoli Theater in New York City.* 7 &ndash; Bloody Sunday: Some 200 Alabama State Troopers clash with 525 civil rights demonstrators in Alabama.* 8 &ndash; War: Some 3,500 States Marines arrive in Vietnam, becoming the first American combat troops in Vietnam.* 9 &ndash; The second attempt to march from Selma to Alabama, under the leadership of Luther King, Jr., stops at the bridge that was the site of Bloody Sunday, to hold a prayer service and return to Selma, in obedience to a court restraining order.  supremacists beat up white Universalist minister J. Reeb later that day in Selma.* 10** Goldie, a Zoo golden eagle, is recaptured 12 days after her escape.** Engagement announced between Margriet of the Netherlands and van Vollenhoven, who will become the first commoner and the first Dutchman to marry into the Royal Family.* 11 &ndash; White Universalist minister J. Reeb, beaten by supremacists in Alabama on 9 following the second march from Selma, dies in a hospital in Alabama.*15 -- President LBJ makes his We Shall Overcome speech.* 16 &ndash; Police clash with 600 SNCC marchers in Alabama.* 17** In Alabama, 1,600 civil rights marchers demonstrate at the Courthouse.** In response to the events of March 7 and 9 in Selma, Alabama, President B. Johnson sends a bill to Congress that forms the basis for the Voting Rights Act of 1965.  It is passed by the Senate May 26, the House July 10, and signed into law by President Johnson Aug. 6.* 18** Cosmonaut Leonov, leaving his spacecraft 2 for 12 minutes, becomes the first person to walk in space.** A States federal judge rules that SCLC has the lawful right to march to Alabama to petition for redress of grievances.* 19 &ndash; The wreck of the Georgiana, reputed to have been the most powerful Confederate cruiser ever built and owned by the real Butler, is discovered off the of Palms, Carolina, by teenage diver Lee Spence, exactly 102 years after she was sunk with a million dollar cargo while attempting to run past the Union blockade into Charleston.* 20** Poupe de cire, poupe de son, sung by Gall (music and lyrics by Gainsbourg) wins the Song Contest 1965 for Luxembourg.** The War of 1965 begins.* 21** program: NASA launches 9, which is the last in a series of unmanned lunar probes.** Luther King, Jr. leads 3,200 rights activists in the third march from Selma, Alabama to the capitol in Montgomery.* 22 &ndash; Ceauescu becomes the first secretary of the Communist Party.* 23 &ndash; 3: NASA launches the States first 2-person crew (Grissom, John Young) into orbit.* 25 &ndash; Luther King, Jr. and 25,000 civil rights activists successfully end the 4-day march from Selma, Alabama, to the capitol in Montgomery.* 30** Funeral services are held for Detroit homemaker Liuzzo, who was shot dead by 4 Klansmen as she drove marchers back to Selma at night after the civil rights march.** Second ODECA charter, signed on 12 December 1962, effective. April * 3 &ndash; The worlds first space nuclear power reactor, SNAP-10A, is launched by the United States from Vandenberg AFB, California.  The reactor operates for 43 days and remains in Earth orbit.* 5 &ndash; At the Academy Awards, My Fair Lady wins 8 Academy Awards, including Best Picture and Best Director. Harrison wins an Oscar for Best Actor. Mary Poppins takes home 5 Oscars. Andrews wins an Award for Best Actress, for her portrayal in the role.  Brothers receives 2 Oscars including Song, Chim Cher-ee.* 6** The Early Bird satellite is launched. It becomes operational 2 and is placed in commercial service in June.** The British Government announced the cancellation of the TSR-2 aircraft project.* 9** The West German parliament extends the of limitations on Nazi crimes.** In Texas, the Harris County Domed Stadium (more commonly known as the Astrodome) opens.** The 100th anniversary of the end of the Civil War is observed.** Brown and the Peanuts Gang appear on the cover of Magazine.* 11 &ndash; The Sunday tornado outbreak of 1965: An estimated 51 tornadoes (47 confirmed) hit in 6 Midwestern states, killing between 256 to 271 people and injuring some 1,500 more.* 14 &ndash; In Cold Blood killers Hickock and Perry Smith, convicted of murdering 4 members of the Clutter family of Kansas, are executed by hanging at the Kansas State Penitentiary for Men in Kansas.* 17 &ndash; The first SDS march against the Vietnam War draws 25,000 protestors to Washington, DC.* 18 &ndash; Consecration of Clement of Ohrid Macedonian Orthodox Cathedral in Toronto, Canada.* 21 &ndash; The NY Worlds Fair in Meadows, NY, reopens.* 23 &ndash; The Way officially opens.* 24** The Yerevan demonstrations start in Yerevan, demanding recognition of the Genocide.** The bodies of Portuguese opposition politician Delgado and his secretary Arajaryr Moreira de Campos are found in a forest near Villanueva del Fresno, Spain (they were killed 12).** In the Republic, officers and civilians loyal to deposed President Bosch mutiny against the right-wing junta running the country, setting up a government.  Forces loyal to the deposed military-imposed government stage a countercoup the next day, and civil war breaks out, although the new government retains its hold on power.* 25 &ndash; On this Sunday morning teenage sniper Michael Clark kills three and wounds others shooting at cars from a hilltop along 101 just south of California. Sixteen year old Clark kills himself as police rush hilltop.* 28** U.S. troops are sent to the Republic by President B. Johnson, for the stated purpose of protecting U.S. citizens and preventing an alleged Communist takeover of the country, thus thwarting the possibility of another Cuba.** War: Minister of Australia Menzies announces that the country will substantially increase its number of troops in Vietnam, supposedly at the request of the Saigon government (it is later revealed that Menzies had asked the leadership in Saigon to send the request at the behest of the Americans).* 29 &ndash; Australia announces that it is sending an infantry battalion to support the Vietnam government. May * 1** Bob Askin replaces Renshaw as Premier of South Wales.** The of Dong-Yin occurs as a conflict between Taiwan and the Republic of China.** Liverpool wins the FA Cup Final, beating Leeds Utd 21.* 5 &ndash; Forty men burn their draft cards at the of California, Berkeley, and a coffin is marched to the Berkeley Draft Board.* 6 &ndash; A tornado outbreak near the Cities in Minnesota kills 13 and injures 683.* 12** Germany and Israel establish diplomatic relations.** The Italian liner T/S Michelangelo enters into service.* 13 &ndash; A West German of appeals condemns the behavior of ex-defense minister Franz Joseph Strauss during the scandal.* 21 &ndash; The largest teach-in to date begins at California, attended by 30,000.* 22 &ndash; The first skateboard championship is held.  In addition, several hundred Vietnam War protesters in Berkeley, California, march to the Draft Board again to burn 19 more cards. Johnson is hung in effigy.* 25 &ndash; Ali knocks out Liston in the first round of their championship rematch with the Phantom Punch at the Maine Civic Center in Lewiston.* 29 &ndash; A accident in Dhanbad, India kills 274.* 31 &ndash; Racing driver Clark wins the 500, and later wins the One world driving championship in the same year. June File:FIU Green Library.JPG|right|thumb|170px|Green Library at International University in FL* 1** International University is founded in FL.** A coal mine explosion in Fukuoka, Japan kills 237.* 2 &ndash; War: The first contingent of Australian combat troops arrives in Vietnam.* 3 &ndash; 4: Astronaut Higgins White makes the first U.S. walk.* 7 &ndash; A mining accident in Kakanj, and Herzegovina, results in 128 deaths.* 10 &ndash; War &ndash; of Dong Xoai: About 1,500 Vietcong mount a mortar attack on Xoai, overrunning its military headquarters and the adjoining militia compound.* 16 &ndash; A planned anti-war protest at Pentagon becomes a teach-in, with demonstrators distributing 50,000 leaflets in and around the building.* 19 &ndash; Boumdiennes Revolutionary Council ousts Ben Bella, in a bloodless coup in Algeria.* 20 &ndash; Police in Algiers break up demonstrations by people who have taken to the streets chanting slogans in support of deposed President Bella.* 22 &ndash; The on Basic Relations between Japan and the Republic of Korea is signed in Tokyo.* 25 &ndash; A U.S. Air Force Boeing C135-A bound for Okinawa crashes just after takeoff at El Toro in County, California, killing all 85 on board. July * July &ndash; Commonwealth secretariat created.* 14 &ndash; U.S. spacecraft 4 flies by Mars, becoming the first spacecraft to return images from the Red Planet.* 15 &ndash; Greek Prime minister George Papandreou and his government are dismissed by King Constantine II.* 16 &ndash; The Blanc Tunnel is inaugurated by presidents Saragat and de Gaulle.* 24 &ndash; War:  Four F-4C Phantoms escorting a bombing raid at Kang Chi are targeted by missiles, in the first such attack against American planes in the war. One is shot down and the other 3 sustain damage.* 25 &ndash; Dylan elicits controversy among folk purists by going electric at the Folk Festival.* 26 &ndash; The Maldives receive full independence from Great Britain.* 27 &ndash; Heath becomes Leader of the British Conservative Party.* 28 &ndash; War: U.S. President B. Johnson announces his order to increase the number of States troops in Vietnam from 75,000 to 125,000, and to more than double the number of men drafted per month - from 17,000 to 35,000.* 29 &ndash; War: The first 4,000 Airborne Division paratroopers arrive in Vietnam, landing at Ranh Bay.* 30 &ndash; on Poverty: U.S. President B. Johnson signs the Security Act of 1965 into law, establishing Medicare and Medicaid. August * 1 &ndash; Cigarette advertising is banned on television.* 6 &ndash; U.S. President B. Johnson signs the Rights Act of 1965 into law.* 7 &ndash; Abdul Rahman, Minister of Malaysia, recommends the expulsion of Singapore from the of Malaysia, negotiating its separation with Kuan Yew, Prime Minister of Singapore.* 9** Singapore is expelled from the Federation of Malaysia, which recognizes it as a sovereign nation.  Kuan Yew announces Singapores independence and assumes the position of Prime Minister of the new island nation.** An explosion at an Arkansas missile plant kills 53.** Indonesian president Sukarno collapses in public.* 11 &ndash; The Riots begin in Angeles, California.* 13 &ndash; The rock group Airplane debuts at the Matrix in Francisco, California and begins to appear there regularly.* 15 &ndash; Beatles perform the first stadium concert in the history of rock, playing at Stadium in York.* 18 &ndash; War &ndash; Starlite: 5,500 States Marines destroy a Cong stronghold on the Van Tuong peninsula in Ngai Province, in the first major American ground battle of the war. The Marines were tipped-off by a Viet Cong deserter who said that there was an attack planned against the U.S. base at Lai.* 19 &ndash; At the Auschwitz trial in Frankfurt, 66 ex-SS personnel receive sentences, 15 others smaller ones.* 20 &ndash; Myrick Daniels, an Episcopal seminarian from New Hampshire, is murdered in Hayneville, Alabama while working in the civil rights movement.* 21 &ndash; 5 (Cooper, Conrad) is launched on the first 1-week flight, as well as the first test of cells for electrical power.* 30** Stengel announces his retirement after 55 years in baseball.** musician Dylan releases his influential album 61 Revisited, featuring the song a Rolling Stone.** An avalanche buries a dam construction site at Saas-Fee, Switzerland killing 90 workers.* 31 &ndash; President Johnson signs a law penalizing the burning of draft cards with up to 5 years in prison and a $1,000 fine. September * 2 &ndash; Pakistani troops enter the Indian sector of Kashmir, while Indian troops try to invade Lahore.* 6 &ndash; Republic Of Pakistan observes its Defence day.* 7** The Republic of China announces that it will reinforce its troops on the Indian border.** War: In a follow-up to Augusts Starlite, States Marines and Vietnamese forces initiate Operation Piranha on the Batangan Peninsula,  south of the Chu Lai Marine base.* 8 &ndash; India opens 2 additional fronts against Pakistan.* 9** Koufax pitches a game in a baseball match against the Cubs. The opposing pitcher, Hendley, allows only 1 run, which is unearned.** U.N. Secretary General Thant negotiates with Pakistan President Ayub Khan.** Thant recommends China for Nations membership.** Betsy roars ashore near Orleans, Louisiana with winds of , causing 76 deaths and $1.42 billion in damage. The storm is the first hurricane to cause $1 billion in unadjusted damages, giving it the nickname Billion Dollar Betsy. It is the last major hurricane to strike New Orleans until Katrina 40 years later.* 13 &ndash; The Congress of Arab Countries begins in Casablanca; Bourguiba of Tunisia boycotts the meeting.* 14 &ndash; The fourth and final period of the Vatican Council opens.* 15 &ndash; Mary Poppins comes out in theaters in France.* 16** China protests against Indian provocations in its border region.** In Iraq, Prime Minister Abd ar-Razzaqs attempted coup fails.* 17 &ndash; King II of Greece forms a new government with Prime Minister Stephanopoulos, in an attempt to end a 2-year-old political crisis.* 18** In Denmark, Srensen shoots 4 policemen in pursuit; he is apprehended the same day.** Ikeya-Seki is first sighted by Japanese astronomers.** Soviet Premier Kosygin invites the leaders of India and Pakistan to meet in the Union to negotiate.* 22 &ndash; Radio Peking announces that Indian troops have dismantled their equipment on the Chinese side of the border.* 24** Fighting resumes between Indian and Pakistani troops.** The British governor of Aden cancels the constitution and takes direct control of the protectorate, due to the bad security situation.* 25 &ndash; The Tom & Jerry cartoon series makes its world broadcast premiere on CBS.* 27 &ndash; The largest tanker ship at the time, Tokyo Maru, is launched in Yokohama, Japan.* 28 &ndash; Castro announces that anyone who wants to can emigrate to the States.* 28 &ndash; Volcano in Luzon, Philippines, erupts, killing hundreds.* 30** The Indonesian army, led by General Suharto, crushes an alleged communist coup attempt (see to the New Order and September Movement).** Classic family sci-fi show Thunderbirds debuts on ITV. October * 3** Castro announces that Guevara has resigned and left the country.** U.S. President B. Johnson signs an immigration bill which abolishes quotas based on origin.* 4** At least 150 killed when a commuter train derails at the outskirts of Durban, KwaZulu-Natal, Africa.** Prime minister Smith of Rhodesia and Bottomley of the of Nations begin negotiations in London.** Paul VI visits the United States.   He appears for a Mass in Yankee Stadium and makes a speech at the Nations.** The of California, Irvine opens its doors.* 5 &ndash; Pakistan severs relations with Malaysia because of their disagreement in the UN.* 6 &ndash; Brady, a 27-year-old stock clerk from Hyde in Cheshire, is arrested for allegedly hacking to death (with a hatchet) 17-year-old apprentice electrician Edward Evans at a house on the Hattersley estate.* 7 &ndash; Seven Japanese fishing boats are sunk off Guam by super typhoon Carmen; 209 are killed.* 8** The Indonesian army instigates the arrest and execution of communists which last until March 1966 (see killings of 196566).** The Olympic Committee admits Germany as a member.** The Office Tower opens in London.* 9** University presents the map.** A brigade of Korean soldiers arrive in Vietnam.* 10 &ndash; The first group of Cuban refugees travels to the U.S.* 12** Borten forms a government in Norway.** The U.N. General Council recommends that the Kingdom try everything to stop a rebellion in Rhodesia.* 13 &ndash; Congo President Kasavubu fires Prime Minister Tshombe and forms a provisional government, with Kimba in a leading position.* 15 &ndash; War: The Worker Movement stages an anti-war protest in Manhattan. One draft card burner is arrested, the first under the new law.* 16** Police find a girls body on Moor near Oldham in Lancashire. The body is quickly identified as that of 10-year-old Ann Downey, who disappeared on Day the previous year from a fairground in the Ancoats area of Manchester. Brady, arrested for the murder of a 17-year-old man in nearby Hattersley, is charged with murdering Lesley, as is his 23-year-old girlfriend Hindley.** Anti-war protests draw 100,000 in 80 U.S. cities and around the world.* 17 &ndash; The Worlds Fair at Flushing Meadows, NY, closes.  Due to financial losses, some of the projected site park improvements fail to materialize.* 18 &ndash; The Indonesian government outlaws the Party of Indonesia.* 20 &ndash; Erhard is re-elected Chancellor of Germany (he had first been elected in 1963).* 21** Ikeya-Seki approaches perihelion, passing 450,000 kilometers from the sun.** The OAU meets in Accra, Ghana.* 22** French authors Andr Figueras and Laurent are fined for their comments against De Gaulle.** African countries demand that the Kingdom use force to prevent Rhodesia from declaring unilateral independence.** Colonel Soglo stages a second coup in Dahomey.* 24**British Prime Minister Wilson and Commonwealth Secretary Bottomley travel to Rhodesia for negotiations.**British police find the decomposed body of a boy on Moor.* 25 &ndash; The Union declares its support of African countries in case Rhodesia unilaterally declares independence.* 26** Anti-government demonstrations occur in the Republic.** Police discover the body of Likens in Indianapolis, Indiana.* 27** Brazilian president de Alencar Castelo Branco removes power from parliament, legal courts and opposition parties.** Demirel of AP forms the new government of Turkey (30th government)* 28** French Minister de Murville travels to Moscow.** Paul VI announces that the council has decided that Jews are not collectively responsible for the killing of Christ.** In Louis, Missouri, the -tall parabolic steel Arch is completed.** Ben Barka, a Moroccan politician, is kidnapped in Paris and never seen again.* 29** Brady and Hindley appear in court, charged with the murders of Edward Evans (17), Lesley Ann Downey (10), and John Kilbride (12).** An 80-kiloton nuclear device is detonated at Island, Alaska as part of the Uniform program, code-named Project Long Shot.* 30** War: Near Nang, States Marines repel an intense attack by Cong forces, killing 56 guerrillas. A sketch of Marine positions is found on the dead body of a 13-year-old Vietnamese boy who sold drinks to the Marines the day before.** In DC, a pro-Vietnam War march draws 25,000. November * 1 &ndash; A trolleybus plunges into the Nile at Cairo killing 74 passengers.* 2** Republican Lindsay is elected mayor of York City.** Quaker Morrison, 32, sets himself on fire in front of Pentagon.* 3 &ndash; French President De Gaulle announces that he will stand for re-election.* 5 &ndash; law is announced in Rhodesia. The UN General Assembly accepts British intent to use force against Rhodesia if necessary by a vote of 829.* 6 &ndash; Freedom Flights begin: Cuba and the States formally agree to start an airlift for Cubans who want to go to the United States (by 1971 250,000 Cubans take advantage of this program).* 7 &ndash; Pillsburys world-famous mascot, the Doughboy, is created.* 8** War &ndash; Hump: The Airborne is ambushed by over 1,200 Cong.** The Indian Ocean Territory is created, consisting of Archipelago, Aldabra, Farquhar and Roches islands (on June 23, 1976 Aldabra, Farquhar and Des Roches are returned to the Seychelles).** The (Abolition of Death Penalty) Act 1965 is given Royal Assent, suspending the penalty for murder in the United Kingdom; renewal of the Act in 1969 made the abolition permanent.** The opera of our Lives debuts on NBC.* 9** Blackout of 1965: Several states (VT, NH, MA, CT, RI, NY and portions of NJ) and parts of Canada are hit by a series of blackouts lasting up to 13 hours.** War: In York City, 22-year-old Worker Movement member Allen LaPorte sets himself on fire in front of the Nations building in protest of the war.* 11** In Rhodesia (modern-day Zimbabwe), the white-minority government of Smith unilaterally declares independence.** Airlines Flight 227 a 727-22, crashes short of the runway and catches fire at Lake City International Airport in Lake City, Utah. 43 out of 91 passengers and crew perish.* 12 &ndash; A UN Security Council resolution (voted 100) recommends that other countries not recognize independent Rhodesia.* 13 &ndash; The SS Yarmouth Castle burns and sinks  off Nassau, with the loss of 90 lives.* 14 &ndash; Vietnam War &ndash; of the Ia Drang: In the Drang Valley of the Central Highlands in Vietnam, the first major engagement of the war between regular States and Vietnamese forces begins.* 15 &ndash; U.S. racer Breedlove sets a new speed record of .* 16 &ndash; program: The Union launches the 3 space probe from Baikonur, Kazakhstan toward Venus (on March 1, 1966 it became the first spacecraft to reach the surface of another planet).* 20 &ndash; The UN Security Council recommends that all states stop trading with Rhodesia.* 21 &ndash; Mathieu sings on Frances Tl-Dimanche and begins her successful singing career (Dimanche is French for Sunday).* 22** of La Mancha opens in a Greenwich Village theatre in New York and eventually becomes one of the greatest musical hits of all time, winning a Award for its star, Kiley.** Dylan weds Lowndes.** UNDP established as a specialized agency of the Nations.* 23 &ndash; Soviet general Mikhail Kazakov assumes command of the Pact.* 24 &ndash; Congolese lieutenant general Mobutu ousts Kasavubu and declares himself president.* 26 &ndash; At the Hammaguira launch facility in the Desert, France launches a Diamant-A rocket with its first satellite, Asterix-1 on board, becoming the third country to enter space.* 27** Tens of thousands of Vietnam War protesters picket the House, then march on the Monument.** War: Pentagon tells U.S. President B. Johnson that if planned major sweep operations to neutralize Cong forces during the next year are to succeed, the number of American troops in Vietnam will have to be increased from 120,000 to 400,000.* 28 &ndash; Vietnam War: In response to U.S. President B. Johnsons call for more flags in Vietnam, Philippines President-elect Marcos announces he will send troops to help fight in Vietnam.* 29 &ndash; The Canadian satellite 2 is launched. December * 1 &ndash; The Security Force is established in India as a special force to guard the borders.* 3** The first British aid flight arrives in Lusaka; Zambia had asked for British help against Rhodesia.** Members of the of African Unity decide to sever diplomatic relations with the Kingdom, unless the British government ends the rebellion of Rhodesia by mid-December.** The Beatles release Soul.* 5 &ndash; de Gaulle is re-elected as French president with 10,828,421 votes.* 8** Rhodesian prime minister Smith warns that Rhodesia will resist a embargo by neighboring countries with force.** The Race Relations Act becomes the first legislation to address racial discrimination in the United Kingdom.** The Vatican Council closes.* 9 &ndash; Charlie Brown Christmas, the first Peanuts television special, debuts on CBS, quickly becoming an annual tradition.* 15** Free Trade Association (CARIFTA) formed.** Tanzania and Guinea sever relations with the Kingdom.** 6 and 7 perform the first controlled rendezvous in Earth orbit.* 17 &ndash; The British government begins an oil embargo against Rhodesia; the States joins the effort.* 20 &ndash; WFP made a permanent UN agency.* 21** The Union announces that it has shipped rockets to Vietnam.** Soviet scientists condemn Lysenko for pseudoscience.** In West Germany, Adenauer resigns as chairman of the Christian Democratic Party.** A new, 1-hour German-American production of Nutcracker, with an international cast that includes Villella in the title role, makes its U.S. TV debut. It is repeated annually by CBS over the next 3 years, but after that, it is virtually forgotten, until it is issued on DVD in 2009 by Warner Archive.* 22** A coup occurs in Dahomey.** A  limit is imposed on British roads.** Release of Leans film of Doctor Zhivago, starring Sharif and Christie.* 25 &ndash; The Yemeni Unionist Peoples Organisation is founded in Taiz.* 27 &ndash; The British platform Sea Gem collapses in the Sea.* 28 &ndash; Italian Foreign Minister Amintore Fanfani resigns.* 30** President Kaunda of Zambia announces that Zambia and the United Kingdom have agreed on a deadline before which the Rhodesian white government should be ousted.** Marcos becomes of the Philippines.* 31 &ndash; Bokassa takes power in the Africa Republic. Date unknown * Tokyo officially becomes the largest city of the world, taking the lead from York City.(http://geography.about.com/library/weekly/aa011201a.htm)* The for National Academic Awards is established in the UK.* TAT-4 cable goes into operation.* Aborigines are given the vote in Queensland. World population  Births  January * 3 &ndash; A. LaChance, American Author* 4 &ndash; Ormond, British actress* 5** Jones, British footballer-turned-actor** Sjoberg, Swedish high jumper* 6 &ndash; Konnan, Cuban-born professional wrestler* 9 ** Khan, Indian choreographer, film director** Richardson, British actress* 12** Borschevsky, Russian professional ice hockey player (retired)** Zombie, American musician* 14** Fearnley-Whittingstall, British chef** Basayev, Chechen terrorist (d. 2006)** Delissen, Dutch field hockey player** Essensa, Canadian ice hockey player* 15 &ndash; Nesbitt, Northern Irish actor* 18 ** Attell, American comedian** Behan, Irish actor* 20 &ndash; Countess of Wessex* 22** Jazzy Jeff, American rapper and actor** Lane, American actress* 24 &ndash; Awesome, American professional wrestler (d. 2007)* 25 &ndash; Tikkanen, Finnish ice hockey player* 26 &ndash; Yurchenko, Soviet gymnast* 27 &ndash; Cumming, Scottish actor* 29 &ndash; Haek, Czech hockey player February * 1** Lee, Chinese-American actor (d. 1993)** Fenn, American actress** Stphanie of Monaco* 3 &ndash; Tierney, American actress* 4 &ndash; Brown, American football player (d. 1992)* 5 &ndash; Hagi, Romanian footballer* 7 &ndash; Rock, American actor and comedian* 8 &ndash; Cheung, Hong Kong actor* 11 &ndash; Stephen Gregory, American actor* 17&ndash; Bay, American film director.* 18 &ndash; Dre, American rapper and music producer* 22 &ndash; Karr, American director and photographer* 23** Dell, American computer manufacturer** Davis, American actress* 27 &ndash; Sundstrm, Swedish sound editor, sound designer and musician* 28 &ndash; Gok-ji, South Korean film editor March * 1** Booker T, American professional wrestler, 5-time WCW World Champion** Elliott, Canadian jockey* 3 &ndash; Stojkovic, Serbian footballer and coach* 4** Gant, American baseball player** Shearer, Scottish castaway** W. S. Anderson, British filmmaker, producer and screenwriter** WestBam (Maximillian Lenz), German rave techno DJ* 7 &ndash; Parnevik, Swedish golfer* 8 &ndash; Smith, American basketball player* 9 &ndash; Santiago, American baseball player* 10 &ndash; Woodson, American football player* 11** Jackson, Jr., American politician** Llewelyn-Bowen, British designer and television presenter* 12** Finley, American baseball player** Umarova, Chechen singer and actress* 14** Kevin Brown, American baseball player** Khan, Indian Bollywood actor, film diector / producer, film editor, script writer* 24 &ndash; Mark Calaway, American professional wrestler (Undertaker)* 25** Jessica Parker, American actress** Kostadinova, Bulgarian high jumper and president of the Olympic Committee** Johnson, American basketball player and coach* 27 &ndash; Ribeiro, Portuguese musician and composer (Madredeus) (d. 2010)* 29 &ndash; Patoulidou, Greek athlete April * 1 &ndash; Mark Jackson, American basketball player and analyst* 2 &ndash; King, American victim of police brutality* 3 ** Hassan, Pakistani pop singer (d. 2000)** Anne Haddock, American actress* 4 &ndash; Downey Jr., American actor* 6** Black, American musician** Reinisch, German swimmer* 7 &ndash; Bellamy, American actor and comedian* 11 &ndash; van Asperen, Dutch computer scientist* 12 &ndash; OBrien (II) (actor), American actor-producer* 13** Real Darren Stevens, Canadian radio personality** Pouchulu, Argentine architect* 15 &ndash; Perry, American musician* 16** Lawrence, American actor, comedian, and producer** Cryer, American actor* 21 &ndash; Belfour, Canadian hockey player* 23 &ndash; Tenzing Norgay, Indian mountain climber* 26 &ndash; Kevin James, American comedian and actor May * 3 &ndash; Mitchell, Irish playwright* 4 &ndash; Kocaman, Turkish footballer* 7** Hart, Canadian professional wrestler (d. 1999)** Whiteside, Northern Irish football player* 9 &ndash; Yzerman, Canadian hockey player* 10 &ndash; Evangelista, Canadian supermodel* 11 &ndash; del Rosario, Filipino Olympic athlete and actor* 13** Antonio Delgado, Venezuelan mountain climber (d. 2006)** Chapman, American Bounty Hunter** Ota, Japanese comedian* 14 &ndash; Colfer, Irish novelist* 16 &ndash; Novoselic, American rock bassist (Nirvana)* 17 &ndash; Reznor, American rock musician (Inch Nails)* 19 &ndash; Dhondt, French singer known as Boris* 23 &ndash; Sanchs Hontiyuelo, Spanish footballer* 24** Watanabe, Japanese anime director** C. Reilly, American actor** Franco, Paraguayan golfer* 25 &ndash; Jammeh, of the Gambia* 27 &ndash; Bridges, American actor* 31 &ndash; Shields, American actress and supermodel June * 1** Short, English chess player** Lazutina, Russian cross-country skier* 2 &ndash; Steve and Waugh, Australian cricketers* 4 &ndash; Doohan, Australian motorcycle racer* 7** Foley, American professional wrestler** Franois, French footballer and singer** Hirst, British artist** Roque, French singer* 8 ** Chavis, American professional wrestler (Tatanka)** Ritz, former MLB pitcher* 10** Ferres, German actress** Hurley, English model and actress** Graham, American sportscaster* 11 &ndash; Uribe Garza, morbidly obese Mexican* 15 &ndash; Hopkins, American boxer* 17 &ndash; OKearney, Irish ultra runner and professional poker player* 23 &ndash; Arthurs, British rock guitarist (Oasis)* 26 &ndash; Breen, American sports announcer* 27 &ndash; Rehmani, Pakistani Naat Khawn, Poet, Writer* 28 &ndash; Densamo, Ethiopian long-distance runner* 29 &ndash; Weiner, American writer, director, and producer of television drama July * 1 &ndash; Zwart, Norwegian film director* 3 &ndash; Hashimoto, Japanese professional wrestler* 4** Grant, American basketball player** Whiley, British radio DJ* 5 &ndash; Katsenelenbogen, Israeli jazz pianist* 11 &ndash; Hoost, Dutch kickboxer* 17 &ndash; Craig Morgan, American singer* 19** Scott, American sports reporter** Glennie, Scottish virtuoso percussionist* 20 &ndash; Cooley, at large for CNET* 21 &ndash; Bergsson, Icelandic footballer* 22 &ndash; Michaels, American professional wrestler* 23 &ndash; Slash (Saul Hudson), American rock musician (N Roses)* 24 &ndash; Blades, American National Football League wide receiver* 25 &ndash; Weil, Union Executive Vice-President* 26 &ndash; Piven, American actor* 27 &ndash; Luis Chilavert, Paraguayan footballer* 31 &ndash; K. Rowling, English author August * 2** Ng, Hong Kong actress** Watanabe, Japanese baseball player and coach* 4** Reinfeldt, Swedish Prime Minister** Lehane, American crime writer* 6** David Robinson, American basketball player** Speight, British television presenter (d. 2008)* 9 &ndash; Kar-lok, Hong Kong actor* 10** E. Smith, American jockey** John Starks, American basketball player** Christian, American actress, writer, singer, musician, and director* 11 &ndash; Martin, American actor* 14 &ndash; Bart, French actress* 15 &ndash; Vincent Kuk, Hong Kong director and actor* 18 &ndash; Kikkawa, Japanese singer* 19 &ndash; de Medeiros, Portuguese actress* 23 &ndash; Avary, American film writer/director/producer* 24** Matlin, American actress** Miller, American basketball player* 25 &ndash; Zapata, American singer (d. 1993)* 28** Tapping, Canadian actress** Twain, Canadian country singer and songwriter* 30 &ndash; Peter Grant, Scottish footballer and football manager September * 1 &ndash; McLachlan, Australian actor and singer* 2** Lewis, British boxer** Sen-Gupta, Indian independent filmmaker* 3 &ndash; Sheen, American actor* 4 &ndash; Lam, Kong actor and singer* 9 &ndash; Marie, American actress* 10 &ndash; Pastors, Dutch politician* 11 &ndash; Heyman, American wrestling promoter, ECW* 12 &ndash; Kristiansen, Norwegian cartoonist, designer and TV host* 14** Medvedev, Russian President since 2008** Pearson, American actor, comedian and juggler* 16 &ndash; Kurtzman, American actress, director, and producer* 17 &ndash; Chandler, American actor* 19 &ndash; Paturel, French singer* 20 &ndash; Rusler, American actor* 21** Hines, American actress** Vuoksenmaa, Finnish film director* 25 &ndash; Pippen, American basketball player* 26 &ndash; Lencastre, Portuguese actress* 27** MacKay, Canadian politician** Kerr, American basketball player* 30 &ndash; Madigan, American comedienne October * 1** Keller, German field hockey player** Ronning, Canadian ice hockey player* 4** Melendez, American TV announcer** Solomon, Nauruan politician** Ward, American boxer* 5** Lemieux, Canadian ice hockey player** Roy, Canadian ice hockey player* 9 &ndash; Ceron, Mexican long-distance runner* 10 &ndash; Penn, American actor (d. 2006)* 11 &ndash; Roy, Indian film and television actor* 14** Coogan, British comedian and actor** Koukias, Australian composer* 16 &ndash; Lamacq, British radio DJ* 17 &ndash; de Silva, Sri Lankan cricketer* 18** Stigers, American jazz vocalist and saxophonist** Naik, Indian Islamic speaker and doctor* 19 &ndash; Pennington, American television presenter* 20 &ndash; Shtalenkov, Russian ice hockey player* 26** Kwok, Kong singer and actor** Rowan, Canadian actress** Kenneth Rutherford, New Zealand cricketer* 29 &ndash; Clark, Canadian politician November * 2 &ndash; Khan, Indian actor, film / television producer, television presenter* 3 &ndash; Scott, French novelist* 4 &ndash; Static, American singer (Static-X)* 6 &ndash; Graffin, American rock singer (Religion)* 7 &ndash; Wodars, German athlete* 9 &ndash; Terfel, Welsh baritone* 10 &ndash; Irvine, Northern Irish racecar driver* 19** Paulo Barreto, Brazilian cryptographer** Blanc, French football player and manager* 20 &ndash; Hayashi, Japanese rock composer, piano and drummer (Japan)* 21** Bjrk, Icelandic singer, songwriter, and musician** Siddig, Sudanese-born English actor* 23** Frye, American wrestler and mixed martial arts fighter** Gataullin, Uzbek-born, Russian pole-vaulter* 25 &ndash; Carter, American football player* 28 &ndash; Beagrie, English footballer* 30** Stiller, American actor** Tenzing, Indian mountaineer December * 3** Steve Harris, American actor** Witt, German figure skater* 4 &ndash; DeSando, American actor* 5 &ndash; Palmer, English footballer* 8 &ndash; Lau Kar-ling, Chinese actress* 10 &ndash; Giraldo, American comedian (d. 2010)* 15 &ndash; Fabin Artime, Argentine footballer* 18 &ndash; Moshoeu, South African footballer* 19 &ndash; Steen, Canadian actress* 21 &ndash; Dick, American actor* 22 &ndash; Lee Berger American-born explorer and paleoanthropologist* 27 &ndash; Khan, Indian actor, television presenter* 28 &ndash; Levandi, Estonian Nordic combined skier* 30** Fleiss, American madam** Kelli Simon, American actress* 31** Nicholas Sparks, American author** Li, Chinese actress Date unknown * Joseph, American composer, pianist, and keyboardist* Seawright, Irish photographer* Noland, Vietnamese-American journalist Deaths  January * 4 &ndash; S. Eliot, American-born writer, Nobel Prize laureate (b. 1888)* 10 &ndash; Fleet, English sailor and lookout aboard the  RMS Titanic (b. 1887)* 12 &ndash; Hansberry, American writer (b. 1930)* 14 &ndash; MacDonald, American actress and singer (b. 1903)* 20 &ndash; Freed, American disc jockey (b. 1922)* 24 &ndash; Churchill, Minister of the United Kingdom, recipient of the Prize in Literature (b. 1874)* 28 &ndash; Weygand, French soldier (b. 1867)* 28 &ndash; Freeman, English cricketer (b. 1888) February * 5 &ndash; Bacon, American actor (b. 1893)* 7 &ndash; ONeil, stage & film actress, friend of Borden  (b. 1874)* 13 &ndash; Gloria Morgan-Vanderbilt, Swiss-born socialite (b. 1906)* 15 &ndash; King Cole, American singer and musician (b. 1919)* 19 &ndash; Taylor, American stage, film and television actor (b. 1883)* 21 &ndash; X, American activist (assassinated) (b. 1925)* 22 &ndash; Frankfurter, U.S. Supreme Court Justice (b. 1882)* 23 &ndash; Laurel, British actor (b. 1890)* 26 &ndash; Adamski, Polish-born alleged UFO traveler (b. 1891)* 28 &ndash; Scharf, former of Austria (b. 1890) March * 6 &ndash; Dumont, American actress (b. 1889)* 7 &ndash; Mountbatten, Queen of Sweden and second wife of King Gustaf VI Adolf (b. 1889)* 13 ** Gini, Italian statistician (b. 1884)** S. Noli, Albanian bishop, poet, and political figure (b. 1882)* 17** Alonzo Stagg, American baseball, basketball, and football player and coach (b. 1862)** Cunard, English writer, heiress and political activist (b. 1896)* 18** King I of Egypt (b. 1920)** Quinlan, American Chicago Cubs radio broadcaster (b. 1927)* 23 &ndash; Murray, stage & silent screen star (b. 1889)* 28** Hoxie, American actor, rodeo performer (b. 1885)** Princess Royal and Countess of Harewood (b. 1897)** Beesly, British Olympic gold medal-winning rower (b. 1907)* 30 &ndash; Showalter Hench, American physician, recipient of the Prize in Physiology or Medicine (b. 1896) April * 3** Enright, American film director (b. 1896)** Kirchweger, Austrian communist and resistance fighter (b. 1897 or 1898)* 8 &ndash; Hanson, Swedish actor (b. 1886)* 10 &ndash; Darnell, American actress (b. 1923)* 14 &ndash; Perry Smith (b. 1928) and Hickock (b. 1931), American murderers of the Clutters in 1959 (executed)* 16 &ndash; Chaplin, American actor (b. 1885)* 18 &ndash; Gonzlez Camarena, Mexican inventor (b. 1917)* 21 &ndash; Victor Appleton, English physicist, Nobel Prize laureate (b. 1892)* 24** Madden, English-born gangster (b. 1891)** Dresser, American actress (b. 1878)* 27 &ndash; R. Murrow, American journalist (b. 1908)* 30 &ndash; Chandler, American actress (b. 1906) May * 1 &ndash; Jones, American musician and bandleader (b. 1911)* 7 &ndash; Sheeler, American photographer (b. 1883)* 9 &ndash; Figl, former of Austria (b. 1902)*10 &ndash; van Mook, Acting of the Dutch East Indies from 1942 to 1948 (b. 1894)* 14 &ndash; Perkins, First woman appointed as a United States Presidential cabinet member (Labor) (b. 1880)* 18 &ndash; Cohen, Israeli spy (b. 1924)* 22 &ndash; Christopher Stone, first disc jockey in the United Kingdom (b. 1882)* 23** David Smith, American sculptor (b. 1906)** Webb, American baseball player (b. 1897)* 25 &ndash; Sonny Boy Williamson, American blues musician (b. 1899) June * 7 &ndash; Holliday, American actress (b. 1921)* 13 &ndash; Buber, Austrian-Israeli philosopher (b. 1878)* 15** Cochran, American actor (b. 1917)** Bill Gardner, American law enforcement agent and one of Nesss Untouchables (b. 1884)** A. Speiser, American Bible scholar (b. 1902)* 20 &ndash; Baruch, Financier and Presidential adviser (b. 1870)* 22 &ndash; O. Selznick, American film producer (b. 1902)* 23 &ndash; Boland, veteran stage & screen actress (b. 1880)* 24** Mills, British boxing champion (b. 1919).** Macdonald Beaumont, English legal pioneer (b. 1884)* 26 &ndash; Beckwith, English actor (b. 1908)* 28 &ndash; Nichols, American jazz cornettist (b. 1905)* 30 &ndash; Barriscale, American actress (b. 1884) July * 1 &ndash; Hammond, English cricketer (b. 1903)* 7 &ndash; Sharett, second Minister of Israel (b. 1894)* 14** Adlai Stevenson, American politician (b. 1900)** Woosnam, English sportsman (b. 1892)* 19** Beatty, American animal trainer (b. 1903)** Rhee, First President of Korea (b. 1875)* 24 &ndash; Bennett, American actress (b. 1904)* 28 &ndash; Edogawa, Japanese author and critic (b. 1894)* 30 &ndash; Tanizaki, Japanese writer (b. 1886) August * 6** Carroll, American actress (b. 1903)** Sloane, American actor (b. 1909)* 8 &ndash; Jackson, American author (b. 1916)* 9 &ndash; Hale, American actor (b. 1882)* 13 &ndash; Ikeda, former Minister of Japan (b. 1899)* 25 &ndash; Graham, American baseball player* 27 &ndash; Corbusier, Swiss architect (b. 1887)* 28 &ndash; Racah, Israeli physicist (b. 1909) September * 4** Schweitzer, Alsatian physician and missionary, recipient of the Peace Prize (b. 1875)** Bossom, Baron Bossom, English architect and politician (b. 1881)* 8** Staudinger, German chemist, Nobel Prize laureate (b. 1881)** Dandridge, American actress (b. 1922)* 10 &ndash; Jordan, American actor (b. 1923)* 14 &ndash; J.W. Hearne, English cricketer (b. 1891)* 15 &ndash; Steve Brown, American musician (b. 1890)* 16 &ndash; Quimby, American animated film producer (b. 1886)* 25 &ndash; Hugh Tudor, British general (b. 1871)* 27** William Stanier, English steam locomotive engineer (Midland and Scottish Railway) (b. 1876)** Bow, American silent film actress (b. 1905) October * 1 &ndash; Hughes, Welsh actor (b. 1894)* 3 &ndash; Scott, American actor (b. 1914)* 6 &ndash; Edward Evans, Murder victim (b. 1948* 11** Lange, American photographer (b. 1895)** Stampfli, of the Swiss Federal Council (b. 1884)* 12 &ndash; Hermann Mller, Swiss chemist, recipient of the Prize in Physiology or Medicine (b. 1899)* 14 &ndash; Jarrell, American poet (b. 1914)* 15 &ndash; Fraenkel, Israeli mathematician and recipient of the Prize (b. 1891)* 17 &ndash; John Barton King, American cricketer (b. 1873)* 18 &ndash; Travers, English actor (b. 1874)* 21 &ndash; McDonald, American actress (b. 1923)* 26 &ndash; Likens, American murder victim (b. 1949)* 29 &ndash; Miller Anderson, American Olympic diver (b. 1922)* 30 &ndash; Schlesinger, Sr., American historian (b. 1888)* 31 &ndash; Johnson, American actress (b. 1913) November * 6** Varse, French-born composer (b. 1883)** Clarence Williams, American musician (b. 1893)* 8 &ndash; Kilgallen, American newspaper columnist (b. 1913)* 12 &ndash; Taher Saifuddin, Indian Bohra spiritual leader (b. 1888)* 16** Blackstone, Sr., American magician (b. 1885)** T. Cosgrave, Irish politician (b. 1880)* 18 &ndash; A. Wallace, President of the United States (b. 1888)* 24 &ndash; III Al-Salim Al-Sabah, Emir of Kuwait (b. 1895)* 25 &ndash; Dame Hess, English pianist (b. 1890) December * 5 &ndash; Erlanger, Nobel Prize laureate (b. 1874)* 16 &ndash; Somerset Maugham, English writer (b. 1874)* 22 ** Dimbleby, English broadcaster (b. 1913)** Al Ritz, American actor (b. 1901)* 24 &ndash; M. Branham, American minister (b. 1909)* 29** S. Nugent, American journalist (b. 1908)** Yamada, Japanese composer and conductor (b. 1886) Nobel Prizes * Physics &ndash; Tomonaga, Schwinger, Richard P. Feynman* Chemistry &ndash; Burns Woodward* Physiology or Medicine &ndash; Franois Jacob, Andr Lwoff, Monod* Literature &ndash; Aleksandrovich Sholokhov* Peace &ndash; United Nations Childrens Fund (UNICEF) References af:1965...ar::1965an:1965roa-rup:1965frp:1965ast:1965gn:1965av:1965ay:1965az:1965bn:nmap-bms:1965be:1965be-x-old:1965bh:bcl:1965bs:1965br:1965bg:1965ca:1965cv:1965cs:1965cbk-zam:1965co:1965cy:1965da:1965pdc:1965de:1965et:1965el:1965es:1965eo:1965eu:1965()hif:1965fo:1965fr:1965fy:1965fur:1965ga:1965gv:1965gag:1965gd:1965gl:1965gan:1965ko:1965hy:1965hi:hr:1965.io:1965ilo:1965id:1965ia:1965ie:1965is:1965it:1965he:1965jv:1965kn:pam:1965ka:1965csb:1965kk:1965kw:1965sw:1965(almanak gregoryen)ku:1965la:1965gadslb:1965m.lij:1965li:1965ln:1965jbo:1965moilmo:1965hu:1965mk:1965ml:1965mi:1965arz:1965ms:1965nah:1965nl:1965ne: ja:1965nap:1965no:1965nn:1965nrm:1965nov:1965oc:1965mhr:1965or:uz:1965pa:pi:pnb:1965pap:1965tpi:1965nds:1965pl:1965pt:1965ty:19651965ro:1965qu:1965rue:1965sah:1965se:1965sq:1965scn:1965simple:1965sk:1965sl:1965ckb:sr:1965sh:1965su:1965fi:1965sv:1965tl:1965ta:1965te:1965tet:19652508tr:1965tk:1965uk:1965ur:1965vec:1965vi:1965vo:1965fiu-vro:1965wa:1965vls:1965war:1965yi:1965yo:1965zh-yue:1965diq:1965bat-smg:1965zh:1965
34931
1815
__NOTOC__Year 1815 (MDCCCXV) was a year starting on Sunday (link will display the full calendar) of the calendar and a year starting on Friday of the 12-day slower calendar. Events  January&ndash;March * 2 &ndash; Byron marries Anna Isabella Milbanke in Seaham, Durham.* 3 &ndash; Austria, Britain, and Bourbon-restored France form a secret defensive alliance treaty against Prussia and Russia.* 8 &ndash; of 1812 &ndash; of New Orleans: American forces under General Jackson defeat an invading British force.* February &ndash; The Convention arrives in DC.* 3 &ndash; The first commercial cheese factory is founded in Switzerland.* 4 &ndash; The first Dutch student association, the Groninger Studenten Corps, atque Polit is founded in the Netherlands. The first rector of the senate was B.J. Winter.* 6 &ndash; Jersey grants the first American railroad charter to a John Stevens.* 26 &ndash; Napoleon Bonaparte escapes from Elba.* 1 &ndash; Napoleon returns to France from his banishment on Elba. * 15 &ndash; Murat, King of Naples declares war on Austria in an attempt to save his throne, starting the War.* 16 &ndash; William I becomes King of the Netherlands.* 2&ndash;18 &ndash; The last King of Ceylon, Vikrama Rajasinha is deposed under the terms of the Convention, which results in Ceylon becoming a British colony.* 20 &ndash; Napoleon enters Paris after escaping from Elba with a regular army of 140,000 and a volunteer force of around 200,000 beginning his Hundred Days rule. April&ndash;June File:1815 Tambora Sumbawa explosion path large.jpg|thumb|250px|right| 5&ndash;12: Tambora explodes, changing climate.File:CongressVienna.jpg|thumb|100px|Congress of Vienna, Jean Godefroy &ndash; Isabey* 5&ndash;12 &ndash; Tambora in the East Indies blows its top explosively during an eruption, killing upwards of 92,000 and propelling thousands of tons of aerosols (Sulfide gas compounds) into the upper atmosphere (stratosphere). The high level gases reflect sunlight and cause the widespread cooling (known as a winter) and heavy rains of 1816, causes snows in June and July in the northern hemisphere, widespread crop failures, and subsequently famine, which is why 1816 is later known as the Without a Summer. * 23 &ndash; The Serbian Uprising against Ottoman rule takes place in Takovo, Serbia. By the end of the year Serbia is acknowledged as a semi-independent state; the ideals of the Serbian Uprising have thus been temporarily achieved.* 3 &ndash; of Tolentino: Austria defeats the of Naples, which quickly ends the War. Murat, the defeated King of Naples, is forced to flee to Corsica and is later executed.* 30 &ndash; The Arniston, an Indiaman repatriating wounded troops to England from Ceylon, is wrecked near Waenhuiskrans, Africa with the loss of 372 of the 378 people on board.* 9 &ndash; Final Act of the of Vienna is signed: A new European political situation is set. The Confederation is created and the neutrality of Switzerland is guaranteed. * 16 &ndash; of Ligny: Napoleon beats the Prussians. * 16 &ndash; of Quatre Bras: Marshal Ney gets a marginal win against the British and Allies. * 18 &ndash; of Waterloo: The of Wellington decisively defeats Napoleon, ending the wars.* 22 &ndash; Napoleon abdicates again; II (18111832), age 4, rules for two weeks ( 22 June to 7 July ).File:Sadler, Battle of Waterloo.jpg|thumb|230px|right| 18: Napoleon at Waterloo. July&ndash;September * 8 &ndash; Louis XVIII returns to Paris, and is restored as King of France (he had declared himself king on 8 June 1795, at the death of his nephew, 10-year-old XVII, and had lived in Westphalia, Verona, Russia, and England).* 17 &ndash; In France, Napoleon surrenders at Rochefort to British forces.* September &ndash; Austria, Prussia and Russia sign a Alliance to uphold the European quo.* 23 &ndash; The September Gale of 1815 is the first hurricane to strike New England in 180 years. October&ndash;December * 3 &ndash; The Chassigny Mars meteorite falls in Chassigny, Haute-Marne, France.* 15 &ndash; I of France begins his exile on Helena in the Ocean.* 21 &ndash; Davy patents the safety lamp for use in coal mining. Date unknown * British missionaries arrive in Zealand.* In Britain, use of the pillory is limited to punishment for perjury.* The second wave of Amish immigration to North America begins.* cricket begins.()* The Empire is expelled from Veracruz. Births  January&ndash;June * 11 &ndash; A. Macdonald, First Prime Minister of Canada, Father of Confederation (d. 1891)* 15 &ndash; von Tischendorf, German Biblical scholar (d. 1874)* 1 &ndash; von Bismarck, German statesman (d. 1898)* 1 &ndash; Clark, of Texas (d. 1880)* 6 &ndash; Volkmann, German composer (d. 1883)* 24 &ndash; Trollope, British author (d. 1882)* 27 &ndash; Henry Parkes, Father of Australian Federation (d. 1896) July&ndash;December * 5 &ndash; John Eyre, explorer (d. 1901)* 16 &ndash; Saint Bosco, priest and educator (d. 1888)* 16 &ndash; Lubbock, of Texas (d. 1905)* 23 &ndash; Maurcio Wanderley, Brazilian magistrate and politician (d. 1889)* 31 &ndash; Weierstrass, German mathematician (d. 1897)* 2 &ndash; Boole, English mathematician and philosopher (d. 1864)* 10 &ndash; Augusta Ada King (ne Byron), Countess of Lovelace, early English computer pioneer (d. 1852)* 12 &ndash; Cady Stanton, American womens rights activist (d. 1902)* 21 &ndash; Couture, French painter (d. 1879) Deaths  January&ndash;June * 8 &ndash; Pakenham, British general (killed in battle) (b. 1778)* 16 &ndash; Lady Hamilton, English mistress of Nelson (b. 1765)* 24 &ndash; Fulton, American inventor (b. 1765)* 26 &ndash; Josias of Coburg, Austrian general (b. 1737)* 4 &ndash; Abington, English actress (b. 1737)* 5 &ndash; Mesmer, German developer of animal magnetism (b. 1734)* 21 &ndash; Winston, American patriot and Congressman from North Carolina (b. 1746)* 1 &ndash; Alexandre Berthier, French marshal (b. 1753)* 16 &ndash; Friedrich Wilhelm, Duke of Brunswick, German noble and general (killed in battle) (b. 1771)* 18 (killed at the Battle of Waterloo):** Picton, British general (b. 1758)** Michel, French general (b. 1772** Philibert Duhesme, French general(b. 1766) July&ndash;December * 2 &ndash; Marie Anne Brune, French marshal (murdered) (b. 1763)* 6 &ndash; A. Bayard (elder), U.S. Senator from Delaware (b. 1767)* 9 &ndash; Singleton Copley, American painter (b. 1738)* 20 &ndash; Desmarest, French geologist (b. 1725)* 13 &ndash; Murat, French marshal and King of Naples (executed) (b. 1767)* 19 &ndash; Mascagni, Anatomist (b. 1755)* 22 &ndash; Lecourbe, French general (b. 1759)* 3 &ndash; Carroll (priest), first American Roman Catholic Archbishop (b. 1735)* 7 &ndash; Ney, French marshal (executed) (b. 1769)* 29 &ndash; Baartman, sideshow performer References af:1815...ar::1815an:1815ast:1815az:1815bn:nmap-bms:1815be:1815be-x-old:1815bh:bcl:1815bs:1815br:1815bg:1815ca:1815cv:1815cs:1815co:1815cy:1815da:1815de:1815et:1815el:1815es:1815eo:1815eu:1815()fr:1815fy:1815ga:1815gd:1815gl:1815gan:1815ko:1815hy:1815hi:hr:1815.io:1815id:1815ia:1815is:1815it:1815he:1815jv:1815kn:ka:1815csb:1815sw:1815(almanak gregoryen)la:1815gadslb:1815m.lij:1815li:1815jbo:1815moilmo:1815hu:1815mk:1815mg:1815mi:1815arz:1815ms:1815nah:1815nl:1815 ja:1815nap:1815no:1815nn:1815nrm:1815nov:1815oc:1815mhr:1815uz:1815pi:pnb:1815tpi:1815nds:1815pl:1815pt:1815ro:1815qu:1815rue:1815sah:1815se:1815sa:sq:1815scn:1815simple:1815sk:1815sl:1815ckb:sr:1815sh:1815su:1815fi:1815sv:1815tl:1815ta:1815te:1815tet:18152358tg:1815tr:1815tk:1815uk:1815ur:1815vec:1815vi:1815vo:1815fiu-vro:1815wa:1815war:1815yo:1815zh-yue:1815diq:1815bat-smg:1815zh:1815
36717
Northumbria
Northumbria () was a medieval kingdom of the Angles, in what is now England and South-East Scotland, becoming subsequently an earldom in a united Anglo-Saxon kingdom of England. The name reflects the approximate southern limit to the kingdoms territory, the Estuary.Northumbria was formed by thelfrith in central Britain in Anglo-Saxon times. At the beginning of the 7th century the two kingdoms of Bernicia and Deira were unified. (In the 12th century writings of of Huntingdon the kingdom was defined as one of the Heptarchy of Anglo-Saxon kingdoms.) At its greatest the kingdom extended at least from just south of the Humber, to the Mersey and to the Forth (roughly, Sheffield to Runcorn to Edinburgh) &ndash; and there is some evidence that it may have been much greater (see map).The later (and smaller) earldom came about when the southern part of Northumbria (ex-Deira) was lost to the Danelaw. The northern part (ex-Bernicia) at first retained its status as a kingdom but when it become subordinate to the Danish kingdom it had its powers curtailed to that of an earldom, and retained that status when England was reunited by the Wessex-led reconquest of the Danelaw. The earldom was bounded by the Tees in the south and the Tweed in the north (broadly similar to the modern East England). Much of this land was debated between England and Scotland, but the Earldom of Northumbria was eventually recognised as part of England by the Anglo-Scottish of York in 1237. On the northern border, Berwick-upon-Tweed, which is north of the Tweed but had changed hands many times, was defined as subject to the laws of England by the Wales and Berwick Act of 1746. The land once part of Northumbria at its peak is now divided by modern administrative boundaries:: East England includes Anglian Bernicia: and the Humber includes Danish Deira and Celtic Elmet: West England includes Cumbria, though Cumbria was more of a Northumbrian colony with its own client kings for most of its history in the Early Medieval era: Borders, Lothian, Edinburgh, Midlothian and Lothian cover the extreme northNorthumbria is also used in the names of some regional institutions: particularly the police force (Police, which covers Northumberland and and Wear) and a university (University) based in Newcastle. The local Environment Agency office, located in Newcastle Business Park, also uses the term Northumbria to describe its patch. Otherwise, the term is not used in everyday conversation, and is not the official name for the UK and EU region of North East England.Kingdom (654954):See also: of monarchs of Northumbria and Timeline of NorthumbriaNorthumbria was originally composed of the union of two independent kingdoms, Bernicia and Deira. Bernicia covered lands north of the Tees, while Deira corresponded roughly to modern-day Yorkshire. Bernicia and Deira were first united by Aethelfrith, a king of Bernicia who conquered Deira around the year 604. He was defeated and killed around the year 616 in battle at the Idle by of East Anglia, who installed Edwin, the son of Aella, a former king of Deira, as king.Edwin, who accepted Christianity in 627, soon grew to become the most powerful king in England: he was recognized as Bretwalda and conquered the of Man and Gwynedd in northern Wales. He was, however, himself defeated by an alliance of the exiled king of Gwynedd, Cadwallon ap Cadfan and Penda, king of Mercia, at the of Hatfield Chase in 633.King OswaldAfter Edwins death, Northumbria was split between Bernicia, where Eanfrith, a son of Aethelfrith, took power, and Deira, where a cousin of Edwin, Osric, became king. Cumbria tended to remain a country frontier with the Britons. Both of these rulers were killed during the year that followed, as Cadwallon continued his devastating invasion of Northumbria. After the murder of Eanfrith, his brother, Oswald, backed by warriors sent by Brecc of Riata, defeated and killed Cadwallon at the of Heavenfield in 634.Oswald expanded his kingdom considerably. He incorporated Gododdin lands northwards up to the of Forth and also gradually extended his reach westward, encroaching on the remaining Cumbric speaking kingdoms of Rheged and Strathclyde. Thus, Northumbria became not only part of modern Englands far north, but also covered much of what is now the south-east of Scotland. King Oswald re-introduced Christianity to the Kingdom by appointing St. Aidan, an Irish monk from the Scottish island of Iona to convert his people. This led to the introduction of the practices of Christianity. A monastery was established on Lindisfarne. War with Mercia continued, however. In 642, Oswald was killed by the Mercians under Penda at the of Maserfield. In 655, Penda launched a massive invasion of Northumbria, aided by the sub-king of Deira, Aethelwald, but suffered a crushing defeat at the hands of an inferior force under Oswiu, Oswalds successor, at the of Winwaed. This battle marked a major turning point in Northumbrian fortunes: Penda died in the battle, and Oswiu gained supremacy over Mercia, making himself the most powerful king in England.Religious union and eventual declineFile:Eric Bloodaxe Norse king of York 952 954.jpg|thumb|Coin of Eric Bloodaxe. The legend reads ERIC REX (King Eric). Museum.In the year 664 the of Whitby was held to discuss the controversy regarding the timing of the Easter festival. Much dispute had arisen between the practices of the Celtic church in Northumbria and the beliefs of the Roman church. Eventually, Northumbria was persuaded to move to the Roman practice and  the Celtic Bishop of Lindisfarne returned to Iona.Northumbria lost control of Mercia in the late 650s, after a successful revolt under Pendas son Wulfhere, but it retained its dominant position until it suffered a disastrous defeat at the hands of the Picts at the Battle of Nechtansmere in 685; Northumbrias king, Ecgfrith (son of Oswiu), was killed, and its power in the north was gravely weakened. The peaceful reign of Aldfrith, Ecgfriths half-brother and successor, did something to limit the damage done, but it is from this point that Northumbrias power began to decline, and chronic instability followed Aldfriths death in 704. In 867 Northumbria became the northern kingdom of the Danelaw, after its conquest by the brothers Ragnarsson and the Boneless who installed an Englishman, Ecgberht, as a puppet king. Despite the pillaging of the kingdom, Viking rule brought lucrative trade to Northumbria, especially at their capital York. The kingdom passed between English, Norse and Norse-Gaelic kings until it was finally absorbed by king Eadred after the death of the last independent Northumbrian monarch, Bloodaxe, in 954.Ealdormanships and earldoms in Northumbria (9541217)After the English regained the territory of the former kingdom, Scots invasions reduced Northumbria to an earldom stretching from the Humber to the Tweed. Northumbria was disputed between the emerging kingdoms of England and Scotland. The land north of the Tweed was finally ceded to Scotland in 1018 as a result of the of Carham. Yorkshire and Northumberland were first mentioned as separate in the Chronicle in 1065.(E. Ekwal, The Concise Oxford Dictionary of English Place-Names: 4th Ed, OUP, 1960, ISBN 0-19-869103-3)Norman invasion and partition of the earldomthe Conqueror became king of England in 1066. He realised he needed to control Northumbria, which had remained virtually independent of the Kings of England, to protect his kingdom from Scottish invasion. To acknowledge the remote independence of Northumbria and ensure England was properly defended from the Scots William gained the allegiance of both the of Durham and the Earl and confirmed their powers and privileges. However, anti-Norman rebellions followed. William therefore attempted to install Comine, a Norman noble, as the of Northumbria, but before Comine could take up office, he and his 700 men were massacred in the city of Durham. In revenge, the Conqueror led his army in a bloody raid into Northumbria, an event that became known as the of the North. Ethelwin, the Anglo-Saxon of Durham, tried to flee Northumbria at the time of the raid, with Northumbrian treasures. The bishop was caught, imprisoned, and later died in confinement; his seat was left vacant.Rebellions continued, and Williams son Rufus decided to partition Northumbria. of St. Carilef was made Bishop of Durham, and was also given the powers of Earl for the region south of the rivers Tyne and Derwent, which became the Palatine of Durham.  The remainder, to the north of the rivers, became Northumberland, where the political powers of the Bishops of Durham were limited to only certain districts, and the earls continued to rule as clients of the English throne. The city of Newcastle was founded by the Normans in 1080 to control the region by holding the strategically important crossing point of the river Tyne. Subsequent historyThe Northumbrian region continued a history of revolt and rebellion against the government, as seen in the of the North in Tudor times. A major reason was the strength of Catholicism in the area after the Reformation. Rural, thinly populated, and sharing a border with an often hostile Scotland, the region became a wild place where reivers raided across the border and outlaws took refuge from justice. However, after the union of the crowns of Scotland and England under King James VI and I peace was largely established. After the Restoration, many inhabitants of the Northumbrian region supported the Jacobite cause.FlagThe flag of the kingdom was a banner made of gold and purple (or red), first recorded in the 8th century as having hung over the shrine of King Oswald. This was later interpreted as vertical stripes. A modified version (with broken vertical stripes) can be seen in the of arms and flag used by County Council.CultureImage:LindisfarneFol27rIncipitMatt.jpg|left|300px|Page from the Gospels, c 700. Northumbria during its golden age was the most important centre of religious learning and arts in the British Isles. Initially the kingdom was evangelized by Irish monks from the Church, based at Iona in modern Scotland, which led to a flowering of monastic life. Lindisfarne on the east coast was founded from Iona by Saint Aidan in about 635, and was to remain the major Northumbrian monastic centre, producing figures like Wilfrid and Saint Cuthbert. The nobleman Biscop had visited Rome and headed the monastery at Canterbury in Kent and his twin-foundation Abbey added a direct Roman influence to Northumbrian culture, and produced figures such as Ceolfrith and Bede. Northumbria played an important role in the formation of art, a unique style combining Anglo-Saxon, Celtic, Pictish, Byzantine and other elements, producing works such as the Gospels, the Cross, and later the of Kells, which was probably created at Iona. After the of Whitby in 664 Roman church practices officially replaced the Celtic ones but the influence of the Celtic style continued, the most famous examples of this being the Lindisfarne Gospels. The Venerable Bede (673&ndash;735) wrote his ecclesiastica gentis Anglorum (Ecclesiastical History of the English People, completed in 731) in Monkwearmouth-Jarrow, and much of it focuses on the kingdom.(Goffart, Walter. The Narrators of Barbarian History (A.D. 550&ndash;800): Jordanes, Gregory of Tours, Bede, and Paul the Deacon. Princeton: Princeton University Press, 1988. 238ff.)  The devastating Viking raid on Lindisfarne in 793 marked the beginning of a century of Viking invasions that severely checked all Anglo-Saxon culture, and heralded the end of Northumbrias position as a centre of influence, although in the years immediately following confident works like the Cross were still being produced.  Northumbria has its own check or tartan, which is similar to many ancient tartans (especially those from Northern Europe, such as one found near Falkirk and those discovered in Jutland that date from Roman times (and even earlier).(Cultural Heritage)(J. P. WildBritannia, Vol. 33, 2002 (2002))(J. P. Wild, The Classical Quarterly, New Series, Vol. 14, No. 2 (Nov., 1964))(Anglo-Saxon Thegn, 449&ndash;1066 A.D. By Mark Harrison, Osprey Publishing 1993, ISBN 1-85532-349-4; p. 17) Modern Border Tartans are almost invariably a bold black and white check, but historically the light squares were the yellowish colour of untreated wool, with the dark squares any of a range of dark grays, blues, greens or browns; hence the alternative name of Border Drab. At a distance the checks blend together making the fabric ideal camouflage for stalking game.(A short history of the Tartan)(The History of Scottish Tartans & Clans Tartans)File:Northumbrian tartan.png|thumb|right| The design of the Northumbrian or Border Check is one of the earliest styles of Tartan in Europe.LanguageApart from standard English, Northumbria has a series of closely related but distinctive dialects, descended from the early languages of the Angles, of which 80% of its vocabulary is derived,(North East dialect origins and the meaning of Geordie) and Vikings with a few Celtic and Latin loanwords. The Scots language began to diverge from early Northumbrian English, which was called Ynglis as late as the early 16th century (until the end of the 15th century the name Scottis (modern form: Scots) referred to Scottish Gaelic). There are many similarities between Scots dialects and those of Northumbria.  The major Northumbrian dialects are Geordie (Tyneside), Northern (north of the Coquet), Western (from Allendale through Hexham up to Kielder), Southern or Pitmatic (the mining towns such as Ashington and much of Durham),(The Northumbrian Language Society) Mackem (Wearside), Smoggie (Teesside) and Tyke (Yorkshire). To an outsiders ear the similarities far outweigh the differences between the dialects. As an example of the difference in the softer South County Durham/Wearside the English book is pronounced bewk, in Geordie it becomes bouk while in the Northumbrian it is byuk.See also* of Northumberland* golden age* music* smallpipes* tartan*of Northumbria References  Further reading * Higham, N.J., The Kingdom of Northumbria AD 350&ndash;1100 (1993) ISBN 0-86299-730-5* Rollason, D., Northumbria, 500&ndash;1100: Creation and Destruction of a Kingdom (2003) ISBN 0-521-81335-2 External links * Lowlands-L, An e-mail discussion list for those who share an interest in the languages & cultures of the Lowlands* Lowlands-L in Nothumbrian* Northumbrian Association* Northumbrian Language Society* Northumbrian Small Pipes Encyclopedia* Northumbrian Traditional Music* Visit Northumberland &ndash; The Official Visitor Site for NorthumberlandRcear:Northumbriade Northumbriacs:Northumbriecy:Northumbriada:Northumbriade:Northumbriade Northumbriaeo:Northumbriaeu:Northumbriafr:Northumbriefy:Northumbriagot:NorthumbrijaNorymbralanddi NorthumbriaNorthanhymbrorumlv:NortambrijaNorthumbriaja:no:Northumbriands:Northumbriapl:Nortumbriada Nortmbriaro:Northumbriaru:sk:Northumbriash:Nortumbrijafi:Northumbriasv:Northumbriath:uk:zh:
37353
Etruscan_civilization
legislature  Etruscan LeagueEtruscan civilization is the modern English name given to a civilization of ancient Italy in the area corresponding roughly to Tuscany. The ancient Romans called its creators the Tusci or Etrusci.(According to Flix Gaffiots Dictionnaire Illustr Latin Franais, the term Tusci was used by the major authors of the Republic: Livy, Cicero, Horace, et al. A number of cognate words developed, including Tuscia and Tusculanensis. Tusci was clearly the principal term used to designate things Etruscan. Etrusci and Etrria were used less often, mainly by Cicero and Horace, and they lack cognates. According to the Online Etymological Dictionary, the English use of Etruscan dates from 1706.) Their Roman name is the origin of the terms Tuscany, which refers to their heartland, and Etruria, which can refer to their wider region.In Greek, the Etruscans were known as  (Tyrrhnioi), earlier Tyrsenoi, from which the Romans derived the names Tyrrhni (Etruscans), Tyrrhnia (Etruria), and Mare Tyrrhnum  (Sea).(Gaffiots.) The Etruscans called themselves Rasenna, which was syncopated to Rasna or Rana.(Rasenna comes from of Halicarnassus I.30.3. The syncopated form, Rasna, is inscriptional and is inflected. The topic is covered in Pallottino, page 133. Some inscriptions, such as the cippus of Cortona, feature the Rana (pronounced Rashna) alternative, as is described in Gabor Z. Bodroghys site, The Palaeolinguistic Connection, under Origins.)As distinguished by its unique language, this civilization endured from the time of the earliest Etruscan inscriptions (ca. 700 BC)(Rix, Helmut. Etruscan. In The Ancient Languages of Europe, ed. Roger D. Woodard. Cambridge University Press, 2008, pp. 141-164.) until its assimilation into the Republic in the 1st century BC.( At its maximum extent, during the foundational period of Rome and the kingdom, it flourished in three confederacies of cities: of Etruria, of the valley with the eastern Alps, and of Latium and Campania.(A good map of the Italian range and cities of the culture at the beginning of its history can be found at http://www.mysteriousetruscans.com/cities.html, the mysteriousetruscans.com site. The topic of the League of Etruria is covered in Freeman, pages 562-565. The league in northern Italy is mentioned in Livy, Book V, Section 33. The passage also identifies the Raetii as a remnant of the 12 cities beyond the Apennines. The Campanian Etruscans are mentioned (among many sources) by Polybius, (II.17). The entire subject with complete ancient sources in footnotes was worked up by George Dennis in his Introduction. In the LacusCurtius transcription, the references in Denniss footnotes link to the texts in English or Latin; the reader may also find the English of some of them on WikiSource or other Internet sites. As the work has already been done by Dennis and Thayer, the complete work-up is not repeated here.) Rome was founded within or adjacent to Etruscan territory, and there is considerable evidence that early Rome was dominated by Etruscans until the Romans sacked Veii in 396 BC.Culture that is identifiably Etruscan developed in Italy after about BC approximately over the range of the preceding Age culture. The latter gave way in the 7th century to a culture that was influenced by Greek traders and Greek neighbours in Graecia, the civilization of southern Italy. After 500 BC the political destiny of Italy passed out of Etruscan hands.(Cary, M.; Scullard, H. H., A History of Rome. Page 28. 3rd Ed. 1979. ISBN 0312383959.)Legend and historyOrigin and historyFile:Etruscan pendant with swastika symbols Bolsena Italy 700 BCE to 650 BCE.jpg|thumb|Etruscan pendant with swastika symbols, Bolsena, Italy, 700-650 BC. Museum.The origins of the Etruscans are lost in prehistory. Historians have no literature, no texts of religion or philosophy; therefore much of what is known about this civilization is derived from grave goods and tomb findings.((Bonfante 2006: 9)) The main hypotheses are that they are indigenous, probably stemming from the culture or from the East.() Etruscan expansion was focused both to the north beyond the Apennines and into Campania. Some small towns in the 6th century BC disappeared during this time, ostensibly consumed by greater, more powerful neighbours. However, it is certain that the political structure of the Etruscan culture was similar to, albeit more aristocratic than, Graecia in the south. The mining and commerce of metal, especially copper and iron, led to an enrichment of the Etruscans and to the expansion of their influence in the Italian peninsula and the western Mediterranean sea. Here their interests collided with those of the Greeks, especially in the 6th century BC, when Phoceans of Italy founded colonies along the coast of France, Spain and Corsica. This led the Etruscans to ally themselves with the Carthaginians, whose interests also collided with the Greeks.()()Around 540 BC, the of Alalia led to a new distribution of power in the western Sea. Though the battle had no clear winner, Carthage managed to expand its sphere of influence at the expense of the Greeks, and Etruria saw itself relegated to the northern Sea with full ownership of Corsica. From the first half of the 5th century BC, the new international political situation meant the beginning of the Etruscan decline after losing their southern provinces. In 480 BC, Etrurias ally Carthage was defeated by a coalition of Magna Graecia cities led by Syracuse. A few years later, in 474, Syracuses tyrant Hiero defeated the Etruscans at the of Cumae. Etrurias influence over the cities of Latium and Campania weakened, and it was taken over by Romans and Samnites. In the 4th century, Etruria saw a Gallic invasion end its influence over the Po valley and the Adriatic coast.  Meanwhile, Rome had started annexing Etruscan cities. This led to the loss of the Northern Etruscan provinces. Etruria was conquered by Rome in the 3rd century BC.((Heritage, founding and Populus RomanusFile:Civita di Bagnoregio.jpg|thumb|right|200px|right|Etruscan walled town, di Bagnoregio.File:She-wolf suckles Romulus and Remus.jpg|200px|thumb|The wolf, feeding the twins and Remus, probably the most famous legend of the founding of the city.Those who subscribe to an Italic foundation of Rome, followed by an Etruscan invasion, typically speak of an Etruscan influence on Roman culture; that is, cultural objects that were adopted at Rome from neighbouring Etruria. The prevalent view today is that Rome was founded by Italics and merged with Etruscans later. In that case Etruscan cultural objects are not a heritage but are influences.()The main criterion for deciding whether an object originated at Rome and traveled by influence to the Etruscans, or descended to the Romans from the Etruscans, is date. Many, if not most, of the Etruscan cities were older than Rome. If one finds that a given feature was there first, it cannot have originated at Rome. A second criterion is the opinion of the ancient sources. These would indicate that certain institutions and customs came directly from the Etruscans. Rome is located on the edge of what was Etruscan territory. When Etruscan settlements turned up south of the border, it was presumed that the Etruscans spread there after the foundation of Rome, but the settlements are now known to have preceded Rome.Etruscan settlements were frequently built on a hillthe steeper the betterand surrounded by thick walls. According to mythology, when and Remus founded Rome, they did so on the Hill according to Etruscan ritual; that is, they began with a pomerium or sacred ditch. Then, they proceeded to the walls. Romulus was required to kill Remus when the latter jumped over the wall, breaking its magic spell (see also under Sublicius). The name of Rome is believed by some to be Etruscan, occurring in a standard form stating place from which: Velzna-, from Velzna, Sveama-, from Sveama, Ruma-, from Ruma. We do not know what it means however. If Tiberius is from efarie, then Ruma would have been placed on the Thefar river. A heavily discussed topic between scholars is who was the founding population of Rome. In 390 BC the city of Rome was attacked by the Gauls, and as a result may have lost many - though not all - of its earlier records.  Certainly, the history of Rome before that date is not as secure as it later becomes, but enough material remains to give a good picture of the development of the city and its institutions.Later history relates that some Etruscans lived in the Tuscus vicus, the Etruscan quarter, and that there was an Etruscan line of kings (albeit ones descended from a Greek, the Corinthian) which succeeded kings of Latin and Sabine origin.  Etruscophile historians would argue that this, together with evidence for institutions, religious elements and other cultural elements, prove that Rome was founded by Italics. The true picture is rather more complicated, not least because the Etruscan cities were separate entities which never came together to form a single Etruscan state. Furthermore, there were strong Latin and Italic elements to Roman culture, and later Romans proudly celebrated these multiple, multicultural influences on the city.Under Romulus and Numa, the people were said to have been divided into 30 curiae and 3 tribes. Few words of Etruscan entered the language, but the names of at least two of the tribes  Ramnes and Luceres  seem to be Etruscan. The last kings may have borne the Etruscan title lucumo, while the regalia were traditionally considered of Etruscan origin: the golden crown, sceptre, the toga palmata (a special robe), the sella curulis (curule chair), and above all the primary symbol of state power: the fasces. The latter was a bundle of whipping rods surrounding a double-bladed axe, carried by the kings lictors.  An example of the fasces are the remains of bronze rods and the axe from a tomb in Etruscan Vetulonia. This allowed to identify the depiction of a fasces on the grave stele of Avele Feluske, who is shown as a warrior wielding the fasces. The most telling Etruscan feature is the word populus, which appears as an Etruscan deity, Fufluns. Populus seems to mean the people assembled in a military body, rather than the general populace.SocietyGovernmentThe historical Etruscans had achieved a state system of society, with remnants of the chiefdom and tribal forms. In this they were different from the surrounding Italics, who had chiefs and tribes. Rome was in a sense the first Italic state, but it began as an Etruscan one. It is believed that the Etruscan government style changed from total monarchy to oligarchic democracy (as the Roman Republic) in the 6th century BC, while it is important to note this did not happen to all the city states.The Etruscan state government was essentially a theocracy. The government was viewed as being a central authority, over all tribal and clan organizations. It retained the power of life and death; in fact, the gorgon, an ancient symbol of that power, appears as a motif in Etruscan decoration. The adherents to this state power were united by a common religion. Political unity in Etruscan society was the city-state, which was probably the referent of methlum, district. Etruscan texts name quite a number of magistrates, without much of a hint as to their function: the camthi, the parnich, the purth, the tamera, the macstrev, and so on. The people were the mech. The chief ruler of a methlum was perhaps a zilach.FamilyFile:Paris - Louvre - Sarcophage.jpg|250px|thumb|right|Etruscan couple (Louvre, Room 18)The princely tombs were not of individuals. The inscriptional evidence shows that families were interred there over long periods, marking the growth of the aristocratic family as a fixed institution, parallel to the gens at Rome and perhaps even its model. There is no sign of such a hereditary aristocracy in the preceding Villanovan culture. The Etruscans could have used any model of the eastern Mediterranean. That the growth of this class is related to the new acquisition of wealth through trade is unquestioned. The wealthiest cities were located near the coast. At the centre of the lautn was the married couple, tusurthir. The Etruscans were a monogamous society that emphasized pairing.Similarly the behaviour of some wealthy women is not uniquely Etruscan. The apparent promiscuous revelry has a spiritual explanation. Swaddling and Bonfante (among others) explain that depictions of the nude embrace, or symplegma, had the power to ward off evil, as did baring the breast, which was adopted by western civilization as an apotropaic device, appearing finally on the figureheads of sailing ships as a nude female upper torso. It is also possible that Greek and Roman attitudes to the Etruscans were based on a misunderstanding of the place of women within their society. In both Greece and Republican Rome, respectable women were confined to the house and mixed-sex socialising did not occur. Thus the freedom of women within Etruscan society could have been misunderstood as implying their sexual availability. It is worth noting that a number of Etruscan tombs carry funerary inscriptions in the form X son of (father) and (mother), indicating the importance of the mothers side of the family.Military and Etruscan citiesFile:Etruscan warrior near Viterbe Italy circa 500 BCE.jpg|thumb|Etruscan warrior, found near Viterbo, Italy, dated circa 500 BC.The Etruscans, like the contemporary cultures of Greece and Rome, had a significant military tradition.  In addition to marking the rank and power of certain individuals in Etruscan culture, warfare was a considerable economic boon to Etruscan civilization. Like many ancient societies, the Etruscans conducted campaigns during summer months, raiding neighboring areas, attempting to gain territory and combating piracy as a means of acquiring valuable resources such as land, prestige, goods, and slaves.  It is also likely individuals taken in battle would be ransomed back to their families and clans at high cost.  Prisoners could also potentially be sacrificed on tombs as an honor to fallen leaders of Etruscan society, not unlike the sacrifices made by Achilles for Patrocles.()()()The range of Etruscan civilization is marked by its cities. They were entirely assimilated by Italic, Celtic, or Roman ethnic groups, but the names survive from inscriptions and their ruins are of aesthetic and historic interest in most of the cities of central Italy. Etruscan cities flourished over most of Italy during the Iron Age, marking the farthest extent of Etruscan civilization. They were gradually assimilated first by Italics in the south, then by Celts in the north and finally in Etruria itself by the growing Roman Republic.(That many Roman cities were formerly Etruscan was well known to all the Roman authors. The Etruscan names of the major cities in this category survived in inscriptions and are listed below. Some cities were founded by Etruscans in prehistoric times, and bore entirely Etruscan names. Others were colonized by Etruscans who Etruscanized the name, usually Italic.(CultureReligionThe Etruscan system of belief was an immanent polytheism; that is, all visible phenomena were considered to be a manifestation of divine power and that power was subdivided into deities that acted continually on the world of man and could be dissuaded or persuaded in favour of human affairs. How to understand the will of deities and how to behave had been revealed to the Etruscans by two initiators, Tages, a child-like figure born from tilled land and immediately gifted with prescience, and Vegoia, a female figure. Their teachings were kept in a series of sacred books. Three layers of deities are evident in the extensive Etruscan art motifs. One appears to be divinities of an indigenous nature: Catha and Usil, the sun; Tivr, the moon; Selvans, a civil god; Turan, the goddess of love; Laran, the god of war; Leinth, the goddess of death; Maris; Thalna; Turms; and the ever-popular Fufluns, whose name is related in some unknown way to the city of Populonia and the Romanus. Perhaps he was the god of the people.()()Ruling over this pantheon of lesser deities were higher ones that seem to reflect the Indo-European system: Tin or Tinia, the sky, Uni his wife (Juno), and Cel, the earth goddess. In addition the Greek gods were taken into the Etruscan system: Aritimi (Artemis), Menrva (Minerva), Pacha (Dionysus). The Greek heroes taken from Homer also appear extensively in art motifs.((ArchitectureFile:Hypogeum cyark 1.jpg|thumb|right|200px|3D view, facing west, of the Etruscan Hypogeum of the Volumnis, Perugia, Italy, cut from a laser scan.The Architecture of the ancient Etruscans adapted the external Greek architecture for their own purposes, which were so different from Greek buildings as to create a new architectural style. The two styles are often considered one body of architecture. The Etruscans absorbed Greek influence, apparent in many aspects closely related to architecture. The Etruscans had much influence over architecture.()Etruscan architecture made lasting contributions to the architecture of Italy, which were adopted by the Romans and through them became standard to western civilization. Rome itself is a repository of Etruscan architectural features, which perhaps did not originate with the Etruscans, but were channeled by them into Roman civilization.Art, music and literatureFile:Etruscan chariot wheel.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Close up detail on a wheel of the chariot, c. 530 BCEtruscan art was the form of art produced by the Etruscan civilization in northern Italy between the 9th and 2nd centuries BC.  Particularly strong in this tradition were figurative sculpture in terracotta (particularly life-size on sarcophagi or temples) and cast bronze, wall-painting and metalworking (especially engraved bronze mirrors). Etruscan art was strongly connected to religion; the afterlife was of major importance in Etruscan art.()File:Chimera di Arezzo.jpg|thumb|left|180px|The of Arezzo, a prime example of Etruscan artThe Etruscan musical instruments seen in frescoes and bas-reliefs are different types of pipes, such as the plagiaulos (the pipes of Pan or Syrinx), the alabaster pipe and the famous double pipes, accompanied on percussion instruments such as the tintinnabulum, tympanum and crotales, and later by stringed instruments like the lyre and kithara. With the exception of the Linteus, the only written records of Etruscan origin that remain are inscriptions, mainly funerary. The language is written in a script related to the early Euboean Greek alphabet.() Etruscan literature is evidenced only in references by later Roman authors.Language and etymologyKnowledge of the Etruscan language is still far from complete. The Etruscans are believed to have spoken a non-Indo-European language; the majority consensus is that Etruscan is related only to other members of what is called the Tyrsenian language family, which in itself is an isolate family, that is, unrelated directly to other known language groups.  Since Rix (1998) it is widely accepted that the Tyrsenian family groups Rhaetic and Lemnian are related to Etruscan.No etymology exists for Rasna, the Etruscans name for themselves. The etymology of Tusci is based on a beneficiary phrase in the third Iguvine tablet, which is a major source for the language.(Paper entitled Cui Bono? The Beneficiary Phrases of the Third Iguvine Table by Michael Weiss and published on-line by University at http://ling.cornell.edu/people/Weiss/Cuibono.pdf.) The phrase is turskum ... nomen, the Tuscan name, from which a root *Tursci can be reconstructed.(Darling Buck (1904), A Grammar of Oscan and Umbian, Boston: Gibb & Company, Introduction, available online at http://www.forumromanum.org/latin/buck_1.html the forumromanum.org site.) A metathesis and a word-initial epenthesis produce E-trus-ci.(Eric Partridge (1983), Origins, New York: Greenwich House, under tower.) A common hypothesis is that *Turs- along with Latin turris, tower, come from Greek , tower.(The Bonfantes (2003), page 51) The Tusci were therefore the people who build towers( or the tower builders.(Partridge) This venerable etymology is at least as old as of Halicarnassus, who said And there is no reason why the Greeks should not have called them by this name, both from their living in towers and from the name of one of their rulers.(Book I, Section 30.)Giuliano and Bonfante (Bonfante 2002) speculate that Etruscan houses seemed like towers to the simple Latins. It is true that the Etruscans preferred to build hill towns on high precipices enhanced by walls. On the other hand if the Tyrrhenian name came from an incursion of peoples or later migrants then it might well be related to the name of Troy, the city of towers in that case.ReferencesNotesBibliography;Ancient sources* of Halicarnassus: Roman Antiquities at LacusCurtius**** Polybius: The Rise of the Roman Empire at LacusCurtius;Modern sources********** Available in the Gazeteer of Bill Thayers Website at http://penelope.uchicago.edu/Thayer/E/Gazetteer/Places/Europe/Italy/_Periods/Roman/Archaic/Etruscan/_Texts/DENETR*/home.html***** ***********External links* Cities and Cemeteries of Etruria, the book by George Dennis at LacusCurtius* Etruscan News Online, the Newsletter of the American Section of the Institute for Etruscan and Italic Studies* Mysterious Etruscans, community dedicated to the preservation of Etruscan culture* Etruscan Studies, a Journal of the Etruscan Foundation from University of Massachusetts AmherstCities and sites* Panorama of Ara della Regina, Tarquinia*(Soprintendenza per i Beni Archeologici dellUmbria) The Cai Cutu Etruscan tomb An undisturbed late Etruscan family tomb, reused between the 3rd and 1st century BC, reassembled in the National Archeological Museum of Perugia* Etruscan Splendors from Volterra in Tuscany* Hypogeum of the Volumnis digital media archive (commons-licensed photos, laser scans, panoramas), data from a of Ferrara/CyArk research partnershipArt* Etruscan Lion Plaque Pendant, article on a piece of Etruscan artaf:Etruskersar:az:Etrusklarbe:be-x-old:br:Etruriabg:ca:Etruscscv:cs:Etruskovco:Etruschicy:Etrwsciaidda:Etruskernede:Etruskeret:Etruskidel:es:Etruscoseo:Etruskojeu:Etruskofa:fr:trusquesfy:Etruskengl:Etruscosko:hr:Etruaniid:Etruskania:Etruscosetruscahe:ka:la:Etruscilv:Etruskilb:Etruskerlt:Etruskaihu:Etruszkoknl:Etruskenja:no:Etruskereetruskapt:Etruscosro:Etrusciru:sk:Etruskoviasl:Etruanisr:sh:Etrurcifi:Etruskitsv:EtruskerEtruskanoth:tr:Etrskleruk:minh Etruscazh:
37754
Mountain
File:Volcn Chimborazo, El Taita Chimborazo.jpg|thumb|300px|Chimborazo, Ecuador, the point farthest from the center of the Earth( The Highest Spot on Earth)File:Matterhorn Riffelsee 2005-06-11.jpg|thumb|right|upright|The Matterhorn, AlpsA mountain is a large landform that stretches above the surrounding land in a limited area usually in the form of a peak. A mountain is generally steeper than a hill. The adjective montane is used to describe mountainous areas and things associated with them. The study of mountains is called Orography.Exogeology deals with planetary mountains, which in that branch of science are usually called montes (singularmons). The highest mountain on Earth based from sea level is Everest () in the Himalayas of Asia. The highest known mountain in the System is Mons on the planet Mars at .DefinitionFile:WheelerPeak.JPG|thumb|The view of Jeff Davis Peak from the glacier-carved summit of Wheeler Peak, Nevada.  Because Boundary Peak, Nevada is partially in California, and is actually a  sub-peak of Peak, the shorter Wheeler Peak can be considered the tallest mountain in Nevada.There is no universally accepted definition of a mountain. Elevation, volume, relief, steepness, spacing and continuity have been used as criteria for defining a mountain.(Gerrard, A. J. 1990. Mountain Environments) In the English Dictionary a mountain is defined as a natural elevation of the earth surface rising more or less abruptly from the surrounding level and attaining an altitude which, relatively to the adjacent elevation, is impressive or notable.(Whether a landform is called a mountain may depend on usage among the local people. The highest point in Francisco, California, is called Mount Davidson, notwithstanding its height of , which makes it ten feet short of the minimum for a mountain by American designations. Similarly, Mount Scott outside Oklahoma is only  from its base to its highest point.Definitions of mountain include:()*Height over base of at least ;*Height over base of .. with a slope greater than 2 degrees*Height over base of .. with a slope greater than 5 degrees*Local (radius . elevation greater than ., or . if local (radius . elevation is greater than .By this definition, mountains cover 64% of Asia, 25% of Europe, 22% of America, 17% of Australia, and 3% of Africa. As a whole, 24% of the Earths land mass is mountainous and 10% of people live in mountainous regions.() Most of the worlds rivers are fed from mountain sources, and more than half of humanity depends on mountains for water.()()CharacteristicsFile:AntelopeIslandEchoGhosttowns 221.jpg|thumb|right|Mountain in County, UtahTall mountains reach into the colder layers of the atmosphere. They are consequently subject to glaciation, and erosion through frost action. Such processes produce the peak shape. Some mountains have lakes, created by melting glaciers; for example, there are an estimated 3,000 glacial lakes in Bhutan. Mountains can be eroded and weathered, altering their characteristics over time.File:Olympus Litochoro.JPG|thumb|right|Mount Olympus in GreeceTall mountains have different climatic conditions at the top than at the base, and will thus have  zonation of ecosystems. At the highest elevations, trees cannot grow, and whatever life may be present will be of the alpine type, resembling tundra.( Just below the tree line, one may find subalpine forests of needleleaf trees, which can withstand cold, dry conditions.() In regions with dry climates, the tendency of mountains to have higher precipitation as well as lower temperatures also provides for varying conditions, which in turn leads to differing flora and fauna.()() Some plants and animals found in these zones tend to become isolated since the conditions above and below a particular zone will be inhospitable and thus constrain their movements or dispersal. On the other hand, birds, being capable of flight, may take advantage of montane habitats and migrate into a region that would otherwise not provide appropriate habitat.() These isolated ecological systems, or microclimates, are known as islands.()Mountains are generally colder than their surrounding lowlands due to the way that the sun heats the surface of the Earth. Practically all the heat at the surface of the Earth comes from the sun, in the form of energy. The suns radiation is absorbed by land and sea, whence the heat is transferred into the air. Static air is a poor conductor of heat, so conduction of heat from the ground to the atmosphere is negligible. Heat is mainly transferred into the atmosphere through convection and radiation. The air immediately adjacent to the warmed surface will rise due to its buoyancy, leading to convective circulation, in the form of thermals, within the lowest layer of the atmosphere, the troposphere. When heat radiates from the surface of the earth, it is released as long-wave radiation, which can move freely through gases composed of diatomic molecules (such as the atmospheres oxygen and nitrogen), but is readily absorbed by triatomic molecules, such as dioxide and vapor. Since most of the atmospheres quantity of such triatomic gases is contained within the troposphere, this portion of the atmosphere is readily heated by the earths radiation. The tropopause forms a blanket of air keeping the surface warm. This is the Effect. The higher the altitude, the less of this blanket there is to keep in the heat. Thus, higher elevations, such as mountains, are colder than surrounding lowlands.() Air temperature in the lowest layer of the atmosphere, the troposphere, decreases with gains in altitude. The rate at which the temperature drops with elevation, called the environmental rate,  is not constant (it can fluctuate throughout the day or seasonally and also regionally), but a normal lapse rate is 5.5C per 1,000 m (3.57F per 1,000 ft).()()() The temperature continues to drop with increasing altitude, until the tropopause (11,000m or 36,089 ft in the Standard Atmosphere, where it does not decrease further. However, this is higher than the highest mountaintop.Mountains are generally less preferable for human habitation than lowlands; the weather is often harsher, and there is little level ground suitable for agriculture. The decreasing atmospheric pressure means that less oxygen is available for breathing, and there is less protection against solar radiation (UV). mountain sickness (caused by hypoxiaa lack of oxygen in the blood) affects over half of lowlanders who spend more than a few hours above .Many mountains and mountain ranges throughout the world have been left in their natural state, and are today primarily used for recreation, while others are used for logging, mining, grazing, or see little use. Some mountains offer spectacular views from their summits, while others are densely wooded. Summit accessibility is affected by height, steepness, latitude, terrain, weather. Roads, lifts, or tramways allow access. Hiking, backpacking, mountaineering, climbing, climbing, skiing, and snowboarding are recreational activities enjoyed on mountains. Mountains that support heavy recreational use (especially downhill skiing) are often the locations of resorts.Mountains are made up of earth and rock materials. The outermost layer of the Earth or the Earths crust is composed of seven primary plates. When two plates move or collide each other, vast land areas are uplifted, forming mountains.TypesClassified by the geological processes that shape them, there are five major types of mountains:File:Nepal Mount Everest And Ama dablam.jpg|thumb|200px|Left to right: Everest, Lhotse and Dablam in the HimalayasFile:Mount Kinabalu.jpg|thumb|200px|Kinabalu, , Malaysia;Fold mountains: mountains are the most common type of mountains.  They are formed due to collision of two plates, causing folding of the Earths crust. Examples of fold mountains are the Himalayas of Asia and the Alps in Europe.;Fault-Block mountains: As the name suggests, mountains or fault mountains are formed when blocks of rock materials slide along faults in the Earths crust. There are two types of block mountains, namely the lifted and tilted. Lifted mountains have two steep sides; whereas, the tilted type has one steep side and a gentle sloping side. Examples of fault-block mountains are found in the Sierra Nevada mountain range of the western United States.;Volcanic mountains: Volcanic mountains are formed due to eruptions where magma piles up on the surface of the Earth. Examples of volcanoes include Fuji in Japan and Pinatubo in the Philippines. Inactive or extinct volcanic mountain include Elbrus in Russia, Kinabalu in Malaysia, Cotopaxi in Ecuador and Aconcagua in Argentina/;Dome mountains: Dome mountains are formed when the hot magma rises from the mantle and uplifts the overlying sedimentary layer of the Earths crust. In the process, the magma is not erupted, but it cools down and forms the core of the mountain. They are called dome mountains due to their appearance that resembles a dome shape. An example of a dome mountain is Mountain in the U.S. state of Utah.Image:AdirondackHighPeaks.png|thumb|200px|The Mountains of New York are remnants of an eroded plateau.;Plateau mountains: Plateau mountains are formed erosion of an uplifted plateau. Examples of plateau mountains are in the Mountains in the U.S. state of New York.GeologyImage:Himalaya_annotated.jpg|thumb|right|The Himalayan mountain range with Mount Everestrect 58 14 160 49 Lonzorect 200 28 335 52 Makalurect 378 24 566 45 Everestrect 188 581 920 656 Plateaurect 250 406 340 427 Riverrect 333 149 409 186 Changtserect 550 284 677 303 Glacierrect 478 196 570 218 North Facerect 237 231 346 267 Rongbuk Glacierrect 314 290 536 309 North Col north ridge routerect 531 79 663 105 Lhotserect 582 112 711 130 Nuptserect 603 232 733 254 South Col routerect 716 165 839 206 Kangrect 882 147 967 183 Oyurect 1 1 999 661 Press hyperlinks (or button to enlarge image)desc bottom-leftA mountain is usually produced by the movement of lithospheric plates, either orogenic movement or movement. Compressional forces, isostatic uplift and intrusion of igneous matter forces surface rock upward, creating a landform higher than the surrounding features. The height of the feature makes it either a hill or, if higher and steeper, a mountain. The absolute heights of features termed mountains and hills vary greatly according to an areas terrain. The major mountains tend to occur in long linear arcs, indicating tectonic plate boundaries and activity. Two types of mountain are formed in this way depending on how the rock reacts to the tectonic forces,  mountains or mountains.  Other mountain building processes include volcanoes and floor spreading.Fold mountainsCompressional forces in continental collisions may cause the compressed region to thicken and fold, with material forced both upwards and downwards. Since the less dense crust floats (cf iceberg) on the denser mantle rocks beneath, the weight of any crustal material forced upward to form hills, plateaus or mountains must be balanced by the buoyancy force (see isostasy) of a much greater volume  forced downward into the mantle.  Thus the continental crust is normally much thicker under mountains ( sometimes called mountain roots),(Press, Frank and  Siever, Raymond, Earth, W. H. Freeman, 4th ed., 1985, p. 413 ISBN 978-0716717430) compared to lower lying areas.  However, in many continental collisions (e.g. the Himalayas) part of one continent may simply override the other, crumpling in the process with the overridden crust forming much of the support.  Mountains may similarly be  partly supported by oceanic crust subducted beneath the continental crust (e.g. the Andes as the Nazca plate flows beneath the American Plate).Fault-block mountainFile:Top of stonyman summit view Shenandoah nP 2007.jpg|thumb|right|Ridge Mountains in National Park, Virginia, USABlock mountains are created when large areas are widely broken up by faults creating large vertical displacements. This occurrence is fairly common. The uplifted blocks are block mountains or horsts. The intervening dropped blocks are termed graben: these can be small or form extensive valley systems. This form of landscape can be seen in Africa, the Vosges, the and Range province of Western America and the Rhine valley. These areas often occur when the regional stress is extensional and the crust is thinned.Rock that does not fault may fold, either symmetrically or asymmetrically. The upfolds are anticlines and the downfolds are synclines: in asymmetric folding there may also be recumbent and overturned folds. The Mountains are an example of folding. Over time, erosion can bring about an inversion of relief: the soft upthrust rock is worn away so the anticlines are actually lower than the tougher, more compressed rock of the synclines.VolcanoesSome isolated mountains are produced by volcanoes, including many apparently small islands or seamounts that reach a great height above the ocean floor.Mid-ocean ridgesThe ridges formed during spreading are often referred to as undersea mountain ranges due to their bathymetric prominence.See alsoFile:ZugspitzeJubilaeumsgratHoellental.JPG |thumb|right|The Zugspitze, the highest mountain in Germany*of mountains*of mountain types*Lists of mountains*range*of mountain ranges*of highest mountains*of peaks by prominence*names of mountains*of ski areas and resorts*Mountaineering*buildingNotes Further reading * Fraknoi, A., Morrison, D., & Wolff, S. (2004). Voyages to the Planets. 3rd Ed. Belmont: Thomson Books/Cole.ace:Gunongaf:Bergam:ar:an:Montanyaarc:ast:Monteaz:Dabn:ba:be:be-x-old:bs:Planinabr:Menezbg:ca:Muntanyacv:cs:Horacy:Mynyddda:Bjergde:Bergnv:Dziet:Mgiel:eml:Muntgnaes:Montaaeo:Montoeu:Mendifa:hif:Pahaarrfr:Montagnefy:Berchga:Sliabhgd:Beinngl:Montaagan:glk:ko:hi:hr:Planineio:Montobpy:id:Gunungzu:Intabais:Fjallit:Montagnahe:jv:Gunungkn:ka:rw:Umusozisw:Mlimaht:Mnlbe:la:Monslv:Kalnslb:Bierglt:Kalnasln:Ngmbjbo:cmanalmo:Muntagnahu:Hegymk:mg:Tendrombohitraml:ms:Gunungnah:Teptl(aardrijkskunde)cr:ne:ja:ce:Lamno:Fjellnn:Fjellnrm:Montangneoc:Montanhauz:Togpnb:ps:nds:Bargpl:Grapt:Montanharo:Munterm:Muntognaqu:Urquru:sah:(gjeografi)scn:Muntagnasimple:Mountain(vyvenina)sl:Goraso:Buurosr:sh:Planinasu:Gunungfi:Vuorisv:Bergtl:Bundokta:te:th:tg:chr:tr:Datk:Daguk:ur:za:Byavi:Nizh-classical:war:Bukidwo:Tangorwuu:yi:zh-yue:zh:
38715
Sigismund,_Archduke_of_Austria
Image:Sigismund of Austria.jpg|right|thumb|200px|An engraving by W. Killian, 1623.Sigismund of Austria, Duke, then Archduke of Austria (October 26, 1427 &ndash; March 4, 1496) was a Habsburg archduke of Austria and ruler of Tirol  from 1446 to 1490. Sigismund (or Siegmund, sometimes also spelled Sigmund) was born in Innsbruck; his parents were IV, Duke of Austria and of Brunswick. He was a first cousin of III, Holy Roman Emperor, who served as regent until 1446.Life and careerIn 1446, upon the end of the regency of Frederick III, he acceded to rulership over Tirol  and (other) Further Austria Vordersterreich, which included the Sundgau in the Alsace, the Breisgau, and some possessions in Swabia. In 1449, he married Princess Eleanor of Scotland, the daughter of James I, of Scots.For much of his reign, Sigismund was engaged in disputes with of Cusa, then of Brixen, for the control of the Eisack, Pustertal and Inn valleys. In 1460, when he had Nicholas imprisoned, he was excommunicated by Pius II. The bishop fled to Todi, but died before the archduke surrendered in order to receive the papal pardon.In 1469, he sold his lands on the Rhine and in the Alsace to Duke of Burgundy. Sources are unclear whether he sold them due to his debts he had accumulated owing to his luxurious lifestyle or just rented them because he wanted to have them protected better against the expansion of the Swiss Confederacy. In any case, he bought back these possessions in 1474, and together with the Swiss (with whom he had concluded a peace treaty in Konstanz) and the Alsatian cities, he sided against Charles in the of Hricourt.In 1477, Frederick III made him archduke. Three years later, Eleanor died, and 1484, Sigismund married the 16-year-old Catherine of Saxony, daughter of Duke of Saxony. He had no offspring from either marriage. File:Half Guldiner Sigismund 1484 691929.jpg|thumb|left|360px|A half guldengroschen from 1484.In the later years of the 1470s and early 1480s Sigismund issued a decree that instituted a radical coinage reformation that eventually led up to the creation of the worlds first really large and heavy silver coin in nearly a millennium, the guldengroschen, which the Habsburgs in Bohemia developed later into the thaler. This coin was the ancestor of many the major European coin denominations to come later (and also of the US Dollar). Using new mining methods and technology, the largely quiescent silver mines in Tirol were brought back into production and soon numerous surrounding states were re-opening old mines and minting similar coins. This production of large coinage exploded as silver from the Spains colonies in the Americas flooded the European economy. It is from these reforms in part that Sigismund acquired the nickname of der Mnzreiche, or rich in coin.Sigismund was easily swayed by the bad advice of his council and in March 1487 entered into a pointless war with the of Venice, sometimes called the War of Rovereto. Tyrolean forces quickly seized silver mines in the Valsugana valley owned by Venice, and in April 1487 Sigismund outraged Venice further when he imprisoned 130 Venetian merchants traveling to the fair at Bozen (modern Bolzano) and confiscated their goods. Tyrol stormed the Pass of Calliano and later besieged the castle at Rovereto using a massive bombard, one of the earliest times such a large piece had been used in warfare. The war continued through summer but ended with no decisive victory for either side. One notable casualty of the conflict was the condottiero Sanseverino, Prince of Salerno.By 1490 the opposition of the population of Tirol compelled Sigismund to hand over the rulership to Archduke Maximilian I, who later became Roman Emperor. Whether Sigismund voluntarily handed over power to Maximilian or was strongly coerced by the latter is not clear.AncestrySee also*WarsExternal links*Encyclopedia of AustriaReferences***Habsbursk(sterreich-Tirol)(Tirooli hertsog)de AustriadAutricheAdipati Agung AustriadAustriaosztrk fhercegvan Tirol()Habsburg( )( )
39473
History_of_Alabama
thumb|right|175px|Alabama State FlagAlabama became a state of the United States of America on December 14, 1819. After the Wars and removals of the early 19th century forced most Native Americans out of the state, white settlers arrived in large numbers.In antebellum Alabama, wealthy planters created large cotton plantations based in the fertile central Black Belt, which depended on the labor of enslaved Americans.  Tens of thousands of slaves were transported to and sold in the state by slave traders who purchased them in the South. Elsewhere in Alabama, poorer whites practiced subsistence farming. By 1860 African Americans comprised 45 percent of the states population, estimated in the 1860 Census at 964,201.Alabama declared its secession in January 1861 and joined the States of America. The ensuing Civil War saw action in Alabama, and the population suffered economic losses and hardships as a result of the war. The Southern capitulation in 1865 ended the Confederacy, led to the emancipation of slaves, and began a period of ReconstructionAn agricultural depression followed, and at the end of Reconstruction in 1877 Alabama emerged still a poor, heavily rural state, with an economy even more tied to cotton despite its declining prices. The financial of 1873 severely impacted the state. Reconstructions end heralded the rise to power of Redeemer Democrats whites who used both legal and extralegal means (including violence and harassment) to re-establish political and social dominance over the recently emancipated African Americans. In 1901 the Democrats passed a state Constitution that effectively disfranchised most African Americans (who in 1900 comprised more than 45 percent of the states population) as well as tens of thousands of poor whites.(Glenn Feldman. The Disfranchisement Myth: Poor Whites and Suffrage Restriction in Alabama. Athens: University of Georgia Press, 2004, p.136)(Historical Census Browser, 1900 Federal Census, University of Virginia http://fisher.lib.virginia.edu/collections/stats/histcensus/php/state.php, accessed 15 Mar 2008)  By 1941, 600,000 poor whites and 520,000 African Americans had been disfranchised.( In addition, despite massive population changes in the state, the rural-dominated legislature refused to redistrict itself from 1901 to the 1960s, leading to massive malapportionment. For decades a rural minority dominated a state, and the needs of urban, class and industrial interests were not addressed.To escape the inequities of disenfranchisement, segregation and violence, and underfunded schools, tens of thousands of African Americans joined the Great Migration from 1915 to 1930() and moved to better opportunities in industrial cities, mostly in the North and Midwest. The black exodus escalated steadily in the first three decades of the 20th century; 22,100 emigrated from 1900 to 1910; 70,800 between 1910 and 1920; and 80,700 between 1920 and 1930.(Sernett, Bound for the Promised Land, 37.)()Politically, the state continued as one-party Democratic into the 1980s as part of the South,() and produced a number of national leaders.The Deal farm programs increased the price of cotton and War II finally brought prosperity, as the state developed a manufacturing and service base. Cotton faded in importance as mechanical pickers each replaced scores of farm workers. With the passage of national civil rights legislation in 1965 African Americans could all exercise their right to vote.With the election of Hunt as governor in 1986, the state became a Republican stronghold in presidential elections and leaned Republican in statewide elections, while the Democratic Party still dominated local and legislative offices. Democratic dominance has ended;() in terms of organization, the parties are about evenly matched.(Bullock and Rozell, The New Politics of the Old South, 87.)Indigenous peoples, early historypeoples of varying cultures lived in the area for thousands of years before European colonization. Trade with the Northeast via the River began during the Burial Mound Period (1000 BCAD 700) and continued until European contact.() The agrarian culture covered most of the state from 1000 to 1600 AD, with one of its major centers being at the Archaeological Site in Alabama.()() Analysis of artifacts recovered from archaeological excavations at Moundville were the basis of scholars formulating the characteristics of the Ceremonial Complex (SECC).() Contrary to popular belief, the SECC appears to have no direct links to Mesoamerican culture, but developed independently. The Ceremonial Complex represents a major component of the religion of the Mississippian peoples; it is one of the primary means by which their religion is understood.()Precontactright|295px|thumb|The Mississippian culture was a mound-building Native American culture that flourished in the United States before the arrival of Europeans.At least 12,000 years ago, Native Americans or Paleo-Indians appeared in what is today referred to as The South.() Paleo-Indians in the Southeast were hunter-gatherers who pursued a wide range of animals, including the megafauna, which became extinct following the end of the Pleistocene age.( The period from 1000 BCE to 1000 CE was marked by the development of pottery and the small-scale horticulture of the Agricultural Complex.The culture arose as the cultivation of Mesoamerican crops of corn and beans led to population growth.  Increased population density gave rise of urban centers and regional chiefdoms, of which the greatest was the settlement known as Cahokia, in present-day Illinois.  Stratified societies developed, with hereditary religious and political elites, and flourished in what is now the Midwestern, Eastern, and Southeastern United States from 800 to 1500 C.E.The early historic Muscogee were probably descendants of the builders of the culture along the River in modern Tennessee,() Georgia and Alabama.  They may have been related to the Utinahica of southern Georgia.At the time the Spanish made their first forays inland from the shores of the of Mexico, many political centers of the Mississippians were already in decline, or abandoned.() The region is best described as a collection of moderately sized native chiefdoms (such as the chiefdom on the River), interspersed with completely autonomous villages and tribal groups. The late culture is what the earliest Spanish explorers encountered, beginning on April 2, 1513, with Ponce de Lens Florida landing and the 1526 Vzquez de Aylln expedition in Carolina.Among the historical tribes of Native American people living in the area of present-day Alabama at the time of European contact were  Iroquoian-speaking Cherokee, and the Muskogean-speaking Alabama (Alibamu), Chickasaw, Choctaw, Creek, Koasati, and Mobile.()  Reminders of Alabamas Native American population can be found in many of its place names.European colonizationSpanish were the first Europeans to enter Alabama, claiming land for their Crown.  They named the region La Florida.Although a member of de Narvezs expedition of 1528 may have entered southern Alabama, the first fully documented visit was by explorer Hernando de Soto.  He made an arduous expedition along the Coosa, Alabama and Tombigbee rivers in 1539.The English also laid claims to the region north of the of Mexico.  II of England included the territory of modern Alabama in the of Carolina, with land granted to certain of his favorites by the charters of 1663 and 1665. English traders from Carolina frequented the valley of the River as early as 1687.map of Mobile, Alabamas first permanent European settlement.The French also colonized the region. In 1702 they founded a settlement on the River, constructing Louis there.  For the next nine years this was the French seat of government of New France, or Louisiane (Louisiana).  In 1711, Fort Louis was abandoned to floods.  Settlers rebuilt a fort on higher ground known as Conde.  This was the start of present-day Mobile, the first permanent European settlement in Alabama.The French and the English contested the region, each attempting to forge strong alliances with Indian tribes. To strengthen their position, defend their Indian allies, and draw other tribes to them, the French established the military posts of Toulouse, near the junction of the Coosa and Tallapoosa rivers, and Tombecbe on the Tombigbee River.The English Crowns grant of Georgia to Oglethorpe and his associates in 1732 included a portion of what is now northern Alabama. In 1739, Oglethorpe visited the Indians west of the River and made a treaty with them.The 1763 Treaty of Paris, which ended the and Indian War, terminated the French occupation of Alabama. Great Britain came into undisputed control of the region between the Chattahoochee and the Rivers. The portion of Alabama below the 31st parallel then became a part of Florida.  The portion north of this line became a part of the Country, set apart by royal proclamation for use by Indians. In 1767, the province of West Florida was extended northward to 3228N latitude.A few years later, during the Revolutionary War, the British ceded this region to Spain.  By the Treaty of Versailles, September 3, 1783, Great Britain ceded West Florida to Spain.  By the of Paris (1783), signed the same day, Britain ceded to the newly established United States all of this province north of the 31N, thus laying the foundation for a long controversy.270px|thumb|Mississippi Territory changes 1798-1817.By the Treaty of Madrid, in 1795, Spain ceded to the United States the lands east of the Mississippi between 31N and 3228N. Three years later, in 1798, Congress organized this district as the Territory. A strip of land 12 or 14 miles wide near the present northern boundary of Alabama and Mississippi was claimed by Carolina, but in 1787 that state ceded this claim to the federal government. Georgia likewise claimed all the lands between the 31st and 35th parallels from its present western boundary to the Mississippi River, and did not surrender its claim until 1802. Two years later, the boundaries of Mississippi Territory were extended so as to include all of the Georgia cession.In 1812, Congress added the District of West Florida to the Mississippi Territory, claiming that it was included in the Purchase. The following year, General Wilkinson occupied the Mobile District with a military force. The Spanish did not resist. Thus the whole area of the present state of Alabama was then under the jurisdiction of the United States.  Native Americans still occupied most of the land, with some formal ownership recognized by treaty.In 1817, the Mississippi Territory was divided.  The western portion became the state of Mississippi, and the eastern portion became the Territory, with St. Stephens, on the River, as the temporary seat of government.Conflict between the Indians of Alabama and American settlers increased rapidly in the early 19th century. The great Shawnee chief Tecumseh visited the region in 1811, seeking to forge an Indian alliance of resistance from the Gulf of Mexico to the Lakes. With the outbreak of the of 1812, Britain encouraged Tecumsehs resistance movement. Several tribes were divided in opinion.The Creek tribe fell to civil war. Violence between Creeks and Americans escalated, culminating in the Mims massacre. Full-scale war between the United States and the Red Stick Creeks began, known as the War. The Chickasaw, Choctaw, Cherokee Nation, and other Creek factions remained neutral or allied to the United States, some serving with American troops. Volunteer militias from Georgia, South Carolina, and Tennessee marched into Alabama, fighting the Red Sticks.Later, federal troops became the main fighting force for the United States. General Jackson was the commander of the American forces during the Creek War and later against the British in the War of 1812. His leadership and military success during the wars made him a national hero. The of Fort Jackson (August 9, 1814), ended the Creek War. By the terms of the treaty the Creeks, Red Sticks and neutrals alike, ceded about one-half of the present state of Alabama to the United States. Later cessions by the Cherokee, Chickasaw, and Choctaw in 1816 left only about a quarter of Alabama to the Indians.Early statehoodIn 1819, Alabama was admitted as the 22nd state to the Union. Its constitution provided for universal suffrage for white men.One of the first problems of the  new commonwealth was that of finance. Since the amount of money in circulation was not sufficient to meet the demands of the increasing population, a system of state banks was instituted. State bonds were issued and public lands were sold to secure capital, and the notes of the banks, loaned on security, became a medium of exchange. Prospects of an income from the banks led the legislature of 1836 to abolish all taxation for state purposes. This was hardly done, however, before the of 1837 wiped out a large portion of the banks assets. Next came revelations of grossly careless and even of corrupt management.  In 1843 the banks were placed in liquidation.  After disposing of all their available assets, the state assumed the remaining liabilities, for which it had pledged its faith and credit.In 1830 the Removal Act set in motion the process that resulted in the removal of southeastern tribes, including the Creek, Cherokee, Choctaw, Chickasaw, and Seminole. In 1832, the national government provided for the removal of the Creeks via the of Cusseta.  Before the actual removal occurred between 1834 and 1837, the state legislature defined counties from Indian lands into counties, and settlers flocked in.Until 1832, there was only one party in the state, the Democratic.  The question of nullification caused a division that year into the (Jackson) Democratic party and the States Rights (Calhoun Democratic) party.  About the same time the Whig party emerged as an opposition party.  It drew support from plantation owners and townsmen, while the Democrats were strongest among poor farmers and Catholic communities (descendants of French and Spanish colonists) in the Mobile area.  For some time, the Whigs were almost as numerous as the Democrats, but they never secured control of the state government. The States Rights faction were in a minority; nevertheless, under their active and persistent leader, L. Yancey (18141863), they prevailed upon the Democrats in 1848 to adopt their most radical views.During the agitation over the Proviso, which would bar slavery from territory acquired from Mexico as a result of the Mexican War, Yancey induced the State Convention of 1848 to adopt what was known as the Platform.  It declared that neither Congress nor the government of a territory had the right to interfere with slavery in a territory, that those who held opposite views were not Democrats, and that the Democrats of Alabama would not support a candidate for the presidency if he did not agree with them.  This platform was endorsed by conventions in Florida and Virginia and by the legislatures of Georgia and Alabama.The of 1850 split people from their old party lines.  The States Rights faction, joined by many Democrats, founded the Rights Party, which demanded the repeal of the Compromise, advocated resistance to future encroachments and prepared for secession.  The Whigs were joined by the remaining Democrats and called themselves the Unionists.  The party unwillingly accepted the Compromise and denied that the Constitution provided for secession.Development of large cotton plantations in the Black Belt after the invention of the cotton gin had added dramatically to the states wealth.  The owners wealth depended on the labor of numerous enslaved African Americans. In other parts of the state, the soil supported only subsistence farming. Most of the yeoman farmers owned few or no slaves. By 1860 the success of cotton production led to planters holding 435,000 enslaved African Americans, 45% of the states population.Early Alabama settlers were noted for their spirit of frontier democracy and egalitarianism, and their fierce defense of the republican values of civic virtue and opposition to corruption. J. Mills Thornton (1978) argued that Whigs worked for positive state action to benefit society as a whole, while the Democrats feared any increase of power in government, or in state-sponsored institutions as central banks. Fierce political battles raged in Alabama on issues ranging from banking to the removal of the Creek Indians. Thornton suggested the overarching issue in the state was how to protect liberty and equality for white people.  Fears that Northern agitators threatened their value system angered the voters and made them ready to secede when Lincoln was elected in 1860 (Thornton 1978).Secession and Civil War, 1861-1865The Unionists were successful in the elections of 1851 and 1852. Passage of the Bill and uncertainty about agitation against slavery led the State Democratic convention of 1856 to revive the Alabama Platform.  When Democratic National convention at South Carolina failed to approve the Alabama Platform in 1860, the Alabama delegates, followed by those of the other cotton states, withdrew. Upon the election of Lincoln, Governor B. Moore, as previously instructed by the legislature, called a state convention.  Many prominent men had opposed secession. In North Alabama, there was an attempt to organize a neutral state to be called Nickajack.  With President Lincolns call to arms in April 1861, most opposition to secession ended.On January 11, 1861 The State of Alabama adopted the ordinances of secession from the Union (by a vote of 61-39). Until February 18, 1861, Alabama was informally called the Alabama Republic. It never changed its formal name which always has been State of Alabama.Alabama soon joined the States of America, whose government was organized at Montgomery on February 4, 1861.File:1861 Davis Inaugural.jpg|thumb|right|The inauguration of Davis in Montgomery on February 18, 1861.Governor Moore energetically supported the Confederate war effort. Even before hostilities began, he seized Federal facilities, sent agents to buy rifles in the Northeast, and scoured the state for weapons. Despite some resistance in the northern part of the state, Alabama joined the States of America (CSA). Congressman Williamson R. W. Cobb was a Unionist and pleaded for compromise. When he ran for the Confederate congress in 1861, he was defeated.  (In 1863, with war weariness growing in Alabama, he was elected on a wave of antiwar sentiment.)  Secessionists brushed Cobb aside, and the CSA set up its temporary capital in Montgomery and selected Davis as president. In May, the Confederate government abandoned Montgomery before the sickly season began, and relocated in Richmond. Virginia.Some idea of the severe internal logistics problems the Confederacy faced can be seen by tracing Daviss journey from Mississippi, the next state over. From his plantation on the river, he took a steamboat down the Mississippi to Vicksburg, boarded a train to Jackson, where he took another train north to Grand Junction, then a third train east to Chattanooga, Tennessee, and a fourth train to Atlanta, Georgia. Yet another train took Davis to the Alabama border, where a final train took him to Montgomery.  As the war proceeded, the Federals seized the Mississippi River, burned trestles and railroad bridges, and tore up track. The frail Confederate railroad system faltered and virtually collapsed for want of repairs and replacement parts.In the early part of the Civil War, Alabama was not the scene of military operations, yet the state contributed about 120,000 men to the Confederate service, practically all the white population capable of bearing arms. Most were recruited locally and served with men they knew, which built esprit and strengthened ties to home.  Medical conditions were severe.  About 15% of fatalities were from disease, more than the 10% from battle. Alabama had few well-equipped hospitals, but it had many women who volunteered to nurse the sick and wounded.  Soldiers were poorly equipped, especially after 1863.  Often they pillaged the dead for boots, belts, canteens, blankets, hats, shirts and pants.  Uncounted thousands of slaves worked with Confederate troops; they took care of horses and equipment, cooked and did laundry, hauled supplies, and helped in field hospitals.  Other slaves built defensive installations, especially those around Mobile. They graded roads, repaired railroads, drove supply wagons, and labored in iron mines, iron foundries and even in the munitions factories. The service of slaves was involuntary: their unpaid labor was impressed from their unpaid masters.  About 10,000 slaves escaped and joined the Union army, along with 2,700 white men.Thirty-nine Alabamians attained flag rank, most notably  Lieutenant General Longstreet and Admiral Semmes.  Gorgas who came to Alabama from Pennsylvania, was the chief of ordnance for the Confederacy. He located new munitions plants in Selma, which employed 10,000 workers until the Union soldiers burned the factories down in 1865. Selma Arsenal made most of the Confederacys ammunition. The Selma Naval Ordnance Works made artillery, turning out a cannon every five days. The Confederate Naval Yard built ships and was noted for launching the CSS Tennessee in 1863 to defend Mobile Bay.  Selmas Confederate Nitre Works procured niter, for gunpowder, from limestone caves. When supplies were low, it advertised for housewives to save the contents of their chamber potsurine, a rich source of nitrogen.Alabama soldiers fought in hundreds of battles; the states losses at Gettysburg were 1,750 dead plus even more captured or wounded; the famed Alabama Brigade took 781 casualties.  In 1863, Union forces secured a foothold in northern Alabama in spite of the opposition of General B. Forrest. From 1861, the Union blockade shut Mobile, and, in 1864, the outer defenses of Mobile were taken by a Union fleet; the city itself held out until April 1865. ch 12Reconstruction, 1865-1875According to the presidential plan of reorganization, a provisional governor for Alabama was appointed in June 1865. A state convention met in September of the same year, and declared the ordinance of secession null and void and slavery abolished.  A legislature and a governor were elected in November, and the legislature was at once recognized by President Johnson, but not by Congress, which refused to seat the delegation.  Johnson ordered the Army to allow the inauguration of the governor after the legislature ratified the thirteenth amendment in December, 1865. But the legislatures passage of Black Codes to control the freedmen who were flocking from the plantations to the towns, and its rejection of the Fourteenth Amendment, intensified Congressional hostility to the presidential plan.In 1867, the congressional plan of Reconstruction was completed and Alabama was placed under military government. The freedmen were enrolled as voters.  Numerous white citizens were temporarily disfranchised, as the government suspected the loyalty of former Confederates. The new Republican party, made up of freedmen, Union sympathizers (scalawags), and northerners who had settled in the South (disparagingly called  carpetbaggers) took control two years after the war ended.  They called a constitutional convention in November 1867, and framed a constitution which conferred universal manhood suffrage.  Whites who had fought for the Confederacy were disfranchised for a temporary period. The Reconstruction Acts of Congress required every new constitution to be ratified by a majority of the legal voters of the state. The whites of Alabama largely stayed away from the polls.  After five days of voting, the constitution needed 13,550 to secure a majority. Congress then enacted that a majority of the votes cast should be sufficient.  Thus the constitution went into effect, the state was readmitted to the Union in June 1868, and a new governor and legislature were elected.Many white citizens resisted postwar changes.  Later the myth about Reconstruction was that it was  notable for legislative extravagance and corruption, and control by freedmen.  In fact, whites had the most control.  A biracial coalition created the first system of public education in the state, which would benefit poor white children as well as freedmen.  They also created charitable public  institutions, such as hospitals and orphanages, to benefit all citizens.  Debt rose in contrast to before the war, when there was little state investment for citizens.  The wealthy elite could educate their children privately, for instance, and they also paid privately for roads and services.The state endorsed railway bonds at the rate of $12,000 and $16,000 a mile until the state debt had increased from eight million to seventeen million dollars.  Mostly the white elite benefited from such arrangements.  , and similar corruption characterized local government. The native white people united, formed a Conservative party and elected a governor and a majority of the lower house of the legislature in 1870.  As the new administration was overall a failure, in 1872, voters reacted in favor of the Republicans.By 1874, however, the power of the Republicans was broken, and conservative Democrats regained power in all state offices.  A commission appointed to examine the state debt found it to be $25,503,000; by compromise, it was reduced to $15,000,000. A new constitution was adopted in 1875, which omitted the guarantee of the previous constitution that no one should be denied suffrage on account of race, color or previous condition of servitude.  Its provisions forbade the state to engage in internal improvements or to give its credit to any private enterprise, an anti-industrial stance that limited the states progress for decades.Disfranchisement and origins of New South, 1876-1914After 1874, the Democratic party had constant control of the state administration. The Republican Party by then was chiefly supported by African Americans.  Republicans held no local or state offices, but the party did have some federal patronage. It failed to make nominations for office in 1878 and 1880 and endorsed the ticket of the Greenback party in 1882.The development of mining and manufacturing was accompanied by economic distress among the farming classes, which found expression in the Jeffersonian Democratic party, organized in 1892. The regular Democratic ticket was elected and the new party was then merged into the Populist party. In 1894, the Republicans united with the Populists, elected three congressional representatives, secured control of many of the counties, but failed to carry the state.  They continued their opposition with less success in the next campaigns. Partisanship became intense, and Democratic charges of corruption of the black electorate were matched by Republican and Populist accusations of fraud and violence by Democrats.Despite opposition by Republicans and Populists, Democrats completed their dominance with passage of a new constitution in 1901 that restricted suffrage and effectively disfranchised African Americans. Its voter registration requirements also rapidly disfranchised tens of thousands of poor whites, an outcome the latter were not suspecting.  From 1900 to 1903, the number of white registered voters fell by more than 40,000, from 232,821 to 191,492, despite a growth in population. By 1941 a total of more whites than blacks had been disfranchised: 600,000 whites to 520,000 blacks.  This was due mostly to effects of the cumulative poll tax.(The damage to the African-American community was severe and pervasive, as nearly all its eligible citizens lost the ability to vote. In 1900 45% of Alabamas population were African American: 827,545 citizens.(Historical Census Browser, 1900 US Census, University of Virginia, accessed 15 Mar 2008)  In 1900 fourteen Black Belt counties (which were primarily African American) had more than 79,000 voters on the rolls.  By June 1, 1903, the number of registered voters had dropped to 1,081. While Dallas and Lowndes counties were each 75% black, between them only 103 African-American voters managed to register.  In 1900 Alabama had more than 181,000 African Americans eligible to vote.  By 1903 only 2,980 had managed to qualify to register, although at least 74,000 black voters were literate.  The shut out was longlasting.  It meant the effects of segregation suffered by African Americans were severe. At the end of WWII, for instance, in the black Collegeville community of Birmingham, only eleven voters in a population of 8,000 African Americans were deemed eligible to register to vote.(  Disfranchisement also meant that blacks and poor whites could not serve on juries, so were subject to a justice system in which they had no part.Railroads and industryFile:Ensley.jpg|thumb|325px|right|Blast furnaces such as the Coal, Iron and Railroad Companys Ensley Works made Birmingham an important center for iron production in the early 20th century.Birmingham was founded on June 1, 1871 by real estate promoters who sold lots near the planned crossing of the Alabama & Chattanooga and South & North railroads.  The site of the railroad crossing was notable for the nearby deposits of ore, coal, and limestone-the three principal raw materials used in making steel. Its founders adopted the name of Englands principal industrial city to advertise the new city as a center of iron and steel production. Despite outbreaks of cholera, the population of Pittsburgh of the South grew from 38,000 to 132,000 from 1900 to 1910, attracting rural white and black migrants from all over the region.(Birminghams Population, 1880-2000) Birmingham experienced such rapid growth that it was nicknamed The Magic City.  By the 1920s, Birmingham was the 19th largest city in the U.S and held more than 30% of the population of the state. Heavy industry and mining were the basis of the economy.Chemical and structural constraints limited the quality of steel produced from Alabamas iron and coal. These materials did, however, combine to make ideal foundry iron.  Because of low transportation and labor costs, Birmingham quickly became the largest and cheapest foundry iron-producing area. By 1915 twenty-five percent of the nations foundry pig iron was produced in Birmingham.(http://www.slossfurnaces.com/media/pdfs/online_lessons/Alabama_New_South.pdf)Alabama in the New South, 1914-1945Despite Birminghams powerful industrial growth and its contributions to the state economy, its citizens, and those of other newly developing areas, were underrepresented in the state legislature for years. The rural-dominated legislature refused to redistrict state House and Senate seats from 1901 to the 1960s. This led to a stranglehold on the state by a white rural minority.  The contemporary interests of urbanizing, industrial cities and tens of thousands of citizens were not adequately represented in the government.(George Mason University, United States Election Project: Alabama Redistricting Summary, accessed 10 Mar 2008)  One result was that Jefferson County, home of Birminghams industrial and economic powerhouse, contributed more than one-third of all tax revenue to the state.  It received back only 1/67th of the tax money, as the state legislature ensured taxes were distributed equally to each county regardless of population.While African Americans suffered from segregation after disfranchisement, the state was diminished by its deliberate suppression of their talents. From 1910-1940, tens of thousands of talented African Americans migrated north from Alabama in the Great Migration to seek jobs, education for their children, and freedom from lynching in northern cities, such as Chicago, Detroit, Cleveland, Philadelphia and New York.  There they built their own businesses, churches and community organizations, music and arts, and began to create a middle class. The rate of population growth in Alabama dropped from 20.8% in 1900 and 16.9% in 1910, to 9.8% in 1920, reflecting the impact of the outmigration.  Disfranchisement was ended only in the mid-1960s by African Americans leading the Civil Rights Movement and gaining Federal legislation to protect their voting and civil rights.A rapid pace of change across the country, especially in growing cities, combined with new waves of immigration and migration of rural whites and blacks to cities, all contributed to a volatile social environment and the rise of a second Klux Klan (KKK) in the South and Midwest after 1915.  In many areas it represented itself as another fraternal group to give aid to a community.  Feldman (1999) has shown that the second KKK was not a mere hate group; it showed a genuine desire for political and social reform. For example, Alabama Klansmen like Black were among the foremost advocates of better public schools, effective Prohibition enforcement, expanded road construction, and other progressive measures to benefit poor whites. By 1925, the Klan was a powerful political force in the state, as urban politicians such as Thomas Heflin, Bibb Graves, and Black manipulated the KKK membership against the power of the Big Mule industrialists and especially the Black Belt planters who had long dominated the state.(Feldman (1999))In 1926, Bibb Graves, a former chapter head, won the governors office with KKK members support. He led one of the most progressive administrations in the states history, pushing for increased education funding, better public health, new highway construction, and pro-labor legislation. At the same time, KKK vigilantes---thinking they enjoyed governmental protectionlaunched a wave of physical terror across Alabama in 1927, targeting both blacks and whites. The conservative elite counterattacked. The major newspapers kept up a steady, loud attack on the Klan as violent and unAmerican. Sheriffs cracked down on Klan violence. The counterattack worked.  The state voted for Al Smith in 1928, and the Klans official membership plunged to under six thousand by 1930.Civil Rights Movement and redistricting, 1945-1975The rural white minoritys hold on the legislature continued, suppressing attempts by more progressive elements to modernize the state.  A study in 1960 concluded  that because of rural domination, A minority of about 25 per cent of the total state population is in majority control of the Alabama legislature.( Legislators and others mounted challenges in the 1960s.  It took years and Federal court intervention to achieve the redistricting necessary to establishing one man, one vote representation.In 1960 on the eve of important civil rights battles, 30% of Alabamas population was African American. More than 980,000 citizens lived without justice in a segregated state.(Historical Census Browser, 1960 US Census, University of Virginia, accessed 13 Mar 2008)As Birmingham was the center of industry and population in Alabama, in 1963 civil rights leaders chose to mount a campaign there for desegregation.  Schools, restaurants and department stores were segregated; no African Americans were hired to work in the stores where they shopped or in the city government supported in part by their taxes. There were no African-American members of the police force. Despite segregation, African Americans had been advancing economically. In response, independent groups affiliated with the KKK bombed transition residential neighborhoods to discourage blacks moving into them.To help with the campaign and secure national attention, the Rev. Shuttlesworth invited members of the Christian Leadership Conference (SCLC) to Birmingham to help change its leaderships policies. Non-violent action had produced good results in some other cities. The Rev. Luther King, Jr., Rev. Tee Walker, his executive director; and other leaders came to Birmingham to help.In the spring and summer of 1963, national attention became riveted on Birmingham.  The media covered the series of peaceful marches that the Birmingham police, headed by Police Commissioner Connor, attempted to divert and control. King intended to fill the jails with nonviolent protesters to make a moral argument to the United States. Dramatic images of Birmingham police using dogs and powerful streams of water against children protesters filled newspapers and television coverage, arousing national outrage. Finally Birmingham leaders King and Shuttlesworth came to agreement to end the marches with  businessmens group commitment to end segregation.  Some of the progress was slow.The Birmingham confrontations contributed to the Kennedy Administrations preparing civil rights legislation.  It was finally entered into law in 1964 when President Lyndon Johnson helped secure its passage and signed the Civil Rights Act.  The following year passage of the Rights Act helped secure suffrage for all citizens.Court challenges related to one man, one vote and the Voting Rights Act of 1965 finally provided the groundwork for Federal court action.  It required the legislature to create a statewide redistricting plan in 1972.(  Redistricting together with renewed voters rights, enabled hundreds of thousands of Alabama citizens to participate for the first time in the political system. See also * of Baptists in Alabama* of the Southern United StatesReferencesBibliographyOverviews* Encyclopedia of Alabama covers history, culture, geography, and natural environment.* Rogers, William Warren, Robert David Ward, Leah Rawls Atkins, and  Wayne Flynt. Alabama: The History of a Deep South State (1994)* Flynt, Wayne. Alabama in the Twentieth Century (2004)*Flynt, J. Wayne. Alabama. in Religion in the Southern States: A Historical Study, edited by Samuel S. Hill. 1983*Flynt, J. Wayne. Poor But Proud: Alabamas Poor Whites  1989.*Flynt, J. Wayne. Alabama Baptists: Southern Baptists in the Heart of Dixie (1998)*Holley, Howard L. A History of Medicine in Alabama. 1982.* Owen Thomas M. History of Alabama and Dictionary of Alabama Biography 4 vols. 1921.* Jackson, Harvey H. Inside Alabama: A Personal History of My State (2004)*Thomas, Mary Martha. Stepping out of the Shadows: Alabama Women, 1819-1990 (1995)*Williams, Benjamin Buford. A Literary History of Alabama: The Nineteenth Century 1979.*WPA. Guide to Alabama (1939)Pre 1900*Abernethy, Thomas Perkins The Formative Period in Alabama, 1815-1828 (1922)  online edition*Barney, William L. The Secessionist Impulse: Alabama and Mississippi in 1860. (1974).* Bethel, Elizabeth . The Freedmens Bureau in Alabama, Journal of Southern History Vol. 14, No. 1, Feb., 1948  pp. 4992 online at JSTOR*  Bond, Horace Mann. Social and Economic Forces in Alabama Reconstruction, Journal of Negro History 23 (1938):290-348  in JSTOR*Dupre, Daniel. Ambivalent Capitalists on the Cotton Frontier: Settlement and Development in the Tennessee Valley of Alabama. Journal of Southern History 56 (May 1990): 215-40. Online at JSTOR*Fitzgerald, Michael R.  Urban Emancipation: Popular Politics in Reconstruction Mobile, 18601890. (2002). 301 pp. ISBN 0-8071-2837-6.)*Fitzgerald, Michael R. Radical Republicanism and the White Yeomanry During Alabama Reconstruction, 1865-1868. Journal of Southern History 54 ( November 1988): 565-96.  JSTOR*Fleming, Walter L. Civil War and Reconstruction in Alabama 1905. the most detailed study; School full text online*Going, Allen J. Bourbon Democracy in Alabama, 1874-1890.  1951.* Hamilton, Peter Joseph.  The Reconstruction Period (1906), full length history of era; School approach; 570 pp; ch 12 on Alabama*Jordan, Weymouth T. Ante-Bellum Alabama: Town and Country. (1957).*Kolchin, Peter. First Freedom: The Response of Alabama Blacks to Emancipation and Reconstruction (1972).*McWhiney, Grady. Were the Whigs a Class Party in Alabama? Journal of Southern History 23 (1957): 510-22. Online at JSTOR*Rogers, William Warren. The One-Gallused Rebellion; Agrarianism in Alabama, 1865-1896  (1970).*Sellers, James B.  Slavery in Alabama  1950.  online edition*Sterkx, Henry Eugene. Partners in Rebellion: Alabama Women in the Civil War (1970).*Thornton, J. Mills III. Politics and Power in a Slave Society: Alabama, 1800-1860  (1978). online edition*Wiener, Jonathan M. Social Origins of the New South; Alabama, 1860-1885.  (1978).*Wiggins, Sarah Woolfolk. The Scalawag in Alabama Politics, 1865-1881 (1991)  online edition*Wiggins, Sarah Woolfolk. Alabama: Democratic Bulldozing and Republican Folly. in Reconstruction and Redemption in the South, edited by Otto H. Olson.  (1980).Since 1900*Barnard, William D. Dixiecrats and Democrats: Alabama Politics, 1942-1950 (1974)*Bond, Horace Mann. Negro Education in Alabama: A Study in Cotton and Steel 1939.*Brownell, Blaine A. Birmingham, Alabama: New South City in the 1920s. Journal of Southern History 38 (1972): 21-48. in JSTOR* Feldman, Glenn. Politics, Society, and the Klan in Alabama, 1915-1949 (1999) online edition* Feldman, Glenn, Southern Disillusionment with the Democratic Party: Cultural Conformity and the the Great Melding of Racial and Economic Conservatism in Alabama during World War II, Journal of American Studies 43 (Aug. 2009), 199230.*Frady, Marshall. Wallace: The Classic Portrait of Alabama Governor George Wallace (1996)*Grafton, Carl, and Anne Permaloff. Big Mules and Branchheads: James E. Folsom and Political Power in Alabama 1985.*Hackney, Sheldon. Populism to Progressivism in Alabama 1969.*Hamilton, Virginia. Lister Hill: Statesman from the South  1987.*Harris, Carl V. Political Power in Birmingham, 1871-1921 1977.*Key, V. O., Jr. Southern Politics in State and Nation. 1949.*Lesher, Stephan. George Wallace: American Populist (1995)*Norrell, Robert J. Caste in Steel: Jim Crow Careers in Birmingham, Alabama. Journal of American History 73 (December 1986): 669-94. in JSTOR*Norrell, Robert J. Labor at the Ballot Box: Alabama Politics from the New Deal to the Dixiecrat Movement. Journal of Southern History 57 (May 1991): 201-34. in JSTOR* Oliff, Martin T., ed. The Great War in the Heart of Dixie: Alabama During World War I (2008)*Sellers, James B. The Prohibition Movement in Alabama, 1702-1943 1943.*Thomas, Mary Martha. The New Women in Alabama: Social Reform and Suffrage, 1890-1920  (1992)  online edition*Thomas, Mary Martha. Riveting and Rationing in Dixie: Alabama Women and the Second World War (1987) online editionPrimary sources*****ja:do Alabama
40293
Nikkei_225
thumb|300px|Nikkei 225thumb|300px|Nikkei 225 (USD)The , more commonly called the Nikkei, the Nikkei index, or the Nikkei Stock Average(http://dictionary.cambridge.org/dictionary/british/the-nikkei-index)(http://education.yahoo.com/reference/dictionary/entry/Nikkei) (, , or ), is a market index for the Stock Exchange (TSE). It has been calculated daily by the Keizai Shimbun (Nikkei) newspaper since 1950. It is a average (the unit is yen), and the components are reviewed once a year. Currently, the Nikkei is the most widely quoted average of Japanese equities, similar to the Jones Industrial Average. In fact, it was known as the Nikkei Dow Jones Stock Average from 1975 to 1985.(Nikkei Definition via Wikinvest)The Nikkei 225 began to be calculated on September 7, 1950, retroactively calculated back to May 16, 1949. Since January 2010 the index is updated every 15 seconds during trading sessions.The Nikkei 225 Futures, introduced at Exchange (SGX) in 1986, the Osaka Securities Exchange (OSE) in 1988, Mercantile Exchange (CME) in 1990,  is now an internationally recognized futures index.(Nikkei Net Interactive)The Nikkei average has deviated sharply from the textbook model of stock averages which grow at a steady exponential rate. The average hit its all-time high on December 29, 1989, during the peak of the asset price bubble, when it reached an intra-day high of 38,957.44 before closing at 38,915.87, having grown sixfold during the decade. Subsequently, it lost nearly all these gains, closing at 7,054.98 on March 10, 200981.9% below its peak twenty years earlier.Another major index for the Tokyo Stock Exchange is the Topix.On March 15, 2011, the second working day after the massive earthquake in the northeast part of Japan, the index dropped over 10% to finish at 8605.15, a loss of 1,015 points. This put it at its lowest close since March 10, 2009.Weighting and modificationsStocks are weighted on the Nikkei 225 by giving an equal weighting based on a par value of 50 yen per share. Events such as stock splits, removals and additions of constituents impact upon the effective weighting of individual stocks and the divisor. The Nikkei 225 is designed to reflect the overall market, so there is no specific weighting of industries.Changes to the componentsStocks are reviewed annually and announcements of review results are made in September. Changes, if required, are made at the beginning of October. Changes may also take place at any time if a stock is found to be ineligible (e.g., delisting). All proposed changes will be announced in Nikkeis Japanese newspapers and will appear on NNI.After a stock has been replaced, the divisor is reviewed and modified to ensure a smooth transition of the stock index.ComponentsAs of April 2011, the Nikkei 225 consists of the following companies: (Japanese securities identification code in parentheses)Foods* Ajinomoto Co., Inc. ()* Breweries, Ltd. ()* Tobacco Inc. ()* Kikkoman Corp. ()* Kirin Brewery Co., Ltd. ()* Meiji Holdings Company, Limited ()* Nichirei Corp. ()* Meat Packers, Inc. ()* Seifun Group Inc. ()* Sapporo Holdings Ltd. ()* Holdings Inc. ()Textiles & apparel* Industries, Inc. ()* Teijin Ltd. ()* Industries, Inc. ()* Toyobo Co., Ltd. ()* Unitika, Ltd. ()Pulp & paper* Paper Mills, Ltd. ()* Paper Mills Ltd. ()* Paper Group, Inc. ()* Paper Co., Ltd. ()Chemicals* Kasei Corp. ()* Kagaku Kogyo K.K. ()* Fujifilm Holdings Corp. ()* Kao Corp. ()* Kuraray Co., Ltd. ()* Chemical Holdings Corp. ()* Chemicals, Inc. ()* Kayaku Co., Ltd. ()* Soda Co., Ltd. ()* Chemical Industries, Ltd. ()* Chemical Co., Ltd. ()* Shiseido Co., Ltd. ()* Denko K.K. ()* Chemical Co., Ltd. ()* Tosoh Corp. ()* Industries, Ltd. ()Pharmaceuticals* Pharma Inc. ()* Chugai Pharmaceutical Co., Ltd. ()* Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. ()* Sumitomo Pharma Co., Ltd. ()* Eisai Co., Ltd. ()* Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd. ()* Shionogi & Co., Ltd. ()* Pharmaceutical Company, Ltd. ()Oil & coal products* Oil Corp. ()* Shell Sekiyu K.K. ()Rubber products* Bridgestone Corp. ()* The Yokohama Rubber Co., Ltd. ()Glass & ceramics* Asahi Glass Co., Ltd. ()* Insulators, Ltd. ()* Electric Glass Company, Limited ()* Sheet Glass Co., Ltd. ()* Boseki Co., Ltd. ()* Osaka Cement Co., Ltd. ()* Cement Corp. ()* Carbon Co., Ltd. ()* Toto Ltd. ()Steel products* Holdings, Inc. ()* Steel, Ltd. ()* Steel Corp. ()* Steel Co., Ltd. ()* Metals Co., Ltd. ()* Metal Industries, Ltd. ()Nonferrous metals* Holdings Co., Ltd. ()* Fujikura Ltd. ()* Furukawa Co., Ltd. ()* The Electric Co., Ltd. ()* Materials Corp. ()* Mining & Smelting Co., Ltd. ()* Light Metal Co., Ltd ()* SUMCO Corp. ()* Electric Industries, Ltd. ()* Metal Mining Co., Ltd. ()* Zinc Co., Ltd. ()* Seikan Kaisha, Ltd. ()Machinery* Chiyoda Corp. ()* Industries, Ltd. ()* Ebara Corp. ()* Construction Machinery Co., Ltd. ()* Hitachi Zsen Corporation ()* IHI Corp. ()* The Steel Works, Ltd. ()* JTEKT Corp. ()* Komatsu Ltd. ()* Kubota Corp. ()* Heavy Industries, Ltd. ()* NSK Ltd. ()* NTN Corp. ()* Holdings, Inc. ()* Heavy Industries, Ltd. ()Electric machinery* Advantest Corp. ()* Alps Electric Co., Ltd. ()* Canon Inc. ()* Casio Computer Co., Ltd. ()* Screen MFG. CO., LTD. ()* Denso Corp. ()* FANUC Corp. ()* Fuji Electric Holdings Co., Ltd. ()* Fujitsu Ltd. ()* Yuasa Corp. ()* Hitachi, Ltd. ()* Kyocera Corp. ()* Panasonic Corp. ()* Meidensha Corp. ()* Minebea Co., Ltd. ()* Electric Corp. ()* Mitsumi Electric Co., Ltd. ()* NEC Corp. ()* Electric Industry Co., Ltd. ()* Pioneer Corporation ()* Ricoh ()* Sharp Corp. ()* Sony Corp. ()* Yuden Co., Ltd. ()* TDK Corp. ()* Electron Ltd. ()* Toshiba Corp. ()* Electric Corporation, Limited ()* Electric Corp. ()Shipbuilding* Heavy Industries, Ltd. ()* Engineering & Shipbuilding Co., Ltd. ()Automotive* Heavy Industries Ltd. ()* Motors, Ltd. ()* Honda Motor Co., Ltd. ()* Isuzu Motors Ltd. ()* Mazda Motor Corp. ()* Motors Corp. ()* Nissan Motor Co., Ltd. ()* Suzuki Motor Corp. ()* Toyota Motor Corp. ()Precision instruments* Citizen Holdings Co., Ltd. ()* Konica Minolta Holdings, Inc. ()* Nikon Corp. ()* Olympus Corp. ()* Terumo Corp. ()Other manufacturing* Nippon Printing Co., Ltd. ()* Printing Co., Ltd. ()* Yamaha Corp. ()Fishery* Suisan Kaisha, Ltd. ()* Maruha Nichiro Holdings, Inc. ()Mining* Inpex Corp. ()Construction* Comsys Holdings Corp. ()* House Industry Co., Ltd. ()* JGC Corporation ()* Kajima Corp. ()* Obayashi Corp. ()* House, Ltd. ()* Shimizu Corp. ()* Taisei Corp. ()Trading companies* Itochu Corp. ()* Marubeni Corp. ()* Mitsubishi Corp. ()* Mitsui & Co., Ltd. ()* Sojitz Corp. ()* Sumitomo Corp. ()* Tsusho Corp. ()Retail* Aeon Co., Ltd. ()* Retailing Co., Ltd. ()* Mitsukoshi Holdings Ltd. ()* Front Retailing Co., Ltd. ()* Marui Group Co., Ltd. ()* Seven & I Holdings Co., Ltd. ()* Takashimaya Co., Ltd. ()* Uny Co., Ltd. ()Banking* The of Yokohama, Ltd. ()* The Bank, Ltd. ()* Sumitomo Mitsui Trust Holdings, Inc., Inc. ()* Financial Group, Inc. ()* UFJ Financial Group, Inc. ()* Financial Group, Inc. ()* Trust & Banking Co., Ltd. ()* Holdings, Inc. ()* Bank, Ltd. ()* The Bank, Ltd. ()* Mitsui Financial Group, Inc. ()Securities* Securities Group Inc. ()* Securities Co., Ltd. ()* Holdings, Inc. ()* Securities Co., Ltd. ()Insurance* Life Insurance Company, Limited ()* Insurance Group, Inc. ()* NKSJ Holdings, Inc. ()* Holdings, Inc. ()* Marine Holdings, Inc. ()Other financial services* Saison Co., Ltd. ()Real estate* Real Estate Co., Ltd. ()* Mitsubishi Estate Co., Ltd. ()* Fudosan Co.,Ltd ()* Realty & Development Co., Ltd. ()* Tatemono  Co., Ltd. ()* Land Corp. ()Railway/bus* Japan Railway Company ()* Japan Railway Company ()* Keio Corp. ()* Electric Railway Co., Ltd. ()* Electric Railway Co., Ltd. ()* Railway Co., Ltd. ()* Tokyu Corp. ()* West Japan Railway Company ()Other land transport* Express Co., Ltd. ()* Yamato Holdings Co., Ltd. ()Marine transport* Kawasaki Kisen Kaisha, Ltd. ()* O.S.K. Lines, Ltd. ()* Yusen K.K. ()Air transport* Nippon Airways Co., Ltd. ()Warehousing* Logistics Corp. ()Communications* KDDI Corp. ()* Telegraph and Telephone Corp. ()* Data Corp. ()* NTT DoCoMo, Inc. ()* Sky Perfect JSAT Holdings Inc. ()* Softbank Corp. ()Electric power* Electric Power Co., Inc. ()* The Kansai Electric Power Co., Inc. ()* The Tokyo Electric Power Co., Inc. ()Gas* Gas Co., Ltd. ()* Gas Co., Ltd. ()Services* CSK Holdings Corp. ()* Dentsu Inc. ()* Konami Corp. ()* Secom Co., Ltd. ()* Dome Corp. ()* Toho Co., Ltd. ()* Micro Inc. ()* Yahoo Japan Corp. ()See also* 150ReferencesExternal links* Nikkei 225 constituents* Nikkei 225 index on Yahoo! Finance* Nikkei 225 index on Google Finance* Nikkei 225 profile at Wikinvest225225225225225225225225225225225Purata Nikkei225ja:225225225225225225sv:Nikkei225s Nikkei 225zh:
42078
Hydrogen_cyanide
 EINECS  200-821-6 | Section2  | Section3  | Section4   HeatCapacity  1.328 J/(gK) (gas)  2.612 J/(gK) (liquid) | Section7   SPhrases  , , , , , , ,  | Section8  }}Hydrogen cyanide (with the historical common name of Prussic acid) is a compound with formula HCN. It is a colorless, extremely poisonous liquid that boils slightly above temperature at . Hydrogen cyanide is a linear molecule, with a bond between carbon and nitrogen. A minor tautomer of HCN is HNC, isocyanide.Hydrogen cyanide is weakly acidic with a pKa of 9.2. It partly ionizes in water solution to give the cyanide anion, CN. A solution of hydrogen cyanide in water is called hydrocyanic acid. The salts of hydrogen cyanide are known as cyanides.HCN has a faint, bitter, burnt almond-like odor that only some people are able to detect owing to a genetic trait.() The volatile compound has been used as inhalation rodenticide and human poison. Cyanide ions interfere with iron-containing respiratory enzymes.HCN is produced on an industrial scale and is a highly valuable precursor to many chemical compounds ranging from polymers to pharmaceuticals.History of discoveryFile:HexacyanidoferratIII 2.svg|thumb|left|220px|The red colored ferricyanide ion, one component of blueHydrogen cyanide was first isolated from a blue dye (blue) which had been known from 1704 but whose structure was unknown. It is now known to be a polymer with a complex structure and an empirical formula of hydrated ferric ferrocyanide. In 1752, the French chemist Macquer made the important step of showing that Prussian blue could be converted to oxide plus a volatile component and that these could be used to reconstitute the dye. The new component was what we now know as hydrogen cyanide. Following Macquers lead, it was first isolated from Prussian blue in pure form and characterized about 1783 by the Swedish chemist Wilhelm Scheele, and was eventually given the German name Blausure (literally Blue acid) because of its acidic nature in water and its derivation from Prussian blue. In English it became known popularly as Prussic acid.In 1787 the French chemist Louis Berthollet showed that Prussic acid did not contain oxygen, an important contribution to acid theory, which had hitherto postulated that acids must contain oxygen() (hence the name of oxygen itself, which is derived from Greek elements that mean acid-former and are likewise calqued into German as Sauerstoff). In 1815 Louis Gay-Lussac deduced Prussic acids chemical formula. The radical cyanide in hydrogen cyanide was given its name from the Greek word for blue, again owing to its derivation from Prussian blue.Production and synthesisHydrogen cyanide forms in at least limited amounts from many combinations of hydrogen, carbon, and ammonia. Hydrogen cyanide is currently produced in great quantities by several processes, as well as being a recovered waste product from the manufacture of acrylonitrile.() In the year 2000, 732,552 tons were produced in the US.(The Innovation Group)The most important process is the oxidation invented by Andrussow at Farben in which methane and ammonia react in the presence of oxygen at about 1200 C over a platinum catalyst:():2 CH4 + 2 NH3 + 3 O2  2 HCN + 6 H2OThe energy needed for the reaction is provided by the partial oxidation of methane and ammonia.Of lesser importance is the Degussa process (process) in which no oxygen is added and the energy must be transferred indirectly through the reactor wall:():CH4 + NH3  HCN + 3H2This reaction is akin to reforming, the reaction of methane and water to give carbon monoxide and hydrogen.In the Shawinigan Process, hydrocarbons, e.g. propane, are reacted with ammonia::C3H8 + 3 NH3  3 HCN + 7 H2When heated strongly, formamide decomposes to hydrogen cyanide and water vapor::CH(O)NH2  HCN + H2OIn the laboratory, small amounts of HCN are produced by the addition of acids to cyanide salts of alkali metals::H+ + NaCN  HCN + Na+This reaction is sometimes the basis of accidental poisonings because the acid converts a nonvolatile cyanide salt into the gaseous HCN.Historical methods of productionThe demand for cyanides for mining operations in the 1890s was met by Thomas Beilby, who patented a method to produce hydrogen cyanide by passing ammonia over glowing coal in 1892. This method was used until Castner in 1894 developed a synthesis starting from coal, ammonia, and sodium yielding sodium cyanide, which reacts with acid to form gaseous HCN.ApplicationsHCN is the precursor to cyanide and cyanide, which are used mainly in mining. Via the intermediacy of cyanohydrins, a variety of useful organic compounds are prepared from HCN including the monomer methacrylate, from acetone, the acid methionine, via the synthesis, and the chelating agents EDTA and NTA. Via the hydrocyanation process, HCN is added to butadiene to give adiponitrile, a precursor to Nylon 66.(OccurrenceHCN is obtainable from fruits that have a pit, such as cherries, apricots, apples, and bitter almonds, from which almond oil and flavoring are made. Many of these pits contain small amounts of cyanohydrins such as mandelonitrile and amygdalin, which slowly release hydrogen cyanide.()() One hundred grams of crushed apple seeds can yield about 10 mg of HCN. Some millipedes release hydrogen cyanide as a defense mechanism,() as do certain insects, such as some burnet moths. Hydrogen cyanide is contained in the exhaust of vehicles, in tobacco and wood smoke, and in smoke from burning nitrogen-containing plastics. So-called bitter roots of the cassava plant may contain up to 1 gram of HCN per kilogram.()()HCN and the origin of lifeHydrogen cyanide has been discussed as a precursor to amino acids and nucleic acids. For example, HCN is proposed to have played a part in the origin of life.(Matthews, C. N. The HCN World: Establishing Protein-Nucleic Augucid Life via Hydrogen Cyanide Polymers Cellular Origin and Life in Extreme Habitats and Astrobiology (2004), 6 (Origins : Genesis, Evoluation and Diversity of Life), 121-135.) Although the relationship of these chemical reactions to the origin of life theory remains speculative, studies in this area have led to discoveries of new pathways to organic compounds derived from condensation of HCN.(Al-Azmi, A.; Elassar, A.-Z. A.; Booth, B. L. The Chemistry of Diaminomaleonitrile and its Utility in Heterocyclic Synthesis Tetrahedron (2003), 59, 2749-2763. CODEN: TETRAB ISSN:0040-4020.)HCN in spaceHCN has been detected in the medium.() Since then, extensive studies have probed formation and destruction pathways of HCN in various environments and examined its use as a tracer for a variety of astronomical species and processes. HCN can be observed from ground-based telescopes through a number of atmospheric windows.() The J10, J32, J 43, and J109 pure transitions have all been observed.(()()HCN is formed in interstellar clouds through one of two major pathways:() via a neutral-neutral reaction (CH2 + N  HCN + H) and via dissociative recombination (HCNH+ + e-  HCN + H). The dissociative recombination pathway is dominant by 30%; however, the HCNH+ must be in its linear form. Dissociative recombination with its structural isomer, H2NC+ produces isocyanide (HNC), exclusively.HCN is destroyed in interstellar clouds through a number of mechanisms depending on the location in the cloud.( In  regions (PDRs), photodissociation dominates, producing CN (HCN +   CN + H). At further depths, photodissociation by cosmic rays dominate, producing CN (HCN + cr  CN + H). In the core, two competing mechanisms destroy it, forming HCN+ and HCNH+ (HCN + H+  HCN+ + H; HCN + HCO+  HCNH+ + CO). The reaction with HCO+ dominates by a factor of ~3.5. HCN has been used to analyze a variety of species and processes in the interstellar medium. It has been suggested as a tracer for dense molecular gas()() and as a tracer of stellar inflow in high-mass star-forming regions.() Further, the HNC/HCN ratio has been shown to be an excellent method for distinguishing between PDRs and X-ray-dominated regions (XDRs).()Hydrogen cyanide as a poison and chemical weaponA hydrogen cyanide concentration of 300 mg/m3 in air will kill a human within about 10 minutes.A hydrogen cyanide concentration of 3500 ppm (about 3200 mg/m3) will kill a human in about 1 minute. The toxicity is caused by the cyanide ion, which halts respiration by inhibiting an enzyme in mitochondria called c oxidase.Hydrogen cyanide absorbed into a carrier for use as a pesticide (under IG Farbens brand name Cyclone B, or in German B, with the B standing for Blausure)() was  employed by Germany in the mid-20th century in camps. The same product is currently made in the Republic under the trademark Uragan D2. Hydrogen cyanide is also the agent used in chambers employed in judicial execution in some U.S. states, where it is produced during the execution by the action of acid on an egg-sized mass of cyanide.Hydrogen cyanide is commonly listed amongst warfare agents known as agents.() As a substance listed under Schedule 3 of the Weapons Convention as a potential weapon which has large-scale industrial uses, manufacturing plants in signatory countries which produce more than 30 tonnes per year must be declared to, and can be inspected by, the for the Prohibition of Chemical Weapons.Under the name prussic acid, HCN has been used as a killing agent in whaling harpoons.(Poison Hand Darted Harpoons and Lances.)Hydrogen cyanide gas in air is explosive at concentrations over 5.6%, equivalent to 56000 ppm.(Documentation for Immediately Dangerous to Life or Health Concentrations (IDLHs) - 74908.)ReferencesExternal links*Institut national de recherche et de scurit (1997). Cyanure dhydrogne et solutions aqueuses. Fiche toxicologique n 4, Paris:INRS, 5pp. (PDF file, in French)*International Chemical Safety Card 0492*Hydrogen cyanide and cyanides (CICAD 61)*National Pollutant Inventory: Cyanide compounds fact sheet*NIOSH Pocket Guide to Chemical Hazards*European Chemicals Bureau*Department of health review*OSHA: HCN Health Guidelines cianhdrickyanovodkovda:Blsyrede:Cyanwasserstoffet:Sinihapeel:cianhdricocianidodhydrognede hidrxenois:Vetnissancianidricohydrocyanicumlv:Cinderadisvandenilishu:Hidrogn-cianidnl:Waterstofcyanideja:no:Hydrogencyanidnn:Blsyrepl:Cyjanowodrde hidrogniocianhidricsk:Kyanovodkkislinafi:Sinihapposv:Vtecyanidth:cyanidexyanuazh:
42540
History_of_the_British_Virgin_Islands
Image:St Phillips Church, Tortola.jpg|thumb|300px|right|The ruins of Phillips Church, Tortola, one of the most important historical ruins in the Territory.The History of the British Virgin Islands is usually, for convenience, broken up into five separate periods:* Pre-Columbian Amerindian settlement, up to an uncertain date* Nascent European settlement, from approximately 1612 until 1672* British control, from 1672 until 1834* Emancipation, from 1834 until 1950* The modern state, from 1950 to present dayThese time periods are used for convenience only. There appears to be an uncertain period of time from when the last Arawaks left what would later be called the Virgin Islands until the first Europeans started to settle there in the early 17th century, but each period commences with a dramatic change from the time period which precedes it, and so is a convenient way to compartmentalise the subject.Pre-Columbian settlementThe first recorded settlement of the Territory was by Arawak Indians who came from America, in around 100 BC.  However, there is some dispute about the dates.  Some historians place it later, at around 200 AD, but they suggest that the Arawaks may have been preceded by the Ciboney Indians, who are thought to have settled in nearby St. Thomas as early as 300 BC.(Vernon Pickering, A Concise History of the British Virgin Islands, page 6)  There is some evidence of Amerindian presence on the islands as far back as 1500 BC,http://dg.ian.com/index.jsp?cid54918&actionviewLocation&formId105392 although there is little academic support for the idea of a permanent settlement on any of the current British Virgin Islands at that time.The Arawaks inhabited the islands until the 15th century when they were displaced by the more aggressive Caribs, a tribe from the Antilles islands, after whom the Sea is named. Some historians, however, believe that this popular account of warlike Caribs chasing peaceful Arawaks out of the Caribbean islands is rooted in simplistic European stereotypes, and that the true story is more complex.None of the later European visitors to the Virgin Islands ever reported encountering Amerindians in what would later be the British Virgin Islands, although Columbus would have a hostile encounter with the Carib natives of St. Croix.Comparatively little is known about the early inhabitants of the Territory specifically (as opposed to the Arawaks generally).  The largest excavations of Arawak pottery have been found around Belmont and Smugglers Cove on the northwest of Tortola, but many other sites have been found, including at Sopers Hole, Apple Bay, Coxheath, Pockwood Pond, Pleasant Valley, Sage Mountain, Russell Hill (modern day Town), Pasea, Purcell, Paraquita Bay, Josiahs Bay, Mount Healthy and Cane Garden Bay.  Modern archaeological excavations regularly cause local historians to revise what they thought they knew about these early settlers.  Discoveries reported in the local newspapers in 2006 have caused postulation that the settlement of the islands by Arawaks may have been much more significant than had earlier been thought.1472 - Early European explorationThe first European sighting of the Virgin Islands was by Columbus in 1493 on his second voyage to the Americas. Columbus gave them the fanciful name Santa Ursula y las Once Mil Vrgenes (Saint Ursula and her 11,000 Virgins), shortened to Las Vrgenes (The Virgins), after the legend of Ursula. He is also reported to have personally named Gorda (the Fat Virgin), which he thought to be the largest island in the group.The Spanish claimed the islands by original discovery, but did nothing to enforce their claims, and never settled the Territory.  In 1508 Juan Ponce de Len settled Rico, and reports in Spanish journals suggested that the settlement used the Virgin Islands for fishing, but nothing else.  It is unclear whether they sailed as far as the modern British Virgin Islands to fish, and the references may be to the present U.S. Virgin Islands.(To sail from Puerto Rico to Tortola involves sailing against the prevailing wind for approximately 70 miles.  In the vessels of the day, which did not sail well upwind, this would have been a trip of 2 or 3 days.)In 1517 Sir Sebastian Cabot and Sir Thomas Pert visited the islands on their way back from their exploration of Brazilian waters.thumb|left|Sir Francis Drake, who would visit the islands four times, and would lend his name to its main channelSir John Hawkins visited the island three times, firstly in 1542 and then again in 1563 with a cargo of slaves bound for Hispaniola.  On his third visit, he was accompanied by a young Captain by the name of Francis Drake in the Judith, for whom the central channel in the British Virgin Islands would later be named.Drake would return in 1585, and is reported to have anchored in North Sound on Virgin Gorda prior to his tactically brilliant attack on Domingo.  Drake returned for the final time in 1595 on his last voyage during which he would eventually meet his death.In 1598 the Earl of Cumberland is reported to have used the islands as a staging ground for his later attack on Fortaleza in Puerto Rico.In 1607 some reports suggest that John Smith sailed past the Virgin Islands on the expedition led by Captain Newport to found the new colony in Virginia.English monarch King James I granted a patent to the Earl of Carlisle for Tortola, as well as Angilla, Semrera (Sombrero island) & Enegada.  He also received letters of patent for Barbados, St. Kitts and all the Caribees in 1628.  Carlisle died shortly after, but his son, the 2nd Earl of Carlisle, leased the patents to Lord Willoughby for 21 years in 1647.  Neither ever attempted to settle the northern islands.First Dutch settlementsDutch privateer van Dyk organized the first permanent settlements in the Territory in Sopers Hole, on the west end of Tortola.  It is not known precisely when he first came to the Territory, but by 1615 van Dyks settlement was recorded in Spanish contemporary records, noting its recent expansion.  He traded with the Spaniards in Rico and farmed cotton and tobacco.Some sources suggest that the first settlements in the Virgin Islands were by the Spanish, who mined copper at the copper mine on Virgin Gorda, but there is no archaeological evidence to support the existence of any settlement by the Spanish in the islands at any time, or any mining of copper on Virgin Gorda prior to the 19th century.By 1625, van Dyk was recognized by the West India Company as the private Patron of Tortola, and had moved his operations to Town. During the same year van Dyk lent some limited (non-military) support to the Dutch admiral Hendricksz, who sacked Juan, Puerto Rico.  In September 1625, in retaliation, the Spanish led a full assault on the island of Tortola, laying waste to its defenses and destroying its embryonic settlements.  Joost van Dyk himself escaped to the island that would later bear his name, and sheltered there from the Spanish.  He later moved to the island of St. Thomas until the Spanish gave up and returned to Puerto Rico.Notwithstanding Spanish hostility, the Dutch West India Company still considered the Virgin Islands to have an important strategic value, as they were located approximately halfway between the Dutch colonies in America (now Suriname) and the most important Dutch settlement in America, Amsterdam (now York City).  Large stone warehouses were built at Freebottom, near Port Purcell (just east of Road Town), with the intention that these warehouses would facilitate exchanges of cargo between North and South America.thumb|right|250px|The remains of Fort Charlotte, built on an earlier lookout post erected by the DutchAt this time, the Dutch settlers erected some small earthworks and a three-cannon fort above the warehouse, on the hill where Fort George would eventually be built by the English. They also constructed a wooden stockade to act as a lookout post above Road Town on the site that would eventually become Fort Charlotte.  They stationed troops at the Spanish dojon near Pockwood Pond, later to be known as Purcell, but now ordinarily referred to as the Dungeon.In 1631 the Dutch West India Company expressed an interest in the copper which had been discovered on Gorda, and a settlement was set up on that island, which came to be known as Little Dyks (now known as Little Dix).In 1640 Spain attacked Tortola in an assault led by Captain Lopez.  Two further attacks were made by the Spanish on Tortola in 1646 and 1647, led by Captain Francisco Vincente Duran.  The Spanish anchored a warship in Sopers Hole at West End and landed men ashore.  They then sent another warship to blockade Road Harbour.  After a team of scouts returned a safe report, the Spanish landed more men and attacked Fort Purcell overland by foot.  The Dutch were massacred, and the Spanish soldiers then marched to Road Town, where they killed everyone and destroyed the settlement.  They did not, apparently, attack the smaller settlements further up the coast in Baughers Bay, or on Virgin Gorda.Decline of the Dutch West India CompanyThe settlements were not ultimately an economic success, and the evidence suggests that the Dutch spent most of their time more profitably engaged in privateering than trading.  The lack of prosperity of the territory mirrored the lack of commercial success of the Dutch West India Company as a whole.The company changed its policy, and it sought to cede islands such as Tortola and Virgin Gorda to private persons for settlement, and to establish slave pens.  The island of Tortola was eventually sold to Hunthum at some point in the 1650s, at which time the Dutch West India Companys interest in the Territory effectively ended.In 1665 the Dutch settlers on Tortola were attacked by a British privateer, John Wentworth, who is recorded as capturing 67 slaves, who were removed to Bermuda.  This is the first official record of slaves being held in the Territory.In 1666 there were reports that a number of the Dutch settlers were driven out by an influx of British brigands and pirates, although clearly a number of the Dutch remained.(Vernon Pickering, A Concise History of the British Virgin Islands, page 23)1672 - British colonisationThe British Virgin Islands came under British control in 1672, at the outbreak of the Anglo-Dutch War, and have remained so ever since.  The circumstances of the British taking control however are somewhat uncertain.  The Dutch averred that in 1672 Willem Hunthum put Tortola under the protection of Colonel Sir Stapleton, the English Governor-General of the Islands.  Stapleton himself reported that he had captured the Territory shortly after the outbreak of war.What is clear is that Colonel William Burt was dispatched to Tortola and took control of the island by no later than 13 July 1672 (when Stapleton reported the conquest to the Council of Trade).  Burt did not have sufficient men to occupy the Territory, but before leaving the island, he destroyed the Dutch forts and removed all their cannon to St. Kitts.(Which perhaps suggested conquest rather than safekeeping.)  By the Treaty of Westminster of 1674, the war was ended, and provision was made for mutual restoration of all territorial conquests during the war.  The Treaty provided the Dutch with the right to resume possession of the islands, but by then the Dutch were at war with the French, and fear of a French attack prevented their immediate restoration.  Although the possessions were not considered valuable, for strategic reasons the British became reluctant to surrender them, and after prolonged discussions, orders were issued to Stapleton in June 1677 to retain possession of Tortola and the surrounding islands.In 1678 the War ended, and the Dutch returned their attention to Tortola, although it was not until 1684 that the Dutch ambassador, Arnout van Citters, formally requested the return of Tortola.  However, he did not do so on the basis of the Treaty of Westminster, but instead based the claim on the private rights of the widow of Willem Hunthum.  He asserted that the island was not a conquest, but had been entrusted to the British.  The ambassador provided a letter from Stapleton promising to return the island.(Part of the dis-communication that arose between the British and Dutch related to the fundamental conceptual differences between the treatment of colonies; the British viewed colonies as belonging to the Crown, and settled with its permission; the Dutch viewed colonies as belonging to the individuals, with the benefit of the Crowns protection.)At this time (1686), Stapleton had completed his term of office and was en route back to Britain.  The Dutch were told Stapleton would be asked to explain the discrepancy between his assertion of having conquered the island, and the correspondence signed by him indicating a promise to return it, after which a decision would be made.  Unfortunately Stapleton travelled first to France to recover his health, where unfortunately he died.  Cognisant that other Caribbean territories which had been captured from the Dutch during the war had already been restored, in August 1686 the Dutch ambassador was advised by the British that Tortola would be restored, and instructions to that effect were sent to Sir Nathaniel Johnson, the new Governor of the Leeward Islands.But Tortola was never actually returned to the Dutch.(The correspondence all refers solely to Tortola, which appears to be the limits of the Territory that the Dutch claimed.  However, the British subsequently asserted control over the entire island group.)  Part of the problem was that Johnsons orders were to restore the island to such person or persons who have sufficient procuration or authority to receive the same...  However, most of the former Dutch colonists had now departed, having lost hope of restoration.  Certainly there was no official representation of the Dutch monarchy or any other organ of government.  In the event, Johnson did nothing.In November 1696 a subsequent claim was made to the island by Sir Peter van Bell, the agent of Sir Joseph Shepheard, a Rotterdam merchant, who claimed to have purchased Tortola on 21 June 1695 for 3,500 guilders.  Shepheard was from the of Brandenburg, and the prospect of Tortola coming under Brandenburger control did not sit well in Westminster.(This was largely a reaction to Brandenburger activities in relation to trade between Britain and Holland in Europe at the time.)  The Brandenburg claim was dismissed by the British on the grounds that Stapleton had conquered rather than been entrusted with Tortola.  The now common delaying tactic of forwarding all correspondence to Governor Codrington for comment was employed.  Codrington readily appreciated the risks of a Brandenburg trading outpost on Tortola, as such an outpost already existed on nearby St. Thomas.(Codrington even suggested that van Bells actual claim appeared to relate to the St. Thomas outpost and not Tortola at all; whether a ruse or a bona fide interpretation, merely making such a comment would involve 6 months in returns of correspondence by sailing vessel across the Atlantic.)  The Brandenburgers had previously set up an outpost for trading slaves on Peter Island in 1690, which they had abandoned, and they were not considered welcome.  At the time they had an outpost on St. Thomas, but they engaged in no agriculture, and only participated in the trading of slaves.  Negotiations became more intense, and the British re-asserted the right of conquest and also (wrongly, but apparently honestly) claimed to have first discovered Tortola.  During the negotiations, the British also became aware of two older historical claims, the 1628 patent granted to the Earl of Carlisle (which was inconsistent with Hunthums title being sold to him by the Dutch West India company), and an order of the King in 1694 to prevent foreign settlement in the Virgin Islands.  In February 1698 Codrington was told to regard the earlier 1694 orders as final, and the British entertained no further claims to the islands.Geographical limits of the Territorythumb|right|300px|St. John, claimed by the British but never settled. They effectively abandoned their claim to the island in 1718.Although the islands which presently form the British Virgin Islands have been under British control since 1672, a number of other islands came under the control of the British Crown (some more than once) during the subsequent period, but no longer form part of the Territory.  At the time the British took control of the territory, the following islands were considered part of the Virgin Islands.(The prefix British to describe the British Virgin Islands only began to be used in the 1940s as a response to the U.S.A. renaming the Danish Antilles the U.S. Virgin Islands.  Legally, the name of the Territory is still the Virgin Islands simpliciter.)* St. Thomas.  The British initially claimed St. Thomas (and St. John as well), but in 1717 the Danish disputed their claim to those islands.  In contrast to the long dispute over ownership of Tortola, the dispute over St. Thomas was settled readily with a year.  The Danish claim was strong; they had the benefit of the Treaty of Alliance and Commerce of 1670 between Britain and Denmark, which led to the founding of the West India Company in 1671 which its charter permitted it to take possession of and occupy the two islands.  On 25 May 1672 the Danes took possession of St. Thomas, and discovered it to have been abandoned by the British settlers some weeks earlier.  The British could scarcely object to the Danes retaining the island.* St. John.  However, no sooner than the dispute over St. Thomas settled, than acrimony flared up again over St. John, when the Danes purported to settle it on 23 March 1718.  The reaction of Walter Hamilton, Governor of the Leeward Islands, was immediate.  He dispatched HMS Scarborough to the island.  A period of fraught negotiations followed, but ultimately the Danes refused to quit St. John, and the British declined to use force to seize it.  Truthfully, the British were less concerned about St. John than about St. Croix, which they thought that the Danes would eventually covet as well.* St. Croix (or St. Cruz, as it was known at the time).  The British fears proved to be well founded.  In 1729 a claim was made to St. Croix by the Danes who (in an ironic twist) claimed it had been sold to them by the French.  St. Croix had been settled at an uncertain point over a century before by settlers from a number of different European nations, but in 1645 violence had flared up between them, and the English governor was murdered.  The English summarily expelled the Dutch, and the French, at their own request, were removed to Guadeloupe, leaving the British in sole control of the island.  But in 1650 the Spanish invaded from Puerto Rico and the British surrendered the island.  Later in the same year the Dutch had sought to return to St. Croix, believing that the Spanish would by then have returned  to Puerto Rico, but when they arrived the Spanish were still there, and the Dutch were all killed or captured.  The Governor General of the French Caribbean colonies then subsequently mounted an attack on the island at his own expense and drove out the Spanish, but he was unable to establish a colony, and surrendered the title to the island to the Grand Master of the Order of Malta in 1653.(The transfer was confirmed by the French monarchy by letters patent.)  In 1665 St. Croix reverted by purchase to the West India Company, and upon the Companys collapse in 1674, the King of France claimed it as part of his dominions, although the island was subsequently ordered to be abandoned as an economic failure - the date of abandoning would later be hotly disputed.  In May 1733 the French purported to sell the island to the Danish West India Company.  If the French had only abandoned it in 1695 (as they asserted), it was French at the time of the Treaty.  If the French had abandoned the island in 1671 (as the British claimed), then under the 1686 Treaty, St. Croix would be peacably in British possession.   In the end, the French had documents to support their claim, and the British did not, and so the Council of Trade admitted that upon the whole we must submit... whether it may be proper to advise His Majesty to insist any longer upon a title so weakly supported.  The British thereafter ceased to resist the French sale of the island to the Danes.Britain would actually conquer St. Thomas, St. John and St. Croix in March 1801 through the Napoleonic wars, but they restored them by the of Amiens in March, 1802.  They were then re-taken in December 1807, but were restored again by the Treaty of Paris of 1815.  Thereafter they would remain under Danish control until 1917 when they were sold to the U.S.A. for US$25 million, and were later renamed the U.S. Virgin Islands.*Vieques (or Crab Island, as the British referred to it).  Vieques was periodically settled by the British, but on each occasion they were driven off by Spanish soldiers from nearby Puerto Rico.  In the early 18th century, the Colonial authorities ordered the removal of British settlers on Vieques and re-settled them on St. Kitts.  Ironically enough, a century later after emancipation a number of former slaves would go and seek work on Vieques as free men of colour, notwithstanding that Vieques was still a slave owning society.Relationships with the Danes were strained from the outset.  The Danes continuously resorted to nearby islands for timber, clearly violating British sovereignty.  British ships which foundered in St. Thomas was subject to extortionate levy for salvage.  Further, St. Thomas became a base for pirates and privateers which the Danish Governor either could not or would not stop.  During the of the Spanish Succession the Danes supported the French colonies, and allowed the French to sell British ships seized as prizes in Charlotte Amalie.  No doubt the British invasions in the early 19th century did not help relations, and in later years smuggling and illegal sales of slaves by St. Thomians would frustrate British authorities.Law and orderEven after British control of the Territory became complete, population infiltration was slow.  Settlers lived in fear of possible Spanish attack, and there was the constant possibility that diplomatic efforts might fail and the Territory might revert to an overseas power (as happened in St. Croix).  Spanish raids in 1685 and ongoing negotiations between the Dutch and the British over the fate of the islands led to them being virtually abandoned; from 1685 to 1690 the population of the Territory was reduced to two - a Mr Jonathan Turner and his wife.  In 1690 there was a relative explosion in the population, which had swollen to fourteen.  By 1696 it was up to fifty.thumb|left|250px|The old HM Prison in Road Town. Used up until 1996, it was built on the site of an earlier prison in the mid 19th centuryFrom 1678 the British appointed a deputy-governor for the Territory (initially for the Territory and Saba and St. Eustatius, until the latter two islands were returned to the Dutch).  The role was somewhat vague, and had no legislative, executory or judicial powers attached to it.  The deputy-governor was encouraged to appoint a local governor beneath him, though it was common complaint being unable to gett one thats tolerable fitt amongst them to take the command upon them.(Calendar of State Papers, America and the West Indies, 1716-1717, No. 350)  In 1709 Governor Parke observed that they live like wild people without law or Government, and have neither Divine nor Lawyer amongst them...  It was not until 1773 that the Virgin Islands actually had its own legislature.(Prior to that laws were extended to the Territory by the legislature in Antigua.  Some of these laws are still in force in the British Virgin Islands, such as the Common Law (Declaration of Application) Act, 1705)  The uncertainty of tenure and slightly ambivalent official British attitude to the fate of the Territory influenced the early population - for many years only debtors from other islands, pirates and those fleeing the law were prepared to undertake the risk of settling in the Virgin Islands.  Most references to the islands from occasional visitors comment on the lack of law and order and the lack of religiosity of the inhabitants.The Territory was granted a Legislative Assembly on 27 January 1774, however, it took a full further decade for a constitutional framework to be settled.  Part of the problem was that the islands were so thinly populated, it was almost impossible to constitute the organs of government.  In 1778 Suckling arrived in the Territory to take up his position as Chief Justice of the Territory.  In the event, a court was not actually established until the Court Bill was passed in 1783, but even then the vested interests ensured that Suckling could still not take up his position, and the islands had a court but no judge.  Suckling finally left the islands without ever taking up his post (or ever being paid) on 2 May 1788, impoverished and embittered, due to the machinations of local interests which were fearful of the recourse of their creditors if a court was to be established.  Suckling was forthright in expressing his views on the state of law and order in the Territory - he described the residents of Tortola as in a state of lawless ferment.  Life, liberty and property were hourly exposed to the insults and depredations of the riotous and lawless.  The authority of His Majestys Council, as conservators of the peace, was defied and ridiculed...  The island presented a shocking state of anarchy; miserable indeed, and disgraceful to government, not to be equalled in any other of His Majestys dominions, or perhaps in any civilized country in the world.Almost 100 years after Governor Parke had expressed his views, one of his successors would speak in similar terms.  On his appointment in 1810, Governor Elliot was struck by the state of irritation ... almost of anarchy.  Writer Howard, an agent selling a distressed cargo of slaves from a shipwreck in Tortola in 1803 wrote that Tortola is well nigh the most miserable, worst-inhabited spot in all the British possessions... this unhealthy part of the globe appears overstocked with each description of people except honest ones.Quaker settlementAlthough short in both duration and number, the Quaker settlement in the British Virgin Islands from 1727 to 1768 would play an important part in the history of the Territory for two reasons.  Firstly, the trenchant opposition of the Quakers to slavery had a contributing effect to the improvements in the treatment of slaves within the Territory (the exceptional case of William Hodge notwithstanding) compared to other Caribbean islands, and to the large number of free blacks within the islands.  Secondly, for such a small community, a large number of famous historical figures came from that small community, including C. Lettsome, Thornton, Nottingham and Richard Humphreys.  There are some vague assertions that Arthur Penn, brother of the more famous Penn, also formed part of the Quaker community of the British Virgin Islands for a time.(Florence Lewisohn, Tales of Tortola and the British Virgin Islands, pages 40 and 41, although she cites no authority beyond local legend for the proposition,)  However, this seems unlikely as the dates of his lifetime do not fit easily within the timeframe of the Quaker community in the British Virgin Islands, and as Quaker history is generally very well documented, it is unlikely that an expedition by a member of such a famous family would go unnoticed.Fortificationthumb|right|250px|Fort Recovery, a traditional tower fort.Between 1760 and 1800 the British significantly upgraded the defences of the Territory.  Usually building upon earlier Dutch fortifications, new structures armed with cannon were erected at Fort Charlotte, Fort George, Burt, Fort Recovery and a new fort was built in the centre of Road Town which came to be known as the Town Fort.  As was common at the time, plantation owners were expected to fortify their own holdings, and Purcell and Hodge were erected on this basis.Slavery economyIn common with most Caribbean countries, slavery in the British Virgin Islands forms a major part of the history of the Territory.  One commentator has gone so far as to say: One of the most important aspects of the History of the British Virgin Islands is slavery.(Vernon Pickering, A Concise History of the British Virgin Islands, page 45)As Tortola, and to a lesser extent Gorda, came to be settled by plantation owners, slave labour became economically essential, and there was an exponential growth in the slave population during the 18th century.  In 1717 there were 547 black people in the Territory (all of whom were assumed to be slaves); by 1724, there were 1,430; and 1756, there were 6,121.  The increase in slaves held in the Territory is, to a large degree, consistent with development of the economy of the British Virgin Islands at the time.Slave revoltsUprisings in the Territory were common, as they were elsewhere in the Caribbean.  The first notable uprising in the British Virgin Islands occurred in 1790, and centred on the estates of Isaac Pickering.  It was quickly put down, and the leaders were executed.  The revolt was sparked by the rumour that freedom had been granted to slaves in England, but that the planters were withholding knowledge of it.  The same rumour would also later spark subsequent revolts.Subsequent rebellions also occurred in 1823, 1827 and 1830, although in each case they were quickly put down.Probably the most significant slave insurrection occurred in 1831 when a plot was uncovered to kill all of the white males in the Territory and to escape to Haiti (which was at the time the only free black republic in the world) by boat with all of the white females.  Although the plot does not appear to have been especially well formulated, it caused widespread panic, and military assistance was drafted in from St. Thomas.  A number of the plotters (or accused plotters) were executed.It is perhaps unsurprising that the incidence of slave revolts increased sharply after 1822.  In 1807, the trade in slaves was abolished.  Although the existing slaves were forced to continue their servitude, the Navy patrolled the Atlantic, capturing slave ships and freeing slave cargoes.  Starting in 1808 hundreds of freed Africans were deposited on Tortola by the Navy who, after serving a 14 year apprenticeship, were then absolutely free.  Naturally, seeing free Africans in the Territory created enormous resentment and jealousy amongst the existing slave population, who understandably felt this to be enormously unjust.1834 - Emancipationthumb|left|Emancipation pamphlet, circa 1815The abolition of slavery occurred on 1 August 1834, and to this day it is celebrated by a three day public holiday on the first Monday, Tuesday and Wednesday in August in the British Virgin Islands.  The original emancipation proclamation hangs in the High Court.  However, the abolition of slavery was not the single defining event that it is sometimes supposed to have been.  Emancipation freed a total of 5,792 slaves in the Territory, but at the time of abolition, there were already a considerable number of free blacks in the Territory, possibly as many as 2,000.(A number of settlers in the Territory, C. Lettsome and Nottingham amongst them, had manumitted large numbers of slaves.  Lettsome manumitted 1,000 slaves upon inheriting them.  Further, subsequent to the abolition of the slave trade, the Navy deposited a number of freed Africans in the Territory who settled in the Kingston area on Tortola.  In January 1808, HMS Cerberus seized the American schooner, the Nancy with a cargo of enslaved Senegalese Africans in the Territorys waters; between August 1814 and February 1815 a further four ships slave cargoes were seized from the Venus, the Manuella, the Atrevido and the Candelaria and a further 1,318 liberated slaves were deposited on Tortolas shores (of whom just over 1,000 survived).  In 1819, a Portuguese slave ship, the Donna Paula, was wrecked upon the reef at Anegada. The ships crew and 235 slaves were saved from the wreckage.  Further Spanish ships, en route to Rico were reported wrecked off Anegada in 1817 and 1824, and their cargos settled on Tortola.  Although many of these former slaves died due to the appalling conditions that they were kept in during the transatlantic crossing, a large number survived, and had children.)  Furthermore, the effect of abolition was gradual; the freed slaves were not absolutely manumitted,(Except for those under the age of 6, who were immediately freed.) but instead entered a form of forced apprenticeship which lasted four years for house slaves and six years for field slaves.(Abolition Act 1833, section 4 http://www.pdavis.nl/Legis_07.htm)  The terms of the forced apprenticeship required them to provide 45 hours unpaid labour a week to their former masters, and prohibited them from leaving their residence without the masters permission.  The effect, deliberately, was to phase out reliance on slave labour rather than end it with a bang.  The Council would later legislate to reduce this period to four years for all slaves to quell rising dissent amongst the field slaves.John Gurney, a Quaker, wrote in his Familiar Letters to Henry Clay of Kentucky that the plantation owners in Tortola were decidedly saving money by the substitution of free labor on moderate wages, for the deadweight of slavery.(However, as a Quaker, Gurney was fundamentally opposed to slavery, and so his comments should perhaps be read accordingly.)In practice, the economics of the abolition are difficult to quantify.  Undeniably the original slave owners suffered a huge capital loss.  Although they received 72,940 from the British Government in compensation, this was only a fraction of the true economic value of the manumitted slaves.(It is difficult to quantify precisely the value of the freed slaves, but in 1798 the total value of slaves in the British Virgin Islands had been estimated at 360,000.  It is likely that figure would have increased considerably during the subsequent 36 years, particularly as the price of slaves rose enormously after the passing of the Trade Act 1807.)  In terms of net cash flow, whilst the slave owners lost the right to free slave labour, they now no longer had to pay to house, clothe and provide medical attention for their former slaves, which in some cases almost balanced out.  The former slaves now usually worked for the same masters, but instead received small wages, out of which they had to pay for the expenses formerly borne by their masters.  However, some former slaves managed to amass savings, which clearly demonstrates that in net terms the slave owners were less well off in income terms as well as capital as a result of abolition.Decline of the sugar industryAn often held view is that the economy of the British Virgin Islands deteriorated considerably after the abolition of slavery.  Whilst this is, strictly speaking, true, it also disguises the fact that the decline had several different causes.  In 1834 the Territory was an agricultural economy with two main crops: sugar and cotton.  Of the two, sugar was the considerably more lucrative export.Shortly after the abolition of slavery the Territory was rocked by a series of hurricanes.  At the time, there was no accurate method of forecasting hurricanes, and their effect was devastating.  A particularly devastating hurricane struck in 1837, which was reported to have completed destroyed 17 of the Territorys sugar works.  Further hurricanes hit in 1842 and 1852.  Two more struck in 1867(The hurricane of 1867 was responsible for the sinking of the RMS Rhone) and 1871.  The island also suffered severe drought between 1837(Presumably apart from the hurricane) and 1847, which made sugar plantation almost impossible to sustain.To compound these miseries, in 1846 the United Kingdom passed the Duties Act 1846 to equalise duties on sugar grown in the colonies.  Removing distortions had the net effect of making prices fall, a further blow to plantations in the British Virgin Islands.In 1846 the commercial and trading firm of Reid, Irving & Co. collapsed.  The firm had 10 sugar estates in the British Virgin Islands and employed 1,150 people.  But the actual economic effect of its failure was much wider; the company also acted as a de facto bank in the Territory, allowing advances to be drawn on the company as credit.  Further, the company had represented the only remaining direct line of communication to the United Kingdom; after its collapse mail had to be sent via St. Thomas and Copenhagen.By 1848, Hay Drummond Hay, the President of the British Virgin Islands, reported that: there are now no properties in the Virgin Islands whose holders are not embarrassed for want of capital or credit sufficient to enable them to carry on the simplest method of cultivation effectively.In December 1853 there was a disastrous outbreak of cholera in the Territory, which killed nearly 15% of the population.(A total of 942 deaths were recorded out of a total population of 6,919 (13.9%))  This was followed by an outbreak of smallpox in Tortola and Van Dyke in 1861 which caused a further 33 deaths.Up until 1845 the value of sugar exported from the Territory varied, but averaged around 10,000 per annum over the preceding ten years.  With the exception of 1847 (an unusually good year), the average for the subsequent 10 years was under 3,000.  By 1852 it had fallen below 1,000 and would never recover.Although this was terrible news for the islands as a whole, as Isaac Dookhan has pointed out,(Isaac Dookhan, History of the British Virgin Islands, page 127) this did mean that the value of land plummeted sharply, and enabled the newly free black community to purchase land where otherwise it might not have been able to do so.  It also created the basis for the future peasant agricultural economy of the British Virgin Islands.InsurrectionSoon after emancipation the newly freed black population of the British Virgin Islands started to become increasingly disenchanted that freedom had not brought the prosperity that they had hoped for.  Economic decline had led to increased tax burdens, which became a source of general discontent, for former slaves and other residents of the Territory alike.In 1848 a major disturbance occurred in the Territory.  The causes of the disturbance were several.  A revolt of slaves was occurring in St. Croix, which increased the general fervour in the islands, but the free population of Tortola were much more concerned with two other grievances: the appointment of public officials, and the crackdown on smuggling.  Although Tortola had sixteen coloured public officials, all except one were foreigners from outside the Territory.  During the period of economic decline, smuggling had been one of the few lucrative sources of employment, and recent laws which imposed stringent financial penalties (with hard labour for non-payment) were unpopular.  The anger was directed against the magistrates by the small shop keepers, and they concentrated their attack on the stipendiary magistrate, Isidore Dyett.  However, Dyett was popular with the rural population, who respected him for protecting them from unscrupulous planters.(Isaac Dookham, History of the British Virgin Islands, page 154 and 155)  The ringleaders of the insurrection had supposed that their attack would lead to a general revolt, but their choice of Dyett as a target robbed them of popular support, and the disturbance eventually fizzled.However, the insurrection of 1853 was a far more serious affair, and would have much graver and more lasting consequences.  Arguably it was the single most defining event in the islands history.  Taxation and economics was also at the root of that disturbance.  In March 1853 Robert Hawkins and Joshua Jordan, both Methodist missionaries, petitioned the Assembly to be relieved on taxes.  The Assembly rejected the request, and Jordan is said to have replied we will raise the people against you.(Source: Colonial Office papers 239/95 enclosure in a letter from Chads to Newcastle, 29 August 1853)  Subsequent meetings fostered the general discontent.  Then in June 1853 the legislature enacted a head tax on cattle in the Territory.  Injudiciously, the tax was to come into effect on 1 August, the anniversary of emancipation.  The burden of the tax would fall most heavily on the rural coloured community.  There was no violent protest when the Act was passed, and it has been suggested that rioting could have been avoided if the legislature had been more circumspect in enforcing it,(Isaac Dookham, History of the British Virgin Islands, page 156) although the historical background suggests that insurrection was never far away, and only needed a reason to spark into life.On 1 August 1853 a large body of rural labourers came to Town to protest the tax.  However, instead of showing a conciliatory approach, the authorities immediately read the Act, and made two arrests.  Violence then erupted almost immediately.  Several constables and magistrates were badly beaten, the greater part of Road Town itself was burned down, and a large number of the plantation houses were destroyed, cane fields were burned and sugar mills destroyed.  Almost all of the white population fled to St. Thomas.  President John Chads showed considerable personal courage, but little judgement or tact.(  On 2 August he met a gathering of 1,500 to 2,000 protesters, but all he would promise to do was relay their grievances before the legislature (which could not meet, as all the other members had fled).  One protester was shot (the only recorded death during the disturbances themselves) which led to the continuation of the rampage.  By 3 August, the only white people remaining in the Territory were John Chads himself, the Collector of Customs, a Methodist missionary and the islands doctor.The riots were eventually suppressed with military assistance from St. Thomas, and reinforcements of British troops dispatched by the Governor of the Leeward Islands from Antigua.  Twenty of the ringleaders of the riots were sentenced to lengthy terms of imprisonment; three were executed.Decline and disorderThe period which followed the riots of 1853 has been referred to by one historian as the period of decline and disorder.(Vernon Pickering, A Concise History of the British Virgin Islands, page 61)  Some commentators have suggested that the white population essentially refused to return, and the islands went to de bush.(Florence Lewisohn, Tales of Tortola and the British Virgin Islands, page 62)  But this is clearly an exaggeration.  Whilst many whites did not return to their heavily mortgaged and now ruined estates, some did, and rebuilt.  But the rebuilding required as a result of the insurrection, as well as the climate of uncertainty it created, alongside the existing poor economic conditions, created an economic depression which would take nearly a century to lift.  It would in fact take a full two years before even the schools in the Territory would be able to open again.(The first schools formally reopened in May 1855.  Reports indicated that others reopened gradually but do not indicate when the last school reopened.)Tensions in the Territory continued to simmer, and local unrest ran high.  Exports continued to decline, and large numbers travelled abroad seeking work.  In 1887 a plot for an armed rebellion was uncovered.  In 1890 a dispute over smuggling led to further violence, and a Long Look resident, Christopher Flemming, emerged as a local hero simply for standing up to authority.  In each case widespread damage was averted by bringing in reinforcements for the local authorities from Antigua and, in 1890, from St. Thomas.Whilst the violence undoubtedly reflected disenchantment with the economic decline and lack of social services, it would be wrong to construe this period as a form of Dark Ages for the Territory.  During this period there was, for the first time, a significant expansion in the islands schools.  By 1875 the Territory had 10 schools; a remarkable development in light of the complete absence of functional schools after the insurrection of 1853.  This period also saw the first coloured British Virgin Islander, Augustus Pickering, appointed as President in 1884.Pickering stepped down in 1887, and in 1889 the title of the office was changed to Commissioner, marking a clear decrease in administrative responsibilities.  Offices were also consolidated to save on salaries.(The President also served as Magistrate and Treasurer.) The Council itself became less and less functional, and it only narrowly avoided dissolution by appointing two popular local figures, Joseph Romney and Pickering.Modern developmentsthumb|right|250px|The busts of Isaac Fonseca and Carlton de Castro outside of the Legislative Council.However, in 1901 the Legislative Council was finally formally dissolved, and the islands were then officially administered through the Governor of the Leeward Islands, who appointed a commissioner and an executive council.  The Territory was not remotely economically prosperous, and social services had deteriorated to vanishing point.  Emigration was extremely high, particularly to St. Thomas and to the Republic.  Both concern and assistance from Britain was in very short supply, not least because of the two Wars which were fought during this period.In 1947 another unlikely hero emerged.  Theodolph H Faulkner was a fisherman from Anegada, who came to Tortola with his pregnant wife.  He had a disagreement with the medical officer, and he went straight to the marketplace and for several nights criticised the government with mounting passion.  His oratory struck a chord, and a movement started.  Led by community leaders such as Isaac Fonseca and Carlton de Castro, a throng of over 1,500 British Virgin Islanders marched on the Commissioners office and presented their grievances.  The voices of the people were heard.1950 - Self governmentthumb|left|250px|The Legislative Council building in Road Town, erected about sixty yards from the market where Faulker roused the crowds.As a result of the demonstrations the previous year, the Legislative Council was reinstituted in 1950 under a new constitution.  The reformation of the Legislative Council is often left as a footnote in the Territorys history - a mere part of the process that led to the more fundamental constitutional government in 1966 - and the 1950 constitution was in fact always envisaged as a temporary measure.  But, having been denied any form of democratic control for nearly 50 years, the new Council did not sit idly by.  In 1951 external capital was brought in to assist farmers from the Colonial Welfare and Development office.  In 1953 the Hotel Aid Act was enacted to boost the nascent tourism industry.(Pursuant to which Burt hotel, Treasure Isle hotel and Little Dix Bay (built by Rockefeller) were built almost immediately.)  Up until 1958 the Territory had only 12 miles of motorable roads; over the next 12 years the road system was vastly improved, linking West End to the East End of Tortola, and joining Tortola to Island by a new bridge.  The Beef Island airport (now renamed after B. Lettsome) was built shortly thereafter.  The Territory considered holding a plebiscite as to whether the British and U.S. Virgin Islands should merge under the U.S. flag, but (although there was no opposition from Westminster) it is unlikely that the U.S. State Department would have acquiesced to taking over responsibility for the impoverished Territory, and in the event no plebiscite was ever held.External events also played a factor.  In 1956 the Islands Federation was abolished.  Defederation enhanced the political status of the British Virgin Islands.  Jealous of its newly acquired powers, the Council declined to join the new of the West Indies in 1958, a move that would later be crucial in the development of the offshore finance industry.In 1966 the new constitution with a much greater transfer of powers was brought into effect by order in council.  Elections followed in 1967, and a comparatively young Stoutt was elected as the first Chief Minister of the Territory.Financial servicesthumb|right|The financial services industry led to surge in growth in the Territory.The fortunes of the Territory dramatically improved in the late twentieth century with the advent of the offshore financial services industry.  Former president of the BVIs Financial Services Commission, Riegels, recites the anecdote that the industry commenced on an unknown date in the 1970s when a lawyer from a firm in New York telephoned him with a proposal to incorporate a company in the British Virgin Islands to take advantage of a taxation relief treaty with the United States.  Within the space of a few years, hundreds of such companies had been incorporated.This eventually came to the attention of the United States government, who unilaterally revoked the Treaty in 1981.(The British Virgin Islands was not alone in this regard; this was part of a policy of mass-repeal by the United States of double tax relief treaties with microstates.)  In 1984 the British Virgin Islands, trying to recapture some of the lost offshore business, enacted a new form of companies legislation, the Business Companies Act, under which an company which was exempt from local taxes could be formed.  The development was only a limited success until 1991, when the United States invaded Panama to oust General Noriega.  At the time Panama was one of the largest providers of offshore financial services in the world, but the business fled subsequent the invasion, and the British Virgin Islands was one of the main beneficiaries.In 2000, KPMG were commissioned by the British Government to produce a report on the offshore financial industry generally, and the report indicated that nearly 41% of the offshore companies in the world were formed in the British Virgin Islands.  The British Virgin Islands is now one of the worlds leading offshore financial centres, and boasts one of the highest incomes per capita in the Caribbean.See also*Virgin Islands*of the Caribbean*of the United States Virgin Islands*of Presidents of the British Virgin Islands (17411887)*of Administrators of the British Virgin Islands (18871971)*of Governors of the British Virgin Islands (1971present)ReferencesIt has been commented more than once that there are a paucity of texts which deal with the history of the Territory.(See the foreword to British Virgin Islands, ISBN 1-4050-2862-9, written by Elton Georges, Deputy Governor of the Territory from 1984-2004.)  The information in this article has been almost entirely composed from the following sources.  For convenience, the primary sources that these texts rely upon are not cited.*Isaac Dookhan, A History of the British Virgin Islands, ISBN 0-85935-027-4*Vernon Pickering, A Concise History of the British Virgin Islands, ISBN 0-934139-05-9*Florence Lewisohn, Tales of Tortola and the British Virgin Islands, ASIN B0007H4XCM, Library of Congress Catalog Card No 66-29446(Ms Lewisohns text does not directly cite primary sources, but draws generally on an impressive bibliography including texts that date back to John Davies History of the Caribby-Islands (1666))Footnotesdas Ilhas Virgens Britnicas
43051
Lehigh_University
logoLehigh University is a private, co-educational university located in Pennsylvania, in the Valley region of the United States. It was established in 1865 by Packer as a four-year school, but has grown to include studies in a wide variety of disciplines. As of 2010, the university comprises 4,781 undergraduate students, 2,270 students, 666 professors, and a staff of 1,255.(The university has four colleges: the P.C. Rossin College of Engineering and Applied Science, the College of Arts and Sciences, the College of Business and Economics, and the College of Education. While the College of Arts and Sciences is the largest college today, home to roughly 40% percent of the universitys students,(Class Summary) the university is historically known for engineering(Introduction to Lehigh University at AcademicInfo.com) and business. The university offers a variety of degrees, including of Arts, of Science, Master of Arts, of Science, of Business Administration, of Engineering, of Education, and of Philosophy.HistoryImage:Asa Packer.jpg|right|thumb|215px|PackerPacker named his university Lehigh after his other passion, the railroad, despite suggestions from some to call it Packer University. It was founded to provide a well-rounded education for young men, combining a liberal and scientific education with the technical skills necessary to increase the prosperity of the region. According to Bacon Stevens, the first president of the board of trustees, Asa Packers founding gift of $500,000 was the largest single endowment for a literary institution at that time.(From 1871 to 1891, Packers endowment allowed the institution to offer its education free of charge by competitive exam.() This, plus its blend of engineering and liberal arts, attracted some of the nations brightest students, many of whom went on to distinguished careers in industry and engineering.Unlike other engineering schools of the day, Lehigh was envisioned as a university instead of an institute of technology, offering an education that was rooted in both scientific and classical traditions as espoused by John Amos Comenius.( Initially there were five schools: four scientific (civil engineering, mechanical engineering, mining and metallurgy, and analytical chemistry) and one of general literature. Over time, additional areas of the arts and sciences were added and engineering curricula were both merged and expanded.left|thumb|130px|Lehighs sealThe stock market crash accompanying the of 1893 was a major financial blow to the university, since its endowment was largely invested in stocks, particularly shares of Valley Railroad donated by the founder.( As a consequence, Lehigh decided to drop its Episcopal Church affiliation in 1897, allowing it to qualify for state and federal government aid.Based on the experience of Lehigh engineers who went into industry(Plotnicki, Rita M., Looking Back: A Lehigh Scrapbook, Lehigh University, 1991) a College of Business & Economics was added in 1910. Lehighs business curriculum was unique( in that it combined both the abstract emphasis on Economics seen in the League with the practical skills of management seen in more common business administration degrees given by other universities.A similar emphasis on the well-rounded graduate can be seen in Lehighs approach to education degrees. Lehighs respected School of Education started as (and remains) a solely graduate-level program. This is based( on the principle that you need to learn primary subject matter well before you can learn how to teach it to others. Thus future teachers at Lehigh often take a five year program earning both a Bachelors Degree in a specialized field and a Masters Degree in Education.Presidents of Lehigh#Coppe (18661875), soldier, author, and engineer#McDowell Leavitt (18751880), Episcopal clergyman#Robert Alexander Lamberton (18801893), lawyer#Messinger Drown (18951904), chemistry professor#Henry Sturgis Drinker (19051920), the only alumnus to serve as president#Charles Russ Richards (19221935), presided over the first graduate degrees awarded to women#Clement C. Williams (19351944), civil engineer#Martin Dewey Whitaker (19461960), who worked to develop the atomic bomb#Harvey A. Neville (19611964), the only faculty member ever elected president#W. Deming Lewis (19641982), presided over the admission of undergraduate women#Likins (19821997), civil engineer#William C. Hittinger (19971998), electrical engineer#C. Farrington (19982006), chemist#P. Gast (2006present), Lehighs first female president, chemical engineerThe Clery ActOn April 5, 1986, 19-year-old Lehigh freshman Jeanne Clery was raped and murdered in her dorm room and the culprit, Josoph Henry, was later sentenced to death. It was later disclosed that between 1982 to 1985 there had been 38 violent crimes at the university.(After Their Daughter Is Murdered at College, Her Grieving Parents Mount a Crusade for Campus Safety) The victims parents then settled a civil suit out of court with the university for an undisclosed amount. The backlash of unreported crimes on numerous campuses across the country led to the Jeanne Clery Disclosure of Campus Security Policy and Campus Crime Statistics Act. The Clery Act requires that colleges reveal information regarding crime on their campuses.(Complying With The Jeanne Clery Act)Campusright|thumb|Alumni Memorial Building on the Asa Packer campusLocated in the Valley, the university is a  drive from Philadelphia, and an  drive from New York City.(Driving Directions to Lehigh from New York, Philadelphia)Lehigh encompasses , including  of recreational and playing fields and 150 buildings comprising four million square feet of floor space. It is organized into three contiguous campuses on and around South Mountain:*the Asa Packer Campus, built into the Northern slope of the mountain, is Lehighs original and predominant campus;*the Mountaintop Campus, atop South Mountain, featuring an sports field as well as Iacocca Hall; and*the Murray H. Goodman Campus, immediately south, where a 16,000-seat stadium and other sports facilities are located.left|thumb|Iacocca Hall on the Mountaintop Campus.AcademicsLehighs average class size is 27 students; 80% of classes have fewer than 35 students. The undergraduate student-to-faculty ratio is 10:1.(The 2010 edition of News & World Reports Best Colleges ranked Lehigh in its Most Selective admissions category and 37th in the National Universities (Doctoral) category.(Lehigh University at a Glance from News & World Report.) Princeton Review classifies it among the Best Northeastern Colleges.(Lehigh University on the Princeton Review)Lehigh University offers undergraduate enrollment in all colleges but the College of Education: the P.C. Rossin School of Engineering and Applied Science, the College of Business and Economics, and the College of Arts and Sciences. Students are able to take courses or major/minor in a subject outside of their respective college.(Chart Showing Undergraduate Enrollment)P.C. Rossin College of Engineering and Applied ScienceGraduates of Lehighs engineering programs invented the escalator(Stairways to Heaven: Escalators in the Vernacular) and founded Packard Motor Car Company(Packard, James Ward  Lehigh Engineering Heritage Initiative) and the companies that built the locks and lockgates of the Canal. Other notable alumni include Penske and Iacocca. Beta Pi, the renowned engineering society, was founded at Lehigh.(Tau Beta Pi Founder, Dr. Edward Higginson Williams, Jr.)College of Business and EconomicsIn 2008, BusinessWeek ranked Lehighs College of Business and Economics 25th in the nation among undergraduate business programs.(BusinessWeek rankings.) Lehighs accounting program is particularly strong, ranked as the number one undergraduate accounting program in the nation by BusinessWeek. The finance program is also strong, ranked as the 18th best undergraduate program in the nation by BusinessWeek.(BusinessWeek Undergrad B-School Specialty Rankings: Accounting Rankings) Accounting and finance majors at Lehigh are heavily recruited by Four auditors and many consulting firms. Additionally, BusinessWeek ranked Lehighs part-time MBA fifth in the nation and first in the region in 2007.(The Best Part-Time MBA Programs)College of Arts and SciencesBased in Maginnes Hall,(http://cas.lehigh.edu/casweb/default.aspx?id1) Lehigh offers a variety of humanities courses and visual arts programs. In particular, it has many music programs, including its Marching 97,(The Marching 97 website) the Wind Ensemble and the Philharmonic orchestra. It has a dedicated Humanities Center, which is the site for many literature and other arts-based programs, including the DWS, or Drown Writers Series.(http://www.lehigh.edu/~indrown/ugrad/activities.html)Lehigh also has a program called ArtsLehigh,(ArtsLehigh from the Lehigh website) oriented towards enhancing interest in the arts on campus.College of EducationThe College of Education offers graduate programs in Psychology, Leadership, Psychology, Education, Teaching, Learning, and Technology, and Comparative and International Education (see education).(COE Academic Programs from Lehighs website)  More than 6000 students have received one of these degrees as of 2007, with some of them going on to receive awards such as MetLife/NASSP National Middle Level Principal of the Year.(COE Alumni page)FacultyAs of 2010, Lehigh has 666 instructional faculty. Over 99% of the faculty hold a Ph.D. or the highest terminal degree in their field. About 69% of all full-time faculty are tenured.( About three-quarters (74%) are male.  Faculty members are required to have a minimum of four office hours per week.Athletics100px|left|Lehigh University Mountain Hawks logoCalled the Engineers until 1995, Lehighs teams are now officially known as the Mountain Hawks. Teams prior to 1995  may be referred to by the historic title, Lehigh Engineers, after the Lehigh railroad.As a member of the League, Lehigh competes in 25 different NCAA Division I sports. Lehighs 2006 student-athlete graduation rate of 97% ranked 12th among all 326 NCAA Division I institutions. ( http://www.lehighsports.com/info/graduation/default.aspx)  In 2002, it won the inaugural Today/NCAA Foundation Award for having the nations top graduation rate of all Division I institutions.( http://www.lehighsports.com/info/graduation/default.aspx) Lehigh student-athletes success on the field and in the classroom has resulted in Lehigh being one of the 20 Division I schools included in News & World Reports Americas Best College Sports Programs. Lehigh graduates have gone on to professional careers in the Football League, League Baseball, League Soccer,and the Basketball Association as players, scouts, coaches and owners.  Lehigh graduates have competed in the Bowl and won gold medals for the USA at the Olympics.right|thumb|Goodman Stadium in the Murray H. Goodman Campus.WrestlingThe most storied athletic program at Lehigh is its wrestling team. Over the past several decades it has turned out several All-Americans and had numerous squads finish with Top 20 NCAA national rankings. Under coach Greg Strobel, recent teams have dominated the EIWA league. On April 15, 2008, the athletic department announced the hiring of former assistant coach and two-time national champion Santoro as Lehighs next head coach.The RivalryLehigh University is notable for its rivalry in sports and academics with nearby College. Since 1884, the two football teams have met 146 times, making The Rivalry the most played in the history of college football. It is also the longest uninterrupted rivalry in college football, with the teams playing at least once every year since 1897. The Rivalry is considered one of the best in all of college athletics and ESPNU recently ranked The Rivalry #8 in their Top Ten College Football Rivalries. This game is sold out long before gameday each year.Greek lifeNearly all of Lehighs fraternities and sororities have their own houses which are owned by the university; most of the fraternities and sororities are located on the Hill along Upper and Lower Sayre Park Roads. Approximately 34% of undergraduates are members of a Greek organization.  There are currently 22 fraternities, 16 of which are on campus, and 10 sororities, 9 of which are on campus:Fraternities*Epsilon Pi*Tau Omega*Phi*Psi*Chi (non-residential)*Phi*Upsilon*Kappa Alpha*Alpha Psi (non-residential)*Sigma*Chi Alpha*Sigma Upsilon (non-residential)*Psi Phi (non-residential)*Kappa Alpha (non-residential)*Gamma Delta*Kappa Theta*Sigma Kappa*Upsilon*Chi*Phi Epsilon*Chi*XiSororities*Chi Omega*Gamma Delta*Omicron Pi*Phi*Gamma*Phi Beta*Alpha Theta*Theta Alpha (non-residential)*Beta Phi*Tau AlphaSpirit and traditionsLehigh students have several lasting traditions: Lehighs school colors, brown and white, date back to 1874, and the school newspaper of the same name was first published in 1894.Following the death of Asa Packer in May 1879, the University established Founders Day to be held in October  to remember and recognize those have contributed to the success of the University. The event remains an annual tradition.Freshmen are traditionally inducted into the University in a convocation in the Arts Center and welcomed at a Freshman-Alumni Rally where their class flag is given to them by the class from fifty years before.Until the 1970s, freshmen wore small brown hats with their class numbers called dinks from the beginning of the fall semester until the Lafayette football game. The week leading up to the big game was full of festivities created to unite the students and fuel spirit. In one of these events, The Pajama Parade, the freshmen were led across the penny toll bridge in their pajamas singing We Pay No Tolls Tonight to the College dormitories where they would serenade the women. The week before the game still involves decoration of the Greek houses, a bonfire, parties, rallies and the Marching 97 performing unexpectedly during classes the Friday before the game.While the riots to rip down the goal posts in Taylor Stadium are a thing of the past, many alumni return for the Lafayette game (which is usually sold out three months in advance) to root Lehigh on, to attend parties at their former fraternities and sororities, and to see old friends.(BeirutLehigh University is credited with coining the phrase Beirut to represent the popular drinking game Beer Pong. The name most likely originated from the 1982 Lebanon War. At Lehigh University, Beer Pong is considered to be the drinking game played with paddles and Beirut is the more common version of throwing a ping pong ball into a cup. There are myriad rules utilized across Lehighs campus, with the most prevalent rule being house rules. Each fraternity has their own style of game play. Another difference between the game played at Lehigh compared to other schools is that at Lehigh the common cup used is a plastic 9oz cup versus the classic Solo cup seen elsewhere.()()RankingsThe 2008 edition of Best Colleges from US News & World Reports ranked Lehigh as Most Selective in admissions and 31st in the National Universities (Doctoral) category. It ranked as follows among the 126 top-tier universities:(*8th in Alumni Giving.*16th in Classes with fewer than 20 students.*28th in Best value.*30th in Retention rate.*32nd in Student selectivity.*32nd in Graduation rate.*36th in Percentage of students in the top 10 percent of their high school class.*36th in Average standardized test scores.The magazine also included Lehigh in its Americas Best College Sports Programs  list(BusinessWeek ranked Lehighs undergraduate College of Business & Economics 25th overall in the nation in 2007. The school was ranked 1st in accounting, 11th in median starting salaries for its graduates, and 21st in academic quality.( In BusinessWeeks 2008 ranking of Which College Grads Earn the Most, Lehigh ranked #14.Wall Street Journal in June 2010 ranked Lehigh as number 12 in the nation for Return on Investment (ROI) when comparing the average career earnings of a graduate to the cost of an education.(:http://blogs.wsj.com/economics/2010/06/30/top-20-colleges-that-offer-best-return-on-investment)Notable alumni*P. Weeks, Chairman and CEO of Incorporated,*Al-Naimi (BS geology, 1962), CEO, Aramco, formerly Arabian American Oil Company, 19841995, Minister of Petroleum and Mineral Resources, Arabia, 1995present.*Amelio (BS engineering, 1979), former CEO, Lenovo Group Limited.*Grace (1899), former president, Steel.*Hayne (BA anthropology, 1969), co-founder, Outfitters, Anthropologie and People.*Iacocca (engineering, 1945, Hon D.Eng. 1965), former chairman, Corporation.*Daniel C. Keefe, former CEO Ingersol-Rand.*Philip Kent (BS business & economics, 1976), chairman & CEO, Broadcasting.*Warren Klawitter  (BS & MS mathematics), vice president & chief actuary, GEICO.*Harold Mohler (BS chemical engineering, 1948), former president and CEO, Foods.*Robert J. Myers, co-creator of the American Social Security program, who set the retirement age at 65.*James W. Packard (mechanical engineering, 1884), co-founder of Packard Motor Company. Funded Lehighs Packard Lab, named after him.*R. Perella (BS business & economics, 1964), former chairman of banking, Stanley.*Douglas Rogers (1982), president, Wyeth Consumer Healthcare.*D. Feaver, (BA, 1983), member of the National Security Council in the Clinton and Bush administrations and professor at University.*Morgenstern (BA English, 1953), 2005 Prize winner.*F. Bartoe (BS physics, 1966), Shuttle astronaut and ISS research manager for NASA.*J. Burakoff, cancer specialist and the author of both Therepeutic Immunology (2001) and Graft-Vs.-Host Disease: Immunology, Pathophysiology, and Treatment (1990).*Holbert, legendary American race car driver.*Ming-Zhen, Chinese palentologist, academican of the Academy of Sciences, recipient of the Medal.*Penske (1959), NASCAR and IRL team owner and member of Motorsports Hall of Fame.*Congressman Charlie Dent (MPA)*Steve G. Vogel (BA and MBA), Chief Financial officer, ONPATH TECHNOLOGIES*Tantaros, News political analyst, writer and columnist for the York Daily News*Rackley, 3rd Round selection of the Jacksonville JaguarsPhoto galleryFile:Gymnasium (Coppee Hall) 1896.jpg|Coppee Hall Gymnasium (built 1882).Image:Lehigh_University_Packard_Lab.jpg|Packard Laboratory, home of the P.C. Rossin College of Engineering and Applied ScienceImage:Lehigh_University_Rauch.jpg|Rauch Business CenterImage:Fairmart.jpg|The Fairchild-Martindale LibraryImage:Lehigh_University_Packard_Windows.jpg|Packard Lab windowsImage:Lehigh_University_Christmas_Saucon.jpg|Christmas Saucon Hall, home of the Department of MathematicsImage:Lehigh_University_Admissions_Stairs.jpg|Stairs Leading to Alumni Memorial BuildingImage:Packer_Memorial_Church_Side_Entrance.jpg|Above an entrance to Memorial ChurchSee also*of Lehigh University alumni*University PressReferencesExternal links*Official website*Official athletics websiteUniversityUniversityLehighLehighnl:Lehigh-universiteitUniversityyliopistoth:zh:
43551
Ruby
A ruby is a pink to blood-red colored gemstone, a variety of the mineral corundum (oxide). The red color is caused mainly by the presence of the element chromium. Its name comes from ruber, Latin for red. Other varieties of gem-quality corundum are called sapphires. The ruby is considered one of the four stones, together with the sapphire, the emerald, and the diamond.(Precious Stones, Max Bauer, p. 2)Prices of rubies are primarily determined by color. The brightest and most valuable red called pigeon blood-red, commands a huge premium over other rubies of similar quality. After color follows clarity: similar to diamonds, a clear stone will command a premium, but a ruby without any needle-like rutile inclusions may indicate that the stone has been treated. Cut and carat (weight) also determine the price.Physical propertiesthumb|left|Crystal structure of rubyRubies have a hardness of 9.0 on the scale of mineral hardness. Among the natural gems only moissanite and diamond are harder, with diamond having a Mohs hardness of 10.0 and moissonite falling somewhere in between corundum (ruby) and diamond in hardness. Ruby is -alumina (the most stable form of Al2O3) in which a small fraction of the aluminum3+ ions are replaced by chromium3+ ions. Each Cr3+ is surrounded octahedrally by six O2- ions. This crystallographic arrangement strongly affects each Cr3+, resulting in light absorption in the yellow-green region of the spectrum and thus in the red color of the gem. When yellow-green light is absorbed by Cr3+, it is re-emitted as red luminescence.() This red emission adds to the red colour perceived by the subtraction of green and violet light from white light, and adds luster to the gems appearance. When the optical arrangement is such that the emission is stimulated by 694-nanometer photons reflecting back and forth between two mirrors, the emission grows strongly in intensity. This effect was used by Maiman in 1960 to make the first successful laser, based on ruby.All natural rubies have imperfections in them, including color impurities and inclusions of rutile needles known as silk. Gemologists use these needle inclusions found in natural rubies to distinguish them from synthetics, simulants, or substitutes. Usually the rough stone is heated before cutting. Almost all rubies today are treated in some form, with heat treatment being the most common practice. However, rubies that are completely untreated but still of excellent quality command a large premium.Some rubies show a 3-point or 6-point asterism or star. These rubies are cut into cabochons to display the effect properly. Asterisms are best visible with a single-light source, and move across the stone as the light moves or the stone is rotated. Such effects occur when light is reflected off the silk (the structurally oriented rutile needle inclusions) in a certain way. This is one example where inclusions increase the value of a gemstone. Furthermore, rubies can show color changes  though this occurs very rarely  as well as chatoyancy or the cats eye effect.Natural occurrenceThe Mogok Valley in Upper Myanmar (Burma) was for centuries the worlds main source for rubies. That region has produced some of the finest rubies ever mined, but in recent years very few good rubies have been found there. The very best color in Myanmar rubies is sometimes described as pigeons blood. In central Myanmar, the area of Mong Hsu began producing rubies during the 1990s and rapidly became the worlds main ruby mining area. The most recently found ruby deposit in Myanmar is in Namya (Namyazeik) located in the northern state of Kachin.Rubies have historically been mined in Thailand, the Pailin and District of Cambodia, Burma, India, Afghanistan and in Pakistan. Rubies have rarely been found in Lanka, where pink sapphires are more common. After the World War ruby deposits were found in Tanzania, Madagascar, Vietnam, Nepal, Tajikistan, and Pakistan. A few rubies have been found in the states of Montana, Carolina, and Carolina. More recently, large ruby deposits have been found under the receding ice shelf of Greenland. In 2002 rubies were found in the Waseges River area of Kenya.There are reports of a large deposit of rubies found in 2009 in Mozambique, in Nanhumbir in the Cabo Delgado district of Montepuez.(Mozambique: Police Seize Boat With 96 Illegal Immigrants. AllAfrica. 4 November 2010)Spinel, another red gemstone, is sometimes found along with rubies in the same gem gravel or marble. Red spinel may be mistaken for ruby by those lacking experience with gems. However, the finest red spinels can have a value approaching that of the average ruby.()Factors affecting valueDiamonds are graded using criteria that have become known as the four Cs, namely color, cut, clarity and carat weight. Similarly natural rubies can be evaluated using the four Cs together with their size and geographic origin.Color: In the evaluation of colored gemstones, color is the single most important factor. Color divides into three components; hue, saturation and tone. Hue refers to color as we normally use the term. Transparent gemstones occur in the following hues: red, orange, yellow, green, blue, violet, purple and pink. The first six are known as spectral hues; the last two are modified spectral hues. Purple is a hue that falls halfway between red and blue. Pink is a paler shade of red.() In nature there are rarely pure hues so when speaking of the hue of a gemstone we speak of primary and secondary and sometimes tertiary hues. In ruby the primary hue must be red. All other hues of the gem species corundum are called sapphire. Ruby may exhibit a range of secondary hues. Orange, purple, violet and pink are possible.Image:Ruby cristal.jpg|A naturally occurring ruby crystalImage:Ruby gem.JPG|Natural ruby with inclusionsImage:Ruby and diamond bracelet.jpg|Rubies set in jewelry Image:Cut Ruby.jpg|A cut ruby.The finest ruby is best described as being a vivid medium-dark toned red. Secondary hues add an additional complication. Pink, orange, and purple are the normal secondary hues in ruby. Of the three, purple is preferred because, firstly, the purple reinforces the red making it appear richer.( Secondly, purple occupies a position on the color wheel halfway between red and blue. In Burma where the term pigeon blood originated, rubies are set in pure gold. Pure gold is itself a highly saturated yellow. Set a purplish-red ruby in yellow and the yellow neutralizes its complement blue leaving the stone appearing to be pure red in the setting.(GemWise: What Color is Pigeons Blood)Treatments and enhancementsImproving the quality of gemstones by treating them is common practice. Some treatments are used in almost all cases and are therefore considered acceptable. During the late 1990s, a large supply of low-cost materials caused a sudden surge in supply of heat-treated rubies, leading to a downward pressure on ruby prices.Improvements used include color alteration, improving transparency by dissolving rutile inclusions, healing of fractures (cracks) or even completely filling them.The most common treatment is the application of heat. Most, if not all, rubies at the lower end of the market are heat treated on the rough stones to improve color, remove purple tinge, blue patches and silk. These heat treatments typically occur around temperatures of 1800 C (3300 F).() Some rubies undergo a process of low tube heat, when the stone is heated over charcoal of a temperature of about 1300 C (2400 F) for 20 to 30 minutes. The silk is only partially broken as the color is improved.Another treatment, which has become more frequent in recent years, is lead glass filling. Filling the fractures inside the ruby with glass (or a similar material) dramatically improves the transparency of the stone, making previously unsuitable rubies fit for applications in jewelry.(Vincent Pardieu Lead Glass Filled/Repaired Rubies. Asian Institute of Gemological Sciences Gem Testing Laboratory. February 2005) The process is done in four steps:# The rough stones are pre-polished to eradicate all surface impurities that may affect the process# The rough is cleaned with fluoride# The first heating process during which no fillers are added. The heating process eradicates impurities inside the fractures. Although this can be done at temperatures up to 1400 C (2500 F) it most likely occurs at a temperature of around 900 C (1600 F) since the rutile silk is still intact# The second heating process in an electrical oven with different chemical additives. Different solutions and mixes have shown to be successful, however mostly lead-containing glass-powder is used at present. The ruby is dipped into oils, then covered with powder, embedded on a tile and placed in the oven where it is heated at around 900 C (1600 F) for one hour in an oxidizing atmosphere. The orange colored powder transforms upon heating into a transparent to yellow-colored paste, which fills all fractures. After cooling the color of the paste is fully transparent and dramatically improves the overall transparency of the ruby(Richard W. Hughes (1997), Ruby & Sapphire, Boulder, CO, RWH Publishing, ISBN 978-0964509764).If a color needs to be added, the glass powder can be enhanced with copper or other metal oxides as well as elements such as sodium, calcium, potassium etc.The second heating process can be repeated three to four times, even applying different mixtures.() When jewelry containing rubies is heated (for repairs) it should not be coated with boracic acid or any other substance, as this can etch the surface; it does not have to be protected like a diamond.Synthetic and imitation rubiesIn 1837 Gaudin made the first synthetic rubies by fusing potash alum at a high temperature with a little chromium as a pigment. In 1847 Ebelmen made white sapphire by fusing alumina in boric acid. In 1877 Frenic and Freil made crystal corundum from which small stones could be cut. Frimy and Verneuil manufactured artificial ruby by fusing BaF2 and Al2O3 with a little Chromium at red heat. In 1903 Verneuil announced he could produce synthetic rubies on a commercial scale using this fusion process.() By 1910, Verneuils laboratory had expanded into a 30 furnace production facility, with annual gemstone production having reached 1,000 kg (2,205 lb) in 1907.Other processes in which synthetic rubies can be produced are through the Czochralskis Pulling process, flux process, and the hydrothermal process. Most synthetic rubies originate from flame fusion, due to the low costs involved. Synthetic rubies may have no imperfections visible to the naked eye but magnification may reveal curves, striae and gas bubbles. The fewer the number and the less obvious the imperfections, the more valuable the ruby is; unless there are no imperfections (i.e., a perfect ruby), in which case it will be suspected of being artificial. Dopants are added to some manufactured rubies so they can be identified as synthetic, but most need gemological testing to determine their origin.Synthetic rubies have technological uses as well as gemological ones. Rods of synthetic ruby are used to make lasers and masers. The first working laser was made by Theodore H. Maiman in 1960() at Research Laboratories in California, beating several research teams including those of H. Townes at University, Arthur Schawlow at Labs,() and Gould at a company called TRG (Technical Research Group). Maiman used a solid-state light-pumped synthetic ruby to produce red laser light at a wavelength of 694 nanometers (nm). Ruby lasers are still in use. Rubies are also used in applications where high hardness is required such as at wear exposed locations in modern mechanical clockworks, or as scanning probe tips in a measuring machine.Imitation rubies are also marketed. Red spinels, red garnets, and colored glass have been falsely claimed to be rubies. Imitations go back to Roman times and already in the 17th century techniques were developed to color foil redby burning scarlet wool in the bottom part of the furnacewhich was then placed under the imitation stone.()Trade terms such as ruby for red spinel and rubellite for red tourmaline can mislead unsuspecting buyers. Such terms are therefore discouraged from use by many gemological associations such as the Laboratory Manual Harmonisation Committee (LMHC).Records and famous rubiesImage:National Museum of Natural History Rubies.JPG|thumb|right|Rubies at the Museum of Natural History, DC, USA* The Smithsonians Museum of Natural History in Washington DC, has received one of the worlds largest and finest ruby gemstones. The  Burmese ruby, set in a platinum ring with diamonds, was donated by businessman and philanthropist Peter Buck in memory of his late wife Carmen Lcia. This gemstone displays a richly saturated red color combined with an exceptional transparency. The finely proportioned cut provides vivid red reflections. The stone was mined from the Mogok region of Burma (now Myanmar) in the 1930s.()* In 2007 the London jeweler & Co featured on their website a heart-shaped 40.63-carat ruby.()* On december 13/14 2011 Elizabeth Taylors complete jewelry collection will be auctions by Christies which include a ruby and diamond necklace (http://news.yahoo.com/photos/elizabeth-taylors-ruby-diamond-necklace-gift-mike-todd-photo-101745840.html)Historical and cultural references*An early recorded note of the transport and trading of rubies arises in the literature on the Silk Road of China, wherein about 200 BC rubies were carried along this ancient trackway moving westward from China.(C. Michael Hogan, Silk Road, North China, The Megalithic Portal. 19 November 2007)*Rubies have always been held in high esteem in Asian countries. They were used to ornament armor, scabbards, and harnesses of noblemen in India and China. Rubies were laid beneath the foundation of buildings to secure good fortune to the structure.()See also*of minerals*processReferencesExternal links*International Colored Stone Associations ruby overview page* Webmineral crystallographic and mineral info*Mindat Ruby localities*BBC article about a large ruby with a photo of it in its uncut statear:an:Rubaz:Rubindelimabe:be-x-old:bg:ca:Robcs:Rubnda:Rubinde:Rubinet:Rubiines:Rubeo:Rubenoeu:Errubifa:fr:Rubisgl:Rubko:hy:hi:hr:Rubinio:Rubinodelimait:Rubinohe:()ka:la:Carbunculuslv:Rubnslt:Rubinas()Delimamy:(edelsteen)(  )ja:no:Rubinps:pl:Rubinpt:Rubiro:Rubinumiaru:simple:Rubysk:Rubnsl:Rubinsr:sh:Rubinfi:Rubiinisv:Rubinta:te:()tr:Yakutuk:ur:ngczh-yue:zh:
44247
North_OssetiaAlania
dateAugust 2010The Republic of North OssetiaAlania (; , Respublik Tsgat Iryston-Alani ) is a federal subject of Russia (a republic). Its population according to the 2010 Census was 712,877.(NameIn the last years of the Union, as nationalist movements swept throughout the Caucasus, many intellectuals in the Ossetian ASSR called for the revival of the name of Alania, a medieval kingdom of the Alans, ancestors of the modern-day Ossetians. The term of Alania quickly became popular in Ossetian daily life through the names of various enterprises, a TV channel, political and civic organizations, publishing house, soccer team, etc. In November 1994, the name of Alania was officially added to the republican title (Republic of North OssetiaAlania).(Shnirelman, Victor (2006). The Politics of a Name: Between Consolidation and Separation in the Northern Caucasus. Acta Slavica Iaponica 23, pp. 37-49.)HistoryEarly historyThe territory of North Ossetia was first inhabited by Caucasian tribes. Some Nomadic Alans settled in the region in the 7th century, forming the kingdom of Alania. It was converted to Christianity by missionaries from Byzantium. Alania greatly profited from the Road which passed through its territory.After the Ages, the Mongols and Tartars repeated invasions decimated the population, now known as the Ossetians. Islam was introduced to the region in the 17th century by Kabardians. Conflicts between the of Crimea and the Empire eventually pushed Ossetia into an alliance with Russia in the 18th century. Soon, Russia established a military base in the capital, Vladikavkaz, making it the first Russian-controlled area in the northern Caucasus. By 1806, Ossetia was under complete Russian control.Russian/Soviet ruleThe Russians rule led to rapid development of industry and railways which overcame its isolation. The first books from the area came during the late 18th century, and became part of the Region of Russia in the mid-19th century.The Russian Revolution of 1917 resulted in North Ossetia being merged into the Mountain Republic in 1921. It then became the Ossetian Autonomous Oblast on 7 July 1924, then merged into the Ossetian Autonomous Soviet Socialist Republic on 5 December 1936. In War II, it was subject to a number of attacks by Nazi German invaders unsuccessfully trying to seize Vladikavkaz in 1942.The North Ossetian SSR declared itself the autonomous republic of the Soviet Union on June 20, 1990. Its name was changed to Republic of North OssetiaAlania in 1991.Post-Soviet ruleThe Soviet Unions collapse posed particular problems for the Ossetian people, who were divided between North Ossetia, which was part of the SFSR, and Ossetia, part of the SSR. In December 1990 the Supreme Soviet of Georgia abolished the autonomous Ossetian enclave amid the rising ethnic tensions in the region, and much of the population fled across the border to North Ossetia or Georgia proper. Some 70,000 South Ossetian refugees were resettled in North Ossetia, sparking clashes with the predominantly Ingush population in the Prigorodny District. That led to the conflict.As well as dealing with the effects of the conflict in South Ossetia, North Ossetia has had to deal with refugees and the occasional spillover of fighting from the war in neighboring Chechnya. The bloodiest incident by far was the September 2004 hostage crisis, in which Chechen insurgents attributed to Basayev (who alternatingly denied and claimed responsibility) seized control of a school. In the firefight between the terrorists and Russian forces that ended the crisis, 335 civilians, the majority of them children, died.GeographyOssetian landscape Kwyrttaty komThe republic is in the northern Caucasus. The northern part of the republic is situated in the Plain. 22% of the republics territory is covered by forests.*Area: *Borders:**internal: Kabardino-Balkar Republic (W/NW/N), Krai (N), Chechen Republic (NE/E), Republic of Ingushetia (E/SE)**international: Georgia (including Ossetia) (SE/S/SW)*Highest point: Kazbek ()*Maximum N->S distance: *Maximum E->W distance: RiversAll of the republics rivers belong to the basin of the River. Major rivers include:*River (~600 km)*River (104 km)*River (101 km)*River (99 km)*River (81 km)*River*River (278 km)MountainsAll of the mountains located on the territory of the republic are a part of the Caucasus. Kazbek is the highest point (5,033 m), with Dzhimara being the second highest (4,780 m).Natural resourcesNatural resources include minerals (copper, silver, zinc), timber, waters, power, and untapped reserves of oil and gas.ClimateClimate is moderately continental.*Average January temperature: *Average July temperature: *Average annual precipitation: 400700 mm in the plains, over 1,000 mm in the mountains.Administrative divisionsDemographics*Population: *Population: **Urban: 464,875 (65.5%)**Rural: 245,400 (34.5%)**Male: 336,035 (47.3%)**Female: 374,240 (52.7%)*Females per 1000 males: 1,114*Average age: 33.8 years**Urban: 34.2 years**Rural: 32.9 years**Male: 30.4 years**Female: 36.9 years*Number of households: 200,191 (with 690,806 people)**Urban: 143,397 (with 447,884 people)**Rural: 56,794 (with 242,922 people)*Vital statistics:Source: Russian Federal State Statistics Service*Ethnic groupsThe Ossetian population of North Ossetia is predominantly Christian with a Muslim minority, speaking Ossetic and Russian.According to the 2002 Census, Ossetians make up 62.7% of the republics population. Other groups include Russians (23.2%), Ingush (3.0%), Armenians (2.4%), Kumyks (12,659, or 1.8%), Georgians (10,803, or 1.5%), Ukrainians (0.7%), Chechens (3,383, or 0.5%), and a host of smaller groups, each accounting for less than 0.5% of the total population. 3,283 people (0.5%) did not indicate their nationalities during the Census.*Number of Refugees: 12,570 (http://www.regnum.ru/news/1129867.html)PoliticsThe head of government in the Republic of North OssetiaAlania is the Head of the Republic. As of 2008, the head of the republic is Mamsurov. Mamsurov succeeded Dzasokhov, who voluntarily quit his post on May 31, 2005.(Regional government to quit over Beslan tragedy: president from ABC)EconomyIn recent years, North Ossetia-Alanias economic development has been successful; the indicators of the republics social and economic development in 2005-2007 revealed a stable growth of all sectors of the economy and major social parameters. The nature and climatic conditions of the republic contribute to the successful development of various economic sectors, which is compounded by the abundance of natural resources. regional product pro capita of the region in 2006 was 61,000 rubles ($2,596), and increased 30% in the 2005-2007 time period.( GRP pro capita in 2007 was 76 455 rubles.(         ) In 2005-2007, the average monthly wage in North OssetiaAlania doubled, with the actual cash earnings increased by 42.5 percent. In terms of the average monthly wage growth, the republic ranks first in the North Caucasus.(The regional governments economic priorities include industrial growth, development of small enterprise, spas, and resorts, and strengthening the budgetary and tax discipline.()Natural resources, agriculture, and industryThe most widespread resources are zinc- and lead-containing complex ores. There are deposits of limestone, dolomites, marble and touchstone. There is also a large availability of construction materials, such as clay, sand and gravel. The local oil deposit reserves are estimated at10 million metric tons.(Agricultural sector is varied and specializes in the cultivation of wheat, corn, and sunflowers; horticulture; viticulture; and cattle and sheep breeding.()()North Ossetias industry is mainly concentrated in Vladikavkaz. Major companies located here include Elektrotsink, Gazoapparat, an instrument-making plant, Elektrokontraktor, a factory producing automotive electrical equipment, a large-panel construction complex, and companies in the food industry. The industrial center has grown around the mining and forest industries.(TourismDespite the proximity to Chechnya, North Ossetia is making efforts to develop its tourist industry.( Projects under a program for spa, resort, and tourism development have been successfully implemented in the mountainous part of the republic, according to the head of the regional government.( There are nearly 3000 historical monuments in the republic and more than half of the its area is occupied bv National Park, the Ossetia National Preserve, and game preserves. There are more than 250 therapeutic, mineral, and freshwater springs in the republic with estimated daily reserves of 15,000 cubic meters. Besides providing the basis for health spas, these mineral waters also have the potential to be bottled and sold. North Ossetian mineral waters are known for their unique qualities, as well as special mineral composition.(()InfrastructureIn terms of its infrastructure, North OssetiaAlania ranks second in the Federal District and 10th in the nation.() The republic has some of the most extensive telecommunication networks in the North Caucasus region and in Russia. It ranks first in terms of its telecom network installations in the Southern Federal District.The republic ranks fourth in Russia in terms of its paved roads, and its expanding transport and logistics complex provides communication networks between Russia and the South Caucasus, as well as Central Asia. The complex includes two federal highways (Military Road connects Vladikavkaz with Transcaucasia) running across Greater Caucasus Range, two customs checkpoints for cars, a developed railway network, Vladikavkaz international airport, and well-equipped transport terminals.(CultureThere are six professional theaters in North OssetiaAlania, as well as Ossetian State Philarmonia.Poets*KhetagurovEducationThe most important facilities of higher education include Caucasus State Technological University, Ossetian State University, Ossetian State Medical Academy, and State Agrarian University; all in Vladikavkaz.ReligionThe predominant religion in the republic is Russian Orthodox Christianity, followed by Islam. Many of the native rituals predate both faiths.See also*language*of OssetiaNotesReferences*External linksGeneral* Official website of the Republic of North OssetiaAlania* Official website of the Parliament of the Republic of North OssetiaAlania* Russian News Agency Ria Novosty* Official website of Alexander Dzasokhov* OssetiaHistory, culture, politics, news*Pictures of North OssetiaAlania*   Welcome to North Ossetia (by Toma Kulayeva)*   Ossetian history and cultureEducation* North Ossetian State University* North Ossetian State Medical Academy* Higher Institute of Management*Institute of CivilizationMass media* Electronic version of the North Ossetia (Severnaya Osetiya) republican newspaper* North Ossetian information portal 15th Region (15y Region)Ossetia Barh-Alania - OsetiyaOsetija-Alanijadel Nord - AlniaOsetie-AlanieOssetiada:Nordossetiende:Nordossetien-Alanienet:Phja-Osseetia   - del Norte - Alaniaeo:Nord-OsetioOsetia-Alania-fo:Norurossetiafr:Osstie-du-Nord-AlanieOisit Thuaidh-An Alindo Norte-Alania -  -got:Alanja-Osetija-Alanijaio:Nord-OsetiaUtara-Alaniais:Norur-OssetaSettentrionale-Alania - yAmajyarugurulv:Ziemeosetija-AlnijaOsetijahu:szak-Osztia--Utara-Alania-nl:Noord-Ossetija:no:Nord-Ossetiann:Nord-OssetiaPnocnado Norte-Alnia de Nordd NordOssetia-AlaniaOsetskoOsetija-Alanija-Osetija-Alanijafi:Pohjois-Ossetia-Alaniasv:NordossetienOssetia-Alania-Osetya-AlanyaOssetia-AlaniaOssetia-Alaniazh:-
44731
Calcium_carbonate
RTECS  FF9335000|Section2  pKb  |Section3  |Section7  |Section8  }}Calcium carbonate is a compound with the formula CaCO3. It is a common substance found in rocks in all parts of the world, and is the main component of shells of marine organisms, snails, balls, pearls, and eggshells. Calcium carbonate is the active ingredient in lime, and is usually the principal cause of water. It is commonly used medicinally as a calcium supplement or as an antacid, but excessive consumption can be hazardous.Chemical propertiesCalcium carbonate shares the typical properties of other carbonates. Notably:*it reacts with strong acids, releasing carbon dioxide::CaCO3(s) + 2 HCl(aq)  CaCl2(aq) + CO2(g) + H2O(l)*it releases carbon dioxide on heating (to above 840 C in the case of CaCO3), to form oxide, commonly called quicklime, with reaction enthalpy 178 kJ / mole::CaCO3  CaO + CO2Calcium carbonate will react with water that is saturated with carbon dioxide to form the soluble bicarbonate.:CaCO3 + CO2 + H2O  Ca(HCO3)2This reaction is important in the erosion of rocks, forming caverns, and leads to hard water in many regions.PreparationThe vast majority of calcium carbonate used in industry is extracted by mining or quarrying. Pure calcium carbonate (e.g. for food or pharmaceutical use), can be produced from a pure quarried source (usually marble).Alternatively, calcium carbonate is prepared by calcining crude oxide. Water is added to give hydroxide, and dioxide is passed through this solution to precipitate the desired calcium carbonate, referred to in the industry as precipitated calcium carbonate (PCC):(): CaCO3  CaO + CO2: CaO + H2O  Ca(OH)2:Ca(OH)2 + CO2  CaCO3 + H2OOccurrenceCalcium carbonate is found naturally as the following minerals in the form of polymorphs:*Aragonite*Calcite*Vaterite or (-CaCO3)The trigonal crystal structure of calcite is most common. The calcium carbonate minerals occur in the following rocks:*Chalk*Limestone*Marble*TravertineGeologyCarbonate is found frequently in geologic settings and constitute an enormous carbon reservoir. Calcium carbonate occurs as the polymorphs aragonite and calcite. A polymorph is a mineral with the same chemical formula but different chemical structure. The carbonate minerals form the rock types: limestone, chalk, marble, travertine, tufa, and others. Calcite commonly occurs as sediments in marine settings. Calcite is typically found around the warm tropic environments. Calcite precipitates in warmer shallow environments more than it does under colder environments because warmer environments do not favor the dissolution of CO2. This is analogous to CO2 being dissolved in soda. When you take the cap off of a soda bottle, the CO2 rushes out. As the soda warms up, dioxide is released. This same principle can be applied to calcite in the ocean. Cold-water carbonates do exist at higher latitudes but have a very slow growth rate.In tropic settings, the waters are warm and clear. Corals are more abundant in this environment than towards the poles where the waters are cold. Calcium carbonate contributors, including plankton (such as coccoliths and planktic foraminifera), algae, sponges, brachiopods, echinoderms, bryozoa and mollusks, are typically found in shallow water environments where sunlight and filterable food are more abundant. The calcification processes are changed by the acidification.Where the oceanic crust is subducted under a plate sediments will be carried down to warmer zones in the astenosphere and mesosphere where the calcium carbonate is decomposed to dioxide which will give rise to explosive vulcanic eruptions.Carbonate compensation depthThe compensation depth (CCD) is the point in the ocean where the rate of precipitation of calcium carbonate is balanced by the rate of dissolution due to the conditions present. Deep in the ocean, the temperature drops and pressure increases. Calcium carbonate is unusual in that its solubility increases with decreasing temperature. Increasing pressure also increases the solubility of calcium carbonate. The CCD can range from 46 km below sea level.TaphonomyCalcium carbonate can preserve fossils through permineralization. Most of the vertebrate fossils of the Medicine Formation, known for its duck-billed dinosaur eggs, are preserved by CaCO3 permineralization.( This type of preservation preserves high levels of detail, even down to the microscopic level.( However, it also leaves specimens vulnerable to weathering when exposed to the surface.(Trexler, D., 2001, Two Medicine Formation, Montana: geology and fauna: In: Mesozoic Vertebrate Life, edited by Tanke, D. H., and Carpenter, K., Indiana University Press, pp. 298309. ISBN 0253339073)UsesIndustrial applicationsThe main use of calcium carbonate is in the construction industry, either as a building material or limestone aggregate for roadbuilding or as an ingredient of cement or as the starting material for the preparation of builders lime by burning in a kiln. However, due to weathering mainly caused by acid rain, calcium carbonate (in limestone form) is no longer used for building purposes on its own, and only as a raw/primary substance for building materials.Calcium carbonate is also used in the purification of iron from ore in a furnace. The carbonate is calcined in situ to give calcium oxide, which forms a slag with various impurities present, and separates from the purified iron.()In the industry, calcium carbonate is added to fluids as a formation-bridging and filtercake-sealing agent; it is also a weighting material which increases the density of drilling fluids to control the downhole pressure. Calcium carbonate is added to swimming pools, as a pH corrector for maintaining alkalinity and offsetting the acidic properties of the disinfectant agent. Calcium carbonate has traditionally been a major component of blackboard chalk. However, modern manufactured chalk is mostly gypsum, hydrated sulfate CaSO42H2O. Calcium carbonate is a main source for growing Seacrete, or Biorock. Precipitated calcium carbonate (PCC), pre-dispersed in slurry form, is a common filler material for latex gloves with the aim of achieving maximum saving in material and production costs.()Fine ground calcium carbonate (GCC) is an essential ingredient in the microporous film used in babies diapers and some building films as the pores are nucleated around the calcium carbonate particles during the manufacture of the film by biaxial stretching. GCC or PCC is used as a filler in paper because they are cheaper than wood fiber. Printing and writing paper can contain 1020% calcium carbonate. In North America, calcium carbonate has begun to replace kaolin in the production of glossy paper. Europe has been practicing this as alkaline papermaking or acid-free papermaking for some decades. PCC has a very fine and controlled particle size, on the order of 2 micrometres in diameter, useful in coatings for paper.Calcium carbonate is widely used as an extender in paints,() in particular matte emulsion paint where typically 30% by weight of the paint is either chalk or marble. It is also a popular filler in plastics.( Some typical examples include around 15 to 20% loading of chalk in unplasticized polyvinyl chloride (uPVC) drain pipe, 5 to 15% loading of stearate coated chalk or marble in uPVC window profile. PVC cables can use calcium carbonate at loadings of up to 70 phr (parts per hundred parts of resin) to improve mechanical properties (tensile strength and elongation) and electrical properties (volume resistivity). Polypropylene compounds are often filled with calcium carbonate to increase rigidity, a requirement that becomes important at high use temperatures.() It also routinely used as a filler in thermosetting resins (sheet and bulk molding compounds)( and has also been mixed with ABS, and other ingredients, to form some types of compression molded clay poker chips. Precipitated calcium carbonate, made by dropping oxide into water, is used by itself or with additives as a white paint, known as whitewashing.Calcium carbonate is added to a wide range of trade and it yourself adhesives, sealants, and decorating fillers.( Ceramic tile adhesives typically contain 70 to 80% limestone. Decorating crack fillers contain similar levels of marble or dolomite. It is also mixed with putty in setting glass windows, and as a resist to prevent glass from sticking to kiln shelves when firing glazes and paints at high temperature.In ceramics/glazing applications, calcium carbonate is known as whiting,( and is a common ingredient for many glazes in its white powdered form. When a glaze containing this material is fired in a kiln, the whiting acts as a flux material in the glaze. Ground calcium carbonate is an abrasive (both as scouring powder and as an ingredient of household scouring creams), in particular in its calcite form, which has the relatively low hardness level of 3 on the scale of mineral hardness, and will therefore not scratch glass and most other ceramics, enamel, bronze, iron, and steel, and have a moderate effect on softer metals like aluminium and copper.  A paste made from calcium carbonate and water can be used to clean tarnish on silver.()Health and dietary applicationsCalcium carbonate is widely used medicinally as an inexpensive dietary calcium supplement or gastric antacid.() It may be used as a binder for the treatment of hyperphosphatemia (primarily in patients with renal failure). It is also used in the pharmaceutical industry as an inert filler for tablets and other pharmaceuticals.()Calcium carbonate is known among IBS sufferers to help reduce diarrhea. Some individuals report being symptom-free since starting supplementation. The process in which calcium carbonate reduces diarrhea is by binding water in the bowel, which creates a stool that is firmer and better formed. Calcium carbonate supplements are often combined with magnesium in various proportions. This should be taken into account as magnesium is known to cause diarrhea.Calcium carbonate is used in the production of toothpaste and has seen a resurgence as a food preservative and color retainer, when used in or with products such as organic apples or food.(Food Additives  Names Starting with C) Excess calcium from supplements, fortified food and high-calcium diets, can cause the syndrome, which has serious toxicity and can be fatal. In 1915, Bertram Sippy introduced the Sippy regimen of hourly ingestion of milk and cream, and the gradual addition of eggs and cooked cereal, for 10 days, combined with alkaline powders, which provided symptomatic relief for peptic ulcer disease. Over the next several decades, the Sippy regimen resulted in renal failure, alkalosis, and hypercalcemia, mostly in men with peptic ulcer disease. These adverse effects were reversed when the regimen stopped, but it was fatal in some patients with protracted vomiting. Milk alkali syndrome declined in men after effective treatments for peptic ulcer disease arose. During the past 15 years, it has been reported in women taking calcium supplements above the recommended range of 1.2 to 1.5 g daily, for prevention and treatment of osteoporosis, and is exacerbated by dehydration. Calcium has been added to over-the-counter products, which contributes to inadvertent excessive intake. Excessive calcium intake can lead to hypercalcemia, complications of which include vomiting, abdominal pain and altered mental status.()As a additive it is designated E170.( 080419 food-info.net) It is used in some milk products as a source of dietary calcium; one study suggests that calcium carbonate might be as bioavailable as the calcium in cows milk.() Calcium carbonate is also used as a agent in many canned or bottled vegetable products.Environmental applicationsIn 1989, a researcher, Ken Simmons, introduced CaCO3 into the Brook in Massachusetts.() His hope was that the calcium carbonate would counter the acid in the stream from acid rain and save the trout that had ceased to spawn. Although his experiment was a success, it did increase the amounts of aluminium ions in the area of the brook that was not treated with the limestone. This shows that CaCO3 can be added to neutralize the effects of acid rain in river ecosystems. Currently calcium carbonate is used to neutralize acidic conditions in both soil and water.()() Since the 1970s, such liming has been practiced on a large scale in Sweden to mitigate acidification and several thousand lakes and streams are limed repeatedly.()Calcination equilibriumCalcination of limestone using charcoal fires to produce quicklime has been practiced since antiquity by cultures all over the world. The temperature at which limestone yields calcium oxide is usually given as 825 C, but stating an absolute threshold is misleading. Calcium carbonate exists in equilibrium with calcium oxide and carbon dioxide at any temperature. At each temperature there is a pressure of carbon dioxide that is in equilibrium with calcium carbonate. At room temperature the equilibrium overwhelmingly favors calcium carbonate, because the equilibrium CO2 pressure is only a tiny fraction of the partial CO2 pressure in air, which is about 0.035 kPa.At temperatures above 550 C the equilibrium CO2 pressure begins to exceed the CO2 pressure in air. So above 550 C, calcium carbonate begins to outgas CO2 into air. However, in a charcoal fired kiln, the concentration of CO2 will be much higher than it is in air. Indeed if all the oxygen in the kiln is consumed in the fire, then the partial pressure of CO2 in the kiln can be as high as 20 kPa.The table shows that this equilibrium pressure is not achieved until the temperature is nearly 800 C. For the outgassing of CO2 from calcium carbonate to happen at an economically useful rate, the equilibrium pressure must significantly exceed the ambient pressure of CO2. And for it to happen rapidly, the equilibrium pressure must exceed total atmospheric pressure of 101 kPa, which happens at 898 C.SolubilityWith varying CO2 pressure{| classwikitable border1 alignright!  colspan3|Calcium ion solubility as a function of CO2 pressure at 25 C (Ksp  4.47109)|-!\scriptstyle P_{\text{CO}_2} (atm)!pH!Ca2+ (mol/L)|-|1012 ||12.0||5.19  103|-|1010 ||11.3||1.12  103|-|108 ||10.7||2.55  104|-|106 ||9.83||1.20  104|-|104 ||8.62||3.16  104|-|3.5  104||8.27||4.70  104|-|103 ||7.96||6.62  104|-|102 ||7.30||1.42  103|-|101 ||6.63||3.05  103|-|1 ||5.96||6.58  103|-|10 ||5.30||1.42  102|}Calcium carbonate is poorly soluble in pure water (47 mg/L at normal atmospheric CO2 partial pressure as shown below). The equilibrium of its solution is given by the equation (with dissolved calcium carbonate on the right)::where the product for Ca2+CO32 is given as anywhere from Ksp  3.7109 to Ksp  8.7109 at 25 C, depending upon the data source.(() What the equation means is that the product of molar concentration of calcium ions (moles of dissolved Ca2+ per liter of solution) with the molar concentration of dissolved CO32 cannot exceed the value of Ksp. This seemingly simple solubility equation, however, must be taken along with the more complicated equilibrium of dioxide with water (see acid). Some of the CO32 combines with H+ in the solution according to::HCO3 is known as the bicarbonate ion. bicarbonate is many times more soluble in water than calcium carbonateindeed it exists only in solution.Some of the HCO3 combines with H+ in solution according to::Some of the H2CO3 breaks up into water and dissolved carbon dioxide according to::And dissolved carbon dioxide is in equilibrium with atmospheric carbon dioxide according to::{| width500| width45% |\frac{P_{\text{CO}_2}}{\text{CO}_2}\ \ k_\text{H}| where kH  29.76 atm/(mol/L) at 25 C (Henry constant), \scriptstyle P_{\text{CO}_2} being the CO2 partial pressure.|}For ambient air, \scriptstyle P_{\text{CO}_2} is around 3.5104 atmospheres (or equivalently 35 Pa). The last equation above fixes the concentration of dissolved CO2 as a function of \scriptstyle P_{\text{CO}_2}, independent of the concentration of dissolved CaCO3. At atmospheric partial pressure of CO2, dissolved CO2 concentration is 1.2105 moles/liter. The equation before that fixes the concentration of H2CO3 as a function of CO2. For CO21.2105, it results in H2CO32.0108 moles per liter. When H2CO3 is known, the remaining three equations together with:(which is true for all aqueous solutions), and the fact that the solution must be electrically neutral,:2Ca2+ + H+  HCO3 + 2CO32 + OHmake it possible to solve simultaneously for the remaining five unknown concentrations (note that the above form of the neutrality equation is valid only if calcium carbonate has been put in contact with pure water or with a neutral pH solution; in the case where the origin water solvent pH is not neutral, the equation is modified).File:CanarySpring.jpg|thumb|right|Travertine calcium carbonate deposits from a springThe table on the right shows the result for Ca2+ and H+ (in the form of pH) as a function of ambient partial pressure of CO2 (Ksp  4.47109 has been taken for the calculation). *At atmospheric levels of ambient CO2 the table indicates the solution will be slightly alkaline with a maximum CaCO3 solubility of 47 mg/L.*As ambient CO2 partial pressure is reduced below atmospheric levels, the solution becomes more and more alkaline. At extremely low \scriptstyle P_{\text{CO}_2}, dissolved CO2, bicarbonate ion, and carbonate ion largely evaporate from the solution, leaving a highly alkaline solution of hydroxide, which is more soluble than CaCO3. Note that for \scriptstyle P_{\text{CO}_2}  1012 atm, the Ca2+OH2 product is still below the solubility product of Ca(OH)2 (8106). For still lower CO2 pressure, Ca(OH)2 precipitation will occur before CaCO3 precipitation.*As ambient CO2 partial pressure increases to levels above atmospheric, pH drops, and much of the carbonate ion is converted to bicarbonate ion, which results in higher solubility of Ca2+.The effect of the latter is especially evident in day-to-day life of people who have hard water. Water in aquifers underground can be exposed to levels of CO2 much higher than atmospheric. As such water percolates through calcium carbonate rock, the CaCO3 dissolves according to the second trend. When that same water then emerges from the tap, in time it comes into equilibrium with CO2 levels in the air by outgassing its excess CO2. The calcium carbonate becomes less soluble as a result and the excess precipitates as lime scale. This same process is responsible for the formation of stalactites and stalagmites in limestone caves.Two hydrated phases of calcium carbonate, monohydrocalcite, CaCO3H2O and ikaite, CaCO36H2O, may precipitate from water at ambient conditions and persist as metastable phases.With varying pHConsider the problem of the maximum solubility of calcium carbonate in normal atmospheric conditions (\scriptstyle P_{\mathrm{CO}_2}  3.5  104 atm) when the pH of the solution is adjusted. This is for example the case in a swimming pool where the pH is maintained between 7 and 8 (by addition of bisulfate NaHSO4 to decrease the pH or of bicarbonate NaHCO3 to increase it). From the above equations for the solubility product, the hydration reaction and the two acid reactions, the following expression for the maximum Ca2+ can be easily deduced::\text{Ca}^{2+}_\text{max}  \frac{K_\text{sp}} {K_\text{h}K_\text{a1}K_\text{a2}k_\text{H}} \frac{\text{H}^+^2}{P_{\text{CO}_2}}showing a quadratic dependence in H+. The numerical application with the above values of the constants gives{| border1 cellspacing0 cellpadding4 stylemargin: 0 0 0 0.5em; background: {}; border-collapse: collapse; border-color: {};|-| width170 aligncenter |pH|7.0|7.2|7.4|7.6|7.8|8.0|8.2|8.27|8.4|-| width170 aligncenter |Ca2+max (106mol/L)|180|71.7|28.5|11.4|4.52|1.80|0.717|0.519|0.285|-| width170 aligncenter|Ca2+max (mg/L)|7.21|2.87|1.14|0.455|0.181|0.0721|0.0287|0.0208|0.0114|}Comments:*decreasing the pH from 8 to 7 increases the maximum Ca2+ concentration by a factor 100. Water with a pH maintained to 7 can dissolve up to 15.9 mg/L of CaCO3. This explains the high Ca2+ concentration in some mineral waters with pH close to 7.*note that the Ca2+ concentration of the previous table is recovered for pH  8.27*keeping the pH to 7.4 in a swimming pool (which gives optimum HClO/ClO ratio in the case of chlorine maintenance) results in a maximum Ca2+ concentration of 1010 mg/L. This means that successive cycles of water evaporation and partial renewing may result in a very water before CaCO3 precipitates (water with a Ca2+ concentration above 120 mg/L is considered very hard). Addition of a calcium sequestering agent or complete renewing of the water will solve the problem.Solubility in a strong or weak acid solutionSolutions of strong (HCl), moderately strong (sulfamic) or weak (acetic, citric, sorbic, lactic, phosphoric) acids are commercially available. They are commonly used as agents to remove limescale deposits. The maximum amount of CaCO3 that can be dissolved by one liter of an acid solution can be calculated using the above equilibrium equations.*In the case of a strong monoacid with decreasing acid concentration A  A, we obtain (with CaCO3 molar mass  100 g):{| border1 cellspacing0 cellpadding4 stylemargin: 0 0 0 0.5em; background: {}; border-collapse: collapse; border-color: {};|-|width160  |A (mol/L)|1|101|102|103|104|105|106|107|1010|-|width160  |Initial pH|0.00||1.00||2.00||3.00||4.00||5.00||6.00||6.79||7.00|-|width160  |Final pH|6.75||7.25||7.75||8.14||8.25||8.26||8.26||8.26||8.27|-|width160  |Dissolved CaCO3 (g per liter of acid)|50.0||5.00||0.514||0.0849||0.0504||0.0474||0.0471||0.0470||0.0470|}where the initial state is the acid solution with no Ca2+ (not taking into account possible CO2 dissolution) and the final state is the solution with saturated Ca2+. For strong acid concentrations, all species have a negligible concentration in the final state with respect to Ca2+ and A so that the neutrality equation reduces approximately to 2Ca2+  A yielding \scriptstyle\mathrm{Ca}^{2+} \simeq \frac{\mathrm{A}^-}{2}. When the concentration decreases, HCO3 becomes non-negligible so that the preceding expression is no longer valid. For vanishing acid concentrations, one can recover the final pH and the solubility of CaCO3 in pure water.*In the case of a weak monoacid (here we take acetic acid with pKA  4.76) with decreasing total acid concentration A  A+AH, we obtain:{| border1 cellspacing0 cellpadding4 stylemargin: 0 0 0 0.5em; background: {}; border-collapse: collapse; border-color: {};|-|width160  |A (mol/L)|1|101|102|103|104|105|106|107|1010|-|width160  |Initial pH|2.38||2.88||3.39||3.91||4.47||5.15||6.02||6.79||7.00|-|width160  |Final pH|6.75||7.25||7.75||8.14||8.25||8.26||8.26||8.26||8.27|-|width160  |Dissolved CaCO3 (g per liter of acid)|49.5||4.99||0.513||0.0848||0.0504||0.0474||0.0471||0.0470||0.0470|}For the same total acid concentration, the initial pH of the weak acid is less acid than the one of the strong acid; however, the maximum amount of CaCO3 which can be dissolved is approximately the same. This is because in the final state, the pH is larger than the pKA, so that the weak acid is almost completely dissociated, yielding in the end as many H+ ions as the strong acid to dissolve the calcium carbonate.*The calculation in the case of acid (which is the most widely used for domestic applications) is more complicated since the concentrations of the four dissociation states corresponding to this acid must be calculated together with HCO3, CO32, Ca2+, H+ and OH. The system may be reduced to a seventh degree equation for H+ the numerical solution of which gives{| border1 cellspacing0 cellpadding4 stylemargin: 0 0 0 0.5em; background: {}; border-collapse: collapse; border-color: {};|-|width160  |A (mol/L)|1|101|102|103|104|105|106|107|1010|-|width160  |Initial pH|1.08||1.62||2.25||3.05||4.01||5.00||5.97||6.74||7.00|-|width160  |Final pH|6.71||7.17||7.63||8.06||8.24||8.26||8.26||8.26||8.27|-|width160  |Dissolved CaCO3 (g per liter of acid)|62.0||7.39||0.874||0.123||0.0536||0.0477||0.0471||0.0471||0.0470|}where A  H3PO4 + H2PO4 + HPO42 + PO43 is the total acid concentration. Thus phosphoric acid is more efficient than a monoacid since at the final almost neutral pH, the second dissociated state concentration HPO42 is not negligible (see phosphoric acid).See also*Cuttlebone*Cuttlefish*Gesso*Limescale*Marble*acidificationReferencesExternal links***codes:  and *The British Calcium Carbonate Association  What is calcium carbonatebn:bs:Kalcij-karbonatde calcivpenatda:Calciumcarbonatde:Calciumcarbonatet:Kaltsiumkarbonaatde calciokarbonatokarbonatode calciumde calciodi calciokarbontskarbonatashu:Kalcium-karbontnl:Calciumcarbonaatja:no:Kalsiumkarbonatnn:Kalsiumkarbonatwapniade clciode calciucarbonatevpenatkarbonatfi:Kalsiumkarbonaattisv:Kalciumkarbonatth:karbonatcacbonatzh:
45411
Winfield_Scott_Stratton
death_placeSprings, ColoradoWinfield Scott Stratton (July 22, 1848 - September 14, 1902) American prospector, capitalist, and philanthropist. He discovered the Independence Lode near Colorado on July 4, 1891, one of the richest gold mines ever located on earth, and became the Cripple Creek districts first millionaire in 1894.BiographyBorn in Indiana, Stratton arrived in the Springs, Colorado area in 1868 and worked as a carpenter. He descends from the Windsor, Conn. line of the Stratton family.(Stratton, Harriet Russell. A Book of Strattons: A Collection of the Records of the Descendents of the Early Colonial Strattons in America from the Fifth Generation to the Present Day. New York: Frederick H. Hitchcock, Genealogical Publishers, 1918. Vol. II, Pp. 321  340.) His marriage to Zura V. Stewart, in June 1876, ended shortly after the wedding when Stratton declared that he was not responsible for his wifes pregnancy, and sent her back to her parents. He set out following the gold and silver rushes in Colorado, but without success. On hearing word of gold on the south slope of Pikes Peak he made his big strike on July 4, 1891, near the present town of Colorado, in the Cripple Creek mining district.Stratton had a hard time getting started developing Independence mine, but once going, it was like an underground bank. Not only was Stratton rich, he was generous. After the Cripple Creek fire of 1896, Stratton paid for food and shelter for the thousands left homeless by the fire. He wrote a check for $5,000 to  Crazy Bob Womack, the prospector who first discovered gold at Cripple, but was down on his luck. He gave $15,000 to A. W. Tabor when Tabor was broke.  However, he tired of having people pester him for money, and he became reclusive and eccentric.  He drank and read a great deal, but almost never had guests or went out socially.In 1900, Stratton sold the Independence Mine to the Venture Corporation of London for $10 million.  The Venture Corporation incorporated the property as Strattons Independence Ltd. and sold shares on the London stock exchange. The ore reserves were discovered to be less than previously thought in late 1900, and the share price crashed. Venture Corporation later sued the Stratton estate, claiming that the mine had been salted, but lost in the U. S. courts.LegacyFile:NWalkerStratton2.jpg|thumb|188px|right|Winfield Scott Stratton Monument by Walker When Winfield Scott Stratton died on 14 September 1902, he left the bulk of his estate for the establishment of the Myron Stratton Home, for the aged poor and dependent children; named for his father Myron Stratton.(Stratton, Harriet Russell. A Book of Strattons: A Collection of the Records of the Descendents of the Early Colonial Strattons in America from the Fifth Generation to the Present Day. New York: Frederick H. Hitchcock, Genealogical Publishers, 1918. Vol. II, Pp. 325  326.) This bequest was not popular with many.  After extended litigation from many, including his son, the Venture Corporation, and thirteen women who claimed to have been secretly married to Stratton, only 6 million was finally available; but the home was established successfully in 1913.Strattons other legacies include the Colorado Springs & Interurban Railway, a trolley system connecting Colorado Springs and Manitou Springs; the ground on which the current Colorado Springs City Hall stands on; and money to complete the Short Line railroad.A bronze statue of Stratton by Walker was placed on the grounds of his estate in 1909.  The sculptor of the work ended up living at the Myron Stratton Home for the last years of her life.  Another casting of Walkers statue of Stratton stands in downtown Colorado Springs.Stratton was inducted into the Mining Hall of Fame.(http://www.mininghalloffame.org/inductee.asp?i54&binductees%2Easp&tn&pS&s)Places named after Stratton include:*Stratton Park, Colorado Springs.*Stratton Hall at School of Mines, completed in 1904, was named after Stratton, who gave the school its first philanthropic gift of $25,000. He had been appointed as a CSM trustee in 1899 and was elected president of the board in 1901.()*Stratton Spring; a mineral spring drilled to a depth of 283 feet completed February 21, 1936 at the loop where the trolleys turned around at 955 Manitou Avenue in Manitou Springs, Colorado.*Winfield Scott Stratton Post Office in Colorado Springs; named by an act of Congress in 1995; Stratton had sold the land the post office was built on to the federal government at a fraction of its value with the understanding that it would be used for the post office.*Stratton Elementary School in Colorado Springs.ReferencesFurther reading****External links*Mining Hall of Fame bio*ColoradoVacation Biography*Myron Stratton Home Website* 
46126
Sulfur_mustard
 SMILES  ClCCSCCCl| Section2  | Section7  | Section8   }}The sulfur mustards, or sulphur mustards,(Mustard Gas (Sulphur Mustard) (IARC Summary & Evaluation, Supplement7, 1987). Inchem.org (1998-02-09). Retrieved on 2011-05-29.) commonly known as mustard gas, are a class of related cytotoxic, vesicant warfare agents with the ability to form large blisters on exposed skin. Pure sulfur mustards are colorless, viscous liquids at room temperature. However, when used in impure form, such as warfare agents, they are usually yellow-brown in color and have an odor resembling plants, garlic or horseradish, hence the name. Mustard gas was originally assigned the name LOST, after the scientists Lommel and Steinkopf, who developed a method for the large-scale production of the agent for the German Army in 1916.()Mustard agents are regulated under the 1993 Weapons Convention (CWC). Three classes of chemicals are monitored under this Convention, with sulfur and nitrogen mustard grouped in Schedule 1, as substances with no use other than warfare. Mustard agents can be deployed on the battlefield via spraying from aircraft, or more typically by means of air-dropped bombs or shells.SynthesisSulfur mustard is the compound described with the formula (Cl-CH2CH2)2S. In the Depretz method, sulfur mustard is synthesized by treating dichloride with ethylene::SCl2 + 2 C2H4  (Cl-CH2CH2)2SIn the Meyer method, thiodiglycol is produced from chloroethanol and sulfide and chlorinated with trichloride:():3 (HO-CH2CH2)2S + 2 PCl3  3 (Cl-CH2CH2)2S + 2 P(OH)3In the Meyer-Clarke method, concentrated acid (HCl) instead of PCl3 is used as the chlorinating agent::(HO-CH2CH2)2S + 2 HCl  (Cl-CH2CH2)2S + 2 H2Ochloride and phosgene have also been used as chlorinating agents.It is a viscous liquid at normal temperatures. The pure compound has a melting point of 14 C (57 F) and decomposes before boiling at 218 C (424.4 F).Mechanism of toxicityThe compound readily eliminates a chloride ion by intramolecular substitution to form a cyclic sulfonium ion. This very reactive intermediate tends to permanently alkylate the guanine nucleotide in DNA strands, which prevents cellular division and generally leads directly to programmed cell death,(Mustard agents: description, physical and chemical properties, mechanism of action, symptoms, antidotes and methods of treatment. Organisation for the Prohibition of Chemical Weapons. Accessed June 8, 2010.) or, if cell death is not immediate, the damaged DNA may lead to the development of cancer.( Sulfur mustard is not very soluble in water but is very soluble in fat, contributing to its rapid absorption into the skin.(:400pxIn the wider sense, compounds with the structural element BCH2CH2X, where X is any group and B is a base are known as mustards. Such compounds can form cyclic onium ions (sulfonium, ammoniums, etc.) that are good agents. Examples are bis(2-chloroethyl)ether, the (2-haloethyl)amines (mustards), and sulfur sesquimustard, which has two -chloroethyl thioether groups (ClH2C-CH2-S-) connected by an ethylene (-CH2CH2-) group. These compounds have a similar ability to alkylate DNA, but their physical properties, e.g. melting point, vary.Physiological effectsImage:mustard gas burns.jpg|thumb||left|Soldier with moderate mustard gas burns sustained during War I showing characteristic bullae on neck, armpit and handsMustard gas has extremely powerful vesicant effects on its victims. In addition, it is strongly mutagenic and carcinogenic, due to its alkylating properties. It is also lipophilic. Because people exposed to mustard gas rarely suffer immediate symptoms, and mustard-contaminated areas may appear completely normal, victims can unknowingly receive high dosages. However, within 24 hours of exposure to mustard agent, victims experience intense itching and skin irritation, which gradually turns into large blisters filled with yellow fluid wherever the mustard agent contacted the skin. These are burns and are very debilitating. Mustard gas vapour easily penetrates clothing fabrics such as wool or cotton, so it is not only the exposed skin of victims that gets burned. If the victims eyes were exposed then they become sore, starting with conjunctivitis, after which the eyelids swell, resulting in temporary blindness. According to the Medical Management of Chemical Casualties handbook, there have been experimental cases in humans where the patient has suffered miosis, or pinpointing of pupils, as a result of the cholinomimetic activity of mustard. At very high concentrations, if inhaled, mustard agent causes bleeding and blistering within the system, damaging membranes and causing edema. Depending on the level of contamination, mustard gas burns can vary between first and degree burns, though they can also be every bit as severe, disfiguring and dangerous as degree burns.(Effects of mustard gas, WW1|Gas Warfare Medical Aspects|World War II Resource Centre. Vlib.us (2004-08-23). Retrieved on 2011-05-29.) Severe mustard gas burns (i.e. where more than 50% of the victims skin has been burned) are often fatal, with death occurring after some days or even weeks have passed. Mild or moderate exposure to mustard agent is unlikely to kill, though victims invariably require lengthy periods of medical treatment and convalescence before recovery is complete. The mutagenic and carcinogenic effects of mustard agent mean that victims who recover from mustard gas burns have an increased risk of developing cancer in later life.Image:blister-arm.jpg|right|thumb|Typical appearance of bullae on arm caused by agent burnsSkin damage can be reduced if povidone-iodine, (Betadine), in a base of glycofurol( ) is rapidly applied, but since mustard agent initially has no symptoms, exposure is usually not recognised until skin irritation begins, at which point it is too late for countermeasures. The vesicant property of mustard gas can be neutralised by oxidation or chlorination, using household bleach (hypochlorite), or by nucleophilic attack using e.g. decontamination solution DS2 (2% NaOH, 70% diethylenetriamine, 28% glycol monomethyl ether) can be used. After initial decontamination of the victims wounds is complete, medical treatment is similar to that required by any conventional burn. The amount of pain and discomfort suffered by the victim is comparable as well. Mustard gas burns heal slowly, and, as with other types of burn, there is a risk of sepsis caused by pathogens such as aureus and aeruginosa.A British nurse treating soldiers with mustard gas burns during War I commented:They cannot be bandaged or touched. We cover them with a tent of propped-up sheets. Gas burns must be agonising because usually the other cases do not complain, even with the worst wounds, but gas cases are invariably beyond endurance and they cannot help crying out.()FormulationsIn its history, various types and mixtures of sulfur mustard have been employed. These include:* H  Also known as HS (Hun Stuff) or Levinstein mustard. This is named after the inventor of the quick but dirty Levinstein Process for manufacture,()() reacting dry ethylene with sulfur monochloride under controlled conditions. Undistilled sulfur mustard contains 2030% impurities, for which reason it does not store as well as HD. Also, as it decomposes, it increases in pressure, making the munition it is contained in likely to split, especially along a seam, thus releasing the agent to the atmosphere(* HD  Codenamed Pyro by the British, and Distilled Mustard by the US.( Distilled sulfur mustard (bis(2-chloroethyl) sulfide); approximately 96% pure. The term mustard gas usually refers to this variety of sulfur mustard. A much-used path of synthesis was based upon the reaction of thiodiglycol with acid.* HT  Codenamed Runcol by the British, and Mustard T- mixture by the US.( A mixture of 60% sulfur mustard (HD) and 40% T (bis2-(2-chloroethylthio)ethyl ether), a related vesicant with lower point, lower volatility and similar vesicant characteristics).* HL  A blend of distilled mustard (HD) and Lewisite (L), originally intended for use in winter conditions due to its lower freezing point compared to the pure substances. The Lewisite component of HL was used as a form of antifreeze.(The Emergency Response Safety and Health Database: MUSTARD-LEWISITE MIXTURE (HL). National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health. Accessed March 19, 2009.)* HQ  A blend of distilled mustard (HD) and sesquimustard (Q) (Gates and Moore 1946).Sulfur mustard agents (class)The complete list of effective sulfur mustard agents commonly stock-piled is as follows:HistoryDevelopmentMustard gas was possibly developed as early as 1822 by Despretz (17981863).(By Any Other Name: Origins of Mustard Gas. Itech.dickinson.edu (2008-04-25). Retrieved on 2011-05-29.) Despretez described the reaction of dichloride and ethylene but never made mention of any irritating properties of the reaction product, which makes the claim doubtful. In 1854, another French chemist Riche (18291908) repeated the procedure but did not describe any adverse physiological properties. In 1860, Guthrie synthesized and characterized the compound, and he also noted its irritating properties, especially in tasting.() In 1886, chemist Albert Niemann, known as a pioneer in cocaine chemistry, repeated the reaction, but, this time, blister-forming properties were recorded. In 1886, Meyer published a paper describing a synthesis that produced good yields. He reacted 2-chloroethanol with aqueous sulfide and treated the resulting thiodiglycol with trichloride. The purity of this compound was much higher and the adverse health effects on exposure, as a consequence, much more severe. These symptoms presented themselves in an assistant, and, in order to rule out that the assistant was suffering from a mental illness (psychosomatic symptoms), Meyer had the compound tested on rabbits, which then died. In 1913, English chemist Thacher Clarke (of Eschweiler-Clarke fame) replaced phosphorus trichloride with acid in Meyers recipe while working with Emil Fischer in Berlin. Clarke was hospitalized for 2 months for burns after a flask broke, and, according to him, Fischers subsequent report on this incident to the Chemical Society set Germany on the chemical weapons track.( Mustard gas can have the problem of turning a patients skin a different colour, including red, orange, pink, and in rare cases, blue.) Germany in War I relied on the Meyer-Clarke method with a 2-chloroethanol infrastructure already in place in the dye industry of that time.UseImage:155mmMustardGasShells.jpg|thumb|Pallets of 155 mm shells containing HD (distilled sulfur mustard agent) at Pueblo chemical weapons storage facility. Note the highly distinctive color coding scheme on each shellMustard gas was first used effectively in World War I by the German army against British soldiers near Ypres in 1917 and later also against the Second Army. The name Yperite comes from its usage by the German army near the city of Ypres. The Allies did not use the gas until November 1917 at Cambrai, after they captured a large stock of German mustard-filled shells. It took the British over a year to develop their own mustard gas weapon (their only option was the DespretzNiemannGuthrie process), first using it in September 1918 during the breaking of the Line.Mustard gas was dispersed as an aerosol in a mixture with other chemicals, giving it a yellow-brown color and a distinctive odour. Mustard gas has also been dispersed in such munitions as bombs, mines, mortar rounds, shells, and rockets.( Mustard gas was lethal in only about 1% of cases; its effectiveness was as an agent. Countermeasures against the gas were relatively ineffective, since a soldier wearing a mask was not protected against absorbing it through the skin.Furthermore, mustard gas was a persistent agent which would remain in the environment for days and continue to cause sickness. If mustard gas contaminated a soldiers clothing and equipment, then other soldiers he came into contact with would also be poisoned. Towards the end of the war it was even used in high concentrations as an area-denial weapon, which often forced soldiers to abandon heavily contaminated positions.Since then, mustard gas has also been reportedly used in several wars, often where those it is used against cannot retaliate:(Blister Agent: Sulfur Mustard (H, HD, HS), CBWinfo.com)* Kingdom against the Army in 1919()* Spain and France against Rif insurgents in Morocco in 19211927(()* Italy in Libya in 1930(* Union in Xinjiang, of China during the Invasion of Xinjiang against the Division (National Revolutionary Army) in 1934 and in the War (1937) in 19361937((* Italy against Abyssinia (now Ethiopia) from 1935 to 1940(* Germany against Poland and the Soviet Union in a few incidents during the World War(* Poland against Germany in 1939 during an isolated incident, British product(* Japan against China in 19371945(* Egypt against Yemen in 19631967(* Iraq against Iran and Kurds in 19831988(()* Possibly Sudan against insurgents in the civil war, in 1995 and 1997(In 1943, during the Second World War, a U.S. stockpile exploded aboard a supply ship that was bombed in an air raid in the harbor of Bari, Italy, eventually killing 83 of the 628 hospitalized military victims who were exposed to the mustard gas.() The deaths and incident were partially classified for many years. From 1943 to 1944, mustard gas experiments were performed on Australian Army volunteers in tropical Queensland by British and U.S. Army experimenters, resulting in severe injuries. One test site, Brook Island, was chosen to simulate Japanese-held Pacific islands.()(Brook Island Trials of Mustard Gas during WW2. Home.st.net.au. Retrieved on 2011-05-29.)The use of poison gas, including mustard gas, during warfare, a practice known as warfare, was prohibited by the Geneva Protocol of 1925 and the subsequent Chemical Weapons Convention of 1993, which also prohibits the development, production and stockpiling of such weapons.Development of the First Chemotherapy DrugAs early as 1919 it was known that mustard gas was a suppressor of hematopoiesis.() Additionally, autopsies on 75 soldiers who had died of mustard gas in War II were done by researchers from the University of Pennsylvania who reported decreased white blood cell counts.( This led to the USs Office of Scientific Research and Development (OSRD) to fund Yale University to conduct research on the chemical warfare agents during World War II.(() As a part of this effort, the group investigated mustard as a therapy for lymphoma and other types of lymphoma and leukemia and the compound was tried on its first human patient in December of 1942. The results of this study werent published until 1946 after being declassified.( In a parallel track, after the Raid on Bari in December 1943, the Armys doctors noted that white blood cell counts were reduced in exposed patients. Because the fact that the  Allies had chemical munitions in the area was potentially embarrassing, the incident was classified until after the war was over. After World War II was over the Bari incident and the Yale groups work with mustard eventually converged prompting a search for other similar compounds. Due to its use in previous studies, the nitrogen mustard known as HN2 became the first chemotherapy drug mustine.DisposalMost of the sulfur mustard found in Germany after World War II was dumped into the Sea. Between 1966 and 2002, fishermen have found around 700 chemical weapons in the Bornholm region, most of which contained sulfur mustard. One of the more frequently dumped weapons was the Sprhbchse 37 (SprB37, Spray Can 37, 1937 being the year of its fielding with the German Army). These weapons contain sulfur mustard mixed with a thickener, which renders it a tarlike viscosity. When the content of the SprB37 comes in contact with water, only the sulfur mustard in the outer layers of the lumps of viscous mustard hydrolyses, leaving amber-coloured residues that still contain most of the active sulfur mustard. On mechanically breaking these lumps, e.g., with a fishing nets drag board or with the hands, the enclosed sulfur mustard is still as active as it had been at the time the weapon was dumped. These lumps, when washed ashore, can be mistaken for amber, which can lead to severe health problems. Shells containing sulfur mustard and other toxic ammunition from World War I (as well as conventional explosives) can still occasionally be found in France and Belgium; they used to be disposed of by explosion at sea, but current environmental regulations prohibit this and so the French government is building an automated factory to dispose of the backlog of shells.In 1972, the States Congress banned the practice of disposing chemical weapons into the ocean. However, 64 million pounds of nerve and mustard agents had already been dumped into the ocean waters off the United States by the Army. According to a 1998 report created by William Brankowitz, a deputy project manager in the Army Chemical Materials Agency, the Army created at least 26 chemical weapons dump sites in the ocean off at least 11 states on both the west and east coasts (CHASE, Geranium, etc.). Additionally because of poor records, they currently only know the rough whereabouts of half of them.A significant portion of the stockpile of mustard agent in the United States was stored at the Edgewood Area of Proving Ground in Maryland. Approximately 1,621 short tons of mustard agent was stored in one-ton (907.2 kg) containers on the base under heavy guard. A disposal plant built on site neutralized the last of this stockpile in February 2005. This stockpile had priority because of the potential for quick reduction of risk to the community. The closest schools were fitted with overpressurization units to protect the students and staff in the event of a catastrophic explosion and fire at the site. These projects, as well as planning, equipment, and training assistance, were provided to the surrounding community as a part of the Chemical Stockpile Emergency Preparedness Program (CSEPP), a joint US Army and Emergency Management Agency program.() Unexploded shells containing mustard agent and other chemical agents are still present in several test ranges in proximity to Edgewood area schools, but the smaller amounts (414 pounds; 26 kg) present considerably less risk. They are being systematically detected and excavated for disposal. There are several other sites in the United States where the remaining U.S. stockpiles of chemical agents are awaiting destruction in compliance with international chemical weapons treaties; the largest mustard agent stockpile, approximately 6,196 short tons, was stored at the Chemical Depot in Utah. Destruction of this stockpile began in 2006. As of May 2011, the last ton container of mustard agent was destroyed at the Utah site and none remains.  U.S. mustard agent and other chemical agent storage is managed by the US Armys Chemical Materials Agency.(cma.army.mil) The Chemical Materials Agency (CMA) manages disposal operations at five of the remaining seven stockpile sites, located in Alabama, Arkansas, Indiana, Utah, and Oregon; disposal projects at the other two sites, located in Kentucky and Colorado, are managed by the U.S. Army Element, Assembled Chemical Weapons Alternatives (ACWA).(pmacwa.army.mil)In 2008, many mustard gas bombs (empty) were recovered in an excavation at the Army Base west of Australia.()(Chemical Warfare in Australia. Mustardgas.org. Retrieved on 2011-05-29.) In 2009, a mining survey near Chinchilla, Queensland uncovered 144 105mm Howitzer shells, some containing Mustard H, buried by the US Army during World War II.(() In 2010, a clamming vessel pulled up World War I munition shells from the waters south of Long Island. Multiple crewmembers became symptomatic with skin blistering and respiratory irritation severe enough to require hospitalization. This was the first instance of occupational non-military mustard gas exposure in the United States.()A large British stockpile of mustard gas that had been manufactured and stored at Rhydymwyn, Wales, since the war was destroyed in 1958.()Detection in biological fluidsUrinary concentrations of the thiodiglycol hydrolysis products of sulfur mustard have been used to confirm a diagnosis of chemical poisoning in hospitalized victims. The presence in urine of 1,1-sulfonylbismethylthioethane (SBMTE), a conjugation product with glutathione, is considered a more specific marker, since this metabolite is not found in specimens from unexposed persons. Intact sulfur mustard was detected in postmortem fluids and tissues of a man who died one week post-exposure.(R. Baselt, Disposition of Toxic Drugs and Chemicals in Man, 8th edition, Biomedical Publications, Foster City, CA, 2008, pp. 14631465.)See also*agent*warfare*gas*Lewisite*Mustard Gas Manufacture in UK*mustard*oxime*gas in World War I*Cross (chemical warfare)ReferencesExternal links* Textbook of Military Medicine  Intensive overview of mustard gas Includes many references to scientific literature*Detailed information on physical effects and suggested treatments* Shows photographs taken in 1996 showing people with mustard gas burns.* An overview of the sulfur and nitrogen mustard agents (Caution: contains graphic images)* Questions and Answers for Mustard Gas* UMDNJ-Rutgers University CounterACT Research Center of Excellence A research center studying sulfur mustard, includes searchable reference library with many early references on sulfur mustard.*Treatment of Mustard Gas Burns  published in the BMJ in 1946* Nightmare in Bari* surgical treatment of Sulfur Mustard Burnsaf:Yperietbe-x-old:br:Iperitbg:cs:Yperitda:Sennepsgasde:Senfgaset:Ipriitmostazaeo:Iperitomoutardemostazaid:Yperitit:Ipritekk:la:Yperitumlv:Iprtslt:Ipritasnl:Mosterdgasja:no:Sennepsgasssiarkowymostardaro:Iperitru:mustardsk:Yperitsl:Iperitfi:Sinappikaasusv:Senapsgasgazuk:hunh m ttvls:Yperietzh:
46793
Death_Valley_National_Park
 governing_body  Park Service thumb|290px|right|upright|Map of the park showing old Monument land (light green) and the expanded Park land (dark green)Death Valley National Park is a park in the U.S. states of California and Nevada located east of the Sierra Nevada in the arid Basin of the United States. The park protects the northwest corner of the Desert and contains a diverse desert environment of salt-flats, sand dunes, badlands, valleys, canyons, and mountains. It is the largest national park in the lower 48 states and has been declared an Biosphere Reserve. Death Valley National Park is visited annually by more than 825,000 visitors who come to see its diverse geologic features, desert wildlife, historic sites, scenery, and clear night skies.(It is the hottest and driest of the national parks in the United States. The second-lowest point in the Hemisphere is in Basin, which is  below sea level. The park is home to many species of plants and animals that have adapted to this harsh desert environment. Some examples include creosote bush, Sheep, Coyote, and the Valley Pupfish, a survivor of much wetter times. The park covers an area of  of which  is federal land.( Approximately 95% of the park is a designated wilderness area,(NPS website, Backcountry Roads) which covers , making it the largest in the contiguous 48 states, and the sixth largest in the United States overall. A series of Native American groups inhabited the area from as early as 7000 BCE, most recently the Timbisha around 1000 AD who migrated between winter camps in the valleys and summer grounds in the high mountain ridges. The first documented non-Native Americans to enter Death Valley did so in the winter of 1849 looking for a shortcut to the gold fields of California. They were stuck for weeks and in the process gave the valley its name, even though only one of their group actually died there.Mining was the primary activity in the area before it was protected. Several short-lived boom towns sprang up during the late 19th and early 20th centuries to exploit minor local bonanzas of gold. The only long-term profitable ore to be mined, however, was borax, a mineral used to make soap and an important industrial compound. Today, borax is an essential component of high-temperature resistant boro-silicate glass products, for example some Pyrex glass products. Twenty-mule teams were used to transport ore out of the valley; helping to make it famous and the subject of books, radio programs, television series, and movies.Tourism blossomed in the 1920s, when resorts were built around waters sources at Stovepipe Wells and Furnace Creek. Pacific Coast Borax, a major landowner, and others like Valley Scotty promoted the region. Death Valley National Monument was declared a National Monument in 1933, placing the area under federal protection. In 1994, the monument was redesignated a national park, as well as being substantially expanded to include Saline and Eureka valleys.(The natural environment of the area has been shaped largely by its geology. The valley itself is actually a graben.  The oldest rocks are extensively metamorphosed and at least 1.7 billion years old.( Ancient warm, shallow seas deposited marine sediments until rifting opened the Ocean. Additional sedimentation occurred until a zone formed off the coast. This uplifted the region out of the sea and created a line of volcanoes. Later the crust started to pull apart, creating the current Basin and Range landform. Valleys filled with sediment and, during the wet times of periods, with lakes, such as Manly.The park covers , encompassing Saline Valley, a large part of Valley, almost all of Valley, and parts of several ranges.(National Park Index (20012003), p. 26) The bulk of the park is in southern Inyo County and northern San Bernardino County in California. A small triangular extension near Nevada of approximately  is part of southwestern Nye County and extreme southern Esmeralda County in Nevada. In addition, there is an exclave (Hole) in southern Nye County administered by the Park.Geographic settingImage:Death Valley,19820817,Desert,radiator water tank.jpg|thumb|right|325px|Desert and abandoned radiator water tank near GrapevineThere are two major valleys in the park, Valley and Valley. Both of these valleys were formed within the last few million years and both are bounded by northsouth-trending ranges.( These and adjacent valleys follow the general trend of and Range topography with one modification: there are parallel faults that perpendicularly bound the central extent of Death Valley. The result of this shearing action is additional extension in the central part of Death Valley which causes a slight widening and more subsidence there.Uplift of surrounding mountain ranges and subsidence of the valley floor are both occurring. The uplift on the Black Mountains is so fast that the fans (fan-shaped deposits at the mouth of canyons) there are small and steep compared to the huge alluvial fans coming off the Range. Fast uplift of a mountain range in an arid environment often does not allow its canyons enough time to cut a classic V-shape all the way down to the stream bed. Instead, a V-shape ends at a slot canyon halfway down, forming a wine glass canyon.  Sediment is deposited on a small and steep alluvial fan.Throughout the western United States, a series of generally north-south running mountain ranges tower over intervening valleys.  When the valley has no outlet for water runoff, it is termed a basin.  This is the case in many of the interior valleys of the western part of the United States, and had led to the geographical term of and range for the entire area.  When sufficient precipitation over extended periods of time wash small earthen particles into the lowest points in the valley, a flat surface of fine sediment can form.  Due to the overwhelmingly arid conditions found here, the water covering this surface is temporal, evaporating quickly.  A playa is then left behind, referring to the absolutely flat, usually salt-laden surface that is formed.Image:2006 1205 135618-DVNP-RACETRACK.jpg|thumbnail|left|187px|Playa, view from south edge of the playa towards The GrandstandWithin Death Valley National Park there are two very distinctive playas.  The most accessible is that located at Badwater in the southern part of the park, with a paved road and parking area at its eastern end.  Near the northern end of the park is the much more remote Playa. To reach it one travels about  over a gravel road from Crater to Junction and down into the Racetrack Playa. While the road is rough in areas, in good weather the Racetrack can be accessed by high-clearance two-wheel-drive vehicles. The road may be temporarily closed to even four-wheel-drive vehicles during or after severe rainfalls.  At  below level,( Basin on Death Valleys floor is the second-lowest point in the Western Hemisphere (behind del Carbn in Argentina), while Whitney, only  to the west, rises to .() This topographic relief is the greatest elevation gradient in the contiguous United States and is the terminus point of the Basins southwestern drainage.( Although the extreme lack of water in the Great Basin makes this distinction of little current practical use, it does mean that in wetter times the lake that once filled Death Valley (Manly) was the last stop for water flowing in the region, meaning the water there was saturated in dissolved materials. Thus the salt pans in Death Valley are among the largest in the world and are rich in minerals, such as borax and various salts and hydrates.() The largest salt pan in the park extends  from the Ashford Mill Site to the Salt Creek Hills, covering some  of the valley floor.((Badwater, the Devils Golf Course, and Salt Creek are all part of the Death Valley Saltpan.) The best known playa in the park is the Racetrack, known for its moving rocks.Climateright|thumb|350px|A slice through the highest and lowest points in Death Valley National ParkDeath Valley is the hottest and driest place in North America because of its lack of surface water and its low relief. It is so frequently the hottest spot in the United States that many tabulations of the highest daily temperatures in the country omit Death Valley as a matter of course.(Hickcox, David H., Temperature extremes. (United States)(1996 Weather), Weatherwise, February 1, 1997. Abstract at Highbeam.com)(Hickcox, David, Temperature extremes. (daily maximum and minimum temperatures in the US), Weatherwise, March 1, 1999. Abstract at Encyclopedia.com)  On July 10, 1913, a record  was measured at the Bureaus observation station at Greenland Ranch (now the site for the Furnace Creek Inn), the highest temperature ever recorded on that continent as of 2007.(NPS website, Weather and Climate) Daily summer temperatures of  or greater are common, as well as below freezing nightly temperatures in the winter.() July is the hottest month, with an average high of  and an average low of .(USGS weather) December is the coldest month, with an average high of  and an average low of .( The record low is .( Several of the larger Death Valley springs derive their water from a regional aquifer, which extends as far east as southern Nevada and Utah. Much of the water in this aquifer has been there for many thousands of years, since the Pleistocene ages, when the climate was cooler and wetter. Todays drier climate does not provide enough precipitation to recharge the aquifer at the rate at which water is being withdrawn.()File:Devils Golf Course in Death Valley NP.jpg|thumb|left|300px|Golf CourseThe highest range within the park is the Panamint Range with Peak being its highest point at .( The Death Valley region is a transitional zone in the northernmost part of the Desert and consists of five mountain ranges removed from the Pacific Ocean. Three of these are significant barriers: the Sierra Nevada, the Range, and the Panamint Range. Air masses tend to lose moisture as they are forced up over mountain ranges, in what climatologists call a effect.The exaggerated rainshadow effect for the Death Valley area makes it North Americas driest spot, receiving about  of rainfall annually at Badwater (some years fail to register any measurable rainfall).() Annual average precipitation varies from  overall below sea level to over  in the higher mountains that surround the valley.( When rain does arrive it often does so in intense storms that cause floods which remodel the landscape and sometimes create very shallow ephemeral lakes.crop.jpg|thumb|300px|Lake Badwater, spring, 2005The hot, dry climate makes it difficult for soil to form. wasting, the down-slope movement of loose rock, is therefore the dominant erosive force in mountainous area, resulting in skeletonized ranges (mountains with very little soil on them). dunes in the park, while famous, are not nearly as numerous as their fame or the dryness of the area may suggest. One of the main dune fields is near Stovepipe Wells in the north-central part of the valley and is primarily made of quartz sand. Another dune field is just  to the north but is instead mostly composed of travertine sand.() Yet another dune field is near the seldom-visited Ibex Hill in the southernmost part of the park, just south of the Saratoga Springs marshland. Prevailing winds in the winter come from the north, and prevailing winds in the summer come from the south. Thus the overall position of the dune fields remains more or less fixed.There are rare exceptions to the dry nature of the area.  In 2005, an unusually wet winter created a lake in the Basin and led to the greatest wildflower season in the parks history.(MSN.com)Human historyImage:Petroglyphs2-above Mesquite Springs-800px.JPG|thumb|left|250px|Petroglyphs above Mesquite SpringsEarly inhabitants and transient populationsFour Native American cultures are known to have lived in the area during the last 10,000 years or so.( The first known group, the Spring People, were and gatherers who arrived in the area perhaps 9,000 years ago (7000 BCE) when there were still small lakes in Death Valley and neighboring Panamint Valley.() A much milder climate persisted at that time, and large game animals were still plentiful. By 5,000 years ago (3000 BCE) the Flat People displaced the Nevares Spring People.( Around 2,000 years ago the Spring People moved into the area, which by then was probably already a hot, dry desert.((The last known lake to exist in Death Valley likely dried up 3,000 years ago.) This culture was more advanced at hunting and gathering and was skillful at handcrafts. They also left mysterious stone patterns in the valley. One-thousand years ago, the nomadic Timbisha (formerly called Shoshone and also known as Panamint or Koso) moved into the area and hunted game and gathered mesquite beans along with pine nuts.(( Because of the wide altitude differential between the valley bottom and the mountain ridges, especially on the west, the Timbisha practiced a vertical migration pattern.( Their winter camps were located near water sources in the valley bottoms. As the spring and summer progressed and the weather warmed, grasses and other plant food sources ripened at progressively higher altitudes. November found them at the very top of the mountain ridges where they harvested pine nuts before moving back to the valley bottom for winter. The Gold Rush brought the first people of European descent known to visit the immediate area. In December 1849 two groups of Gold Country-bound white travelers with perhaps 100 wagons total stumbled into Death Valley after getting lost on what they thought was a shortcut off the Old Spanish Trail.() Called the Bennett-Arcane Party, they were unable to find a pass out of the valley for weeks; they were able to find fresh water at various springs in the area, but were forced to eat several of their oxen to survive. They used the wood of their wagons to cook the meat and make jerky. The place where they did this is today referred to as Burned Wagons Camp and is located near the sand dunes.After abandoning their wagons, they eventually were able to hike out of the valley. Just after leaving the valley, one of the women in the group turned and said, Goodbye Death Valley, giving the valley they endured its name.((In fact only one member of the Death Valley 49ers died in Death Valley, an elderly man named Culverwell, who was half dead already when he entered it.) Included in the party was William Lewis Manly whose autobiographical book Valley in 49 detailed this trek and popularized the area (geologists later named the prehistoric lake that once filled the valley after him).thumb|287px|A twenty-mule team in Death ValleyImage:1993 death valley furnace creek museum.jpg|thumb|287px|Historical locomotive for borax-carrying in Death Valley (Furnace-Creek-Museum), USA, in June 1993in 1906.jpg|thumb|right|287px|Skidoo in 1906Image:Scottys Castle under construction.JPG|thumb|right|287px|Castle under constructionImage:CCC boys in Death Valley.jpg|thumb|right|287px|Conservation Corps workers in Death ValleyBoom and bustThe ores that are most famously associated with the area were also the easiest to collect and the most profitable: evaporite deposits such as salts, borate, and talc. Borax was found by Rosie and Aaron Winters near Furnace Creek Ranch (then called Greenland) in 1881.()  Later that same year, the Borax Works became Death Valleys first commercial borax operation. Tell Coleman built the Borax Works plant and began to process ore in late 1883 or early 1884, continuing until 1888.(NPS website, Mining) This mining and smelting company produced borax to make soap and for industrial uses.(NPS website, Twenty Mule Teams) The end product was shipped out of the valley  to the Mojave railhead in 10-ton-capacity wagons pulled by teams that were actually teams of 18 mules and two horses each.( The teams averaged two miles (3 km) an hour and required about 30 days to complete a round trip.( The trade name 20-Mule Team Borax was established by Marion Smiths Coast Borax Company after Smith acquired Colemans borax holdings in 1890. A memorable advertising campaign used the wagons image to promote the Boraxo brand of granular hand soap and the Valley Days radio and television programs. Mining continued after the collapse of Colemans empire, and by the late 1920s the area was the worlds number one source of borax.( Some four to six million years old, the Furnace Creek Formation is the primary source of borate minerals gathered from Death Valleys playas.(Other visitors stayed to prospect for and mine deposits of copper, gold, lead, and silver.( These sporadic mining ventures were hampered by their remote location and the harsh desert environment. In December 1903, two men from Ballarat were prospecting for silver.(NPS website, People) One was an out-of-work Irish miner named Jack Keane and the other was a one-eyed Basque butcher named Domingo Etcharren. Quite by accident, Keane discovered an immense ledge of free-milling gold by the duos work site and named the claim the Wonder Mine. This started a minor and short-lived rush into the area.( The Keane Wonder Mine, along with mines at Rhyolite, Skidoo and Harrisburg, were the only ones to extract enough metal ore to make them worthwhile. Outright shams such as Leadfield also occurred, but most ventures quickly ended after a short series of prospecting mines failed to yield evidence of significant ore (these mines now dot the entire area and are a significant hazard to anyone who enters them). The boom towns which sprang up around these mines flourished during the first decade of the 20th century but soon declined after the of 1907.(Early tourismThe first documented tourist facilities in Death Valley were a set of tent houses built in the 1920s where Stovepipe Wells is now located. People flocked to resorts built around natural springs thought to have curative and restorative properties. In 1927, Pacific Coast Borax turned the crew quarters of its Furnace Creek Ranch into a resort, creating the Furnace Creek Inn and resort.(NPS website, Furnace Creek Inn) The spring at Furnace Creek was harnessed to develop the resort, and as the water was diverted, the surrounding marshes and wetlands started to shrink.( Soon the valley was a popular winter destination. Other facilities started off as private getaways but were later opened to the public. Most notable among these was Death Valley Ranch, better known as Castle. This large ranch home built in the Revival style became a hotel in the late 1930s and, largely because of the fame of Valley Scotty, a tourist attraction. Death Valley Scotty, whose real name was Walter Scott, was a gold miner who pretended to be owner of his castle, which he claimed to have built with profits from his gold mine. Neither claim was true, but the real owner, Chicago millionaire Mussey Johnson, encouraged the myth. When asked by reporters what his connection was to Walter Scotts castle, Johnson replied that he was Mr. Scotts banker.(NPS website, Johnson and Scotty Build a Castle)Protection and later historyPresident Hoover proclaimed a national monument in and around Death Valley on February 11, 1933, setting aside almost two million acres (8,000 km2) of southeastern California and small parts of southwesternmost Nevada.(NPS Visitor Guide) Twelve companies worked in Death Valley using Conservation Corps workers during the Depression and on into the early 1940s. They built barracks, graded  of roads, installed water and telephone lines, and erected a total of 76 buildings.(NPS website, Civilian Conservation Corps) Trails in the Panamint Range were built to points of scenic interest, and an adobe village, laundry and trading post were constructed for Shoshone Indians. Five campgrounds, restrooms, an airplane landing field and picnic facilities were also built. Creation of the monument resulted in a temporary closing of the lands to prospecting and mining. However, Death Valley was quickly reopened to mining by Congressional action in June of the same year. As improvements in mining technology allowed lower grades of ore to be processed, and new heavy equipment allowed greater amounts of rock to be moved, mining in Death Valley changed. Gone were the days of the single-blanket, jackass prospector long associated with the romantic west. Open pit and mines scarred the landscape as international mining corporations bought claims in highly visible areas of the national monument. The public outcry that ensued led to greater protection for all national park and monument areas in the United States.at Leadfield.JPG|thumb|left|200px|Inside an abandoned mine at LeadfieldIn 1976 Congress passed the in the Parks Act, which closed Death Valley National Monument to the filing of new mining claims, banned open-pit mining and required the Park Service to examine the validity of tens of thousands of pre-1976 mining claims.( Mining was allowed to resume on a limited basis in 1980 with stricter environmental standards.( The parks Resources Management Division monitors mining within park boundaries and continues to review the status of 125 unpatented mining claims and 19 patented claim groups, while ensuring that federal guidelines are followed and the parks resources are protected. In 2005, the Mine, an underground borax mine located along the road to View, closed, ending mining in the park.Death Valley National Monument was designated a reserve in 1984.( On October 31, 1994, the Monument was expanded by 1.3 million acres (5,300 km2) and redesignated a park by passage of the Protection Act.( This made it the largest national park in the United States.Many of the larger cities and towns within the boundary of the regional water flow system that the park and its plants and animals rely upon are experiencing some of the fastest growth rates of any place in the United States. Notable examples within a  radius of Death Valley National Park include Las Vegas and Nevada. In the case of Las Vegas, the local Chamber of Commerce estimates that 6,000 people are moving to the city every month. Between 1985 and 1995, the population of the Las Vegas Valley increased from 550,700 to 1,138,800.(& Wildrose Peaks - Emigrant Canyon Rd.jpg|thumbnail|center|800px|Telescope and Wildrose Peaks from Emigrant Canyon Rd.Geologic historythumbnail|425px|The deep Death Valley basin is filled with sediment (light yellow) eroded from the surrounding mountains. Black lines show some of the major faults that created the valley.The park has a diverse and complex geologic history. Since its formation, the area that comprises the park has experienced at least four major periods of extensive volcanism, three or four periods of major sedimentation, and several intervals of major tectonic deformation where the crust has been reshaped. Two periods of glaciation (a series of ages) have also had effects on the area, although no glaciers ever existed in the ranges now in the park.Basement and Pahrump GroupLittle is known about the history of the oldest exposed rocks in the area due to extensive metamorphism (alteration of rock by heat and pressure). dating gives an age of 1,700 million years for the metamorphism (during the Proterozoic: See bottom of the geologic timeline).( About 1,400 million years ago a mass of granite now in the Panamint Range intruded this complex.() Uplift later exposed these rocks to nearly 500 million years of erosion.(  On these basement rocks was deposited the sedimentary formation of the Group. This occurred after uplift-associated erosion removed whatever rocks covered the Proterozoic-aged rocks. The Pahrump is composed of arkose conglomerate (quartz clasts in a concrete-like matrix) and stone in its lower part, followed by dolomite from carbonate banks topped by algal mats in stromatolites, and finished with basin-filling sediment derived from the above, including possible till from the hypothesized Earth glaciation.() The very youngest rocks in the Pahrump Group are from basaltic lava flows. Image:Late Precambrian Noonday Formation.jpg|thumb|242px|left|The Noonday Dolomite was formed from a carbonate shelf after the break-up of Rodinia.Rifting and depositionA rift opened and subsequently flooded the region as part of the breakup of the supercontinent Rodinia in the Neoproterozoic (by about 755 million years ago) and the creation of the Ocean. A shoreline similar to the present Ocean margin of the United States lay to the east. An mat-covered carbonate bank was deposited, forming the Noonday Dolomite.() Subsidence of the region occurred as the crust thinned and the newly formed Pacific widened, forming the Ibex Formation. An angular unconformity (an uneven gap in the geologic record) followed. A true basin developed to the west, breaking all the earlier formations along a steep front. A wedge of clastic sediment then began to accumulate at the base of the two underwater precipices, starting the formation of opposing shelfs.() Three formations developed from sediment that accumulated on the wedge. The regions first known fossils of complex life are found in the resulting formations.( Notable among these are the Ediacara fauna and trilobites, both part of the Explosion of life. The sandy mudflats gave way about 550 million years ago to a carbonate platform (similar to the one around the present-day Bahamas), which lasted for the next 300 million years of Paleozoic time (refer to the middle of the timescale image). Death Valleys position was then within ten or twenty degrees of the Paleozoic equator. Thick beds of carbonate-rich sediments were periodically interrupted by periods of emergence. Although details of geography varied during this immense interval of time, a north-northeasterly trending coastline generally ran from Arizona up through Utah. The resulting eight formations and one group are  thick and underlay much of the Cottonwood, Funeral, Grapevine, and Panamint ranges.(Compression and upliftIn the early-to-mid- Mesozoic the western edge of the North American continent was pushed against the oceanic plate under the Pacific Ocean, creating a zone.( A subduction zone is a type of contact between different crustal plates where heavier crust slides below lighter crust. Erupting volcanoes and uplifting mountains were created as a result, and the coastline was pushed to the west. The Arc started to form to the northwest from heat and pressure generated from subduction, and compressive forces caused faults to develop. A long period of uplift and erosion was concurrent with and followed the above events, creating a major unconformity, which is a large gap in the geologic record. Sediments worn off the Death Valley region were carried both east and west by wind and water.( No Jurassic- to Eocene-aged sedimentary formations exist in the area, except for some possibly Jurassic-age rocks (see the top of the timescale image).() Image:Lake Manly system.png|thumb|282px|The Manly lake system as it might have looked during its last maximum extent 22,000 years ago() (USGS image)Image:Amargosa.jpg|thumb|282px|During very wet periods, the River can flow at the surface, as it did in Death Valley during the wet winter of 2005. Wildflowers also peak during wetter years.Erosion over many millions of years created a relatively featureless plain. Thirty-five million years ago, sluggish streams migrated laterally over its surface. Several other similar formations were also laid down.Stretching and lakesand Range-associated stretching of large parts of crust below southwestern United States and northwestern Mexico started around 16 million years ago and the region is still spreading.( This stretching began to affect the Death and Panamint valleys area by 3 million years ago.() Before this, rocks now in the Panamint Range were on top of rocks that would become the Black Mountains and the Cottonwood Mountains. Lateral and vertical transport of these blocks was accomplished by movement on normal faults. Right-lateral movement along strike-slip faults that run parallel to and at the base of the ranges also helped to develop the area.( Torsional forces, probably associated with northwesterly movement of the Plate along the Andreas Fault (west of the region), is responsible for the lateral movement.( Igneous activity associated with this stretching occurred from 12 million to 4 million years ago.() Sedimentation is concentrated in valleys (basins) from material eroded from adjacent ranges. The amount of sediment deposited has roughly kept up with this subsidence, resulting in retention of more or less the same valley floor elevation over time. Pleistocene ice ages started 2 million years ago, and melt from alpine glaciers on the nearby Sierra Nevada Mountains fed a series of lakes that filled Death and Panamint valleys and surrounding basins (see the top of the timescale image). The lake that filled Death Valley was the last of a chain of lakes fed by the Amargosa and Rivers, and possibly also the River. The large lake that covered much of Death Valleys floor, which geologists call Manly, started to dry up 10,500 years ago.() Saltpans and playas were created as ice age glaciers retreated, thus drastically reducing the lakes water source. Only faint shorelines are left.BiologyHabitat varies from saltpan at  below sea level to the sub-alpine conditions found on the summit of Telescope Peak, which rises to .(NPS website, Plants) Vegetation zones include Bush, Desert Holly, and mesquite at the lower elevations and sage up through shadscale, blackbrush, Joshua Tree, pinyon-juniper, to Pine and Bristlecone Pine woodlands.( The saltpan is devoid of vegetation, and the rest of the valley floor and lower slopes have sparse cover, although where water is available, an abundance of vegetation is usually present. These zones and the adjacent desert support a variety of wildlife species, including 51 species of native mammals, 307 species of birds, 36 species of reptiles, 3 species of amphibians, and 2 species of native fish.(NPS website, Animals) Small mammals are more numerous than large mammals, such as Sheep, Coyotes (image), Bobcats,  Foxes, Cougars, and Deer.( Mule Deer are present in the pinyon/juniper associations of the Grapevine, Cottonwood, and Panamint ranges.( Bighorn Sheep are a rare species of sheep that exist in isolated bands in the Sierra and in Death Valley. These are highly adaptable animals and can eat almost any plant. They have no known predators, but humans and burros compete for habitat. Image:Death Valley Pupfish spawning in Salt Creek.jpg|thumb|225px|left|Valley Pupfish spawning in Salt CreekThe ancestors of the Valley Pupfish swam to the area from the River via a long-since dried-up system of rivers and lakes (see Manly). They now live in two separate populations: one in Salt Creek and another in Cottonball Marsh.  Death Valley is one of the hottest and driest places in North America, yet it is home to over 1,000 species of plants; 23 of which are not found anywhere else.( Adaptation to the dry environment is key. For example, creosote bush and mesquite have tap-root systems that can extend  down in order to take advantage of a year-round supply of water. The diversity of Death Valleys plant communities results partly from the regions location in a transition zone between the Desert, the Great Basin Desert and the Desert. This location, combined with the great relief found within the Park, supports vegetation typical of three biotic zones: the lower Sonoran, the Canadian, and the Arctic/Alpine in portions of the Panamint Range. Based on the Munz and Keck (1968) classifications, seven plant communities can be categorized within these life zones, each characterized by dominant vegetation and representative of three vegetation types: scrub, desert woodland, and coniferous forest. Microhabitats further subdivide some communities into zones, especially on the valley floor.Image:Sphinx moth on rock nettle at Mosaic Canyon.jpg|thumb|187px|Moth on Nettle in Mosaic CanyonUnlike more typical locations across the Mojave Desert, many of the water-dependent Death Valley habitats possess a diversity of plant and animal species that are not found anywhere else in the world.( The existence of these species is due largely to a unique geologic history and the process of evolution that has progressed in habitats that have been isolated from one another since the Pleistocene epoch.ActivitiesSightseeing is available by personal automobile, drive, bicycle, mountain bike (on established roadways only), and hiking. Riding through the park on motorcycle is also a popular pastime.() State Route 190, the Badwater Road, the Scottys Castle Road, and paved roads to View and Wildrose provide access to the major scenic viewpoints and historic points of interest. More than  of unpaved and four-wheel-drive roads provide access to wilderness hiking, camping, and historical sites.() All vehicles must be licensed and street legal. There are hiking trails of varying lengths and difficulties, but most backcountry areas are accessible only by cross-country hiking. There are literally thousands of hiking possibilities. The normal season for visiting the park is from October 15 to May 15, because of summer extremes in temperature. A costumed living history tour of the historic Death Valley Castle is conducted for a fee. thumb|left|250px|A tourist sliding down Star Dune in the Mesquite Flat Dune fieldThere are nine designated campgrounds within the park, and overnight backcountry camping permits are available at the Visitor Center.(NPS website, Campgrounds) Parks & Resorts owns and operates a private resort, the Furnace Creek Inn and Ranch Resort,( which comprises two separate and distinct hotels: the Furnace Creek Inn is a four-star historic hotel, and the Furnace Creek Ranch is a three-star ranch-style property reminiscent of the mining and prospecting days. Xanterra also operates the Stovepipe Wells Village motel. The Furnace Creek Inn and Ranch and the Stovepipe Wells Village are the only inns located inside Death Valley proper. There are a few motels near various entrances to the park, in Shoshone, Valley Junction, Nevada, and Springs.The visitor center is located in the Furnace Creek resort area on State Route 190. A 12-minute introductory slide program is shown every 30 minutes.(NPS website, Ranger Programs) During the winter seasonNovember through Aprilrangers offer interpretive tours and a wide variety of walks, talks, and slide presentations about Death Valley cultural and natural history. The visitor center has displays dealing with the parks geology, climate, wildlife and natural history. There are also specific sections dealing with the human history and pioneer experience. The Valley Natural History Association maintains a bookstore specifically geared to the natural and cultural history of the park. Death Valley National Park is a popular location for stargazing as it has one of the darkest night skies in the United States. Despite Death Valleys remote location, its air quality and night visibility are threatened by civilization. In particular, pollution is introduced by nearby Las Vegas.(NPS website, Lightscape / Night Sky) The darkest skies are, in general, located in the northwest of the park.()Image:Deathvalleysky nps big.jpg|thumb|center|800px|A 360-degree panorama of Playa at night. The Way is visible as an arc in the center.See also*of nationally protected areas of the United States*and Colorado Deserts Biosphere Reserve*Register of Historic Places listings in Death Valley National ParkReferencesExplanatory notes(CitationsBibliography***** (adapted public domain text)** (adapted public domain text)***External links* by the Park Service*list1    ( )Cenedlaethol Dyffryn Marwolaethde:Death-Valley-NationalparkNacional del Valle de la MuerteParko Valo de Morto  national de la Valle de la mortpark Dolina smrti    ielejas nacionlais parksValley Nemzeti ParkValley National Parkja:Valley nasjonalparkNarodowy Doliny mierciNacional do Vale da MorteNaional Death Valley ( )Valleyn kansallispuistoValley nationalpark   ( )quc gia thung lng Deathzh-yue:zh:
47222
3753_Cruithne
K3753 Cruithne (, from Irish ; Modern  or ) is an asteroid in orbit around the Sun in approximate 1:1 resonance with the Earth. It is a periodic inclusion planetoid orbiting the Sun in an apparent orbit.( It has been incorrectly called second moon, but it is only a quasi-satellite.()The name Cruithne is that of an early medieval people of Ireland. Discovery Cruithne was discovered on October 10, 1986, by Waldron on a photographic plate taken with the Schmidt Telescope at Spring Observatory, Coonabarabran, Australia. The 1983 apparition (1983 UH) is credited to de Sanctis and M. West of the Southern Observatory in Chile. It was not until 1997 that its unusual orbit was determined by Wiegert and Innanen, working at University in Toronto, and Mikkola, working at the of Turku in Finland.The asteroid is named after the Cruithne or Cruthin, a people of early medieval Ireland mentioned in the of Ulster.(Cruithne: Asteroid 3753. Western Washington University Planetarium. Retrieved January 27, 2011.) Dimensions and orbit frame|left|Cruithne and Earth seem to follow each other in their orbits.frame|left|Cruithne appears to make a bean-shaped orbit from the perspective of Earth.300px|thumb|right|Cruithnes distance to Earth and the Sun plotted over 500 years (top) and 10 years (bottom). Cruithne is approximately  in diameter, and its closest approach to Earth is approximately thirty times the separation between Earth and the Moon (12 Gm or twelve million kilometres).  From 1994 through 2015, Cruithne makes its annual closest approach to Earth every November.() Although Cruithnes orbit is not thought to be stable over the long term, calculations by Wiegert and Innanen showed that it has probably been synchronized with Earths orbit for a long time. There is no danger of a collision with Earth for millions of years, if ever. Its orbital path and Earths do not cross, and its orbital plane is currently tilted to that of the Earth by 19.8. Cruithne, having a maximum near-Earth magnitude of +15.8, is fainter than Pluto and would require at least a  telescope to be seen.()()Cruithne is in a normal orbit around the Sun.  Its period of revolution around the Sun, approximately 364 days at present, is almost equal to that of the Earth. Because of this, Cruithne and Earth appear to follow each other in their paths around the Sun. This is why Cruithne is sometimes called Earths second moon.( However, it does not orbit the Earth and is not a moon.(Meeus, reference above, writes we may not deduce that Cruithne is a companion of the Earth, as some authors wrote, and certainly it is not a satellite! The object simply cannot be a satellite of the Earth, as it moves from nearly the orbit of Mercury to outside that of Mars, and because sometimes it is in superior conjunction, at the far side of the Sun as seen from the Earth.)  In 2058, Cruithne will come within 0.09 AU (13.6 million kilometres) of Mars.( Cruithnes distance from the Sun and orbital speed vary a lot more than the Earths, so from the Earths point of view Cruithne actually follows a bean-shaped orbit ahead of the Earth, taking slightly less than one year to complete a circuit of the bean. Because it takes slightly less than a year, the Earth falls behind the bean a little more each year, and so from our point of view, the circuit is not quite closed, but rather like a spiral loop that moves slowly away from the Earth.After many years, the Earth will have fallen so far behind that Cruithne will then actually be catching up on the Earth from behind. When it eventually does catch up, Cruithne will make a series of annual close approaches to the Earth and gravitationally exchange orbital energy with Earth; this will alter Cruithnes orbit by a little over half a million kilometreswhile Earths orbit is altered by about so that its period of revolution around the Sun will then become slightly more than a year. The kidney bean will then start to migrate away from the Earth again in the opposite direction  instead of the Earth falling behind the bean, the Earth is pulling away from the bean. The next such series of close approaches will be centred on the year 2292  in July of that year, Cruithne will approach Earth to about .After 380 to 390 years or so, the kidney-bean-shaped orbit approaches Earth again from the other side, and the Earth, once more, alters the orbit of Cruithne so that its period of revolution around the Sun is again slightly less than a year (this last happened with a series of close approaches centred on 1902, and will next happen with a series centered on 2676). The pattern then repeats itself. Similar minor planets thumb|left|200px|Figure 1. Plan showing possible orbits along gravitational contours (Not to scale)More resonant objects (NEOs) have since been discovered.  These include YORP, , , and 2009BD which exist in resonant orbits similar to Cruithnes. 2010 TK7 is the first and so far only identified Earth trojan.Other examples of natural bodies known to be in orbits include Janus and Epimetheus, satellites of Saturn. The orbits these two moons follow around Saturn are much simpler than the one Cruithne follows, but operate along the same general principles.Mars has four known co-orbital asteroids (Eureka, , , and , all at the points), and Jupiter has many (more than 1000 known objects, the asteroids); there are also other small co-orbital moons in the Saturnian system: Telesto and Calypso with Tethys, and Helene and Polydeuces with Dione. However, none of these follow horseshoe orbits.Cruithne in popular cultureCruithne plays a major role in Steven Baxters novel Time, which was nominated for the Arthur C. Clarke science fiction award in 2000. The British panel show QI brought attention to Cruithne in 2003 when host Fry claimed it was the second moon. He also incorrectly claimed that it was discovered in 1994.(QI:  How many moons does earth have?, BBC video) See also * * *Asteroids in fiction: Other asteroids,  Asteroids in fiction: Colonization, and Asteroids in fiction: Mining*configuration*Earths second moon*satellite*Quasi-satelliteReferencesFurther reading**External links*Paul Wiegerts page about Cruithne, with movies*Java-applet based animations showing Cruithnes orbit*A simulation of Cruithnes orbit with animation (Gravity Simulator)**Curious About Astronomy: Have astronomers discovered Earths second moon?CruithneCruithneCruithneCruithneCruithneCruithneCruithneCruithneCruithneCruithne(planetode)ja:CruithneCruithneCruithneCruithneCruithneCruithneCruithneCruithneCruithnezh:3753
47734
Chhattisgarh
 footnotes               Chhattisgarh (Chhattisgarhi/Hindi: , ) is a state in Central India, formed when the 16 Chhattisgarhi-speaking South-Eastern districts of Pradesh gained separate statehood on 1 November 2000.Raipur is the biggest city and the capital of the state. Chhattisgarh is the 10th-largest state in India with an area of . By population it ranks as the seventeenth largest state of the nation. It is an important electrical power and steel producing state of India.() Chhattisgarh produces 15 per cent of the steel made in the country.()Chhattisgarh borders the states of Pradesh on the northwest, Maharashtra on the west, Pradesh on the south, Orissa on the east, Jharkhand on the northeast and Pradesh on the north.EtymologyThere is a wide array of opinions on the origin of the word Chhattisgarh. The name Chhattisgarh is not an a very old one and has come into popular usage in the last few centuries. In ancient times the region was called Dakshin Kosala (South Kosala). The name Chhattisgarh was popularized during the Maratha period and was first used in an official document in 1795.()*In a popular and widely-believed opinion, Chhattisgarh takes its name from the 36 pillars of Chhatishgarhin Devi temple (chhattis means 36, and garh means pillar). The state has 36 districts, which are : 1- Ratanpur, 2- Vijaypur, 3- Kharound, 4- Maro, 5- Kautgarh, 6- Nawagarh, 7- Sondhi, 8- Aukhar, 9- Padarbhatta, 10- Semriya, 11- Champa, 12- Lafa, 13- Chhuri, 14- Kenda, 15- Matin, 16- Aparora, 17- Pendra, 18- Kurkuti-kandri, 19- Raipur, 20- Patan, 21- Simaga, 22- Singarpur, 23- Lavan, 24- Omera, 25- Durg, 26- Saradha, 27- Sirasa, 28- Menhadi, 29- Khallari, 30- Sirpur, 31- Figeswar, 32- Rajim, 33- Singhangarh, 34- Suvarmar, 35- Tenganagarh and 36- Akaltara.(Dr. Bhagvan Singh Verma,  Chhattisgarh ka Itihas  (A History of Chattisgarh - in Hindi), Madhya Pradesh Hindi Granth Academy, Bhopal(M.P.), 4th edition(2003), P.7) However, experts do not agree with this explanation, as thirty-six forts cannot be archaeologically identified in the region.(*The British Chronicler, J.B. Beglar provides a different explanation of the origins of the name Chhattisgarh. According to Beglar, the real name is Chhattisghar(ChhattisThirty six, Gharhouses) and not Chhattisgarh. According to him,There is a traditional saying that ages ago, about the time of Jarasandha(Age of Mahabharata), thirty six dalit families (leather workers) emigrated southwards from Jarasandhas kingdom and established themselves in this region, which is called after them Chhattisgarh.()*Another view, more popular with experts and historians, is that Chhattisgarh is the corrupted form of Chedisgarh which means Raj or Empire of the Chedis (Kalchuri Dynasty).(*According to DR. Shrikant Khilari- the word Chhattisgarh comes from the time of Gurughasidas www.satnami.com a saint who gave this name and then it was officially applied by the Marathas in 1795.GeographyThe Northern and Southern parts of the state are hilly, while the central part is fertile plain. Moist deciduous forests of the Eastern Highlands Forests cover roughly 44% of the state.State Animal - Van Bhainsa (Wild Buffalo)State Bird - Pahari Myna (Hill Myna)State Tree - Sal or SaraiThe north of the state lies on the edge of the great plain: The River, a tributary of the Ganges, drains this area. The eastern end of the Range and the western edge of the Nagpur Plateau form an east-west belt of hills that divide the River basin from the Indo-Gangetic plain.The central part of the state lies in the fertile upper basin of the Mahanadi and its tributaries, with extensive rice cultivation. The upper Mahanadi basin is separated from the upper Narmada basin to the west by the Hills, (part of the Satpuras), and from the plains of Orissa to the east by ranges of hills. The southern part of the state lies on the Deccan plateau, in the watershed of the River and its tributary the River.The Mahanadi is the chief river of the state. The other main rivers are Hasdo (a tributary of Mahanadi), Rihand, Indravati, Jonk and Arpa. It is situated in the east of Madhya Pradesh.ClimateThe climate of Chhattisgarh is mainly tropical. It is hot and humid because of its proximity to the of Cancer. It is completely dependent on the monsoons for rains.Summer in Chhattisgarh is from April to June and can be uncomfortably hot, with the mercury hitting the high 40s.The Monsoon season is from middle and late June to October and is a welcome respite from the scorching heat. Chhattisgarh receives a pretty decent amount of rainfall with an average of 1292mm. The Winter season is from November to January and this is a good time to visit Chhattisgarh. The Winters are pleasant with low temperatures and lesser humidity.()TemperatureThe Temperature varies between 30 - 47 degree Celsius in summer and between 5 - 25 degree Celsius during winter.HistoryAncient and Medival HistoryIn ancient times this region was known as Dakshin-Kausal. This finds mention in Ramayana and Mahabharata also. Between the sixth and twelfth centuries Sarabhpurias, Panduavanshi, Somvanshi, Kalchuri and Nagvanshi rulers dominated this region. Kalchuris ruled in Chhattisgarh from 980 to 1741 AD.Modern historyChhattisgarh was under Maratha rule (Bhonsales of Nagpur) from 1741 to 1845 AD. It came under British rule from 1845 to 1947. With the advent of the British in 1845, Raipur gained prominence instead of capital Ratanpur. In 1905 district was transferred to Orissa and estates of Sarguja were transferred from Bengal to Chhattisgarh.Separation of ChhattisgarhThe demand for a separate Chhattisgarh state was first raised in the 1920. Similar demands kept cropping up at regular intervals; however, a well-organised movement was never launched. There were several all-party platforms formed and they usually resolved around petitions, public meetings, seminars, rallies and bandhs.()A demand for separate Chhattisgarh was raised in 1924 by the Raipur Congress unit, and later on also discussed in the Annual Session of the Indian Congress at Tripuri. A discussion also took place of forming a Regional Congress organisation for Chhattisgarh. When the State Reorganisation Commission was set up in 1954, the demand for a separate Chhattisgarh was put forward to it, through this was not accepted. In 1955, a demand for a separate state was raised in the Nagpur assembly of the then state of Madhya Bharat.(The 1990s saw more activity for a demand for the new state, such as formation of a state wide political forum, specially the Chhattisgarh Rajya Nirman Manch. The Late Chadrakar led this forum, several successful region-wide Bandhs and rallies were organised under the banner of the forum all of which were supported by major political parties including the National Congress and the Janata Party.(The new National Democratic Alliance (NDA) government sent the redrafted Separate Chhattisgarh Bill for the approval of the Madhya Pradesh Assembly, where it was once again unanimously approved and then it was tabled in the Sabha. This bill for a separate Chhattisgarh was passed in the Lok Sabha and the Rajya Sabha, paving the way for the creation of a separate state of Chhattisgarh. The of India gave his consent to The Pradesh Reorganisation Act 2000 on the 25 August 2000. The Government of India subsequently set the First day of November 2000 as the day on which the state of Madhya Pradesh would be bifurcated into Chhattisgarh and Madhya Pradesh.(Government and AdministrationThe State Legislative assembly is composed of 90 MLAs (Members of the Legislative Assembly). There are 11 members to the Sabha from Chhattisgarh. The Sabha has five members from the state.DistrictsChattisgarh state consists 27 districts:()(http://www.chhattisgarh.nic.in/statistics/details.pdf)(List of Chhattisgarh District Centres at NIC, Chhatisgarh official Portal)(Mathew, K.M. (ed.). Manorama Yearbook 2008, Kottayam: Malayala Manorama, ISSN 0542-5778, p.518)Bastar Division:*Bijapur*Sukma*Dantewada (Dakshin Bastar)*Bastar (Jagdalpur)*Kondagaon*Narayanpur*Kanker (Uttar Bastar)Durg Division:*Kawardha (Kawardha)*Rajnandgaon*Balod*Durg*BemetaraRaipur Division:*Dhamtari*Gariyaband*Raipur*Bazar*MahasamundBilaspur Division:*Bilaspur*Mungeli*Korba*Janjgir*RaigarhSarguja Division:*Koriya*Surajpur*Sarguja (Ambikapur)*Balrampur*JashpurMunicipal CorporationsBhataparaDemographicsChhattisgarh is primarily a rural state with only 20% of population residing in urban areas.According to the report from Government of India,() at least 34% are Tribes, 12% are Castes and over 50% belong to official list of Backward Castes. Plain area is numerically dominated by castes such as Teli, Satnami and Kurmi; while forest area is mainly occupied by tribes such as Gond, Halba and Kamar/ Bujia and Oraon.LanguageOfficial language of the state is Hindi and used by non-rural population of the state. Chhattisgarhi a dialect of Hindi language (or a language in its own right) is spoken and understood by the majority of people in Chhattisgarh. Chhattisgarhi was also known as Khaltahi to surrounding Hill-people and as Laria to Sambalpuri and Oriya speakers.Status of WomenChhattisgarh has a high female-male ratio (991)() ranking at 5th position among other states of India. Although this ratio is small compared to other states, it is unique in India because of large size of Chhattisharh (the 10th-largest state in India).The gender ratio (number females per 1000 males) has been steadily declining over 20th century in Chhattisgarh: But it is  conspicuous that Chhattisgarh always had better female to male ratio compared with national average.Probably, such social composition also results in some customs and cultural practices that seem unique to Chhattisgarh: the regional variants are common in Indias diverse cultural pattern.Rural women although poor, are independent, better organized, socially outspoken.() According to another local custom, women can choose to terminate a marriage relationship and through a custom called Chudi pahanana, if she so desires. Most of the old temples and shrines here are related to women power (e.g., Shabari, Mahamaya, Danteshwari) and existence of these temples gives insight into historical and current social fabric of this state. However, a mention of these progressive local customs, in no way suggests that the ideology of female subservience does not exist in Chhattisgarh. On the contrary, in spite of this male authority and dominance is seen quite clearly in the social and cultural life of Chhattisgarh.Detailed information on various aspects of women status in Chhattisgarh can be found in the linked 103 page report titled A situational analysis of women and girls in Chhattisgarh prepared in 2004 by National Commission of Women, a statutory body belonging to government of India.Malus Usuo of Tonhi (Witchcraft)There is widespread belief in witchcraft in Chhattisgarh.() Women are believed to have access to supernatural forces, and accused of being witches (tonhi) often to settle personal scores. They are barbarically persecuted, particularly older women, widows, women with deformities or with abnormal facial features.As of 2010, they are still hounded out of villages on the basis of flimsy accusations by male village sorcerers paid to do so by villagers with personal agendas, such as property and goods acquisition.( According to Geographic Channels investigations, those accused are fortunate if they are only verbally bullied and shunned or exiled from their village. Humiliations are commonplace, such as being forced to eat human excreta and in recent years, 2,500 women accused of witchcraft were murdered by stoning, hanging and beheading by neighbours. Though, in India, only Chhattisgarh has an act (known as, Chhattisgarh Tonhi atyachar Niwaran Act, 2005) against witchery,() a lot has be done on the hand of law enforcement and judicial authorities to protect women in this regard, bringing such persecution to an end.(CultureThe state hosts religious sects including Satnami Panth, Kabirpanth, Ramnami Samaj, and others. (Chhattisgarh) is a small town with religious significance as the birth place of the Saint Vallabhacharya, increasingly important as a pilgrimage site for the Gujarati community.The Oriya culture is prominent in the eastern parts of Chhattisgarh bordering Orissa.CraftsChattisgarh is known for Kosa silk and lost wax art.  Besides saris and salwar suits, the fabric is used to create lehengas, stoles, shawls and menswear including jackets, shirts, achkans and sherwanis.in Lost wax metal, International Sculptor Sushil Sakhujas Dhokra Nandi is famous and available at Govts SHABARI handicrafts emporium, Raipur.DancePanthi, Rawat Nacha, Karma, Pandwani and Soowa are indigenous dance styles of Chhattisgarh.PanthiPanthi, the folk dance of the Satnami community has religious overtones. Panthi is performed on Maghi Purnima, the anniversary of the birth of Ghasidas. The dancers dance around a jaitkhamb set up for the occasion, to songs eulogizing their spiritual head. The songs reflect a view of Nirvana, conveying the spirit of their gurus renunciation and the teachings of saint poets like Kabir, Ramdas and Dadu. Dancers with bent torsos and swinging arms dance, carried away by their devotion. As the rhythm quickens, they perform acrobatics and form human pyramids.()PandwaniPandavani is a folk ballad form performed predominantly in Chhattisgarh. It depicts the story of the Pandavas, the leading characters in the epic Mahabharata. The artists in the Pandavani narration consist of a lead artist and some supporting singers and musicians. There are two styles of narration in Pandavani, Vedamati and Kapalik. In the Vedamati style the lead artist narrates in a simple manner by sitting on the floor throughout the performance. The Kaplik style is livelier, where the narrator actually enacts the scenes and characters.()Rawat NachaRaut Nacha, the folk dance of cowherds, is a traditional dance of Yaduvanshis(Clan of Yadu) as symbol of worship to Krishna at the time of Dev Uthani Ekadashi (day of awakening of the gods after a brief rest) which is the 11th day after Diwali according to the Hindu calendar. The dance closely resembles Krishnas dance with the gopis (milkmaids).()()Soowa NachaSoowa or Suwa Tribal Dance in Chhattisgarh, India is also known as Parrot Dance. It is a symbolic form of dancing related to worship. Dancers keep a parrot in a bamboo- pot and form a circle around it. Then performers sing and dance, moving around it with clapping. This is one of the main dance form of tribal women of Chhattisgarh.()In Bilaspur city, Rawat Nach Mahotsav folk dance festival is organized annually since 1978. Tens of hundreds of Rawat dancers from remote areas participate in the festival every year.()KarmaTribal groups like Gonds, the Baigas and the Oraons in Chattisgarh have Karma dance as part of their culture. Both men and women arrange themselves in two rows and follow the rhythmic steps, directed by the singer group. The Karma tribal dance marks the end of the rainy season and the advent of spring season.()()MusicTheatreTheater is known as Gammat in Chhattisgarh. Pandavani is one of the lyrical forms of this theater. Several acclaimed plays of Tanvir, such as Chor, are variations of Chhattisgarhi theater, and heavily use Chhatttisgarhi folk songs and music.Traditional FoodThe State of Chhattisgarh is known as the rice bowl of Central India and has a rich tradition of food culture.Most of the traditional and tribe foods are made of rice and rice flour, curd (number of veg kadis) and a variety of green leaves like lal bhaji, chech bhaji, kohda, and bohar bhaji. Badi and Bijori are optional food categories; also Gulgula, pidiya, dhoodh fara, balooshahi, khurmi falls in sweet categories.The tribal and village population enjoys delicacy brew made of small, creamy white fruit of a local tree called Mahuwa.ReligionbarsOver 65% of the population of the state are Hindus. Several saints have their origin in Chattisgarh, including Parsurama Ramnami and Acharya. Mahesh Yogi, a noted Hindu leader and founder of the Meditation was from Jabalpur (Madhya Pradesh). There is a significant minority of Christians among several tribal groups in Chattisgarh, though there are few reliable statistics on their exact numbers.EconomyChhattisgarhs gross state domestic product for 2010 is estimated at Rs 60,079 Crore in current prices. The economy of Chhattisgarh has grown rapidly in recent years with a growth rate of 11.49 per cent in GDP for 2009-2010.() Chhattisgarhs success factors in achieving high growth rate are growth in agriculture and industrial production.AgricultureAgriculture is counted as the chief economic occupation of the state of Chhattisgarh. According to a government estimate, Net sown area of the Chhattisgarh state is 4.828 Million hectares and the gross sown area is 5.788 Million hectares.() Horticulture and animal husbandry also engages a major share of the total population of the state.() 80% population of the state is rural and the main livelihood of the villagers is agriculture and agriculture based small industry.Agricultural ProducesThe main crops are paddy, cereals like maize, kodo-kutki and other small millets, pulses like tuar and kulthi and oil seeds like groundnut, soya-bean and sunflower are also grown.  In the mid nineties, most of Chhattisgarh was still a mono-crop belt. Only one fourth to one fifth of the sown area was double cropped. When a very substantial portion of the population is dependent on agriculture, a situation where nearly 80 percent of a states area is covered only by mono cropping needs immediate attention to turn them into double crop areas. Also there are very few cash crops grown in Chhattisgarh, and there is a need to diversify the agriculture produce towards oilseeds and other cash crops. Chhattisgarh is also called the rice bowl of Central India.(IrrigationChhattisgarh have very good irrigation systems, with dams and canals on various rivers. Average rainfall in the state is around 1400 mm and the entire state falls under Rice-agro-climatic zone.  Large variation in the yearly rainfall directly affects the main crop i.e. Paddy. Obviously, irrigation is the prime need of the state for its overall development and therefore the state government has given top priority to development of irrigation potential.(Irrigation potential was 1.328 Million hectares at the time of formation of the state (i.e. on 1 November 2000) which was 13% of the gross sown area. The irrigation potential has now been raised to 1.66 Million hectares at the end of March 2006 which is 28.7% of gross sown area.A total of 4 Major, 33 Medium and 2199 Minor irrigation projects have been completed and 5 Major, 9 Medium and 312 Minor projects are under construction, as on 31 March 2006.Industrial SectorPower SectorChhattisgarh is one of the few states of India where Power sector is effectively developed. Based on the current production of surplus electric power, position of the State is comfortable and profitable. The Chhattisgarh State Electricity Board (CSEB) is in a strong position to meet the electricity requirement of the new State and is in good financial health. Chhattisgarh provides electricity to several other states because of surplus production, and its power hubs are Korba and Bilaspur.In Chhattisgarh, NTPC has an installed thermal capacity of 2100 MW at Sipat, Bilaspur while CSEBs units have a thermal capacity of 1240 MW and hydel capacity of 130 MW. Apart from NTPC and CSEB, there are a number of private generation units of large and small capacity. The state Govt. has pursued a liberal policy with regard to captive generation which has resulted in a number of private players coming up.()As per a study made by the Power Finance Corporation Ltd. New Delhi, the state has potential of 61000 MW of additional thermal power in terms of availability of coal for more than 100 years and more than 2500 MW hydral capacity. To tap this vast potential, substantial addition to the existing generation capacity is already under way.(Steel SectorSteel industry is one of the biggest heavy industry of Chhattisgarh. Bhilai Steel Plant, Bhilai operated by SAIL with a capacity of 3.6 million tonnes per year, is regarded as a significant growth indicator of the state. There are more than 100 steel rolling mills, sponge iron plants and ferro-alloy units in Chhattisgarh.()Aluminium SectorThe aluminium industry of Chhattisgarh consists of Bharat Aluminum Company limited which has a capacity of around one million tonnes each year.(Natural ResourcesForestForests occupy 41.33% of the area (as per the latest report by the Forest Service) and there are rich forest resources including wood, tandu leaves, honey and lac.Mineral DepositsChhattisgarh is also rich in minerals. It produces 20% of the countrys steel and cement. Iron-ore, limestone, dolomite, coal, bauxite are abundant. It is the only tin-ore producing state in the country. Other minerals include korandum, garnet, quartz, marble and diamonds.Issues with Development and InsurgencyChhattisgarh State is rich in unused timber and mineral resources. There are disagreements between local indigenous peoples and the national government over the use of these resources.Also, an ongoing insurgency between Maoists and the central of India has produced much bloodshed. The controversy surrounding the arrest of Dr Sen is related to the insurgency. Maoist insurgency has been main source of instability.TransportThe rail network in Chhattisgarh is centered around Bilaspur, which is zonal headquarters of East Central Railway of Indian Railways. The other main railway junction is Raipur, followed by Durg Junction which is also a starting point of many long distance trains. These three junctions are well-connected to the major cities of India.The roadways infrastructure is also slowly picking up in the state. The National Highway 6 (Mumbai to Kolkata) passes through the state. The state also hosts National Highway 43 which starts from Raipur and goes up to Vishakhapatnam. National Highway 16 from Hyderabad ends at Bhopalpatnam in Dantewada district. National Highway 78 From Katni (MP) ends at Gumla (Jharkhand) pass through Koria, Surajpur, Sarguja, Jashpur District. The state has 11 National Highways (2,225 kilometres).The air infrastructure is minor. The sole commercially operating airport is in Raipur, the capital city. Of late, Raipur has shown  upsurge in passenger traffic. Raipur has links to top cities of the country i.e. Delhi (5 flights per day), Bombay (3 flight), Kolkata (3),  Bhopal (1), Indore (1). It is also connected to Jaipur (1 flight a day), Nagpur (1 flights), Bhubaneshwar (1), Ahmedabad (1), Gwalior, Chandigarh (1), Hyderabad (2) and Bangalore(1).AirportsOther Airstrips* Nandini Airport, Bhilai* Chakarbhata Airstrip, Bilaspur* Baikunth Airstrip, Baikunth* Kondatarai Airstrip, Raigarh* JSPLs Airstrip, Raigarh* Darima Airstrip, Ambikapur* Korba Airstrip, Korba* Agdih Airstrip, Jashpur* Dondi Airstrip, Dondi, DurgSome New airstrips have been proposed for more connectivity:TourismChhattisgarh, situated in the heart of India, is endowed with a rich cultural heritage and attractive natural diversity. The State is full of ancient monuments, rare wildlife, exquisitely carved temples, Buddhist sites, palaces, falls, caves, rock paintings and hill plateaus. Most of these sites are untouched and unexplored, and offer a unique and alternate experience to tourists, compared to traditional destinations which have become overcrowded. For tourists who are tired of the crowds at major destinations will like the district, with its unique cultural and ecological identity. The Green State of Chhattisgarh has 41.33% of its area under forests, and is one of the richest bio-diversity areas in the country.*WaterfallsBeautiful waterfalls in Chhattisgarh are Akuri Nala, Amrit Dhara waterfall, Gavar Ghat waterfall, Ramdaha waterfall in Koriya district, Tiger point waterfall at Mainpat in Sarguja district and Chitrakot waterfall, Tirathgarh waterfall in Bastar district.*Hot spring Known as Taat Pani(taathot, pani water)A hot spring (Taat pani) flows in Sarguja district. This hot spring flows continuously through the year. It is reputed to have medicinal properties.*CavesGadiya mountain in Kanker district, Kutumsar cave and Kailash Gufa in Bastar district, Ramgarh and Sita Bengra in Sarguja district and Singhanpur cave in Raigarh district with pre-historic paintings are very famous.*National parks and Wildlife sanctuaryAchanakmar wildlife sanctuary in Bilaspur district, Gamarda Reserve forest at Sarangarh in Raigarh district, National Park and Kanger valley national park in Bastar district and Barnawapara Wildlife Sanctuary in Mahasamund district are good places for eco-tourism.*Archaeological sitesArchaeological sites worth seeing are Barsoor in Dantewada district, Malhar and Ratanpur in Bilaspur district, Sirpur in Mahasamund district and Surguja in Surguja district. A small picnic spot with waterfall on the extremity of Satpura ranga along with a stone inscription of circa 1st century CE is also found at dhara in Janjgir-Champa district.*TemplesFamous and ancient temples in Chhattisgarh are temple near kawardha in Kabirdham district, Rajivlochan temple at Rajim and Champaran in Raipur district, Chandrahasini Devi temple at Chandrapur, Vishnu temple at Janjgir, Damudhara (Rishab Tirth) and Sivarinarayana Laxminarayana temple in Janjgir-Champa district, Temple at Dongrigarh in Rajnandgaon district, Temple in Dantewada district, Deorani-Jethani temple at Tala gram and Mahamaya temple at Ratanpur in Bilaspur district, Laxman temple at Sirpur in Mahasamund district, Uwasaggaharam Parshwa Teerth at Nagpura in Durg district, Pali with Lord Shiva temple andKharod with Lakshmaneswar temple.Giraudhpuri, a religious place for the Satnamis. They are the follower of Satnam Panth.Sirpur is proposed world heritage site and Malhar, are of historical significance, as they were visited by Xuanzang, the Chinese historian.Dams  Khudiya dam, Lormi & Khutaghat dam, Ratanpur.EducationAccording to the census of 2011, Chhattisgarhs literacy, the most basic indicator of education was at 71.04 percent. Female literacy is at 60.59 percent.Absolute Literates and Literacy RateData from Census of India,2011.(http://www.censusindia.gov.in/2011-prov-results/data_files/Chhattishgarh/2.%20Chhattishgarh%20Figures%20at%20a%20glance.pdf)UniversitiesPandit Ravishankar Shukla UniversityPandit Ravishankar Shukla University(RSU) is Chhattisgarhs largest and one of the oldest institution of higher education, founded in 1964. There are 5000 students enrolled for variety of courses offered by the departments who are steered under the guidance of more than 100 faculty members. Jurisdiction of RSU covers entire central and southern part of Chhattisgarh. There are 180 educational institutions affiliated to the University. The University plays a major role in the educational, cultural and economic life of the region.()Guru Ghasidas Central UniversityFormally known as Guru Ghasidas Vishwavidyalaya, is a Central University located in Bilaspur, established under Central Universities Act 2009, No. 25 of 2009. Formerly called Ghasidas University(GGU), established by an Act of the State Legislative Assembly, was formally inaugurated on June 16, 1983. It covers almost the entire spectrum of the higher education requirements of the local people. It has several University Teaching Department (UTDs) on its campuses and about 125 colleges affiliated to it.()Chhattisgarh Swami Vivekanand Technical UniversitySwami Vivekanand Technical University (CSVTU) is a public university located in the city of Bhilai, the STEEL CITY. The university was established on 21 January 2005. The University incorporates the purpose of ensuring systematic, efficient and qualitative education in engineering and technological subjects including Architecture and Pharmacy at Research, Postgraduate, Degree and Diploma level.Premier Professional Colleges in ChattisgarhThere are three premier Professional Institutes in the state of Chattisgarh.National Institue of TechnologyNational Institute of Technology, Raipur is an important technical university located in Raipur, Chhattisgarh. Originally founded in 1956 as Govt. College of Mining & Metallurgy, institute is one of the oldest of its kind in India. Currently it is one of the 20 National Institutes of Technology, which have been accorded Institute of National Importance status by the NIT Act of the Indian Government.The institute offers 2 undergraduate (B.Tech. and B.Arch.) and 2 post graduate programmes M.Tech. and M.C.A. in 11 engineering disciplines and architecture.Indian Institute Of ManagementThe Indian Institute of Management Raipur,() is a Premium School in the state of Chhattisgarh. It is the tenth Institute of Management in the country.() The first batch of Post Graduate Programme of the institute was inaugurated by Dr Raman Singh, Chief Minister of Chhattisgarh on October 11, 2010.All India Institute of Medical ScienceCapital Raipur is all set to get a new India Institute of Medical Sciences in next two years. It will be a huge leap in availability of top notch Medical education and remarkable milestone in the availability of health services in Chhattisgarh.()Bastar Vaikalpik Chikitsa MahavidyalayaA premiear educational institute to promote, delopement and educate Alternative Medical SciencesJagdalpur, Dist. Bastar, ChhattisgarhNotesReferences*Books on Chhattisgarh**Deshbandhu Publication Division,  **Deshbandhu Publication Division,      **Deshbandhu Publication Division, Chhattisgarh: Beautiful & Bountiful (Study in Biodiversity of Chhattisgarh)**Ramesh Dewangan & Sunil Tuteja, Chhattisgarh Samagra**C.K. Chandrakar, Chhattisgarhi Shabadkosh  ....**C.K. Chandrakar, Manak Chhattisgarhi Vyakaran**C.K. Chandrakar, Chhattisgarhi Muhawara Kosh**Lawrence Babb, The Divine Hierarchy: Popular Hinduism in Central India**Saurabh Dube, Untouchable Pasts: Religion, Identity and Power among a Central Indian Community, 17801950 (on the Satnamis)**Ramdas Lamb, Rapt in the Name: Ramnamis, Ramnam and Untouchable Religion in Central India**Chad Bauman, Identifying the Satnam: Hindu Satnamis, Indian Christians, and Dalit Religion in Colonial Chhattisgarh, India (18681947) (Ph.D. dissertation, Princeton Theological Seminary, 2005)*Books by Indologist Prof H. L. Shukla :**List of books by Prof H. L. Shukla **Chhattisgarh Rediscoverd on oral history of the state, and**History of the People of Bastar*Folktales of Chhattisgarh*Tribal History of Central India by R.K. Sharma and S.K. Tiwari, Other linkExternal links*Chhattisgarh Photos, Videos, Maps and Tourism*Chhattisgarh Live*Folk Song & Ballad of Chhattisgarh*Chhattisgarh Web Directory*Chhattisgarh Classified & Online Directory*Chhattisgarh Web Portal*Chhattisgarh Post*Tourism Website of Chhattisgarh*Chhattisgarh News Video* *Chhattisgarhi Film Music*Chhattisgarhi Recipes/Food/Cuisineace:Chhattisgarhar:bn:zh-min-nan:Chhattisgarhbe:be-x-old:bh:bo:br:Chhattisgarhbg:ca:Chhattisgarhcs:hattsgarhcy:Chhattisgarhda:Chattisgarhde:Chhattisgarhdv:et:Chhattsgarhel:es:Chhattisgarheo:hatisgaroeu:Chhattisgarhfa:hif:Chhattisgarhfr:Chhattisgarhgu:hi:hsb:atisgarhr:Chhattisgarhbpy:id:Chhattisgarhit:Chhattisgarhhe:pam:Chhattisgarhka:sw:Chhattisgarhla:Chhattisgarhlv:hatsgarhalt:atisgarchashu:Cshattszgarhmk:ml:mr:ms:Chhattisgarhnl:Chhattisgarhne:new:ja:no:Chhattisgarhnn:Chhattisgarhor:pa:pnb:pl:Chhattisgarhpt:Chhattisgarhro:Chhattisgarhru:sa:simple:Chhattisgarhsk:atsgarhsr:sh:Chhattisgarhfi:Chhattisgarhsv:Chhattisgarhta:te:th:tg:tr:Chhattisgarhuk:vi:Chhattisgarhwar:Chhattisgarhyo:Chhattisgarhzh:
47763
Environmental_economics
Environmental economics is a subfield of economics concerned with environmental issues. Quoting from the Bureau of Economic Research Environmental Economics program:... Environmental Economics ... undertakes theoretical or empirical studies of the economic effects of national or local environmental policies around the world .... Particular issues include the costs and benefits of alternative environmental policies to deal with air pollution, water quality, toxic substances, solid waste, and global warming.()For an overview of international policy relating to environmental economics, see Runnals (2011)(Runnals, D. (2011) Environment and economy: joined at the hip or just strange bedfellows?. S.A.P.I.EN.S. 4 (1) ).Topics and conceptsCentral to environmental economics is the concept of failure.  Market failure means that markets fail to allocate resources efficiently. As stated by Hanley, Shogren, and White (2007) in their textbook Environmental Economics(Hanley, N., J. Shogren, and B. White (2007). Environmental Economics in Theory and Practice, Palgrave, London.): A market failure occurs when the market does not allocate scarce resources to generate the greatest social welfare. A wedge exists between what a private person does given market prices and what society might want him or her to do to protect the environment.  Such a wedge implies wastefulness or economic inefficiency; resources can be reallocated to make at least one person better off without making anyone else worse off. Common forms of market failure include externalities, non-excludability and non-rivalry.Externality: the basic idea is that an externality exists when a person makes a choice that affects other people that are not accounted for in the market price. For instance, a firm emitting pollution will typically not take into account the costs that its pollution imposes on others.  As a result, pollution in excess of the socially efficient level may occur. A classic definition influenced by Arrow and Meade is provided by Heller and Starrett (1976), who define an externality as a situation in which the private economy lacks sufficient incentives to create a potential market in some good and the nonexistence of this market results in losses of Pareto efficiency.(Heller, Walter P. and David A. Starrett (1976), On the Nature of Externalities, in: Lin, Stephen A.Y. (ed.), Theory and Measurement of Economic Externalities, Academic Press, New York, p.10)  In economic terminology, externalities are examples of failures, in which the unfettered market does not lead to an efficient outcome.Common property and non-exclusion: When it is too costly to exclude people from access to an environmental resource for which there is rivalry, market allocation is likely to be inefficient. The challenges related with common property and non-exclusion have long been recognized. Hardins (1968) concept of the of the commons popularized the challenges involved in non-exclusion and common property. commons refers to the environmental asset itself, common property resource or common pool resource refers to a property right regime that allows for some collective body to devise schemes to exclude others, thereby allowing the capture of future benefit streams; and open-access implies no ownership in the sense that property everyone owns nobody owns.(Ostrom, E. 1990. Governing the Commons. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.)The basic problem is that if people ignore the scarcity value of the commons, they can end up expending too much effort, harvesting a resource (e.g., a fishery). Hardin theorizes that in the absence of restrictions, users of an open-access resource will use it more than if they had to pay for it and had exclusive rights, leading to degradation.  See, however, Ostroms (1990) work on how people using real common property resources have worked to establish self-governing rules to reduce the risk of the tragedy of the commons.(Ostrom, E. 1990. Governing the Commons. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.)goods and non-rivalry: Public goods are another type of market failure, in which the market price does not capture the social benefits of its provision.  For example, protection from the risks of climate change is a public good since its provision is both non-rival and non-excludable.  Non-rival means climate protection provided to one country does not reduce the level of protection to another country; non-excludable means it is too costly to exclude any one from receiving climate protection.  A countrys incentive to invest in carbon abatement is reduced because it can free ride off the efforts of other countries. Over a century ago, Swedish economist Knut Wicksell (1896) first discussed how public goods can be under-provided by the market because people might conceal their preferences for the good, but still enjoy the benefits without paying for them.Image:Nitrogen_Cycle.jpg|Nitrogen CycleImage:Water cycle.png|Water CycleImage:Carbon cycle-cute diagram.svg|Carbon CycleImage:Oxygen Cycle.jpg|Oxygen Cycle Valuation Assessing the economic value of the environment is a major topic within the field. Use and indirect use are tangible benefits accruing from resources or services (see the nature section of ecological economics). Non-use values include existence, option, and bequest values. For example, some people may value the existence of a diverse set of species, regardless of the effect of the loss of a species on ecosystem services. The existence of these species may have an option value, as there may be possibility of using it for some human purpose (certain plants may be researched for drugs). Individuals may value the ability to leave a pristine environment to their children.Use and indirect use values can often be inferred from revealed behavior, such as the cost of taking recreational trips or using hedonic methods in which values are estimated based on observed prices.  Non-use values are usually estimated using stated preference methods such as valuation or modelling. Contingent valuation typically takes the form of surveys in which people are asked how much they would pay to observe and recreate in the environment (to pay) or their willingness to accept (WTA) compensation for the destruction of the environmental good. Hedonic pricing examines the effect the environment has on economic decisions through housing prices, traveling expenses, and payments to visit parks.(Harris J. (2006). Environmental and Natural Resource Economics: A Contemporary Approach. Houghton Mifflin Company.)SolutionsSolutions advocated to correct such externalities include:*  Environmental regulations. Under this plan, the economic impact has to be estimated by the regulator. Usually this is done using analysis.  There is a growing realization that regulations (also known as command and control instruments) are not so distinct from economic instruments as is commonly asserted by proponents of environmental economics.  E.g.1 regulations are enforced by fines, which operate as a form of tax if pollution rises above the threshold prescribed.  E.g.2 pollution must be monitored and laws enforced, whether under a pollution tax regime or a regulatory regime.  The main difference an environmental economist would argue exists between the two methods, however, is the total cost of the regulation.  Command and control regulation often applies uniform emissions limits on polluters, even though each firm has different costs for emissions reductions.  Some firms, in this system, can abate inexpensively, while others can only abate at high cost.  Because of this, the total abatement has some expensive and some inexpensive efforts to abate.  Environmental economic regulations find the cheapest emission abatement efforts first, then the more expensive methods second.  E.g. as said earlier, trading, in the quota system, means a firm only abates if doing so would cost less than paying someone else to make the same reduction.  This leads to a lower cost for the total abatement effort as a whole.* Quotas on pollution. Often it is advocated that pollution reductions should be achieved by way of emissions permits, which if freely traded may ensure that reductions in pollution are achieved at least cost. In theory, if such tradeable quotas are allowed, then a firm would reduce its own pollution load only if doing so would cost less than paying someone else to make the same reduction.  In practice, tradeable permits approaches have had some success, such as the U.S.s sulphur dioxide trading program or the EU Emissions Trading Scheme, and interest in its application is spreading to other environmental problems.* Taxes and tariffs on pollution/Removal of dirty subsidies. Increasing the costs of polluting will discourage polluting, and will provide a dynamic incentive, that is, the disincentive continues to operate even as pollution levels fall.  A pollution tax that reduces pollution to the socially optimal level would be set at such a level that pollution occurs only if the benefits to society (for example, in form of greater production) exceeds the costs. Some advocate a major shift from taxation from income and sales taxes to tax on pollution - the so-called tax shift.* Better defined rights. The Theorem states that assigning property rights will lead to an optimal solution, regardless of who receives them, if costs are trivial and the number of parties negotiating is limited. For example, if people living near a factory had a right to clean air and water, or the factory had the right to pollute, then either the factory could pay those affected by the pollution or the people could pay the factory not to pollute. Or, citizens could take action themselves as they would if other property rights were violated. The River Keepers Law of the 1880s was an early example, giving citizens downstream the right to end pollution upstream themselves if government itself did not act (an early example of democracy).  Many markets for pollution rights have been created in the late twentieth centurysee trading.  The assertion that defining property rights is a solution is controversial within the field of environmental economics and environmental law and policy more broadly; in Anglo-American and many other legal systems, one has the right to carry out any action unless the law expressly proscribes it.  Thus, property rights are already assigned (the factory that is polluting has a right to pollute). Relationship to other fields Environmental economics is related to economics but there are differences. Most environmental economists have been trained as economists. They apply the tools of economics to address environmental problems, many of which are related to so-called market failurescircumstances wherein the hand of economics is unreliable.  Most ecological economists have been trained as ecologists, but have expanded the scope of their work to consider the impacts of humans and their economic activity on ecological systems and services, and vice-versa. This field takes as its premise that economics is a strict subfield of ecology.  Ecological economics is sometimes described as taking a more pluralistic approach to environmental problems and focuses more explicitly on long-term environmental sustainability and issues of scale.Environmental economics is viewed as more pragmatic in a system; ecological economics as more idealistic in its attempts not use money as a primary arbiter of decisions. These two groups of specialists sometimes have conflicting views which may be traced to the different philosophical underpinnings.Another context in which externalities apply is when globalization permits one player in a market who is unconcerned with biodiversity to undercut prices of another who is - creating a race to the bottom in regulations and conservation. This in turn may cause loss of capital with consequent erosion, water purity problems, diseases, desertification, and other outcomes which are not efficient in an economic sense. This concern is related to the subfield of development and its political relation, the movement.Image:Sustainable development.svg|right|The three pillars of sustainability. Clickable.|300px|thumbpoly 138 194 148 219 164 240 182 257 219 277 263 291 261 311 264 331 272 351 283 366 300 383 316 394 287 408 261 417 224 424 182 426 154 423 119 415 87 403 58 385 40 368 24 347 17 328 13 309 16 286 26 263 43 240 64 224 84 212 107 202 Environmentpoly 324 219 334 226 343 234 351 242 359 251 366 263 371 276 375 287 400 279 417 272 438 263 453 252 466 241 477 229 488 214 497 193 482 189 463 188 423 188 398 191 376 196 352 204 Equitablepoly 319 221 330 229 337 235 347 244 357 258 365 270 371 287 358 289 344 291 321 292 303 292 284 290 268 288 272 275 278 261 287 249 297 239 Sustainablepoly 142 192 167 188 185 187 211 187 235 190 263 196 286 203 304 212 316 219 305 227 295 236 285 246 276 259 269 272 264 287 249 284 229 277 208 268 190 256 172 242 158 226 149 212 Bearable (Social ecology)poly 267 291 265 304 267 320 275 345 284 360 293 371 304 381 319 392 332 384 343 374 354 362 364 347 371 332 373 317 374 305 372 292 362 293 344 295 323 296 301 296 286 294 Viable (Environmental economics)poly 501 193 519 197 541 205 561 215 582 228 604 248 616 267 623 286 626 305 623 326 617 343 607 359 596 373 580 386 563 397 538 409 517 417 494 422 468 425 432 426 413 424 396 421 375 416 353 409 335 401 323 394 335 386 349 372 360 359 374 331 377 313 377 299 376 290 388 288 410 280 458 256 481 233 Economicpoly 141 188 139 173 143 147 152 126 169 107 191 88 216 75 242 65 280 55 310 53 352 54 379 60 415 71 447 88 461 99 475 112 488 128 496 147 500 162 500 176 500 189 471 185 452 183 410 185 369 194 337 206 319 216 305 208 279 197 257 191 230 185 199 183 199 182 199 183 SocialImage:Nested sustainability-v2.gif|thumb|right|altThree circles enclosed within one another showing how both economy and society are subsets that exist wholly within our planetary ecological system. |Three circles enclosed within one another showing how both economy and society are subsets of our planetary ecological system. This view is useful for correcting the misconception, sometimes drawn from the previous three pillars diagram that portions of social and economic systems can exist independently from the environment.(Bob Willard, 2011.  3 Sustainability Models : The Power of Sustainable Thinking by Bob Doppelt, and The Necessary Revolution by Peter Senge et al. Retrieved on: 2011-05-03.)Environmental economics was once distinct from economics. Natural resource economics as a subfield began when the main concern of researchers was the optimal commercial exploitation of natural resource stocks. But resource managers and policy-makers eventually began to pay attention to the broader importance of natural resources (e.g. values of fish and trees beyond just their commercial exploitation;, externalities associated with mining). It is now difficult to distinguish environmental and natural resource economics as separate fields as the two became associated with sustainability.  Many of the more radical economists split off to work on an alternate economy.Environmental economics was a major influence for the theories of capitalism and finance, which could be said to be two sub-branches of environmental economics concerned with conservation in production, and the of biodiversity to humans, respectively.  The theory of capitalism (Hawken, Lovins, Lovins) goes further than traditional environmental economics by envisioning a world where natural services are considered on par with physical capital.The more radical economists reject neoclassical economics in favour of a new economy beyond capitalism or communism that gives a greater emphasis to the interaction of the human economy and the natural environment, acknowledging that economy is three-fifths of ecology - Nickerson.These more radical approaches would imply changes to supply and likely also a democracy so that political, economic, and ecological environmental limits were all aligned, and not subject to the arbitrage normally possible under capitalism.Professional bodiesThe main academic and professional organizations for the discipline of Environmental Economics are the Association of Environmental and Resource Economists (AERE) and the European Association for Environmental and Resource Economics (EAERE).  The main academic and professional organization for the discipline of Ecological Economics is the Society for Ecological Economics (ISEE) and The Green Economics Institute for Green Economics greeneconomics.org.uk is its international Professional body. See also *Agroecology*Biofuel*finance*change in Washington*economics (policy think tank)*commerce*Eco-Money*Economics*Marketplace*Ecotax*balance*accounting*credit crunch*enterprise*finance*Investment Organisation*pricing reform*Tariff*trade*environmentalism*banking*economics*syndicalism*trading*of Environmental Economics and Management*resource*resource economics*of ecopreneurship*rights (economics)*resource*assessment*Sustainable Investing (SSI)*ecology*Ecological ForumHypotheses and theorems* theorem* hypothesisReferences* Allen K. Kneese and Clifford S. Russell (1987). environmental economics, New Palgrave: A Dictionary of Economics, v. 2, pp. 15964.* Robert N. Stavins (2008). environmental economics, New Palgrave Dictionary of Economics, 2nd Edition. Abstract & article.* Maureen L. Cropper and Wallace E. Oates (1992). Environmental Economics: A Survey, Journal of Economic Literature, 30(2), pp. 675-740(press +).* David Pearce (2002). An Intellectual History Of Environmental Economics, Annual Review of Energy and the Environment 2002, 27:5781.* UNEP (2007). Guidelines for Conducting Economic Valuation of Coastal Ecosystem Goods and Services, UNEP/GEF/SCS Technical Publication No. 8.* UNEP (2007). Procedure for Determination of National and Regional Economic Values for Ecotone Goods and Services, and Total Economic Values of Coastal Habitats in the context of the UNEP/GEF Project Entitled: Reversing Environmental Degradation Trends in the South China Sea and Gulf of Thailand, South China Sea Knowledge Document No. 3. UNEP/GEF/SCS/Inf.3 Notes (External links* The new green economy by Hillary Rosner 10.September.2010 UK*  - Environmental Economics course at the Harris School of Public Policy Studies* M. King Hubbert on the Nature of Growth. 1974* A green New Deal-environmental economics preposition (2008)* The Bioeconomy to 2030: Designing a Policy Agenda by the OECD*Environmental economics (Bank).* The Economic Benefits/Costs of Biophysical Systems to Business and Society NOAA Economics* Grant Thornton International Business Report Energy & Environment focus* Earth Index (PDF).* Sustainable Prosperity: building a greener and more prosperous economy for Canadians * The Environmental Economics Blog.* Environmental Economics: Basic Concepts and Debates* Introduction to environmental economics* University of Nebraska Natural Resource and Environmental Economics* UNEP/GEF Regional Task Force on Economic Valuation* IDEAS/RePEc list of environmental economists, and ranking of sameambientalde:Umweltkonomieambientalde lenvironnementhu:Krnyezet-gazdasgtannl:Milieueconomieja:no:miljkonomiambiental fi:Ympristtaloustiedesv:Miljekonomit hc mi trngzh:
48694
Richard_Llewellyn
Richard Dafydd Vivian Llewellyn Lloyd (8 December 1906 &ndash; 30 November 1983), better known by his name Richard Llewellyn, was a Welsh novelist.()()Llewellyn (real name Vivian Lloyd()()) was born of Welsh parents in Hendon, Middlesex in 1906. Only after his death was it discovered that his claim that he was born in Davids, Wales was false.((Llewellyn , Richard , 1906-1983) Several of his novels dealt with a Welsh theme, the best-known being Green Was My Valley (1939), which won international acclaim and was made into a classic Hollywood film. It immortalised the way of life of the Wales Valleys mining communities, where Llewellyn spent a small amount of time with his grandfather. Three sequels followed.(  He lived a peripatetic life, travelling widely throughout his life. Before War II, he spent periods working in hotels, wrote a play, worked as a coal miner and produced his best known novel. During World War II, he rose to the rank of Captain in the Guards. Following the war, he worked as a journalist, covering the Trials, and then as a screenwriter for MGM. Late in his life, he lived in Eilat, Israel.Protagonists who assume new identities, often because they are transplanted into foreign cultures, are a recurring element in Llewellyns novels, including a spy adventure (Edmund Trothe) that extends through several volumes.Llewellyn married twice: his first wife was Nona Sonstenby, whom he married in 1952 and divorced in 1968, and his second wife was Susan Heimann, whom he married in 1974.Richard Llewellyn died on 30 November 1983.  Bibliography  * Green Was My Valley (1939)* None but the Lonely Heart (1943)* Few Flowers for Shiner (1950) * Flame for Doubting Thomas (1954) * Witch (1955)* Hamish Gleave (1956)* Flame of Hercules (1957)* of the Smoke and Bells (1958)* Pavan (1959) * into the Singing Mountain (1960)* Man in a Mirror (1964)* Morn of Judas Day (1965)* Where the Moon is Small (1966) * of Israel My Love (1973)* of Many Dreams (1974)* Green My Valley Now (1975)* Sunrise, the Rough Music (1976)* Me Now and Again (1977)* Night of Bright Stars (1979)* Stand on a Quiet Shore (1982)Edmund Trothe series* of the Rug (1969)* We Didnt Get the Fox (1970)* Horse to Banbury Cross (1972)* Night is a Child (1974) Notes LlewellynLlewellynLlewellynLlewellynLlewellynLlewellynLlewellynLlewellynLlewellynLlewellyn
48997
Overseas_Chinese
Overseas Chinese () are people of Chinese birth or descent who live outside China. People of partial Chinese ancestry living outside the China may also consider themselves Overseas Chinese.The term Overseas Chinese can refer narrowly to those of Chinese ethnicity, or more broadly, to all 56 recognized ethnic groups in China; Chinese people in the sense of minzu. For example, members of the diaspora may travel to China on passes granted to certain Overseas Chinese.() In Asia and particularly in Malaysia and Singapore, the state classifies the Peranakan as Chinese despite partial assimilation into Malay culture.One study on overseas Chinese defines several criteria for identifying non-Han overseas Chinese: there is evidence of descent from groups living within or originating from China, they still retain their culture, self-identify with Chinese culture or acknowledge Chinese origin, although they are not categorized as ethnic Han Chinese. Under this definition, ethnic minority overseas Chinese number about 7 million, or about 8.4% of the total overseas population.TerminologyThe language has various terms equivalent to the English Overseas Chinese which refers to citizens residing in countries other than China: Huqio () or Hoan-kheh in Hokkien () .Huy () refers to ethnic Chinese residing outside of China. http://www.hup.harvard.edu/features/reference/panenc/huaqiao.html Another often-used term is  (Hiwi Hurn), a more literal translation of Overseas Chinese; it is often used by the PRC government to refer to people of Chinese ethnicities who live outside the PRC, regardless of citizenship.Overseas Chinese who are ethnically Han Chinese, such as Cantonese, Hokkien, or Hakka refer to Overseas Chinese as  (Tngrn), pronounced thng yn in Cantonese, Tng-lng in Hokkien, and tong nyin in Hakka. Literally, it means Tang people, a reference to Tang dynasty China when it was ruling China proper. It should be noted that this term is commonly used by the Cantonese, Hakka and Hokkien as a colloquial reference to the Chinese people, and has little relevance to the ancient dynasty.HistoryThe Chinese people have a long history of migrating overseas. One of the migrations dates back to the dynasty when He (13711435) became the envoy of Ming. He sent people  - many of them Cantonese and Hokkien - to explore and trade in the China Sea and in the Ocean.Waves of immigrationDifferent waves of immigration led to subgroups among overseas Chinese such as the new and old immigrants in Asia, America, Oceania, the Caribbean, America, Africa and Russia.In the 19th century, the age of colonialism was at its height and the great Chinese Diaspora began.  Many colonies lacked a large pool of laborers.  Meanwhile, in the provinces of Fujian and Guangdong in China, there was a surge in emigration as a result of the poverty and ruin caused by the rebellion.(The Story of California From the Earliest Days to the Present, by Henry K. Norton. 7th ed. Chicago, A.C. McClurg & Co., 1924. Chapter XXIV, pp. 283-296.) The Qing Empire was forced to allow its subjects to work overseas under colonial powers.  Many Hokkien chose to work in Southeast Asia (where they had earlier links starting from the Ming era), as did the Cantonese. The city of Taishan in Guangdong province was the source for many of the economic migrants. For the countries in America and Australasia, great numbers of laborers were needed in the dangerous tasks of mining and railway construction.  Widespread famine in Guangdong impelled many Cantonese to work in these countries to improve the living conditions of their relatives.  Some overseas Chinese were sold to America during the Clan Wars (18551867) in the River Delta in Guangdong. After War II many people from the Territories in Kong emigrated to the UK (mainly England) and to the Netherlands to earn a better living.From the mid-19th century onward, emigration has been directed primarily to Western countries such as the States, Canada, Australia, Zealand, Brazil, and the nations of Europe; as well as to Peru where they are called tusn, Panama, and to a lesser extent to Mexico. Many of these emigrants who entered Western countries were themselves overseas Chinese or were from Taiwan or Hong Kong, particularly from the 1950s to the 1980s, a period during which the PRC placed severe restrictions on the movement of its citizens. In 1984, Britain agreed to transfer the sovereignty of Kong to the PRC; this triggered another wave of migration to the United Kingdom (mainly England), Australia, Canada, USA, Latin America and other parts of the world.  The Square protests of 1989 further accelerated the migration.  The wave calmed after Hong Kongs transfer of sovereignty in 1997. In addition, many citizens of Hong Kong hold citizenships or have current visas in other countries so if the need arises, they can leave Hong Kong at short notice.  In fact, after the Tiananmen Square incident, the lines for immigration visas increased at every consulate in Hong Kong.  More recent Chinese presences have developed in Europe, where they number nearly a million, and in Russia, they number over 600,000, concentrated in Far East. Chinese who emigrated to Vietnam beginning in the 18th century are referred to as Hoa.It is estimated that only 26,700 of the old Chinese community now remain in Korea.()  However, in recent years, immigration from mainland China has increased; 624,994 persons of Chinese nationality have immigrated to South Korea, including 443,566 of ethnic Korean descent.()In recent years, the Republic of China has built increasingly stronger ties with African nations. As of August 2007, there were an estimated 750,000 Chinese nationals working or living for extended periods in different African countries.(Chinese flocking in numbers to a new frontier: Africa) An estimated 200,000 ethnic Chinese live in Africa.(SA-Born Chinese and the Colours of Exclusion, allAfrica.com:) In a 2007 New York Times article, Chad Chamber of Commerce Director estimated an influx of at least 40,000 Chinese in coming years to Chad.  as many as 40,000 Chinese lived in Namibia,(China and Africa: Stronger Economic Ties Mean More Migration, By Malia Politzer, Migration Information Source, August 2008) an estimated 80,000 Chinese in Zambia(Zambians wary of exploitative Chinese employers, irinnews.org, November 23, 2006) and 50,000 Chinese in Nigeria.(Direct air flights between Nigeria, China proposed, China Daily, August 30, 2008) As many as 100,000 Chinese live and work across Angola.(Chinas African Misadventures, Newsweek, December 3, 2007)  35,000 Chinese migrant workers lived in Algeria.(Chinese, Algerians fight in Algiers - witnesses. Reuters. August 4, 2009.)Russias main Pacific port and naval base of Vladivostok, once closed to foreigners,  bristles with Chinese markets, restaurants and trade houses.(Chinese Come To Russia) Experts predict that the diaspora in Russia will increase to at least 10 million by 2010 and Chinese may become the dominant ethnic group in the Russian Far East region 20 to 30 years from now.( A Chinese Invasion)(Chinese Presence Grows in Russian Far East)(Vladivostoks Chinese puzzle)Other experts discount such stories estimating the numbers of Chinese in Russia at less than half a million, most of whom are temporary traders.(http://www.russiablog.org/2009/04/post_15.php)A growing Chinese community in Germany consists of around 76,000 people .(Chinesen in Deutschland  ein historischer berblick) An estimated 15,000 to 30,000 Chinese live in Austria,(Heimat ssauer) including a significant Chinese community in Vienna.OccupationsThe Chinese in Southeast Asian countries have established themselves in commerce and finance.(The worlds successful diasporas) In North America, Europe and Oceania, occupations are diverse and impossible to generalize; ranging from catering to significant ranks in medicine, arts, and academia.Overseas Chinese experienceThe Chinese usually identify a person by ethnic origin instead of nationality. As long as the person is of Chinese descent, that person is considered Chinese, and if that person lives outside of China, that person is overseas Chinese. The majority of PRC Chinese do not understand the overseas Chinese experience of being a minority, as ethnic Han Chinese comprise approximately 92% of the population.DiscriminationOverseas Chinese have sometimes experienced hostility and discrimination (see Sinophobia).In countries with small Chinese minorities, the economic disparity can be remarkable. For example, in 1998, ethnic Chinese made up just 1% of the population of the Philippines and 3% of the population in Indonesia, but controlled 40% of the Philippines private economy and 70% of the Indonesian private economy (Indonesian analysts believe this is a false claim since most of Indonesias wealth was controlled by the military)(Chua. pg. 3 & 43.) In Malaysia the low birth rate of Chinese decreased its relative population from one half to one third. One study of the Chinese as a market-dominant minority notes that Chinese market dominance and intense resentment amongst the indigenous majority is characteristic of virtually every country in Southeast Asia except Thailand and Singapore.(Chua. (2003). pg. 61.)This asymmetrical economic position has incited anti-Chinese sentiment among the poorer majorities. Sometimes the anti-Chinese attitudes turn violent, such as the 13 Incident in Malaysia in 1969 and the riots of May 1998 in Indonesia, in which more than 2,000 people died mostly rioters burned to death in a shopping mall.(Malaysias race rules. The Economist Newspaper Limited (2005-08-25). Requires login.) During the colonial era, some genocides killed ten thousands of Chinese.()()()()()During the killings of 196566, in which more than 500,000 people died,(Indonesian academics fight burning of books on 1965 coup, smh.com.au) ethnic Chinese were killed and their properties looted and burned as a result of anti-Chinese racism on the excuse that Dipa Amat Aidit had brought the PKI closer to China.(Vickers (2005), p. 158)(BBC News | Analysis | Indonesia: Why ethnic Chinese are afraid) The anti-Chinese legislation was in the Indonesian constitution until 1998.A major point of friction is the apparent tendency of overseas Chinese to segregate themselves into a subculture. For example, the anti-Chinese Kuala Lumpur Racial Riots of 13 May 1969 and Riots of May 1998 were believed to have been motivated by these racially-biased perceptions.(Wages of Hatred. Michael Shari. Business Week.) In 2006, rioters damaged shops owned by Chinese-Tongans in Nukualofa.(Editorial: Racist moves will rebound on Tonga, New Zealand Herald, November 23, 2001) Chinese migrants were evacuated from the riot-torn Islands.(Spiller, Penny: Riots highlight Chinese tensions, BBC News, Friday, 21 April 2006, 18:57 GMT)Ethnic politics can be found to motivate both sides of the debate. In Malaysia, Overseas Chinese tend to support equal and meritocratic treatment on the expectation that they would not be discriminated against in the resulting competition for government contracts, university places, etc., whereas many Bumiputra (native sons) Malays oppose this on the grounds that their group needs such protections in order to retain their patrimony. The question of to what extent ethnic Malays, Chinese, or others are native to Malaysia is a sensitive political one. It is currently a taboo for Chinese politicians to raise the issue of Bumiputra protections in parliament, as this would be deemed ethnic incitement.(Race clouds Malaysian birthday festivities)Many of the overseas Chinese who worked on railways in North America in the 19th century suffered from racial discrimination in Canada and the States.  Although discriminatory laws have been repealed or are no longer enforced today, both countries had at one time introduced statutes that barred Chinese from entering the country, for example the United States Exclusion Act of 1882 (repealed 1943) or the Canadian Immigration Act, 1923 (repealed 1947).AssimilationFile:East Timor hakka wedding.jpg|thumb|right|people in a wedding in Timor, 2006Overseas Chinese vary widely as to their degree of assimilation, their interactions with the surrounding communities (see Chinatown), and their relationship with China. Thailand has the largest overseas Chinese community and is also the most successful case of full assimilation. For over 400 years, Thai-Chinese have largely intermarried and assimilated with their compatriots. The present Thai monarch, Chakri Dynasty, is founded by King Rama I who himself is partly Chinese. His Predecessor, King Taksin of Thonburi dynastry, is the son of Chinese immigrant from Guangdong Province and is born with Chinese name. In Myanmar, the Chinese rarely intermarry (even amongst different Chinese linguistic groups), but have largely adopted the Burmese culture whilst maintaining Chinese culture affinities. Between 1965 to 1993, the affairs of state once were prevent to those with Chinese name, yielded the number of people switched to the local term instead in Cambodia. Indonesia, and Myanmar were among the countries that do not allow birth names to be registered in foreign languages, including Chinese. But since 2003, the Indonesian government has allowed overseas Chinese to use their Chinese name or using their Chinese family name on their birth certificate.In Vietnam, Chinese names are pronounced with Sino-Vietnamese readings. For example, the name of the Chinese president,  (pinyin: H Jnto), would be transcribed as H Cm o. In Western countries, the overseas Chinese generally use romanised versions of their Chinese names, and the use of local first names is also common.On the other hand, in Malaysia, Singapore and Brunei, overseas Chinese have maintained a distinct communal identity, though the rate and state of being assimilated to the local, in this case a multicultural society, is currently on par with that of other Chinese communities (see Peranakan).  In the Philippines many younger Overseas Chinese are well assimilated, whereas the older ones tend to be considered as foreigners. The Chinese have also brought a cultural influence to some other countries such as Vietnam, where many Chinese customs have been adopted by native Vietnamese.()LanguageThe usage of Chinese languages by overseas Chinese has been determined by a large number of factors, including their ancestry, their migrant ancestors regime of origin, assimilation through generational changes, and official policies of their country of residence. The general trend is - increase of Mandarin-speaking Chinese among the new arrivals, making it the most common language of chinatowns.(As Mandarin language becomes standard, Chinatown explores new identity)Southeast AsiaWithin Asia, the language situation of overseas Chinese varies greatly even amongst neighboring nations.SingaporeIn Singapore, a nation with an ethnic Chinese majority population, Mandarin is recognized as one of its official languages, along with Chinese characters, in contrast to other overseas Chinese communities which almost exclusively used Chinese characters until the 1990s, when nationals of the PRC began to emigrate in substantial numbers and brought with them the simplified Chinese characters. Although ethnic Chinese in Singapore are predominantly of Hokkien descent, the government of Singapore discourages the usage of non-Mandarin languages through the Mandarin Campaign. The official policy in Singapore also has an impact on neighboring Johor, in southern Peninsular Malaysia, where Mandarin is predominantly spoken among the Chinese communities there. As the Singapore government actively promotes English as the common language of the multiracial society of Singapore, younger Chinese Singaporeans are mostly bilingual in Mandarin and English.MalaysiaChinese Malaysians speak a wide variety of dialects and Mandarin, their prevalence being concentrated around particular metropolitan centres: the Penang, Klang, Kelantan and Malacca groups are predominantly Hokkien-speaking (Penang has its own version of Hokkien, Kelantan has its own version of Hokkien too); the Lumpur, Seremban and Ipoh groups are predominantly Cantonese and Hakka-speaking; whereas in Malaysia (Malaysian Borneo), Hakka and Mandarin are widely spoken, except in Sibu, where the dialect is predominant, and in Sandakan, where Cantonese is spoken. Regardless of location, however, younger generations tend to speak Mandarin, which is taught in schools. A significant number of Chinese are English-educated, who speak mainly English. Most Chinese Malaysians can speak Malay, the national language, and English, which is widely used in business.IndonesiaEthnic Chinese in Indonesia and Thailand had been subjected to official, and at times draconian, assimilation policies, and as a result many of them are no longer proficient in the Chinese language (particularly ethnic Chinese who lived in Java). Chinese who lived in Sumatra did not give up some of the dialects. Most of the ethnic Chinese in Medan, the capital of North Sumatra, are still able to speak creole Hokkien within their community. This is due to the number of generations that have lived in Indonesia and their exposure to cultural assimilation. Most of the ethnic Chinese who live in Java have a long line (10 generations) of forefathers before them, where the ethnic Chinese who live in Sumatra have a relatively short generation of forefathers (4 or 5 generations). There is also a small population of Hakka Chinese in Indonesia, most notably in Belitung province,() Pontianak and Singkawang where they form a significant part of the local population. Chinese Indonesians identity are more Indonesians compared to Chinese.ThailandThailand is home to the largest and most integrated Overseas Chinese community. The present Thai monarch, Chakri Dynastry, is founded by King Rama I who himself is partly Chinese. His Predecessor, King Taksin of Thonburi dynastry, is the son of Chinese immigrant from Guangdong Province and is born with Chinese name. Majority of Prime Ministers in Thailand are of Chinese descent. Most ethnic Chinese in Thailand live in cities such as Bangkok, Chiang Mai, Phuket, Hat Yai and Nakhon Sawan. A large majority of them belong to the Teochew dialect group of Han Chinese. A small number of Chinese people, mainly belonging to the Yunnanese dialect group, also live in the northern part of Thailand which is in close proximity to their homeland in Yunnan province of China. Charoen Pokphand Group, founded by Thai-Chinese Chearavanont family, is currenly single largest foreign investors in China.(- CP Group)VietnamA large number of Chinese people live in Saigon city and most of them belong to the Cantonese dialect group of Han Chinese, tracing their ancestral homeland to the southern part of Guangdong province in China.CambodiaChinese are a visible ethnic group of Cambodia and constitute around 7% of the population.(http://news.xinhuanet.com/english/2008-06/07/content_8324545.htm) Chinese ethnics can be seen in all towns and many towns are exclusive to ethnic Chinese. Most Cambodians belong to the Hokkien and Teochew dialect groups. Many Khmer people are taught Mandarin in school along side many Sino-Khmers and ethnic people.LaosMyanmarBruneiA variety of Chinese dialects are spoken in Brunei. Mandarin and Hokkien are the most commonly spoken dialects in the country.PhilippinesThe most widely spoken dialects are Hokkien (there is a native form of Hokkien called Lan-nang-oe) and Cantonese. Mandarin is taught at all Chinese schools, and in most Chinese schools, the traditional Chinese script is usually taught.North AmericaMany overseas Chinese populations in North America speak some variety of Chinese.  In the United States and Canada, Chinese is the third most spoken language.()()  Cantonese has historically been the most prevalent variety due to immigrants being mostly from southern China from the 19th century up through the 1980s.(()  However, Mandarin is becoming increasingly more prevalent due to the opening up of the PRC.(In York City at least, although Mandarin is spoken as a native language among only ten percent of Chinese speakers, it is used as a secondary dialect among the greatest number of them and is on its way to replace Cantonese as their franca.()  Although Chinese is spoken natively by a third of the Chinese population there, it is not used as a lingua franca because speakers of other dialect groups do not learn Min.(In Richmond (part of the Vancouver metropolitan area in Canada), 44% of the population is Chinese.(Community Profiles from the 2006 Census - Richmond. Statistics Canada. Retrieved 2011-01-16.)  Chinese words can be seen everywhere from local banks to  grocery stores.  In the broader Vancouver Census Metropolitan Area, 18% of the population is Chinese. Similarly in Toronto, which is the largest city in Canada, Chinese people make up 11.4% of the local population with the percentages higher in the suburbs of Markham, Mississauga and within the city in its east end of Scarborough. In these regions Chinese people make up between 20-50% of their total populations respectively.(Community Profiles from the 2006 Census - Vancouver CMA. Statistics Canada. Retrieved 2011-01-16.)  Cantonese and Mandarin are the most popular Chinese languages.Relationship with ChinaBoth the Republic of China and the of China maintain highly complex relationships with overseas Chinese populations.  Both maintain cabinet level ministries to deal with overseas Chinese affairs, and many local governments within the PRC have overseas Chinese bureaus.  Both the PRC and ROC have some legislative representation for overseas Chinese.  In the case of the PRC, some seats in the Peoples Congress are allocated for returned overseas Chinese.  In the ROCs Yuan, there used to be eight seats allocated for overseas Chinese.  These seats were apportioned to the political parties based on their vote totals on Taiwan, and then the parties assigned the seats to overseas Chinese party loyalists.  Now, political parties in the ROC are still allowed to assign overseas Chinese into the Legislative Yuan, but they are not required to.  Most of these members elected to the Legislative Yuan hold dual citizenship, but must renounce their foreign citizenship before being sworn in.Overseas Chinese have sometimes played an important role in Chinese politics.  Most of the funding for the Chinese revolution of 1911 came from overseas Chinese.During the 1950s and 1960s, the ROC tended to seek the support of overseas Chinese communities through branches of the Kuomintang based on Yat-sens use of expatriate Chinese communities to raise money for his revolution. During this period, the Peoples Republic of China tended to view overseas Chinese with suspicion as possible capitalist infiltrators and tended to value relationships with southeast Asian nations as more important than gaining support of overseas Chinese, and in the declaration explicitly stated that overseas Chinese owed primary loyalty to their home nation. On the other hand, overseas Chinese in their home nations were often persecuted for suspected or fabricated ties to Communist China. This was used as a pretext for the massacres of ethnic Chinese in Indonesia and other Southeast Asian countries.After the Xiaoping reforms, the attitude of the PRC toward overseas Chinese changed dramatically.  Rather than being seen with suspicion, they were seen as people which could aid PRC development via their skills and capital.  During the 1980s, the PRC actively attempted to court the support of overseas Chinese by among other things, returning properties that were confiscated after the 1949 revolution.  More recently PRC policy has attempted to maintain the support of recently emigrated Chinese, who consist largely of Chinese seeking graduate education in the West. Many overseas Chinese are now investing in mainland China providing financial resources, social and cultural networks, contacts and opportunities. However, some distrust between Chinese and overseas Chinese still remains.(http://www.statesman.com/news/world/u-s-ambassador-nominee-stirs-strong-emotions-in-1317218.html)According to Article 5 of the Law of the Peoples Republic of China:  Any person born abroad whose parents are both Chinese nationals or one of whose parents is a Chinese national shall have Chinese nationality. But a person whose parents are both Chinese nationals and have both settled abroad, or one of whose parents is a Chinese national and has settled abroad, and who has acquired foreign nationality at birth shall not have Chinese nationality.(Nationality Law of the Peoples Republic of China - china.org.cn) However the Law of the Republic of China, which permits dual citizenship, considers these persons to be citizens of the ROC.Current numbersThere are over 40 million overseas Chinese,(http://english.peopledaily.com.cn/200505/30/eng20050530_187556.html) mostly living in Asia where they make up a majority of the population of Singapore and significant minority populations in Thailand, Malaysia, Indonesia, Brunei, the Philippines, and Vietnam.  The overseas populations in those areas arrived between the 16th and 19th centuries mostly from the maritime provinces of Guangdong and Fujian, followed by Hainan. There were incidences of earlier emigration from the 15th centuries in particular to Malacca.()Urban areas with large Chinese populations include Bangkok with 2,900,000 (2009 census, registered resident only), Singapore with 2,800,000 (2010 census), Lumpur with 612,277 (2000 census, city only),() Penang with 650,000 (2005), Jakarta with 528,300 (2010 census), York City Metropolitan Area with 665,714 and the Jose-San Francisco-Oakland Combined Statistical Area with 562,355 (2009),() as well as the Toronto Area with 486,300 (2006 Census, metropolitan area).()StatisticsStatistics compiled using local country statistics or best available estimates. Note that the percentages may not add up due to varying census and estimate dates.ReturningIn the case of Indonesia and Burma, political and ethnic strife has cause a significant number of people of Chinese origins to re-emigrate.Due to the growing economic strength and the influence on the world, many overseas Chinese have began to migrate back to China. The trend is expected to rise even more in the future.See also*legislation in Indonesia*Latin American*Bumiputra*migration*Chinatown, the article, and Chinatowns the international category list*Clan Association*Consolidated Benevolent Association*Kongers*of overseas Chinese*Chinese banks*Chinese Affairs Office*culture kidNotes# The Japanese nationals with Chinese ethnicity are excluded.# This number includes 443,566 people called Joseonjok (). Joseonjok people are the Koreans who have Chinese citizenship. The 181,428 Chinese people who are ethnic Chinese (calculated from 624,994-443,566) in Korea are called Hwagyo (). (See reference)ReferencesFurther reading*Pan, Lynn. The Encyclopedia of the Chinese Overseas, Landmark Books, Singapore, 1998. ISBN 981-4155-90-X*Chin, Ung Ho. The Chinese of South East Asia, London: Minority Rights Group, 2000. ISBN 1-897693-28-1*Lpez-Calvo, Ignacio. Imaging the Chinese in Cuban Literature and Culture, Gainesville, Florida: University Press of Florida, 2008. ISBN 0-8130-3240-7*Fitzgerald, John. Big White Lie: Chinese Australians in White Australia, UNSW Press, Sydney, 2007. ISBN 978-0868408-70-5External links*Andrewkidz Collections Library - The Overseas Chinese Biographies*Overseas Chinese Affairs Office of the State Council of the Peoples Republic of China *Overseas Chinese Affairs Commission, R.O.C.*Ohio University Study on Distribution of the Overseas Chinese Population*The Distribution of the Overseas Chinese in the Contemporary World*Museum of Chinese in the Americas*The Overseas Chinese returnees movement *Chinese in Africade:Auslandschinesenes:Tusnchinoisehak:F-khiuko:Cina seberang lautChinezenja:chiskaru:sah:th:kiuzh:
49669
Groom_Lake
File:Groom Lake and Papoose Lake.jpg|thumb|250px|right|Groom Lake with Lake noticeable at the lower rightGroom Lake is a flat in Nevada used for runways of the Nellis Bombing Range Test Site airport (KXTA) on the north of the Area 51 USAF military installation.  The lake at (*) elevation is ~ from north to south and  from east to west at its widest point.(  Located within the namesake Groom Lake Valley portion of the Basin, the lake is northeast of Lakes (Sector Four) location and ~ south of Nevada.(DREAMLAND: Fifty Years of Secret Flight Testing in Nevada By Peter W. Merlin)HistoryLead and silver were discovered in the southern part of the Groom Range in 1864,(Mineral resources of the Pahranagat Range 30 by 60 quadrangle, Joseph V. Tingley, Nevada Bureau of Mines and Geology, of Nevada, Reno, 1989, retrieved 11 June 2010) and the English Groome Lead Mines Limited company financed the Conception Mines in the 1870s, giving the district its name (nearby mines included Maria, Willow and White Lake).(A Guide to the Records of The Groom Mining District Collection No. 99-19, Mathewson-IGT Knowledge Center, of Nevada, Reno)  The interests in Groom were acquired by J. B. Osborne and partners and patented in 1876, and his son acquired the interests in the 1890s.(  Claims were incorporated as two 1916 companies with mining continuing until 1918 and resuming after War II until the early 1950s.( References LakeGroomGroomru:-
50465
Democratic_Republic_of_Afghanistan
currencythumb|right|200px|First flag of the Peoples Democratic Party of Afghanistan.The Democratic Republic of Afghanistan was a government of Afghanistan between 1978 and 1992 recognised by 8 countries.(Afghanistan: Politics, Economics, and Society: Revolution, Resistance, Intervention; page 128) It was both ideologically close to and economically dependent on the Union, and was a major belligerent of the Civil War. Saur Revolution The advent of the communist revolution in Afghanistan can be traced to the assassination of Mohammed Akbar Khaibar on April 17, 1978.  Mohammed Akbar Khaibar was a prominent member of the Democratic Party of Afghanistan (PDPA) and, allegedly, was killed by the government of President Daoud Khan.(Bradsher, Henry S. Afghanistan and the Soviet Union. Durham: Duke Press Policy Studies, 1983. p. 7273) The government denied involvement, but the leaders of the PDPA feared that Daoud was planning to exterminate them all.  Many were arrested after the funeral of Khyber, including Muhammad Taraki and Karmal.(Hilali, A. Z. The Soviet Penetration into Afghanistan and the Marxist Coup. The Journal of Slavic Military Studies 18, no. 4 (2005): 673716, p. 709.) Amin and a number of military wing officers of the PDPA managed to remain at large and organized.On 27 April 1978 the PDPA, led by Mohammad Taraki, Karmal and Amin overthrew the regime of Mohammad Daoud. On the morning of April 28, 1978, Mohammad Daoud and his family were executed.(Garthoff, Raymond L. Dtente and Confrontation. Washington D.C.: The Brookings Institute, 1994. p. 986.) The uprising was known as the Great Saur Revolution (Saur being to the month in the Calendar in which the revolution occurred). On 1 May, Taraki became President, Minister and Secretary of the PDPA. The country was then renamed the Democratic Republic of Afghanistan (DRA), and the PDPA regime lasted, in some form or another, until April 1992.In 1967, two years after its founding, the PDPA had split into several factions. Ten years later the efforts of the Union reunited the Khalq faction of Taraki and the Parcham faction of Karmal. The Revolution, as the new government labeled its detat, after the month in the Islamic calendar in which it occurred, was almost entirely the achievement of the Khalq faction of the PDPA. This success gave it effective control over the armed forces, a great advantage over its Parchami rival. Khalqs victory was partially due to Daouds miscalculation that Parcham was the more serious threat. Parchams leaders had enjoyed widespread connections within the senior bureaucracy and even the royal family and the most privileged elite. These linkages also tended to make their movements easy to trace.Khalq, on the other hand, had not been involved in Daouds government, had little connection with Kabuls Persian speaking elite, and a rustic reputation based on recruitment of students from the provinces. Most of them were Pashtuns, especially the Ghilzais. They had few apparent connections in the senior bureaucracy, many had taken jobs as school teachers. Khalqs influence at Kabul University was also limited.These newcomers to Kabul had seemed poorly positioned to penetrate the government. Moreover, they were led by the erratic Mohammed Taraki, a poet, sometime minor official, and a publicly notorious radical. Confident that his military officers were reliable, Daoud must have discounted the diligence of Tarakis lieutenant, Hafizullah Amin, who had sought out dissident Pashtun officers. The bungling of Amins arrest, which enabled him to trigger the coup ahead of its planned date, also suggests Khalqs penetration of Daouds security police.The organisers of the coup had carried out a bold and sophisticated plan. It employed the shock effect of a combined armored and air assault on the Argor palace, the seat of Daouds highly centralized government. Seizure of the initiative demoralized the larger loyal or uncommitted forces nearby. Quick capture of telecommunications, the defense ministry and other strategic centers of authority isolated Daouds stubbornly resisting palace guard.The coup was by far Khalqs most successful achievement. So much so, that considerable literature has accumulated arguing that it must have been planned and executed by the KGB, or some special branch of the Soviet military. Given the friction that soon developed between Khalq and Soviet officials, especially over the purging of Parcham, Soviet control of the coup seems unlikely. Prior knowledge of it does appear to have been highly likely. Claims that Soviet pilots bombed the palace overlook the availability of seasoned Afghan pilots.Political leadership of the Democratic Republic of Afghanistan was asserted within three days of the military takeover. After thirteen years of conspiratorial activity, the two factions of the PDPA emerged in public, refusing at first, to admit their Marxist credentials. Khalqs dominance was quickly apparent. Taraki became president, prime minister and General Secretary of the PDPA, Hafizullah Amin as deputy prime minister. Parchams leader, Babrak Karmal was also named deputy prime minister. Cabinet membership was split eleven to ten, with Khalq in the majority. Khalq dominated the Revolutionary Council, which was to serve as the ruling body of the government. Within weeks purges of Parcham began and by summer Khalqs somewhat bewildered Soviet patrons became aware of how difficult it would be to temper its radicalism. Reforms and repression, 19781979 Once in power, the PDPA implemented a socialist agenda. It moved to promote atheism.(http://www.vfw.org/resources/levelxmagazine/0203_Soviet-Afghan%20War.pdf The Soviet-Afghan War:Breaking the Hammer & Sickle) The regime abolished Muslim laws and encouraged men to cut off their beards. Women were no longer allowed to wear the Burqa, and mosques were placed off limits during the reforms. The mosques re-opened in the 80s, because the party tried to win more supporters. It carried out an ambitious reform, waiving farmers debts countrywide and abolishing usury  intended to release the poorer farmers from peonage.()The government of the Peoples Democratic Party of Afghanistan moved to prohibit traditional practices which were deemed feudal in nature, including banning price (Mahr) and marriage. The minimum age for marriage was also raised. Education was stressed for both men and women and widespread literacy programmes were set up.(WOMEN IN AFGHANISTAN: Pawns in mens power struggles) According to sources, in 1988, women made up 40 percent of the doctors and 60 percent of the teachers at the of Kabul; 440,000 female students were enrolled in educational institutions and 80,000 more in literacy programs. Western dress was common in the cities, and women enjoyed freedom from having to cover their faces with veils.(Scapegoating of Muslim Women - Down with Quebecs Niqab Ban!, Spartacist Canada, Summer 2010, No. 165)thumb|right|Soviet image of an Afghan crowd, circa 1980. The crowd is wearing Western style clothing, with Western hairstyles.Such reforms however were not universally well-received, being viewed by many Afghans (particularly in rural areas) as the imposition of secular western values considered to be alien to Afghan culture and un-Islamic. As had happened earlier in the century, resentment with the governments programme and the manner in which it was imposed, along with widespread repression, provoked a backlash from tribal and Islamic leaders.(The PDPA invited the Union to assist in modernizing its economic infrastructure (predominantly its exploration and mining of rare minerals and natural gas). The USSR also sent contractors to build roads, hospitals and schools and to drill water wells; they also trained and equipped the Afghan army. In April 1978, the USSR delivered to Afghanistan free of charge 45 BTR-65 PB armored personnel carriers with ammunition; 26 combat radios for border troops; 10,000 Kalashnikov rifles (AK); and 5,000 Makarov pistols (PM) with ammunition, totalling about 6.3 million rubles.(http://www.wilsoncenter.org/index.cfm?topic_id1409&fuseactionva2.document&identifier5034D1F4-96B6-175C-92656F5C5B6B4973&sortCollection&itemSoviet%20Invasion%20of%20Afghanistan) Upon the PDPAs ascension to power, and the establishment of the DRA, the Soviet Union promised monetary aid amounting to at least $1.262 billion.The destruction of Afghanistans former ruling elite had begun immediately after the seizure of power. Execution (Parcham leaders later claimed at least 11,000 during the Taraki/Amin period), flight into exile, and later the devastation of Kabul itself would literally remove the great majority of the some 100,000 who had come to form Afghanistans elite and middle class. Their loss almost completely broke the continuity of Afghanistans leadership, political institutions and their social foundation. Karmal was dispatched to Czechoslovakia as ambassador, along with others shipped out of the country. Amin appeared to be the principal beneficiary of this strategy.The Khalq leadership proved incapable of filling this vacuum. Its brutal and clumsy attempts to introduce radical changes in control over agricultural land holding and credit, rural social relations, marriage and family arrangements, and education led to scattered protests and uprisings among all major communities in the Afghan countryside. Taraki and Amin left a legacy of turmoil and resentment which gravely compromised later Marxist attempts to win popular acceptance.The human rights violations of the Khalq extended beyond the educated elite. Between April 1978 and the Soviet invasion of December 1979, Afghan Communists executed an estimated 27,000 political prisoners at Pul-i-Charki prison six miles east of Kabul. Many of the victims were village mullahs and headmen who were obstructing the modernization and secularization of the intensely religious Afghan countryside. The Khalq leadership introduced to Afghanistan the knock on the door in the middle of the night, previously little known in that country, where the central government usually lacked the power to enforce its will beyond Kabul.(Kaplan, Robert D., Soldiers of God: With Islamic Warriors in Afghanistan and Pakistan, New York, Vintage Departures, (2001), p.115)The Government was constructed in classic Leninist fashion. Until 1985 it was governed by a provisional constitution, The Fundamental Principles of the Democratic Republic of Afghanistan. Supreme sovereignty was vested in a Revolutionary Council, originally a body of fifty-eight members whose number later varied. Its executive committee, the Presidium, exercised power when the council was not in formal session. The Revolutionary Council was presided over by the president of the Democratic Republic.Beneath the council the cabinet functioned under a Prime Minister, essentially in a format inherited from the pre-Marxist era. Two new ministries were added: Islamic Affairs and Tribes and Nationalities. Administrative arrangements for provincial and sub-provincial government were also retained.In Leninist style, the PDPA closely mirrored the formal instruments of government. Its authority was generated by its Central Committee, whose executive stand-in was its Politburo. Presiding over both was the partys secretary general. Policy generation was the primary function of the executive level of the party, which was to be carried out by its members serving throughout the government.On 5 December 1978 a friendship treaty was signed with the Soviet Union and was later used as a pretext for the Soviet invasion. Major uprisings occurred regularly against the government led by members of the traditional establishment who lost their privileges in the land reform. The government responded with heavy-handed military reprisals and arrested, exiled and executed many Mujahideen holy Muslim warriors. The Mujahideen belonged to various different factions, but all shared, to varying degrees, a similarly conservative Islamic ideology.On 15 February 1979, the States ambassador in Kabul, Dubs, was taken hostage and later killed when Amin ordered the police to attack. The US did not appoint a new ambassador.The U.S. saw the situation as a prime opportunity to weaken the Union. As part of a War strategy, in June 1979, the States government (under President Carter and National Security Advisor Brzezinski) began to covertly fund and train anti-government Mujahideen forces through the Pakistani secret service known as Services Intelligence (ISI), with the intention of provoking Soviet intervention (according to Brzezinski).In mid-March the 17th infantry division in Herat under the control of Khan mutinied in support of Shiite Muslims. A hundred Soviet advisors in the city, and their families, were killed. The city was bombed, causing massive destruction and thousands of deaths and later it was recaptured with Afghan army tanks and paratroopers.Taraki visited Moscow on 20 March 1979 with a formal request for Soviet ground troops. Kosygin told him we believe it would be a fatal mistake to commit ground troops... if our troops went in, the situation in your country... would get worse. Despite this statement Taraki negotiated some armed and humanitarian supporthelicopter gunships with Soviet pilots and maintenance crews, 500 military advisors, 700 paratroopers disguised as technicians to defend Kabul airport, also significant food aid (300,000 tons of wheat). Brezhnev still warned Taraki that full Soviet intervention would only play into the hands of our enemiesboth yours and ours.During this period, many Afghans fled to Pakistan and Iran and began organizing a resistance movement. Although the groups organized, backed by the U.S. and Pakistan, in the city of Peshawar, Pakistan would after the Soviet invasion be described by the western press as freedom fightersas if their goal were to establish a representative democracy in Afghanistanin reality these groups each had agendas of their own that were often far from democratic.  They were united, however, in their opposition to a regime with values very far from Islamic traditional ones, supported by external forces, as they were themselves in a far more direct manner.The intense rivalry between Taraki and Amin within the Khalq faction heated up. Amin became prime minister on 28 March 1979 with Taraki remaining President. In September 1979, Tarakis followers had made several attempts on Amins life. However, it was Taraki who was overthrown and assassinated by being smothered with a pillow in his bed, with Amin assuming power in Afghanistan. The Amin uprising was characterized as US-backed, with several reports of Amin meeting CIA agents in Kabul. Amin also began attempts to moderate what many Afghans viewed to be an anti-Islamic regime. His regime was still under pressure from the insurgency in the country and he tried to gain Pakistani or American support and refused to take Soviet advice. However, many Afghans held Amin responsible for the regimes harshest measures. The Soviet servicemen in Kabul speculated that Amins rule would be marked by harsh repression and... in the activation and strengthening of the opposition... The situation can only be saved by the removal of Amin from power.Tarakis death was first noted in the Kabul Times on 10 October, which reported that the former leader only recently hailed as the great teacher... great genius... great leader had died quietly of serious illness, which he had been suffering for some time. Less than three months later, after the Amin government had been overthrown, the newly installed followers of Babrak Karmal gave another account of Tarakis death. According to this account, Amin ordered the commander of the palace guard to have Taraki executed. Taraki reportedly was suffocated with a pillow over his head. Amins emergence from the power struggle within the small divided Communist party in Afghanistan alarmed the Soviets and would usher in the series of events which lead to the Soviet invasion.In Kabul, the ascension of Amin to the top position was quick. Amin began unfinished attempts to moderate what many Afghans viewed to be an anti-Islamic regime. Promising more religious freedom, repairing mosques, presenting copies of the Quran to religious groups, invoking the name of Allah in his speeches, and declaring that the Saur Revolution was totally based on the principles of Islam. Yet many Afghans held Amin responsible for the regimes harshest measures.The Soviets established a special commission on Afghanistan, of KGB chairman Andropov, Ponomaryev from the Central Committee and Ustinov, the defense minister. In late October they reported that Amin was purging his opponents, including Soviet sympathizers; his loyalty to Moscow was false; and that he was seeking diplomatic links with Pakistan and possibly China. Opposition forces Outside observers usually identify the two warring groups as fundamentalists (or theocrats) and traditionalists (or monarchists). Rivalries between these groups continued during the Afghan civil war that followed the Soviet withdrawal. The rivalries of these groups brought the plight of the Afghans to the attention of the West, and it was they who received military assistance from the States and a number of other nations.Since 1973 (nearly five years before the revolution) Hekmatyar, Shah Massoud and Rabbani, future fundamentalist warlords and leaders of the fight against the Soviet army had fled to Peshawar, in Pakistan to build up support with the help of the Pakistani government. A number of camps, military in origin, may have been conceived as rallying points around specific warlords with strong fundamentalist leanings, not just as neutral gathering places for refugees. In 1977, the Pakistani dictator, General Zia-Ul-Haq enforced an Islamic constitution, and backed the Afghan warlords in Peshawar, financing the building of thousands of madrassas in the vicinity of refugee camps, with help from Saudi Arabia.()The fundamentalists based their organizing principle around mass politics and included several divisions of the Jamiat-i-Islami. The leader of the parent branch, Rabbani, began organizing in Kabul before repression of religious conservatives, which began in 1974, forced him to flee to Pakistan during Daouds regime. Perhaps best known among the leaders was Hekmatyar, who broke with Rabbani to form another resistance group, the Hizb-e-Islami, which became Pakistans favoured arms recipient. Another split, engineered by Khales, resulted in a second group using the name Hizb-e-Islamia group that was somewhat more moderate than Hikmatyars. A fourth fundamentalist group was the Ittehad-i-Islami led by Abdul Rabb Rasuul al-Sayyaf, who would later invite bin Laden to come to Afghanistan. Rabbanis group received its greatest support from northern Afghanistan where the best known resistance commander in AfghanistanMassouda Tajik, like Rabbani, operated against the Soviets with considerable success.The organizing principles of traditionalist groups differed from those of the fundamentalists. Formed from loose ties among ulama in Afghanistan, the traditionalist leaders were not concerned, unlike fundamentalists, with redefining Islam in Afghan society but instead focused on the use of thesharia as the source of law (interpreting the sharia is a principal role of the ulama). Among the three groups in Peshawar, the most important was theJebh-e-Nejat-e-Milli led by Mojadeddi. Some of the traditionalists were willing to accept restoration of the monarchy and looked to former King Zahir Shah, exiled in Italy, as the ruler.The traditionalist groups set about the active eradication of any kind of alternative secular opposition to Fundamentalist ideology, eliminating the dissident intellectualswho also happened to oppose the Mujaheddin groups.Other ties also were important in holding together some resistance groups. Among these were links within sufi orders, such as the Mahaz-e-Milli Islami, one of the traditionalist groups associated with the Gilani Sufi order led by Sayyid Gilani. Another group, the Shia Muslims of Hazarajat, organized the refugees in Iran.Funds of over $1 billion per year poured into the Mujahideen from the US, the Saudi intelligence service al-Ama, the Kuwaitis, the Iraqis, the Libyans and the Iranians during the 1980s. The US-Saudi dominance in funding enabled them, along with the Pakistanis, to choose seven parties amongst the various exiled forces that leaned more towards theocratic despotism than toward secular nationalism.() The Soviet war in Afghanistan, December 1979 thumb|right|A Soviet Spetsnaz (special operations) group prepares for a mission in Afghanistan, 1988.The war in Afghanistan began as midnight approached on 24 December 1979. USSR organized a massive military airlift into Kabul, involving an estimated 280 transport aircraft and 3 divisions of almost 8,500 men each. Within two days, Soviet forces secured Kabul, deploying a special Soviet assault unit against Aman Palace, where elements of the Afghan army loyal to Amin put up a fierce, but brief resistance. With Amins death at the palace, Karmal, exiled leader of the Parcham faction of the PDPA took place as Afghanistans new head of government.Several theories have been advanced for the Soviet action. These interpretations of Soviet motives do not always agreewhat is known for certain is that the decision was influenced by many factorsthat in Brezhnevs words the decision to enter Afghanistan was truly no simple decision. Two factors were certain to have figured heavily in Soviet calculations. The Soviet Union, interested in establishing a sanitaire of friendly or neutral states on its frontiers, was increasingly alarmed at the unstable, unpredictable situation on its southern border. Perhaps as important, the doctrine declared that the Soviet Union had a zone of responsibility where it had to come to the assistance of an endangered fellow socialist country. The Democratic Republic of Afghanistan was a regime apparently on the verge of collapse.(http://www.biblicalstudies.org.uk/pdf/rcl/14-2_172.pdf)The government of Karmal faced several challenges. Strong connection to the Soviets prevented popular acceptance of the legitimacy of his government. Even though the Parchamis, themselves, had been among the groups most viciously persecuted by the Khalqis, their identification with Anti-Islam Marxism and Soviet infidels was not forgiven. Indeed, the decimation of their members forced the Soviets to insist on reconciliation between the two factions. The purging of Parchamis had left the military forces so dominated by Khalqis that the Soviets had no choice but to rely upon Khalqi officers to rebuild the army.Soviet miscalculation of what was required to crush Afghan resistance further aggravated the governments situation. The Afghan army was expected to carry the burden of suppressing opposition, which was to be done quickly with Soviet support. As the war of pacification dragged on for years, the Babrak Karmal government was further weakened by the poor performance of its army.Image:Afghanistan Veterans.jpg|thumb|Monument to Soviet Soldiers in Afghanistan. Kiev, Ukraine.Whatever the Soviet goals may have been, the international response was sharp and swift. States President Carter, reassessing the strategic situation in his State of the Union address in January, 1980, identified Pakistan as a front-line state in the global struggle against communism. He reversed his stand of a year earlier that aid to Pakistan be terminated as a result of its nuclear program and offered Pakistan a military and economic assistance package if it would act as a conduit for United States and other assistance to the mujahedin. Pakistani President Zia-ul-Haq refused Carters package but later a larger aid offer from the Reagan administration was accepted.Questions about Pakistans nuclear program were, for the time being, set aside. Assistance also came from the Republic of China, Egypt, and Arabia. Also forth coming was international aid to help Pakistan deal with more than 3 million fleeing refugees.The foreign ministers of the Organisation of the Islamic Conference deplored the invasion and demanded Soviet withdrawal at a meeting in Islamabad in January 1980. Nations Security Council did not pass a resolution on the war, but the Nations General Assembly regularly passed resolutions opposing the Soviet occupation.In mid-January 1980 the Soviets relocated their command post from Termez, on Soviet territory to the north of Afghanistan, to Kabul. For ten years the Soviets and the DRA government battled the mujahedin for control of the country. The Soviets used helicopters (including Mil Mi-24 Hind gunships) as their primary air attack force, supported with fighter-bombers and bombers, ground troops and special forces. The search for popular support thumb|right|299px|Flag of the Democratic Republic of Afghanistan 19801987.In attempts to broaden support, the PDPA created organizations and launched political initiatives intended to induce popular participation. The most ambitious was the National Fatherland Front (NFF), founded in June 1981. This organization created local units in cities, towns and tribal areas which were to recruit supporters of the regime. Village and tribal notables were offered inducements to participate in well publicized rallies and programs. The party also gave affiliated organizations that enrolled women, youth and city workers high profile exposure in national radio, television, and government publications.From its beginnings in the mid-1960s, the membership of the PDPA had taken keen interest in the impact of information and propaganda. Some years after their own publications had been terminated by the government, they gained control of all official media. These were energetically harnessed to their propagandagoals. Anis, the mainline government newspaper (published in Pashto and Dari), the Kabul New Times (previously the Kabul Times), published in English, and such new publications as Haqiqat-i-Inqelab-i-Saur exhibited the regimes flair for propaganda. With Kabul as its primary constituency, it also made innovative use of television.The early efforts at mobilizing popular support were later followed up by national meetings and assemblies, eventually using a variation of the model of the traditional jirga to entice the cooperation of rural secular leaders and religious authorities. A large scale loya jirga was held in 1985 to ratify the DRAs new constitution.These attempts to win collaboration were closely coordinated with efforts to manipulate Pashtun tribal politics. Such efforts included trying to split or disrupt tribes who affiliated with the resistance, or by compromising notables into commitments to raise militia forces in service to the government.A concerted effort was made to win over the principal minorities: Uzbek, Turkmen, and Tajiks, in northern Afghanistan. For the first time their languages and literatures were prominently broadcast and published by government media. Minority writers and poets were championed, and attention was given to their folk art, music, dance and lore. Internal refugees: flight to the cities As the Afghan-Soviet war became more destructive, internal refugees flocked to Kabul and the largest of the provincial cities. Varying estimates (no authentic census was taken) put Kabuls population at more than 2 million by the late 1980s. In many instances villagers fled to Kabul and other towns to join family or lineage groups already established there.At least 3, perhaps 4, million Afghans were thus subject to government authority and hence exposed to PDPA recruitment or affiliation. Its largest membership claim was 160,000, starting from a base of between 5,000 and 10,000 immediately after the Soviet invasion. How many members were active and committed was unclear, but the lure of perquisites, for example, food and fuel at protected prices, compromised the meaning of membership. Claims of membership in the NFF ran into the millions, but its core activists were mostly party members. When it was terminated in 1987, the NFF disappeared without impact. Factionalism: Khalq and Parcham The PDPA was also never able to rid itself of internal rivalries. Burdened by obvious evidence that the Soviets oversaw its policies, actively dominated the crucial sectors of its government, and literally ran the war, the PDPA could not assert itself as a political force until after the Soviets left. In the civil war period that followed, it gained significant respect, but its internal disputes worsened.Born divided, the PDPA suffered virtually continuous conflict between its two major factions. The Soviets imposed a public truce upon Parcham and Khalq, but the rivalry continued with hostility and disagreement frequently rising to the surface. Generally, Parcham enjoyed political dominance, while Khalq could not be denied the leverage over the army held by its senior officers.Social, linguistic, and regional origins and differing degrees of Marxist radicalism had spurred factionalism from the beginning. When Soviet forces invaded, there was a fifteen-year history of disagreement, dislike, rivalry, violence and murder. Each new episode added further alienation. Events also tended tosub-divide the protagonists. Amin murder of Taraki divided the Khalqis. Rival military cliques divided the Khalqis further. Mohammad Najibullah, 19861992 Parchami suffered a series of splits when the Soviets insisted on replacing Karmal with Najibullah as head of the PDPA on 4 May 1986. The PDPA was riven by divisions which prevented implementation of policies and compromised its internal security. These fundamental weaknesses were later partially masked by the urgency of rallying for common survival in the immediate aftermath of the Soviet withdrawal. Yet, after military successes rifts again began to surface.Karmal retained the presidency for a while, but power had shifted to Najibullah, who had previously headed the State Information Service (Khadamate Ettelaate DowlatiKHAD), the Afghan secret service agency. Najibullah tried to diminish differences with the resistance and appeared prepared toallow Islam a greater role as well as legalize opposition groups, but any moves he made toward concessions were rejected out of hand by the mujahedin.Factionalism had a critical impact on the leadership of the PDPA. Najibullahs achievements as a mediator between factions, an effective diplomat, a clever foe, a resourceful administrator and a brilliant spokesman who coped with constant and changing turmoil throughout his six years as head of government, qualified him as a leader among Afghans. His leadership qualities might be summarized as conciliatory authoritarianism: a sure sense of power, how to get it, how to use it, but mediated by willingness to give options to rivals. This combination was glaringly lacking in most of his colleagues and rivals.Najibullah suffered, to a lesser degree, the same disadvantage that Karmal had when he was installed as General Secretary of the PDPA by the Soviets. Despite Soviet interference and his own frustration and discouragement over the failure to generate substantial popular support, Karmal still had retained enough loyalty within the party to remain in office. This fact was shown by the fierceness of the resistance to Najibullahs appointment within the Parcham faction. This split persisted, forcing Najibullah to straddle his politics between whatever Parchami support he could maintain and alliances he could win from the Khalqis.Najibullahs reputation was that of a police apparatchik with especially effective skills in disengaging Ghilzai and eastern Pashtuns from the resistance. Najibullah was himself a Ghilzai from the large Ahmedzai tribe. His selection by the Soviets was clearly related to his success in running KHAD, the secret police, more effectively than the rest of the DRA had been governed. His appointment thus, was not principally the result of intra-party politics. It was related to crucial changes in the Soviet-Afghan war that would lead to the Soviet military withdrawal. The Soviet decision to withdraw, 19861988 The Soviets grossly underestimated the huge cost of the Afghan venturedescribed, in time, as the Soviet Unions Vietnamto their state.The peak of the fighting came in 198586. The Soviet forces launched their largest and most effective assaults on the mujahedin supply lines adjacent to Pakistan. Major campaigns had also forced the mujahedin into the defensive near Herat and Kandahar.At the same time a sharp increase in military support for the mujahedin from the States and Arabia allowed it to regain the guerilla war initiative.These shifts in momentum reinforced the inclination of the new Gorbachev government to view further escalation of the war as a misuse of Soviet political and military capital. Such doubts had developed prior to the decision to install Najibullah. In April 1985, one month after Gorbachev assumed the Soviet leadership, its Day greeting to the Kabul government failed to refer to its revolutionary solidarity with the PDPA, a signal in Marxist-Leninist rhetoric that their relationship had been downgraded. Several months later, Karmal suggested the inclusion of non-party members in the Revolutionary Council and the promotion of a mixed economy. These tentative concessions toward non-Marxists won Soviet praise, but divergence in policy became obvious at the Twenty-Seventh Congress of the Communist Party of the Soviet Union in February 1986. Gorbachevs bleeding wound speech hinted at a decision to withdraw in the nearest future. In his own speech Karmal made no reference to withdrawal. In early May he was replaced by Najibullah.Najibullah was obliged to move toward the evolving Soviet position with great caution. Karmals followers could use any concessions to non-Marxists or acceptance of a Soviet withdrawal against him. Accordingly, he moved in conflicting directions, insisting there was no room for non-Marxists in government, only offering the possibility of clemency to bandits who had been duped by mujahedin leaders into resisting the government. In addition to air strikes and shelling across the border, KHAD terrorist activity in Pakistan reached its peak under Najibullah.Late in 1986 Najibullah had stabilized his political position enough to begin matching Moscows moves toward withdrawal. In September he set up the National Compromise Commission to contact counterrevolutionaries in order to complete the Saur Revolution in its new phase. Allegedly some 40,000 rebels were contacted. In November Karmal was replaced as now-ceremonial president by a non-party member, Muhammad Samkanai, signaling the PDPAswillingness to open government to non-Marxists.At the end of 1986 Najibullah unveiled a program of National Reconciliation. It offered a six-month cease-fire and discussions leading to a possible coalition government in which the PDPA would give up its government monopoly. Contact was to be made with anti-state armed groups. Affiliation was suggested, allowing resistance forces to retain areas under their control.In fact much of the substance of the program was happening on the ground in the form of negotiations with disillusioned mujahedin commanders who agreed to cooperate as government militia. The mujahedin leadership rhetorically claimed that the program had no chance for success. For his part Najibullah assured his followers that there would be no compromise over the accomplishments of the Saur Revolution. It remained a standoff. While a strenuous propaganda effort was directed at the both the refugees and Pakistanis in North-West Frontier, the program was essentially a sop to Moscows hope to tie a favorable political settlement to its desire to pull its forces out.Najibullahs concrete achievements were the consolidation of his armed forces, the expansion of co-opted militia forces and the acceptance of his government by an increasing proportion of urban population under his control. As a propaganda ploy National Reconciliation was a means of gaining time to prepare for civil war after the Soviet departure. The Geneva accords, 19871989 By the beginning of 1987, the controlling fact in the Afghan war was the Unions determination to withdraw. It would not renege on its commitment to the Kabul governments survivalGorbachevs options were restricted by Soviet military insistence that Kabul not be abandoned. Nevertheless, the Soviet leadership was convinced that resolution of War issues with the West and internal reform were far more urgent than the fate of the Kabul government.Other events outside Afghanistan, especially in the Soviet Union, contributed to the eventual agreement. The toll in casualties, economic resources, and loss of support at home increasingly felt in the Soviet Union was causing criticism of the occupation policy. Brezhnev died in 1982, and after two short-lived successors, Gorbachev assumed leadership in March 1985. As Gorbachev opened up the countrys system, it became clearer that the Soviet Union wished to find a face-saving way to withdraw from Afghanistan.The civil war in Afghanistan was guerrilla warfare and a war of attrition between government and the mujahedin; it cost both sides a great deal. Many Afghans, perhaps as many as five million, or one-quarter of the countrys population, fled to Pakistan and Iran where they organized into guerrilla groups to strike Soviet and government forces inside Afghanistan. Others remained in Afghanistan and also formed fighting groups; perhaps most notable was one led by Shah Massoud in the northeastern part of Afghanistan. These various groups were supplied with funds to purchase arms, principally from the States, Arabia, Republic of China, and Egypt. Despite high casualties on both sides, pressure continued to mount on the Soviet Union, especially after the United States brought in Stinger anti-aircraft missiles which severely reduced the effectiveness of Soviet air cover.Conveniently, a formula was readily available for minimizing the humiliation of reversing a policy in which enormous political, material, and human capital had been invested. In 1982 under the auspices of the office of its secretary general, the UN had initiated negotiations facilitating a Soviet withdrawal from Afghanistan. Its format had essentially been agreed upon by 1985. Ostensibly it was the product of indirect negotiations between the DRA and Pakistan (Pakistan did not recognize the DRA) with the mediation of the secretary generals special representative, Cordovez. The United States and the Soviet Union had committed themselves to guaranteeing the implementation of an agreement leading to a withdrawal.Both the format and the substance of the agreement were designed to be acceptable to the Soviet Union and the DRA. Its clauses included affirmation of the sovereignty of Afghanistan and its right to self-determination, its right to be free from foreign intervention or interference, and the right of its refugees to a secure and honorable return. But at its core was an agreement reached in May 1988 that authorized the withdrawal of foreign troops according to a timetable that would remove all Soviet forces by 15 February 1989.The accords emerged from initiatives by Moscow and Kabul in 1981. They had claimed that Soviet forces had entered Afghanistan in order to protect it from foreign forces intervening on the side of rebels attempting to overthrow the DRA. The logic of the Geneva Accords was based on this accusation, that is, that once the foreign threat to Afghanistan was removed, the forces of its friend, the Soviet Union, would leave. For that reason a bilateral agreement between Pakistan, which was actively supporting the resistance, and the DRA prohibiting intervention and interference between them was essential. In meticulous detail each party agreed to terminate any act that could remotely affect the sovereignty or security of the other. This agreement included preventing an expatriate or a refugee from publishing a statement which his/her government could construe as a contribution to unrest within its territory. The bilateral agreement between the Afghanistan and Pakistan on the principles of non-interference and non-intervention was signed on 14 April 1988.The accords thus facilitated a withdrawal by an erstwhile superpower, in a manner which justified an invasion. They exemplify the delicacy of UN diplomacy when the interests of a great power are engaged. In essence, the accords were a political bailout for a government struggling with the consequences of a costly error. The UN could not insist that accusations of national culpability were relevant to the negotiations. In the case of Afghanistan, the Soviet Union insisted on its own diplomatic terms as did the United States in a different manner concerning Vietnam.The agreement on withdrawal held, and on 15 February 1989, the last Soviet troops departed on schedule from Afghanistan. Their exit, however, did not bring either lasting peace or resettlement. The failure to bring peace The accords did not bring peace to Afghanistan. There was little expectation among its enemies or the Union that the Kabul government would survive. Its refusal to collapse introduced a three-year period of civil war.The Geneva process failed to prevent the further carnage which a political solution among Afghans might have prevented or lessened. It failed partially because the Geneva process prevented participation by the Afghan resistance. The Democratic Republic of Afghanistan (DRA) occupied Afghanistans seat at the Nations General Assembly. Denied recognition, the resistance leadership resented the central role that DRA was permitted to play at Geneva. When the Nations representative Cordovez approached the mujahedin parties to discuss a possible political settlement in February 1988more than five years after negotiations beganthey were not interested. Their bitterness would hover over subsequent efforts to find a political solution.Considerable diplomatic energy was expended throughout 1987 to find a political compromise that would end the fighting before the Soviets left. While Pakistan, the Soviet Union and the DRA haggled over a timetable for the Soviet withdrawal, Cordovez worked on a formula for an Afghan government that would reconcile the combatants. The formula involved Zahir Shah, and by extension, the leading members of his former government, most of whom had gone into exile. This approach also called for a meeting in the jirga tradition representing all Afghan protagonists and communities. It was to reach a consensus on the features of a future government. The jirgah also was to select a small group of respected leaders to act as a transitional government in place of the Kabul government and the mujahedin. During the transition a new constitution was to be promulgated and elections conducted leading to the installation of a popularly accepted government. This package kept re-emerging in modified forms throughout the civil war that followed. Suggested roles for the king and his followers slipped into and out of these formulas, despite the implacable opposition of most of the mujahedin leaders.The peace prospect faltered because no credible consensus was attainable. By mid-1987 the resistance forces sensed a military victory. They had stymied what proved to be the last set of major Soviet offensives, the Stinger missiles were still having a devastating effect, and they were receiving an unprecedented surge of outside assistance. Defeat of the Kabul government was their solution for peace. This confidence, sharpened by their distrust of the UN virtually guaranteed their refusal of a political compromise. Pakistans attempt at a political solution, 19871988 Pakistan was the only protagonist in a position to convince the mujahedin otherwise. Its intimate relationship with the parties it hosted had shaped their war and their politics. Their dependence on Pakistan for armaments, training, funding and sanctuary had been nearly total. But by 1987, the politics of Pakistans foreign policy had fragmented. The Foreign Ministry was working with Cordovez to devise a formula for a neutral government. President Zia-ul-Haq was adamantly convinced that a political solution favoring the mujahedin was essential and worked strenuously to convince the States and the Union. Riaz Muhammad Khan argues that disagreement within the military and with Zias increasingly independent prime minister, Khan Junejo, deflected Zias efforts. When Gorbachev announced a Soviet withdrawal without a peace settlement at his D.C. meeting with President Reagan on 10 December 1987, the chance for a political agreement was lost. All the protagonists were then caught up in the rush to complete the Geneva process.In the end the Soviets were content to leave the possibilities of reconciliation to Najibullah and to shore him up with massive material support. He had made an expanded reconciliation offer to the resistance in July, 1987 including twenty seats in State (formerly Revolutionary) Council, twelve ministries and a possible prime minister-ship and Afghanistans status as an Islamic non-aligned state. Military, police, and security powers were not mentioned. The offer still fell far short of what even the moderate mujahedin parties would accept.Najibullah then reorganized his government to face the mujahedin alone. A new constitution took effect in November, 1987. The name of the country was reverted to the Republic of Afghanistan, the State Council was replaced by a National Assembly for which progressive parties could freely compete. Hussein Sharq, a non-party politician, was named prime minister. Najibullahs presidency was given Gaullist powers and longevity. He was promptly elected to a seven-year term. On paper, Afghan government appeared far more democratic than Daoud Khan had left it, but its popular support remained questionable. Stalemate: Civil War, 19891992 The Union left Afghanistan deep in winter with intimations of panic among Kabul officials. Hard experience had convinced Soviet officials that the government was too factionalized to survive. Pakistani and States officials expected a quick mujahedin victory. The resistance was poised to attack provincial towns and cities and eventually Kabul, if necessary. The first one to fall might produce a ripple effect that would unravel the government.Within three months, these expectations were dashed at Jalalabad. An initial assault penetrated the citys defenses and reached its airport. A counterattack, supported by effective artillery and air power, drove the mujahedin back. Uncoordinated attacks on the city from other directions failed. The crucial supply road to the garrison from Kabul was reopened. By May 1989 it was clear that the Kabul forces in Jalalabad had held.The Mujahedin were traumatized by this failure. It exposed their inability to coordinate tactical movements or logistics or to maintain political cohesion. During the next three years, they were unable to overcome these limitations. Only one significant provincial capital, Taloqan, was captured and held. Mujahedin positions were expanded in the northeast and around Herat, but their inability to mass forces capable of overcoming a modern army with the will to fight from entrenched positions was clear. A deadly exchange of medium-range rockets became the principal form of combat, embittering the urban population, and adding to the obstacles that prevented millions of refugees from returning.Victory at Jalalabad dramatically revived the morale of the Kabul government. Its army proved able to fight effectively alongside the already hardened troops of the Soviet-trained special security forces. Defections decreased dramatically when it became apparent that the resistance was in disarray, with no capability for a quick victory. The change in atmosphere made recruitment of militia forces much easier. As many as 30,000 troops were assigned to the defense of Herat alone.Immediately after the Soviet departure, Najibullah pulled down the faade of shared government. He declared an emergency, removed Sharq and the other non-party ministers from the cabinet. The Soviet Union responded with a flood of military and economic supplies. Sufficient food and fuel were made available for the next two difficult winters. Much of the military equipment belonging to Soviet units evacuating Europe was shipped to Afghanistan. Assured adequate supplies, Kabuls air force, which had developed tactics minimizing the threat from Stinger missiles, now deterred mass attacks against the cities. Medium-range missiles, particularly the Scud, were successfully launched from Kabul in the defense of Jalalabad, 145 kilometers miles away. One reached the suburbs of Pakistans capital, Islamabad, more than 400 kilometers away. Soviet support reached a value of $3 billion a year in 1990. Kabul had achieved a stalemate which exposed the mujahedins weaknesses, political and military. The collapse of the Soviet Union, 1991 With the failure of the communist hardliners to take over the Soviet government in August 1991, Najibullahs supporters in the Soviet Army lost their power to dictate Afghan policy. The effect was immediate. On 13 September, the Soviet government, now dominated by Yeltsin, agreed with the States on a mutual cut off of military aid to both sides in the Afghan civil war. It was to begin 1 January 1992.The post-coup Soviet government then attempted to develop political relations with the Afghan resistance. In mid-November it invited a delegation of the resistances Afghanistan Interim Government (AIG) to Moscow where the Soviets agreed that a transitional government should prepare Afghanistan for national elections. The Soviets did not insist that Najibullah or his colleagues participate in the transitional process. Having been cut adrift both materially and politically, Najibullahs faction torn government began to fall apart.During the nearly three years that the Kabul government had successfully defended itself against mujahedin attacks, factions within the government had also developed quasi-conspiratorial connections with its opponents. Even during the Soviet war Kabuls officials had arranged cease-fires, neutral zones, highway passage and even passes allowing unarmed mujahedin to enter towns and cities. As the civil war developed into a stalemate in 1989, such arrangements proliferated into political understandings. Combat generally ceased around Kandahar because most of the mujahedin commanders had anunderstanding with its provincial governor. Shah Massoud developed an agreement with Kabul to keep the vital north-south highway open after the Soviet withdrawal. The greatest mujahedin victory during the civil war, the capture of Khost, was achieved through the collaboration of its garrison. In March 1990 Hekmatyar cooperated with an attempted coup by the Khalqi Defense minister Nawaz Tanai: Hekmatyars forces were to attack Kabul simultaneously. The plot misfired because of faulty communications. Tanai escaped by helicopter to Pakistan where he was greeted and publicly accepted as an ally by Hekmatyar.Interaction with opponents became a major facet of Najibullahs defensive strategy. Many mujahedin groups were literally bought off with arms, supplies and money to become militias defending towns, roads and installations. Such arrangements carried the danger of backfiring. When Najibullahs political support ended and the money dried up, such allegiances crumbled. The fall of Kabul, April 1992 Kabul ultimately fell to the mujahedin because the factions in its government had finally pulled it apart. Until demoralized by the defections of its senior officers, the army had achieved a level of performance it had never reached under direct Soviet tutelage. It was a classic case of loss of morale. The regime collapsed while it still possessed material superiority. Its stockpiles of munitions and planes would provide the victorious mujahedin with the means of waging years of highly destructive war. Kabul was short of fuel and food at the end of winter in 1992, but its military units were supplied well enough to fight indefinitely. They did not fight because their leaders were reduced to scrambling for survival. Their aid had not only been cut off, the Marxist-Leninist ideology that had provided the government its rationale for existence had been repudiated at its source.A few days after it was clear that Najibullah had lost control, his army commanders and governors arranged to turn over authority to resistance commanders and local notables throughout the country. Joint councils or shuras were immediately established for local government in which civil and military officials of the former government were usually included. Reports indicate the process was generally amicable. In many cases prior arrangements for transferring regional and local authority had been made between foes.These local arrangements generally remained in place in most of Afghanistan until at least 1995. Disruptions occurred where local political arrangements were linked to the struggle that developed between the mujahedin parties. At the national level a political vacuum was created and into it fell the expatriate parties in their rush to take control. The enmities, ambitions, conceits and dogmas which had paralysed their shadow government proved to be even more disastrous in their struggle for power. The traits they brought with them had been accentuated in the struggle for preferment in Peshawar.Collusions between military leaders quickly brought down the Kabul government. In mid-January 1992, within three weeks of demise of the Soviet Union, Shah Massoud was aware of conflict within the governments northern command. General Momim, in charge of the Hairatan border crossing at the northern end of Kabuls supply highway, and other non-Pashtun generals based in Sharif feared removal by Najibullah and replacement by Pashtun officers. The generals rebelled and the situation was taken over by Rashid Dostam, who held general rank as head of the Jozjani militia, also based in Mazari Sharif. He and Massoud reached a political agreement, together with another major militia leader, Mansor, of the Ismaili community based in Baghlan province. These northern allies consolidated their position in Mazari Sharif on 21 March.Their coalition covered nine provinces in the north and northeast. As turmoil developed within the government in Kabul, there was no government force standing between the northern allies and the major air force base at Bagram, some seventy kilometres north of Kabul. By mid-April the air force command at Begram had capitulated to Massoud. Kabul was defenseless; its army was no longer reliable.Najibullah had lost internal control immediately after he announced his willingness on 18 March to resign in order to make way for a neutral interim government. As the government broke into several factions the issue had become how to carry out a transfer of power. Najibullah attempted to fly out of Kabul on 17 April, but was stopped by Dostams troops who controlled Kabul Airport under the command of Babrak Karmals brother,Baryalai. Vengeance between Parchami factions was reaped. Najibullah took sanctuary at the UN mission where he remained until his hanging by the Taliban in 1996. A group of Parchami generals and officials declared themselves an interim government for the purpose of handing over power to the mujahedin.For more than a week Massoud remained poised to move his forces into the capital. He was awaiting the arrival of political leadership from Peshawar. The parties suddenly had sovereign power in their grasp, but no plan for executing it. With his principal commander prepared to occupy Kabul, Rabbani was positioned to prevail by default. Meanwhile UN mediators tried to find a political solution that would assure a transfer of power acceptable to all sides. The United Nations plan for political accommodation Sevan, Cordovezs successor as special representative of the secretary general, attempted to apply a political formula that had been announced by UN Secretary General Prez de Cullar on 21 May 1991. Referred to as a five-point plan, it included: recognition of Afghanistans sovereign status as a politically non-aligned Islamic state; acceptance of the right of Afghans to self-determination in choosing their form of government and social and economic systems; need for a transitional period permitting a dialogue between Afghans leading to establishment of a government with widely based support; the termination of all foreign arms deliveries into Afghanistan; funding from the international community adequate to support the return of Afghanistans refugees and its reconstruction from the devastation of war.These principles were endorsed by the Soviet Union and the United States and Afghanistans neighboring governments, but there was no military means of enforcing it. The three moderate Peshawar parties accepted it, but it was opposed by Hekmatyar, Rabbani, Sayyaf and Yunis Khalis who held out for a total victory over the Kabul government.Nevertheless, these four fundamentalists found it politic to participate in the effort to implement the UN initiative. Pressure from their foreign supporters and the opportunities that participation offered to modify or obstruct the plan encouraged them to be reluctant players. Pakistan and Iran worked jointly to win mujahedin acceptance at a conference in July, 1991. Indicating its formal acceptance of the plan, Pakistan officially announced the termination of its own military assistance to the resistance in late January 1992. Najibullah also declared his acceptance, but until 18 March 1992, he hedged the question of whether or when he would resign in the course of negotiations.Sevan made a strenuous effort to create the mechanism for the dialogue that would lead to installation of the transitional process envisaged in point three of the plan. The contemplated arrangement was a refinement and a simplification of earlier plans which had been built around the possible participation of Zahir Shah and the convoking of a meeting in the jirga tradition. By March 1992 the plan had evolved to the holding of a meeting in Europe of some 150 respected Afghans representing all communities in the late spring. Most of Sevans effort was directed at winning the cooperation of all the Afghan protagonists, including the Shia parties in control of the Hazarajat. In early February, he appeared to have won the active support of commanders among the Pashtuns in eastern Afghanistan and acquiescence from Rabbani and Hekmatyar to the extent of submitting lists of participants acceptable to them in the proposed meeting. Simultaneously, Sevan labored to persuade Najibullah to step down on the presumption that his removal would bring about full mujahedin participation. Instead, Najibullahs 18 March announcement accelerated the collapse of his government. This collapse in turn triggered events that moved faster than Sevans plan could be put into effect.In the midst of hectic manoeuvring to put the European meeting together, Sevan declared on 4 April that most of the parties (including Hekmatyars) and the Kabul government had agreed to transfer power to a proposed transitional authority. He also announced the creation of a pre-transition council to take control of government perhaps within the next two weeks. He was struggling to keep up with events which threatened to dissolve the government before he had a replacement for it.In the end, some of the Shia parties and the Islamists in Peshawar blocked his scheme. They withheld their choices or submitted candidates for the European meeting whom they knew would be unacceptable to others. The hope for a neutral, comprehensive approach to a political settlement among Afghans was dashed. Sevan then worked to ensure a peaceful turnover of power from the interim Kabul government which replaced Najibullah on 18 April to the forces of Shah Massoud and Rashid Dostam. In effect, the turnover was peaceful, but without an overall political settlement in place. Within a week, a new civil war would begin among the victors as the era of the Islamic State of Afghanistan began. References  External links *Soviet Air Power: Tactics and Weapons Used in Afghanistan by Lieutenant Colonel Denny R. Nelson*Library of Congress Country Study of Afghanistan*The Cold War international history project  Soviet Documents*Online Afghan Calendar with Historical dates*Red Army in AfghanistanBn-ch King-h-kokRepublik AfghanistanDemocrtica de Afganistndmocratique dAfghanistan Demokratik AfganistanDemocratica dellAfghanistanDemokrtisk Republika  Republiek Afghanistandemokratiske republikken AfghanistanRepublika AfganistanuDemocrtica do Afeganisto  demokratiska republikDemokratik Cumhuriyetiha Dn ch Afghanistanzh:
50972
Grenoble
Grenoble (; ) is a city in southeastern France, situated at the foot of the Alps where the river Drac joins the Isre. Located in the Rhne-Alpes region, Grenoble is the capital of the department of Isre. The proximity of the mountains has led to the city being known as the Capital of Alps. Grenobles history encompasses a period of more than 2,000 years, and the city has been the capital of the Dauphin since the 11th century. Grenoble experienced a period of economic expansion in the nineteenth and 20th centuries, which is symbolized by the holding of the X Olympic Winter Games in 1968. The city is now a significant scientific center in Europe.()The population of the city (commune) of Grenoble at the 2006 census was 156,107 inhabitants. The population of the urban unit at the 2006 census was 427,659 inhabitants. The population of the metropolitan area (French: urbaine de Grenoble) at the 2006 census was 531,440 inhabitants. The residents of the city are called Grenoblois.Among the numerous communes that make up Grenoble are the citys largest suburbs, Saint-Martin-dHres, chirolles, and Fontaine, each with a population exceeding 20,000 inhabitants.()GeographyGrenoble is surrounded by mountains. To the north lies the Chartreuse, to the south and west the Vercors, and to the east the Belledonne range. For the French, Grenoble is the capital of the Alps.Grenoble is exclusively built on the alluvial plain of the Isre River and the River at an altitude of . Mountain sports are an important tourist attraction for the city, both in summer and in winter. Twenty large and small ski stations surround the city, the nearest being Le Sappey-en-Chartreuse, which is about a 15 minute drive away.Historically, both Grenoble and the surrounding areas were sites of mining and heavy industry.(Petite histoire du Dauphin , Flix Vernay, 1933, p67) Abandoned mills and factories can be found in small towns and villages, such as the coal mine at Mure.TransportGrenoble can be accessed by plane from Airport, Lyon Saint-Exupry Airport and International Airport. Within Grenoble, there is a comprehensive bus and tram service that operates 26 bus lines and four tram lines and serves all of greater Grenoble. Being essentially flat, Grenoble is a bicycle-friendly city.The de Grenoble is served by the TGV train network, which provides frequent services to and from de Lyon, often with a stop at Lyon Saint-Exupry Airport train station. There are also less frequent trains to and from other destinations in France, such as Lille Europe and Nantes. TER services connect Grenoble with Lyon, Geneva, and destinations to the east. Valence to the west provides connections with TGV services along the Rhone valley. Rail and road connections to the south are less well-developed. Highways link Grenoble to all major cities in the area including the autoroute to the northwest toward Lyon, the A49 to the southwest toward the Rhone valley via Valence, the A41 to the northeast toward Chambry, the Alps and Italy.The city also has a partial beltway running around the south of the city, the Rocade Sud, which connects the autoroute arriving from the northwest (A48) with the autoroute arriving from the northeast (A41). A project to complete the ring road encircling the city was suggested with a tunnel under the Bastille being the likely route but it has not been accepted by French authorities.(The web site of the Rocade Nord lists the two preferred routes, each of which pass under the Bastille: http://www.rocade-nord.fr/index.php?id163)History:For the ecclesiastical history, see Bishopric of Grenoble.AntiquityThe first references to Grenoble date back to 43 BC. Cularo was at that time a little Gallic village founded by the Allobroges tribe near a bridge across the Isere River. A strong wall was built around the small town in 286 AD.(Petite histoire du Dauphin , Flix Vernay, 1933, p18)The Emperor Gratian visited Cularo and, touched by the peoples welcome, made the village a Roman city. In honour of this, Cularo was renamed Gratianopolis (city of Gratian) in 381 (leading to Graignovol() during the Middle Age and then Grenoble).Christianity spread to the region during the 4th century, and the diocese of Grenoble was founded in 377. From that time, the bishops exercised a significant political power over the city and, until the French Revolution, styled themselves the bishops and princes of Grenoble.(Petite histoire du Dauphin , Flix Vernay, 1933, p40)After the collapse of the Empire, the city was part of the first Burgundian kingdom in the 5th century and the second Burgundian of Arles until 1032, when it was integrated into the Roman Empire.Middle AgesGrenoble grew significantly in the 11th century when the Counts of Albon chose the city as the capital of their territories. At the time, their possessions were a patchwork of several territories sprawled across the region.(Petite histoire du Dauphin , Flix Vernay, 1933, p9) The central position of Grenoble allowed the counts to strengthen their authority. When these counts later took the title of Dauphins, Grenoble became the capital of the State of Dauphin.In spite of their status, the counts authority was shared with the Bishop of Grenoble. One of the most famous Bishop was Saint Hugh. Under his rule, the citys bridge was rebuilt, and a hospital was constructed along with a leper hospital.(Petite histoire du Dauphin , Flix Vernay, 1933, p27)The inhabitants of Grenoble took advantage of the division between the counts and the bishops and obtained the recognition of a Charter of Customs that guaranteed their rights.(Petite histoire du Dauphin , Flix Vernay, 1933, p32) That charter was confirmed by Kings XI in 1447 and Francis I in 1541.In 1336, the last Dauphin Humbert II founded a court of justice, the delphinal, which settled at Grenoble in 1340. He also established the of Grenoble in 1339. Aging and heirless, Humbert sold his state to France in 1349 on the condition that the heir to the French crown used the title of Dauphin. The first one, the future Charles V, spent nine months in Grenoble. The city remained the capital of the Dauphin, henceforth a province of France, and the Estates of Dauphin were created.The only Dauphin who really governed his province was XI, whose reign lasted nine years from 1447 to 1456. It was only under his rule that Dauphin properly joined the Kingdom of France. The Old Conseil Delphinal became a Parlement (the third one in France after the Parliaments of Paris and Toulouse), strengthening the status of Grenoble as a Provincial capital. He also ordered the construction of the Palais du Parlement (finished under Francis I) and ensured that the Bishop pledged allegiance, thus forging the political union of the city.(Petite histoire du Dauphin , Flix Vernay, 1933, p58)At that time, Grenoble was a crossroads between Vienne, Geneva, Italy, and Savoy. It was the industrial centre of the Dauphin and the biggest city of the province.RenaissanceDue to Grenobles geographical situation, French troops were garrisoned in the city and its region during the Wars. Charles VIII, XII, and Francis I went several times to Grenoble. However, the people had to suffer from the exactions of the soldiers.The nobility of the region took part in various battles (Marignano, Pavia) and in doing so gained an immense prestige.(Petite histoire du Dauphin, Flix Vernay, 1933, p78) The best-known of its members was Bayard, the knight without fear and beyond reproach.Grenoble suffered as a result of the Wars of Religion. The Dauphin was indeed an important settlement for Protestants and therefore experienced several conflicts. The baron des Adrets, the leader of the Huguenots, pillaged the Cathedral of Grenoble and destroyed the tombs of the former Dauphins.In August 1575, Lesdiguires became the new leader of the Protestants and, thanks to the accession of Henry IV to the throne of France, allied himself with the governor and the lieutenant general of the Dauphin. But this alliance did not bring an end to the conflicts. Indeed, a Catholic movement, the Ligue, which took Grenoble in December 1590, refused to make peace. After months of assaults, Lesdiguires defeated the Ligue and took back Grenoble. He became the leader of the entire province.(Petite Histoire du Dauphin , Flix Vernay, 1933, p88)Lesdiguires became the lieutenant-general of the Dauphin and administered the Province from 1591 to 1626. He began the construction of the Bastille in order to protect the city and ordered the construction of new walls, increasing the citys size. He also constructed the Htel Lesdiguires, built new fountains, and dug sewers.(Histoire de Grenoble, Vidal Chaumel, Editions Privat, p.68,123,126,223)From Louis XIV to the French RevolutionThe revocation of the of Nantes by XIV caused the departure of 2,000 Protestants from Grenoble, weakening the citys economy.(Petie Histoire, Flix Vernay, 1933, p97) However, it also weakened the glove industry of Grasse, leaving the glove factories of Grenoble without any competition.(Petite histoire du Dauphin , Flix Vernay, 1933, p98) This allowed a stronger economic development for the city during the 18th century. For example, at the beginning of that century, only 12 glovers made 15,000 dozen gloves each year; however, by 1787, 64 glovers madde 160,000 dozen gloves each year.(The city gained some notoriety on 7 June 1788 when the townspeople assaulted troops of XVI in the of the Tiles. The people attacked the royal troops to prevent an expulsion of the notables of the city, which would have seriously endangered the economic prosperity of Grenoble. Following these events, the of Vizille took place. Its members organized the meeting of the old Estates General, thus beginning the Revolution. During the Revolution, Grenoble was highly represented in Paris by two illustrious notables, Joseph Mounier and Barnave.In 1790, the Dauphin was divided into three departments, and Grenoble became the chef-lieu of the Isere department. The city was renamed Grelibre and took back its real name only under Napoleon. Only two abbeys were executed at Grenoble during the of Terror. Pope VI, prisoner of France, spent three days at Grenoble in 1799 before going to Valence where he died.19th centuryThe approval of the establishment of the Empire was clear and overwhelming (in Isre, the results showed 82,084 yes and only 12 no).(Petite Histoire du Dauphin, Flix Vernay, 1933,p115)Grenoble welcomed for the second time a prisoner Pope in 1809. VII spent 10 days in the city en route to his exile in Fontainebleau.In 1813, Grenoble was under threat from the Austrian army, which invaded Switzerland and Savoy. The city, well-defended, contained the Austrian attacks, and the French army defeated the Austrians, forcing them to withdraw at Geneva. However, the invasion of France in 1814 resulted in the capitulation of the troops and the occupation of the city.During his return from the island of Elba in 1815, Napoleon took a road that led him near Grenoble at Laffrey. There he met the royalist fifth Infantry Regiment of XVIII. Napoleon stepped towards the soldiers and said these famous words: If there is among you a soldier who wants to kill his Emperor, here I am. The soldiers all joined his cause. After that, Napoleon was acclaimed at Grenoble and General Gabriel Marchand could not prevent Napoleon from entering the city through the door of Bonne. He said later: From Cannes to Grenoble, I still was an adventurer; in that last city, I came back a sovereign.(Petite histoire du Dauphin , Flix Vernay, 1933, p120) But after the defeat of Waterloo, the region suffered from a new invasion of Austrian and Sardinian troops.In the 19th century, there was a significant industrial development of Grenoble. The glove factories reached their Golden Age at that time, and their products were exported to the United States, the United Kingdom, and Russia.(Lhistoire de lIsre en BD, Tome 5, Gilbert Bouchard, 2004)The Bastille fortress was transformed between 1824 and 1848 by general Haxo and took on its present-day aspect. During the Second Empire, the region saw the construction of its railway network, and the first trains arrived at Grenoble in 1858.In 1869, the engineer Bergs played a major role in industrializing hydroelectricity production. With the development of his paper mills, he accelerated the economic development of the Grsivaudan valley and Grenoble.On 4 August 1897, a stone and bronze fountain was inaugurated in Grenoble to commemorate the pre-revolutionary events of June 1788. Built by the sculptor Ding, the Fountain of the Three Orders, which represents three characters, is located on the Place Notre-Dame. People in Grenoble interpret these characters as follows: Is it raining? enquires the third estate; Please heaven it had rained, lament the clergy; and It will rain, proclaims the nobility.(Grenoble, cur de pierre, Franoise Goyet, Edi Loire, 1996, (ISBN 2840840464))20th centuryWorld War I continued the acceleration of Grenobles economic development.(Lhistoire de lIsre en BD, Tome 5, Gilbert Bouchard, 2004, p40) In order to sustain the effort of war, new hydroelectric industries grew up alongside the various rivers of the region, and several other enterprises moved into the armaments industry. Chemicals factories were also established in the area surrounding Grenoble. This development resulted in significant immigration to Grenoble, particularly from Italian workers who settled in Saint-Laurent quarter.The economic development of the city was highlighted by the organization of the Exhibition of Hydropower and Tourism in 1925, which was visited by 1,050,000 people.(internationale de la houille blanche#Les chiffres) The organization of this exhibition forced the military to remove the old city walls and allowed an expansion of the city to the south. This exhibition also allowed the highlighting of the citys hydropower industry and the regions tourist attractions.The site of the exhibition has become an urban park in 1926, called Parc Paul Mistral since the death of the mayor in 1932. Today, the only building remaining of this exhibition in the park, is the Perret, closed to the public since 1960.During World War II, at the of the Alps, the Nazi invasion was stopped near Grenoble at Voreppe by the forces of Cartier in June 1940. The French forces resisted until the armistice. Grenoble was then part of the State before submitting to Italian occupation from 1942 to 1943. Their mercy towards the Jewish populations resulted in a significant increase of their number in the region.(Lhistoire, Tome 5, Gilbert Bouchard, 2004, p45)Grenoble was extremely active in the Rsistance against the occupation. Its action was symbolized by figures such as Chavant, Lon Martin, and Marie Reynoard.() The University of Grenoble supported the clandestine operations and provided false documentation for young people to prevent them from being assigned to STO.In September 1943, German troops occupied Grenoble, escalating the conflict with the clandestine movements. On 11 November 1943 (the anniversary of the armistice of 1918) massive strikes and demonstrations took place in front of the local collaboration offices. In response, the occupiers arrested 400 demonstrators in the streets. On 13 November, the resistance blew up the artillery at the Polygon, which was a psychological shock for an enemy who then intensified the repression. On 25 November, the occupiers killed 11 members of the Rsistance organizations of Grenoble. This violent crackdown was nicknamed Grenobles Saint-Bartholomew.()This event only intensified the activities of Grenobles resistance movements. The Germans could not prevent the destruction of their new arsenal on 2 December at the Bonne Barracks. After the Normandy landing, resistance operations reached their peak, with numerous attacks considerably hampering the activity of German troops. With the landing in Provence, German troops evacuated the city on 22 August 1944. On 5 November 1944, General de Gaulle came to Grenoble and bestowed on the city the Compagnon de la Libration in order to recognise a heroic city at the peak of the French resistance and combat for the liberation.(In 1955, physics Nobel prize laureate Nel created the Grenoble Center for Nuclear Studies (CENG), resulting in the birth of the Grenoble model, a combination of research and industry. The first stone was laid in December 1956.In 1968, Grenoble welcomed the Xth Olympic Winter Games. This event helped modernize the city with the development of infrastructure such as an airport, motorways, and a town hall. It also helped develop new ski resorts like Chamrousse, Deux Alpes, and de Lans.Main sightsLa BastilleThe Bastille, an ancient series of fortifications, sits on the mountainside overlooking Grenoble and is visible from many points in the city. The Bastille is one of Grenobles most visited tourist attractions and is a good vantage point for viewing the town below and the surrounding mountains.Although the Bastille was begun in the Ages, later years saw extensive additions, including a semi-underground defense network. The Bastille has been credited as the most extensive example of early 18th century fortifications in all of France and held an important strategic point on the Alpine frontier.(See web site http://www.bastille-grenoble.fr/english/fortifie_uk.htm)The first cable transport system, installed on the Bastille in 1875, was built by the world-famous Porte de France Cement Company. This cable transport system connected the Mount Jalla, just over the bastille, and Grenoble. It was abandoned in the early twentieth centurySince 1934, the Bastille has been the destination of the Cable Car. This system of egg-shaped cable cars known to locals as Les Bulles provides the occupants with an excellent view over the River. At the top are located two restaurants and a museum of mountain troops (Muse des troupes de montagne).Palace of the Parliament of DauphinThis palace was constructed Place Saint Andre, around 1500 and extended in 1539. It was the location of the Parlement of Dauphin until the Revolution. It then became a courthouse until 2002. The left wing of the palace was extended in 1897.The building now belongs to the Isre Council (Conseil Gnral de lIsre). An ongoing renovation project will give this building a new life whilst preserving its patrimonial character and adding a modern touch.(General Council of the department of Isere (french))Museum of GrenobleThe citys most prized museum, the of Grenoble ( Muse de Grenoble), welcomes  visitors a year. The of Grenoble is above all renowned for its collection of paintings that covers all the artistic evolutions, but it also presents Egyptian antiquities as well as Greek and Roman artifacts. In April 2010, the prophetess of Antinoe, a sixth-century mummy discovered in 1907 in a necropolis Coptic of Antinoe in Middle Egypt, returns to the Museum of Grenoble, after more than fifty years of absence.Archaeological museum of Saint-LaurentLocated in the Place Saint-Laurent, the collections come from the archaeological excavations done on the site and are dated throughout the 3rd century AD. Situated on the right bank of the Isre, the museum presents the vestiges permitting to carry up the time until the origins of Christianity. The museum is situated in a Benedictine church of the 12th century. Discovered in 1803 by Joseph Champollion-Figeac, brother of the egyptologist Champollion, the church is one of the first monuments classified in France thanks to the intervention of Mrime, historic monument inspector.() Since 1978, a systematic excavation has led Loud in the setting of a regional research program on the evolution of the churches during the Middle Ages. After eight years of work, the museum opened 6 May 2011.Education and ScienceSecondary levelThe presence of a large international community of both foreign students and foreign researchers prompted the creation of an international school more than a decade ago. The Cit Scolaire Internationale Europole (CSI Europole) was formerly situated downtown in the Lyce International Stendhal across from the du Tourisme.Tertiary levelIn a 1339 pontific bull, Pope XII commissioned the establishment of the of Grenoble. In 1968, the university was relocated to a campus outside of the city in Saint Martin dHres (with some parts in Gires). However, there are annexes inside the city proper, on the slopes of the Bastille, and in the northwestern part of the city known as the Polygone Scientifique (Scientific Polygon).The university consists of five separate institutions sharing the campus grounds and even some buildings and laboratories:* Grenoble I  Fourier University (sciences, health, technologies)* Grenoble II  Mends-France University (social sciences)** with attached the Institute of political studies* Grenoble III  University  (humanities)* cole de Management (management and business administration)* cole DArchitecture de Grenoble ( School of Architecture of Grenoble)* Institute of Technology (INPG or Grenoble-INP) is a federation of engineering colleges.Grenoble is now an important university center with more than 60,000 students, including 16% from abroad.()Science and engineeringFile:Esrf grenoble.jpg|thumb|right|Site of Synchrotron Radiation Facility, Laue-Langevin and Molecular Biology Laboratory Grenoble is also a major scientific center, especially in the fields of physics, science, and mathematics: Joseph Fourier University (UJF) is one of the leading French scientific universities while the Grenoble Institute of Technology trains more than 5000 engineers every year in key technology disciplines.Many fundamental and applied scientific research laboratories are conjointly managed by Joseph Fourier University, Grenoble Institute of Technology, and the French National Center for Scientific Research (CNRS). Numerous other scientific laboratories are managed independently or in collaboration with the CNRS and the French National Institute for Research in Computer Science and Control (INRIA).Other research centers in or near Grenoble include the Synchrotron Radiation Facility (ESRF), the Laue-Langevin (ILL), the Molecular Biology Laboratory (EMBL), and one of the Commissariat  lnergie Atomique (Nuclear Energy Commission)(CEA) main research facilities.File:Minatec ; Grenoble.JPG|thumb|right|Site of MinatecLeti and the recent development of Minatec, a centre for innovation in micro- and nano-technology, only increases Grenobles position as a European scientific center.(See official website)The city benefits from the highest concentration of strategic jobs in France after Paris, with 14% of the employments, 35,186 jobs, 45% of which specialized in design and research.() Grenoble is also the largest research center in France after Paris with 21,000 jobs.()Grenoble is also renowned for the excellence of its academic research in humanities and political sciences. Its universities, alongside public scientific institutions, host some of the largest research centres in France (in fields such as political science, urban planning or the of organizations). Knowledge and Innovation Community Grenoble is one of the co-location centres of the Knowledge and Innovation Community (Sustainable Energy) of the Institute of Innovation and Technology (EIT).()EconomyGrenoble is one of the leading European cities in term of high-tech industries, especially bio- and nano-technologies. World-renowned enterprises have settled in Grenoble and in the surrounding area. Industry* The town is famous for glove manufacturing, for which an innovative technique from Xavier Jouvin was introduced in the 19th century.(A. Doyon, Xavier Jouvin, inventeur grenoblois et sa famille, Paris, Dayez ed., 1976) Companies * The biggest enterprises of Grenoble were in 2007, by number of employees:()de Glnat - Grenoble.jpg|thumb|Head office of GlnatThe presence of enterprises such as HP or Caterpillar in the city results in the settlement of many American and British workers in Grenoble, especially in surrounding mountain villages. The region has the second largest English-speaking community in France after Paris.() This community has an English speaking Church and supported the International School.Glnat has its head office in Grenoble.(Mentions obligatoires. Glnat. Retrieved on 1 May 2011. GLENAT Editions SA 37, Rue Servan BP 177 38008 GRENOBLE CEDEX 1)SportGrenoble hosted the 1968 Winter Olympics. The city is famous for many nearby ski resorts nestled in the surrounding mountains.It is the home of a union team Grenoble, a football team Foot 38, and an ice hockey team de loups.* of Grenoble, a six-day track cycling race since 1971.* The ferrata Grenoble is a climbing route located on the hill of the Bastille in Grenoble.The abundance of natural sites around Grenoble as well as the particular influence of mountaineering practices and history make many Grenoble inhabitants very fond of sports and outdoor activities (e.g., mountain trails hiking, mountain bike, backcountry skiing, rock climbing, and paragliding).The de France cycling race regularly passes through the city.CultureGrenoble hosts several festivals: the Grenoble Jazz Festival in March, the Open Air Short Film Festival in early July, and the Cabaret Frapp music festival at the end of July.The Summum is the biggest concert hall in Grenoble, and the most famous artists produce there. Another big hall, Le grand angle, is located nearby in Voiron. Smaller halls in the city include the Salle Olivier Messiaen.The main cultural center of the city is called MC2 (for Maison de la culture, version 2), which hosts music, theater, and dance performances.There are several theaters in Grenoble, the main one being Grenoble Municipal Theater (Thatre de Grenoble). Others are the Thtre de Cration, the Thtre Prmol, and the Thtre 145.There are two main art centers in Grenoble: the Centre national dArt contemporain (also called Le Magasin) and the Centre dart Bastille.Grenoble is famous for its walnuts, for which it enjoys an appellation of controlled origin.()The town also hosts an important comics publisher, Glnat.People from GrenobleInternational relationsAfter World War I, one street in the center of Palanka (Serbia) was named French street (Francuska ulica) and one street in Grenoble was named Palanka street(Rue de Palanka). There is also a Belgrade Street (Rue de Belgrade) near the Isre River.Twin towns  Sister citiesGrenoble is twinned with:( ) Gallery See also* Roch Cemetery* des Minimes de Grenoble* Bishopric of Grenoble* of mayors of Grenoble* Robert Ruffier-Lanche* NapolonReferences* INSEE commune file* * * The city is often referred to by Derek Boy Trotter, when he tries to speak French in the BBC sitcom Fools and HorsesNotesExternal links* * Grenoble Chamber of Commerce and Industry* Grenoble City website* Official tourism office of Grenoble* Semitag  Transports de lagglomration grenobloise * Comptable Grenoble le site spcialis pour lagglomration grenobloise * Remembering Grenoble Photography Exposition af:Grenoblear:an:Grenoblefrp:Grenobloaz:Qrenoblbe-x-old:bar:Grenoblebg:ca:Grenobleceb:Grenoblecs:Grenoblecy:Grenobleda:Grenoblede:Grenobleet:Grenobleel:es:Grenobleeo:Grenobloext:Grenobleeu:Grenoblefa:fr:Grenoblefy:Grenoblegd:Grenobleko:hi:hr:Grenobleio:Grenobleid:Grenobleos:is:Grenobleit:Grenoblehe:kl:Grenobleka:sw:Grenobleku:Grenoblelad:Grenoblela:Gratianopolislv:Grenoblelb:Grenobellt:Grenoblislij:Grenobleli:Grenoblelmo:Grenoblehu:Grenoblemk:mr:ms:Grenoblenl:Grenobleja:nap:Grenobleno:Grenoblenn:Grenobleoc:Grenblepnb:pl:Grenoblept:Grenoblero:Grenoblequ:Grenobleru:sq:Grenoblescn:Grenoblesimple:Grenoblesk:Grenoblesl:Grenoblesr:sh:Grenoblefi:Grenoblesv:Grenoblekab:Grenobletr:Grenobleuk:vec:Grenoblevi:Grenoblevo:Grenoblewar:Grenoblezh:
51518
Dam
Image:Hoover Dam Nevada Luftaufnahme.jpg|right|300px|thumb|Dam, a concrete dam in Black Canyon of the Colorado River. Mead in the background is impounded by the dam.Image:Glen canyon dam.jpg|thumb|right|300px||Canyon DamA dam is a barrier that impounds water or underground streams. Dams generally serve the primary purpose of retaining water, while other structures such as floodgates or levees (also known as dikes) are used to manage or prevent water flow into specific land regions. Hydropower and hydroelectricity are often used in conjunction with dams to generate electricity. A dam can also be used to collect water or for storage of water which can be evenly distributed between locations.HistoryFile:Harbaqa Dam, Syria. Pic 02.jpg|thumb|right|300px|The sizable Roman Dam in Syria is  high and   long.File:Roman Cornalvo dam, Extremadura, Spain. Pic 01.jpg|thumb|300px|The Roman dam at Cornalvo in Spain has been in use for almost two millennia.File:Anaicut.JPG|thumb|right|300px|Anicut dam on river Kaveri in Nadu, South India (19th century on 1st-2nd century foundation)The word dam can be traced back to English,(The American Heritage Dictionary of the English Language, Fourth Edition) and before that, from Dutch, as seen in the names of many old cities.(Source: Tijdschrift voor Nederlandse Taal- en Letterkunde (Magazine for Dutch Language and Literature), 1947. The first known appearance of the word dam stems from 1165. However, there is one village, Obdam, that is already mentioned in 1120. The word seems to be related to the Greek word taphos, meaning grave or grave hill. So the word should be understood as dike from dug out earth. The names of more than 40 places (with minor changes) from the Middle Dutch era (11501500 CE) such as Amsterdam (founded as Amstelredam in the late 12th century) and Rotterdam, also bear testimony to the use of the word in Middle Dutch at that time.) Early dam building took place in Mesopotamia and the East. Dams were used to control the water level, for Mesopotamias weather affected the Tigris and Euphrates rivers, and could be quite unpredictable.The earliest known dam is the Dam in Jordan,   northeast of the capital Amman. This gravity dam featured a   high and   wide stone wall, supported by a   wide earth rampart. The structure is dated to 3000 BC.(Gnther Garbrecht: Wasserspeicher (Talsperren) in der Antike, Antike Welt, 2nd special edition: Antiker Wasserbau (1986), pp.51-64 (52))(S.W. Helms: Jawa Excavations 1975. Third Preliminary Report, Levant 1977) The Egyptian Dam at Wadi Al-Garawi, located about   south of Cairo, was   long at its base and   wide. The structure was built around 2800(Gnther Garbrecht: Wasserspeicher (Talsperren) in der Antike, Antike Welt, 2nd special edition: Antiker Wasserbau (1986), pp.51-64 (52f.)) or 2600 B.C.() as a dam for flood control, but was destroyed by heavy rain during construction or shortly afterwards.(( By the mid-late third century BC, an intricate water-management system within Dholavira in modern day India, was built. The system included 16 reservoirs, dams and various channels for collecting water and storing it.()Roman dam construction was characterized by the Romans ability to plan and organize engineering construction on a grand scale.() Roman planners introduced the then novel concept of large dams which could secure a permanent supply for urban settlements also over the dry season.(; ) Their pioneering use of water-proof hydraulic mortar and particularly Roman concrete allowed for much larger dam structures than previously built,( such as the Homs Dam, possibly the largest water barrier to that date,() and the Dam, both in Syria. The highest Roman dam was the Dam near Rome; its record height of   remained unsurpassed until its accidental destruction in 1305.()Roman engineers made routine use of ancient standard designs like embankment dams and masonry gravity dams.() Apart from that, they displayed a high degree of inventiveness, introducing most of the other basic dam designs which had been unknown until then. These include dams,(; ) dams,(; ; ; ; ) dams() and multiple arch buttress dams,(; ; ; ) all of which were known and employed by the 2nd century AD (see of Roman dams). Roman workforces also were the first to build dam bridges, such as the of Valerian in Iran.()Pnar is a Hittite dam and spring temple near Konya, Turkey. Its thought to be from the time of the Hittite empire between the 15th and 13 century BC.The Kallanai is constructed of unhewn stone, over   long,   high and   wide, across the main stream of the Kaveri river in Nadu, South India. The basic structure dates to the 1st century AD.() and is considered one of the oldest water-diversion or water-regulator structures in the world, which is still in use.() The purpose of the dam was to divert the waters of the Kaveri across the fertile Delta region for irrigation via canals.It is considered to be the oldest dam still in use.Du Jiang Yan is the oldest surviving irrigation system in China that included a dam that directed waterflow. It was finished in 251 B.C. A large earthen dam, made by the Minister of (state), Ao, flooded a valley in modern-day northern Anhui province that created an enormous irrigation reservoir   in circumference), a reservoir that is still present today.(Needham, Joseph (1986). Science and Civilization in China: Volume 4, Part 3. Taipei: Caves Books, Ltd.)In Iran, bridge dams such as the Kaisar were used to provide hydropower through wheels, which often powered water-raising mechanisms. One of the first was the Roman-built dam bridge in Dezful,() which could raise water 50 cubits in height for the supply to all houses in the town. Also dams were known.(Routledge Hill (1996), Engineering, p. 759, in ) Milling dams were introduced which the Muslim engineers called the Pul-i-Bulaiti. The first was built at Shustar on the River Karun, Iran, and many of these were later built in other parts of the world.( Water was conducted from the back of the dam through a large pipe to drive a water wheel and watermill.(Adam Lucas (2006), Wind, Water, Work: Ancient and Medieval Milling Technology, p. 62. BRILL, ISBN 9004146490.) In the 10th century, Al-Muqaddasi described several dams in Persia. He reported that one in Ahwaz was more than   long,( and that and it had many water-wheels raising the water into aqueducts through which it flowed into reservoirs of the city.() Another one, the Band-i-Amir dam, provided irrigation for 300 villages.()In the Netherlands, a low-lying country, dams were often applied to block rivers in order to regulate the water level and to prevent the sea from entering the marsh lands. Such dams often marked the beginning of a town or city because it was easy to cross the river at such a place, and often gave rise to the respective places names in Dutch. For instance the Dutch capital Amsterdam (old name Amstelredam) started with a dam through the river Amstel in the late 12th century, and Rotterdam started with a dam through the river Rotte, a minor tributary of the Maas. The central square of Amsterdam, covering the original place of the 800 year old dam, still carries the name Square or simply the Dam.French engineer Fourneyron developed the first successful turbine in 1832. The era of large dams was initiated after Dam was completed on the River near Las Vegas in 1936. By 1997, there were an estimated 800,000 dams worldwide, some 40,000 of them over   high.(Is it Worth a Dam? . Health Perspectives Volume 105, Number 10, October 1997) Types of dams Dams can be formed by human agency, natural causes, or even by the intervention of wildlife such as beavers. Man-made dams are typically classified according to their size (height), intended purpose or structure. By structure Based on structure and material used, dams are classified as timber dams, dams, dams or dams, with several subtypes. Arch dams File:Gordon Dam.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Dam, Tasmania is an dam.In the arch dam, stability is obtained by a combination of arch and gravity action. If the upstream face is vertical the entire weight of the dam must be carried to the foundation by gravity, while the distribution of the normal hydrostatic pressure between vertical cantilever and arch action will depend upon the stiffness of the dam in a vertical and horizontal direction. When the upstream face is sloped the distribution is more complicated. The normal component of the weight of the arch ring may be taken by the arch action, while the normal hydrostatic pressure will be distributed as described above. For this type of dam, firm reliable supports at the abutments (either buttress or canyon side wall) are more important. The most desirable place for an arch dam is a narrow canyon with steep side walls composed of sound rock.()The safety of an arch dam is dependent on the strength of the side wall abutments, hence not only should the arch be well seated on the side walls but also the character of the rock should be carefully inspected.File:Barrage Daniel-Johnson2.jpg|thumb|left|250px|Dam, Quebec, is a multiple-arch buttress dam.Two types of single-arch dams are in use, namely the constant-angle and the constant-radius dam. The constant-radius type employs the same face radius at all elevations of the dam, which means that as the channel grows narrower towards the bottom of the dam the central angle subtended by the face of the dam becomes smaller. Falls Dam, in Canada, is a constant radius dam. In a constant-angle dam, also known as a variable radius dam, this subtended angle is kept a constant and the variation in distance between the abutments at various levels are taken care of by varying the radii. Constant-radius dams are much less common than constant-angle dams. Dam is a constant-angle arch dam.A similar type is the double-curvature or thin-shell dam. Wildhorse Dam near Mountain City, Nevada in the United States is an example of the type. This method of construction minimizes the amount of concrete necessary for construction but transmits large loads to the foundation and abutments. The appearance is similar to a single-arch dam but with a distinct vertical curvature to it as well lending it the vague appearance of a concave lens as viewed from downstream.The multiple-arch dam consists of a number of single-arch dams with concrete buttresses as the supporting abutments, as for example the Dam, Qubec, Canada. The multiple-arch dam does not require as many buttresses as the hollow gravity type, but requires good rock foundation because the buttress loads are heavy. Gravity damsFile:Grand Coulee Dam spillway.jpg|thumb|right|200px|The Coulee Dam is an example of a solid gravity dam.In a gravity dam, the force that holds the dam in place against the push from the water is Earths gravity pulling down on the weight of the dam itself. (Brittish Dam society http://www.britishdams.org/about_dams/gravity.htm)In a gravity dam, stability is secured by making it of such a size and shape that it will resist overturning, sliding and crushing at the toe. The dam will not overturn provided that the moment around the turning point, caused by the pressure, is smaller than the moment caused by the weight of the dam . This is the case if the force of water pressure and weight falls within the base of the dam. However, in order to prevent stress at the upstream face and excessive stress at the downstream face, the dam cross section is usually designed so that the resultant falls within the middle at all elevations of the cross section (the core). For this type of dam, impervious foundations with high bearing strength are essential.When situated on a suitable site, gravity dams can prove to be a better alternative to other types of dams. When built on a carefully studied foundation, the gravity dam probably represents the best developed example of dam building. Since the fear of flood is a strong motivator in many regions, gravity dams are being built in some instances where an arch dam would have been more economical.Gravity dams are classified as solid or hollow and are generally made of either concrete or masonry. This is called zoning. The core of the dam is zoned depending on the availability of locally available materials, foundation conditions and the material attributes. The solid form is the more widely used of the two, though the hollow dam is frequently more economical to construct. Gravity dams can also be classified as overflow (spillway) and non-overflow. Coulee Dam is a solid gravity dam and Dam is a hollow gravity dam. Arch-gravity dams File:Hoover dam from air.jpg|thumb|right|200px|The Dam is an example of an arch-gravity dam.A gravity dam can be combined with an arch dam into an dam for areas with massive amounts of water flow but less material available for a purely gravity dam. Barrages File:Koshi.jpg|thumb|right|200px|The BarrageA barrage dam is a special kind of dam which consists of a line of large gates that can be opened or closed to control the amount of water passing the dam.  The gates are set between flanking piers which are responsible for supporting the water load.  They are often used to control and stabilize water flow for irrigation systems.Barrages that are built at the mouth of rivers or lagoons to prevent tidal incursions or utilize the tidal flow for power are known as barrages.( Embankment dams Embankment dams are made from compacted earth, and have two main types, rock-fill and earth-fill dams. Embankment dams rely on their weight to hold back the force of water, like the gravity dams made from concrete. Rock-fill dams Rock-fill dams are embankments of compacted free-draining granular earth with an impervious zone. The earth utilized often contains a large percentage of large particles hence the term rock-fill. The impervious zone may be on the upstream face and made of masonry, concrete, plastic membrane, steel sheet piles, timber or other material. The impervious zone may also be within the embankment in which case it is referred to as a core. In the instances where clay is utilized as the impervious material the dam is referred to as a composite dam. To prevent internal erosion of clay into the rock fill due to seepage forces, the core is separated using a filter. Filters are specifically graded soil designed to prevent the migration of fine grain soil particles. When suitable material is at hand, transportation is minimized leading to cost savings during construction. Rock-fill dams are resistant to damage from earthquakes. However, inadequate quality control during construction can lead to poor compaction and sand in the embankment which can lead to liquefaction of the rock-fill during an earthquake. Liquefaction potential can be reduced by keeping susceptible material from being saturated, and by providing adequate compaction during construction. An example of a rock-fill dam is Melones Dam in California.Concrete-face rock-fill damsA concrete-face rock-fill dam (CFRD) is a rock-fill dam with slabs on its upstream face. This design offers the concrete slab as an impervious wall to prevent leakage and also a structure without concern for uplift pressure. In addition, the CFRD design is flexible for topography, faster to construct and less costly than earth-fill dams. The CFRD originated during the Gold Rush in the 1860s when miners constructed rock-fill timber-face dams for sluice operations. The timber was later replaced by concrete as the design was applied to irrigation and power schemes. As CFRD designs grew in height during the 1960s, the fill was compacted and the slabs horizontal and vertical joints were replaced with improved vertical joints. In the last few decades, the design has become popular.()Currently, the tallest CFRD in the world is the  tall Dam in China which was completed in 2008.() Earth-fill dams File:Gathrightdam4.jpg|thumb|right|200px|The Dam in Virginia is a rock-fill dam.Earth-fill dams, also called earthen, rolled-earth or simply earth dams, are constructed as a simple embankment of well compacted earth. A homogeneous rolled-earth dam is entirely constructed of one type of material but may contain a drain layer to collect seep water. A zoned-earth dam has distinct parts or zones of dissimilar material, typically a locally plentiful shell with a watertight clay core. Modern zoned-earth embankments employ filter and drain zones to collect and remove seep water and preserve the integrity of the downstream shell zone. An outdated method of zoned earth dam construction utilized a fill to produce a watertight core. Rolled-earth dams may also employ a watertight facing or core in the manner of a rock-fill dam. An interesting type of temporary earth dam occasionally used in high latitudes is the frozen-core dam, in which a coolant is circulated through pipes inside the dam to maintain a watertight region of permafrost within it.Dam is a large dam on the River in Pakistan. It is located about  northwest of Islamabad, and a height of 485 ft (148 m) above the river bed and a reservoir size of  makes it the largest earth filled dam in the world. The principal element of the project is an embankment 9,000 feet (2743 meters) long with a maximum height of 465 feet (143 meters). The total volume of earth and rock used for the project is approximately 200 million cubic yards (152.8 million cu. Meters) which makes it the largest man made structure in the world , except for the Great Chinese Wall which consumed somewhat more material.Because earthen dams can be constructed from materials found on-site or nearby, they can be very cost-effective in regions where the cost of producing or bringing in concrete would be prohibitive. Asphalt-concrete core A third type of embankment dam is built with concrete core. The majority of such dams are built with rock and/or gravel as the main fill material. Almost 100 dams of this design have now been built worldwide since the first such dam was completed in 1962. All asphalt-concrete core dams built so far have an excellent performance record. The type of asphalt used is a viscoelastic-plastic material that can adjust to the movements and deformations imposed on the embankment as a whole, and to settlements in the foundation. The flexible properties of the asphalt make such dams especially suited in earthquake regions.() By size International standards (including Commission on Large Dams, ICOLD) define large dams as higher than 15 meters and major dams as over 150 meters in height.()  The Report of the World Commission on Dams also includes in the large category, dams, such as barrages, which are between 5 and 15 meters high with a reservoir capacity of more than 3 million cubic meters.()The tallest dam in the world is the 300-meter-high Dam in Tajikistan.(Guinness Book of Records 1997 Pages 108-109 ISBN 0-85112-693-6) By use  Saddle dam A saddle dam is an auxiliary dam constructed to confine the reservoir created by a primary dam either to permit a higher water elevation and storage or to limit the extent of a reservoir for increased efficiency. An auxiliary dam is constructed in a low spot or saddle through which the reservoir would otherwise escape. On occasion, a reservoir is contained by a similar structure called a dike to prevent inundation of nearby land. Dikes are commonly used for reclamation of arable land from a shallow lake. This is similar to a levee, which is a wall or embankment built along a river or stream to protect adjacent land from flooding. Weir A weir (also sometimes called an overflow dam) is a type of small overflow dam that is often used within a river channel to create an impoundment lake for water abstraction purposes and which can also be used for flow measurement. Check dam A check dam is a small dam designed to reduce flow velocity and control erosion. Conversely, a dam is a structure that only partly restricts a waterway, creating a faster channel that resists the accumulation of sediment. Dry dam A dry dam also known as a flood retarding structure, is a dam designed to control flooding. It normally holds back no water and allows the channel to flow freely, except during periods of intense flow that would otherwise cause flooding downstream. Diversionary dam A diversionary dam is a structure designed to divert all or a portion of the flow of a river from its natural course. The water may be redirected into a canal or tunnel for irrigation and/or hydroelectric power production.Tailings damA tailings dam is typically an earth-fill embankment dam used to store tailings  which are produced during mining operations after separating the valuable fraction from the uneconomic fraction of an ore. Conventional water retention dams can serve this purpose but due to cost, a tailings dam is more viable. Unlike water retention dams, a tailings dam is raised in succession throughout the life of the particular mine. Typically, a base or starter dam is constructed and as it fills with a mixture of tailings and water, it is raised. Material used to raise the dam can include the tailings (depending on their size) along with dirt.() There are three raised tailings dam designs, the upstream, downstream and centerline, named according to the movement of the crest during raising. The specific design used it dependent upon topography, geology, climate, the type of tailings and cost. An upstream tailings dam consists of trapezoidal embankments being constructed on top but toe to crest of another, moving the crest further upstream. This creates a relatively flat downstream side and a jagged upstream side which is supported by tailings slurry in the impoundment. The downstream design refers to the successive raising of the embankment that positions the fill and crest further downstream. A centerlined dam has sequential embankment dams constructed directly on top of another while fill is placed on the downstream side for support and slurry supports the upstream side.()()Because tailings dams often store toxic chemicals from the mining process, they have an impervious liner to prevent seepage. Water/slurry levels in the tailings pond must be managed for stability and environmental purposes as well.( By material  Steel dams A dam is a type of dam briefly experimented with in around the turn of the 19th-20th Century which uses steel plating (at an angle) and load bearing beams as the structure. Intended as permanent structures, steel dams were an (arguably failed) experiment to determine if a construction technique could be devised that was cheaper than masonry, concrete or earthworks, but sturdier than timber crib dams. Timber dams File:Dam Timber Crib.jpg|thumb|left|200px|A timber crib dam in Michigan, photographed in 1978.Timber dams were widely used in the early part of the industrial revolution and in frontier areas due to ease and speed of construction. Rarely built in modern times because of relatively short lifespan and limited height to which they can be built, timber dams must be kept constantly wet in order to maintain their water retention properties and limit deterioration by rot, similar to a barrel. The locations where timber dams are most economical to build are those where timber is plentiful, cement is costly or difficult to transport, and either a low head diversion dam is required or longevity is not an issue. Timber dams were once numerous, especially in the North American west, but most have failed, been hidden under earth embankments or been replaced with entirely new structures. Two common variations of timber dams were the crib and the plank.Timber crib dams were erected of heavy timbers or dressed logs in the manner of a log house and the interior filled with earth or rubble. The heavy crib structure supported the dams face and the weight of the water. dams were timber crib dams used to help float logs downstream in the late 19th and early 20th centuries.Timber plank dams were more elegant structures that employed a variety of construction methods utilizing heavy timbers to support a water retaining arrangement of planks. Other types  Cofferdams File:Dam Coffer.jpg|thumb|right|200px|A cofferdam during the construction of locks at the Point Lock and Dam.A cofferdam is a (usually temporary) barrier constructed to exclude water from an area that is normally submerged. Made commonly of wood, concrete or steel sheet piling, cofferdams are used to allow construction on the foundation of permanent dams, bridges, and similar structures. When the project is completed, the cofferdam may be demolished or removed. See also causeway and wall. Common uses for cofferdams include construction and repair of off shore oil platforms. In such cases the cofferdam is fabricated from sheet steel and welded into place under water. Air is pumped into the space, displacing the water allowing a dry work environment below the surface. Upon completion the cofferdam is usually deconstructed unless the area requires continuous maintenance. Beaver dams Beavers create dams primarily out of mud and sticks to flood a particular habitable area. By flooding a parcel of land, beavers can navigate below or near the surface and remain relatively well hidden or protected from predators. The flooded region also allows beavers access to food, especially during the winter. Construction elements  Power generation plant Image:Water turbine.jpg|thumb|right|upright|Hydraulic turbine and generator.As of 2005, hydroelectric power, mostly from dams, supplies some 19% of the worlds electricity, and over 63% of energy.(Renewables Global Status Report 2006 Update, REN21, published 2006, accessed 2007-05-16) Much of this is generated by large dams, although China uses small scale hydro generation on a wide scale and is responsible for about 50% of world use of this type of power.(Most hydroelectric power comes from the energy of dammed water driving a turbine and generator; to boost the power generation capabilities of a dam, the water may be run through a large pipe called a penstock before the turbine. A variant on this simple model uses storage hydroelectricity to produce electricity to match periods of high and low demand, by moving water between reservoirs at different elevations. At times of low electrical demand, excess generation capacity is used to pump water into the higher reservoir. When there is higher demand, water is released back into the lower reservoir through a turbine. (For example see Power Station.)thumb|left|Hydroelectric dam in cross section. Spillways Image:Llyn Brianne spillway.jpg|right|upright|thumb|Spillway on Brianne dam, Wales soon after first fill.A spillway is a section of a dam designed to pass water from the upstream side of a dam to the downstream side. Many spillways have floodgates designed to control the flow through the spillway. Types of spillway include: A service spillway or primary spillway passes normal flow. An auxiliary spillway releases flow in excess of the capacity of the service spillway. An emergency spillway is designed for extreme conditions, such as a serious malfunction of the service spillway. A plug spillway is a low embankment designed to be over topped and washed away in the event of a large flood. Fusegate elements are independent free-standing block set side by side on the spillway which work without any remote control. They allow to increase the normal pool of the dam without compromising the security of the dam because they are designed to be gradually evacuated for exceptional events. They work as fixed weir most of the time allowing overspilling for the common floods.The spillway can be gradually eroded by water flow, including cavitation or turbulence of the water flowing over the spillway, leading to its failure. It was the inadequate design of the spillway which led to the 1889 over-topping of the Fork Dam in Johnstown, Pennsylvania, resulting in the infamous Flood (the great flood of 1889).Erosion rates are often monitored, and the risk is ordinarily minimized, by shaping the downstream face of the spillway into a curve that minimizes turbulent flow, such as an curve.Dam creationCommon purposes Location File:Takato Dam discharge.jpg|thumb|right|200px|The discharge of DamOne of the best places for building a dam is a narrow part of a deep river valley; the valley sides can then act as natural walls. The primary function of the dams structure is to fill the gap in the natural reservoir line left by the stream channel. The sites are usually those where the gap becomes a minimum for the required storage capacity. The most economical arrangement is often a composite structure such as a masonry dam flanked by earth embankments. The current use of the land to be flooded should be dispensable.Significant other engineering and geology considerations when building a dam include:* permeability of the surrounding rock or soil* earthquake faults* landslides and stability* water table* peak flood flows* reservoir silting* environmental impacts on river fisheries, forests and wildlife (see also ladder)* impacts on human habitations* compensation for land being flooded as well as population resettlement* removal of toxic materials and buildings from the proposed reservoir areaImpact assessmentImpact is assessed in several ways: the benefits to human society arising from the dam (agriculture, water, damage prevention and power), harm or benefit to nature and wildlife, impact on the geology of an area - whether the change to water flow and levels will increase or decrease stability, and the disruption to human lives (relocation, loss of archeological or cultural matters underwater).Environmental impactthumb|250px|Wood and garbage accumulated because of a damReservoirs held behind dams affect many ecological aspects of a river. Rivers topography and dynamics depend on a wide range of flows whilst rivers below dams often experience long periods of very stable flow conditions or saw tooth flow patterns caused by releases followed by no releases. Water releases from a reservoir including that exiting a turbine usually contains very little suspended sediment, and this in turn can lead to scouring of river beds and loss of riverbanks; for example, the daily cyclic flow variation caused by the Canyon Dam was a contributor to bar erosion.Older dams often lack a ladder, which keeps many fish from moving up stream to their natural breeding grounds, causing failure of breeding cycles or blocking of migration paths.(Dam Fact Sheet) Even the presence of a fish ladder does not always prevent a reduction in fish reaching the spawning grounds upstream. In some areas, young fish (smolt) are transported downstream by barge during parts of the year. Turbine and power-plant designs that have a lower impact upon aquatic life are an active area of research.A large dam can cause the loss of entire ecospheres, including endangered and undiscovered species in the area, and the replacement of the original environment by a new inland lake.Large reservoirs formed behind dams have been indicated in the contribution of seismic activity, due to changes in water load and/or the height of the water table.Human social impactThe impact on human society is also significant.  Cullather argues in Hungry World: Americas Cold War Battle Against Poverty in Asia that dam construction requires state to displace individual people in the name of the good, and that it often leads to abuses of the masses by planners.  He cites Desai, Interior Minister of India, in 1960 speaking to villagers upset about the Dam, who threatened to release the waters and drown the villagers if they did not cooperate.(Cullather, 110.)For example, the Gorges Dam on the River in China is more than five times the size of the Dam (U.S.), and will create a reservoir 600 km long to be used for hydro-power generation. Its construction required the loss of over a million peoples homes and their mass relocation, the loss of many valuable archaeological and cultural sites, as well as significant ecological change.() It is estimated that to date, 40-80 million people worldwide have been physically displaced from their homes as a result of dam construction.(World Commission on Dams Report)EconomicsConstruction of a plant requires a long lead-time for site studies, hydrological studies, and environmental impact assessment, and are large scale projects by comparison to traditional power generation based upon fuels. The number of sites that can be economically developed for hydroelectric production is limited; new sites tend to be far from population centers and usually require extensive transmission lines. Hydroelectric generation can be vulnerable to major changes in the climate, including variation of rainfall, ground and surface levels, and glacial melt, causing additional expenditure for the extra capacity to ensure sufficient power is available in low water years.Once completed, if it is well designed and maintained, a hydroelectric power source is usually comparatively cheap and reliable. It has no fuel and low escape risk, and as an energy source it is cheaper than both nuclear and wind power. It is more easily regulated to store water as needed and generate high power levels on demand compared to power, although dams have life expectancies while renewable energies do not.Dam failureImage:Teton Dam failure.jpg|thumb|right|The reservoir emptying through the failed Dam.thumb|right|International special sign for works and installations containing dangerous forcesDam failures are generally catastrophic if the structure is breached or significantly damaged. Routine deformation monitoring and monitoring of seepage from drains in and around larger dams is useful to anticipate any problems and permit remedial action to be taken before structural failure occurs. Most dams incorporate mechanisms to permit the reservoir to be lowered or even drained in the event of such problems. Another solution can be rock grouting - pressure pumping cement slurry into weak fractured rock.During an armed conflict, a dam is to be considered as an installation containing dangerous forces due to the massive impact of a possible destruction on the civilian population and the environment. As such, it is protected by the rules of Humanitarian Law (IHL) and shall not be made the object of attack if that may cause severe losses among the civilian population. To facilitate the identification, a sign consisting of three bright orange circles placed on the same axis is defined by the rules of IHL.The main causes of dam failure include inadequate spillway capacity, piping through the embankment, foundation or abutments, spillway design error (Fork Dam), geological instability caused by changes to water levels during filling or poor surveying (Dam, Malpasset, Creek Dam), poor maintenance, especially of outlet pipes (Lake Dam, di Stava Dam collapse), extreme rainfall (Dam), and human, computer or design error (Creek Flood, Dike Reservoir, Sauk pumped storage plant).A notable case of deliberate dam failure (prior to the above ruling) was the Air Force Dambusters raid on Germany in War II (codenamed Chastise), in which three German dams were selected to be breached in order to have an impact on German infrastructure and manufacturing and power capabilities deriving from the Ruhr and Eder rivers. This raid later became the basis for several films.Since 2007, the Dutch IJkdijk foundation is developing, with an innovation model and early warning system for levee/dike failures. As a part of the development effort, full scale dikes are destroyed in the IJkdijk fieldlab. The destruction process is monitored by sensor networks from an international group of companies and scientific institutions.See also* lock* curtain* rubber dam* of largest dams* of reservoirs and dams* of worlds tallest dams* BundingReferences Sources ************External links*Gravity Dam Analysis*Structurae: Dams and Retaining Structuresaf:Damar:an:Entibaderadaguabe-x-old:bs:Branabr:Stankelldaiguacv:hrzcy:Argaeda:Dmningde:Talsperreet:Paisel:es:Represaeo:Akvobaraoidrulicafa:fr:Barragegl:Encorogan:ko:hr:Branaid:Bendunganos:is:Stflait:Digahe:kk:sw:Lamboku:Bendav(agger)lv:Aizsprostslt:Utvanka(waterkiering)ln:Ndka(ptszet)ml:mr:ms:Empanganmy:(waterkering)new:ja:no:Demningnn:Demningoc:Paissirapnb:wodnapt:Barragemro:Barajharkaru:simple:Dam(hrdza)sl:Jezsr:sh:Branafi:Patosv:Dammbyggnadta:te:th:tr:Barajuk:ur:vi:pwar:Damwuu:yi:zh-yue:zh:
51981
List_of_planned_cities
This is a list of planned cities (sometimes known as planned communities or towns) by country. Additions to this list should be cities whose overall form (as opposed to individual neighborhoods or expansions) has been determined in large part in advance on a drawing board, or which were planned to a degree which is unusual for their time and place.Argentina*Plata  Buenos Aires*La Punta  San Luis*Jardn Lomas del Palomar  Buenos AiresAustralia*Adelaide  South Australia*Canberra  Australian Capital Territory*Churchill  Victoria*Eaglemont  Victoria*Griffith  New South Wales*Inala  Queensland*Leeton  New South Wales*Melbourne  Victoria*Mildura  Victoria*Monarto  South Australia (never built)*Polis  South Australia (never built)*Palmerston  Northern Territory*Garden City  Victoria*Yallourn  VictoriaAustria*Plten http://www.st-poelten.gv.at/Belarus*Novopolotsk (plan developed in 1958) http://www.2goroda.by/main.aspx?formcontent&file472*Soligorsk (construction began in 1958)Belgium*Louvain-la-NeuveBelize*BelmopanBrazil*Aracaju*Belmonte, Santa Catarina State*Horizonte (inaugurated in 1897)*Vista, Roraima*Braslia*Canarana - Mato Grosso State*Cataguases (most of the towns central areas were developed according to a plan, though the rest of the town has since grown randomly)*Curitiba*Erechim*Fordlndia A dream of Henry Ford, now abandoned*Goinia*Valadares (1915)*Solteira*Londrina*Maring*Palmas*de Contas http://www.google.com/search?qcache:N2S6rA9u3y8J:www.ufogenesis.com.br/ufoturismo/chapada_diamantina.htm+%22%C3%A9+uma+cidade+planejada%22&hlpt-BR&glbr&ctclnk&cd10&clientfirefox-a*Bahia *Sinop*do Leste - Mato Grosso State*Sorriso - Mato Grosso State*Teresina (The first one, inaugurated in 1852 from Oeiras)Botswana*GaboroneBurma*NaypyidawCanadaPlanned cities of Eastern Canada are notable.  In Western Canada, however, virtually all cities and towns created after the 1870 Dominion Lands Act (the majority of all such cities) were planned.  Most were railway towns, surveyed and subdivided by the powerful railway companies. For example, both Hat, Alberta and Current, Saskatchewan were founded by the CPR during construction of the main transcontinental line.  The only cities in Western Canada that grew organically were those, usually founded before 1870, that grew up around fur trade forts, police outposts, or missions.*Ontario*Ontario, now a part of Brampton, Ontario*Nova Scotia (failed)*Brook, Newfoundland*River, Ontario*Mills, now a part of Toronto*Mills, part of Mississauga*Quebec*Quebec*Ontario*Falls-Windsor, Newfoundland*Kapuskasing, Ontario*British Columbia*Royal, Quebec*Westminster, British Columbia, designed by Richard Clements Moody of the Royal Engineers to be the capital of the Colony of British Columbia. *Oromocto, New Brunswick*Manitoba*Manitoba*Ontario (failed)*Ridge, British Columbia*OntarioChile*Salvador, Chile mining cityCzech Republic*Havov*ZlnDenmark*restadEstonia*Paldiski*VruFinland*Helsinki*Tapiola, Espoo http://english.espoo.fi//default.asp?path32373*Rovaniemi http://www.rovaniemi.fi/Intro.iw3?langen*HaminaFrance*Near Paris: **Cergy-Pontoise,  http://www.ville-cergy.fr/**Marne-la-Valle, http://www.san-valmaubuee.fr**Snart, http://www.san-senart.fr**vry,http://www.sanevry.fr** en Yvelines  http://www.san-sqy.fr*Near Lille: dAscq*Near Lyon: dAbeau*Near Marseille: de lEtang de Berre*Near Rouen: de Reuil*Saltworks at Arc-et-Senans*Fos http://www.san-vnf.fr*Neuf-Brisach*VersaillesGermany*Bremerhaven http://www.bremerhaven.de*Eisenhttenstadt*Freudenstadt*Glckstadt*Karlsruhe http://www.karlsruhe.de*Ludwigslust*Mannheim*Putbus*Salzgitter*Germania (never built)*Wilhelmshaven*WolfsburgHong Kong*Tsuen Wan*Sha Tin *Tuen Mun *Tai Po *Fanling - Sheung Shui *Yuen Long *Tseung Kwan O *Tin Shui Wai *North Lantau (Tung Chung - Tai Ho)*East New Territories New Development Area*West New Territories New Development AreaHungary*Dunajvros http://www.dunaujvaros.hu*Kazincbarcika http://www.kazincbarcika.hu*Oroszlny http://www.oroszlany.hu*Petfibnya*Salgtarjn http://www.salgotarjan.hu*Tatabnya http://www.tatabanya.hu*Tiszajvros http://www.tiszaujvaros.huIndia*Bengaluru*Delhi*Mumbai (New Mumbai) a satellite city of Mumbai*Noida*Noida*Gurgaon(DLF)*Auroville*Lavasa*Rourkela*Chandigarh*Dispur*Gandhinagar*Jamshedpur*Bhubaneswar*Raipur*Madurai*Panchkula*Jaipur*Pondicherry*Durgapur*Bokaro*Bhilai*Udaipur*Mohali*SricityIran*Alavi*shahr*Andisheh*Baharestan*Binalud*Golbahar*Hashtgerd *Isfahan*Latian*Majlesi*Mohajeran*Parand*Pardis http://www.pardiscity.com*Poulad-shahr*Ramin*Ramshar*Sadra*Sahand*Shahr*TisIraq*Bagdhad http://www.schoolshistory.org.uk/baghdad.htmIreland*Adamstown*Town   (County Clare|Clare)  http://www.clare.ie/Israel*Acre*Afula*Arad*Ariel*Ashdod*Ashkelon*Beersheba*Shean*Shemesh*Illit*Caesarea*Dimona*Eilat*HaGelilit*Karmiel*Gat*Malakhi*Shmona*Adummim*Tarshiha*Ramon*Modiin*Nahariya*Illit*Netivot*Ofakim*Akiva*Safed*Sderot*Tiberias*YeruhamItalyAbruzzo*Salle*Salvo MarinaPuglia*Segezia*Borgo Giardinetto*Borgo Mezzanone*Siponto*Tavernola*Incoronata*Borgo Cervaro*Montegrosso*Ginosa Marina*Borgo Perrone *Borgo Piave *Borgo Grappa *Cesareo*CardiglianoBasilicata*Colonico Villaggio Marconi*Salice*Jonico*Policoro Calabria*Lamezia *Sibari*Frasso*Thurio*ScaloCampania*Appio*Domitio*Licola*Corvinia*FariniaEmilia Romagna*Marittima*Volania *Anita*Tresigallo Friuli Venezia Giulia*Torviscosa*Brunner *Sdobba*Fossalon *Palmanova Lazio*Latina*Sabaudia*Pontinia*Aprilia*Pomezia*Guidonia*Maccarese*Cesareo*AciliaLombardia*Milano 2*Milano 3Marche*MetauriliaMolise*CliterniaSardinia*Carbonia*Cortoghiana*Strovina*Fertilia*Tramariglio*Villaggio Calik*Campo Giavesu*Arborea*Sassu*Pompongias*Tanca Marchesa*Torrevecchia*LinnasTuscany*Albinia *Tirrenia*Calambrone*Macchiascandona*Alberese*Spergolaia*PienzaVeneto*CandianaIvory Coast*YamoussoukroJapan*Near Tokyo**New Town**Yukarigaoka**New Town**Den-en Toshi*Near Nagoya**New Town *Near Osaka**New Town *Near Hiroshima**Shinto*Kyoto*Sapporo*Science CityKazakhstan*Astana http://www.astana.kzLithuania*Visaginas*ElektrnaiMalaysia*Cyberjaya*Nusajaya, part of Malaysia project.*Jaya*Putrajaya*AlamMalta*Vallettahttp://www.cityofvalletta.org*Senglea http://www.islalocalcouncil.com/historicalinfo.htm*SmartCity http://www.smartcity.ae/malta/index.htmlMexicoMost Mexican cities founded during the period of New Spain were planned right from the beginning. There are historical maps showing the designs of most cities, however as time passed and the cities grew, the original planning disappeared. In recent times, a number of tourist cities have been built, such as Cancun or Puerto Peasco; the latest city to be planned in Mexico was Delicias. Some of these cities are:*City, Federal District*Puebla*Veracruz*Jalisco*Laredo, Tamaulipas Recent times*Cancn, Quintana Roo*Delicias, Chihuahua*Peasco, Sonora*Baja California*de Ramos, Jalisco*Santa Fe, de Ziga, Jalisco*Bugambilias, Zapopan, JaliscoMiddle East*Al Noor City, Djibouti*Al Noor City, YemenNetherlands*Almere http://www.almere.nl*aan den IJssel http://www.capelleaandenijssel.nl*Dronten http://www.dronten.nl*Emmeloord http://www.noordoostpolder.nl*Helder http://www.denhelder.nl*Haarlemmermeer http://www.haarlemmermeer.nl*Hellevoetsluis http://www.hellevoetsluis.nl*Lelystad http://www.lelystad.nl*Nieuwegein http://www.nieuwegein.nl*Purmerend http://www.purmerend.nl*Spijkenisse http://www.spijkenisse.nl*Zeewolde http://www.zeewolde.nl*Zoetermeer http://www.zoetermeer.nlNew Zealand*Town http://www.pegasustown.comNigeria*AbujaNorway*Nordstern (planned by occupying Nazi officials in Norway, never built)Pakistan*Faisalabad*Islamabad*Peshawar*Lahore*Karachi*Lahore*Queeta*Swabi*Yaqubi*Khas*New Murree near Islamabad*Joharabad*Rabwah*Sahiwal, MontgommeryPalestine*Rawabi (under construction)Philippines*Baguio*Manila*Palayan*City*Davao del Norte*MartiresPoland*Sulinowo former German military base, then Soviet secret city, and since 1993 Polish town*Elblg http://www.elblag.pl*Gogwek http://www.glogowek.pl*Gdynia http://www.gdynia.pl*Huta (showpiece of Socialist Realist-era urban planning), now incorporated into the Royal city of Cracow*Gdaski http://www.starogard.pl*Ursynw http://www.ursynow.pl*Zamo A UN World Heritage site, Zamosc is the result of the opulently wealthy Polish Chancellor Jan Zamoyskis financial empire. It is modelled on Italian renaissance theories of the ideal city and built by the architect Bernardo Morando. Zamo is a perfect example of late 16th century Renaissance urban planning ideals. http://www.zamosc.pl/*Tychy Nowe Tychy, New Tychy http://www.umtychy.plPortugal*Lisbon (reconstruction after the 1755 Lisbon earthquake)*Vila Real de Santo Antnio*Covo*Nova de Santo Andr*Nisa  (medieval town)*Braga  (16th century expansion)Romania*Alexandria*VictoriaRussia*Petersburg*Magnitogorsk*Akademgorodok*ProtvinoSaudi Arabia*Jubail *Yanbu *Abdullah City (currently under development)*Abdul Aziz bin Musaed Economic City (also currently under development)Serbia*Bor*Majdanpek*Beograd*KikindaSingaporeThe following are not cities per se, but smaller developments within the nation-state of Singapore.*Mo Kio New Town*New Town*New Town*Batok New Town*Merah*Panjang New Town*Timah Estate*Chu Kang New Town*New Town*Geylang*New Town*East New Town*West New Town*Kallang/Whampoa*Parade Estate*Ris New Town*New Town*Queenstown*Sembawang New Town*New Town*New Town*New Town*New Town*Payoh New Town*New Town*New TownSlovakia*Dubnica*Partiznske*Petralka*SvitSlovenia*Gorica*VelenjeSouth Africa*Sasolburg*WelkomSouth Korea*Ansan*Changwon*Gwacheon*New Songdo City*City (proposed multifunctional administrative city)Spain*Cantos http://www.tres-cantos.org*del Valls, Barcelona*CarolinaSweden*Kiruna http://www.kiruna.se*Stockholm (satellite towns)**Farsta http://www.farsta.stockholm.se**Skarpncksfltet http://www.skarpnack.stockholm.se**Vllingby http://www.vallingby.stockholm.se*Gothenburg http://www.goteborg.se*Jakriborg http://www.jakriborg.se*Falkping*Hssleholm*NssjSwitzerland*Chaux-de-FondsTaiwan*VillageTurkey*MiletusUkraine*Pripyat Foundation in 1970, then the Ukrainian SSR. Abandoned in 1986.*SlavutychUnited Kingdom(including all New Towns under the New Towns Act of 1946 and successive Acts, as well as some communities not designated under this name)See towns in the United Kingdom.England*Aycliffe http://www.sedgefield.gov.uk*Barrow-in-Furness http://www.barrowbc.gov.uk/*Basildon http://www.basildon.gov.uk/*Bracknell http://www.bracknell-forest.gov.uk*Chorley http://www.chorley.gov.uk*Corby http://www.corby.gov.uk/*Crawley http://www.crawley.gov.uk*Letchworth*Harlow http://www.harlow.gov.uk*Hatfield http://www.welhat.gov.uk*Hemel Hempstead http://www.dacorum.gov.uk/hemel-hempstead/index.htm*Keynes http://www.mkweb.co.uk (New City)*Northampton http://www.northampton.gov.uk*Peterborough http://www.peterborough.gov.uk*Peterlee http://www.easington.gov.uk*Poundbury http://www.princes-foundation.org/foundation/projdir-uep-poundbury.html*Redditch http://www.redditchbc.gov.uk*Runcorn http://www.halton.gov.uk/townandvillage/runcorn_new_town.asp*Skelmersdale http://www.westlancsdc.gov.uk/ *Stevenage http://www.stevenage.gov.uk*Telford http://www.telford.gov.uk*Warrington http://www.warrington.gov.uk*Washington http://www.sunderland.gov.uk*Welwyn Garden City http://www.welhat.gov.ukScotland*Cumbernauld http://www.northlan.gov.uk*East Kilbride http://www.southlanarkshire.gov.uk*Glenrothes http://www.fife.gov.uk/*Irvine http://www.north-ayrshire.gov.uk/*Livingston http://www.westlothian.gov.uk*TornagrainWales*Cwmbran http://www.torfaen.gov.uk*Newtown http://www.powys.gov.ukNorthern Ireland*Derry http://www.derrycity.gov.uk*Antrim http://www.antrim.gov.uk*Ballymena http://www.ballymena.gov.uk*Craigavon http://www.craigavon.gov.ukUnited StatesNew communities built in the Colonial and post-Colonial era*Maryland*Georgia*South Carolina*South Carolina*Massachusetts*Alabama*Haven, Connecticut - the first planned city in America, designed in 1638.*Orleans, Louisiana*Philadelphia, Pennsylvania*North Carolina*Virginia*Tennessee*North Carolina*North Carolina - Salem was planned by the Moravians, later merged with Winston*Georgia*D.C.*VirginiaNew communities built in the nineteenth century*Texas*Bay section of Boston, Massachusetts*New York*Washington*North Carolina*Ohio*Indianapolis, Indiana*Park, New Jersey*New Hampshire*Most of Manhattan, New York City, New York. (A Plan of 1811 defined the street layout of most of the borough; however, New York originated in the 1620s without a master plan. Since the grid plan is noteworthy, it is listed here.)*Tennessee, a grid plan with a public promenade along the Mississippi River, and four designated public squares, surveyed in 1819.*Georgia*Plymouth, Idaho*Kansas*Virginia*Pullman, Illinois (now part of Chicago)*Illinois*Lake City, Utah*Florida*PennsylvaniaNew communities built in the early twentieth century*Estates, Georgia*Hills Village, California*California*Village, Pittsburgh*California*Gables, Florida*Alabama*Park, Texas (Dallas suburb)*California*Tennessee*Washington*Ohio*Nevada*New Jersey*Park, Baltimore, Maryland*Heights, Ohio*Land, Texas*Gardens, Queens, New York*Falls, Idaho*FloridaNew communities built with federal aid in the 1930s*West Virginia*City, Nevada*Maryland http://www.greenbelt.com*Wisconsin http://www.greendale.org/*Ohio http://www.greenhillsohio.org/*Tennessee*New JerseyNew communities built privately in the post World War II era*Maryland*New York*Pennsylvania*Park, California*Houston, Texas*Forest, Illinois (Chicago suburb) http://findit.sos.state.il.us/PFS/birthofacity.html *Willingboro, New JerseyNew communities built in the 1960s and 1970s*Hills, California**Arcosanti, Arizona*New Community, New York (near Buffalo, New York)*Florida*Lake City, Houston, Texas*Maryland*Spring, Maryland (Baltimore, Maryland) http://www.baltimoremd.com/coldspring/*Springs, Florida*de Caza, California*Maryland*of Cross Keys, Maryland (see Maryland)*Colony, Sugar Land, Texas (see Land, Texas)*City, California*California**City, Oregon*Houston, Texas*Las Colinas, Irving, Texas*Viejo, California*City, Georgia*Corners, Georgia*Virginia*Creek, Sugar Land, Texas (see Land, Texas)*Oregon*Fort Worth, Texas*Ranch, Irving, Texas*Both Anaheim Hills and Irvine began construction in the 1970s, but have not been completed due to their size, and will not be completed for at least ten yearsNew communities sponsored by the Department of Housing and Urban Development after 1970*Cedar-Riverside, Minnesota (Minneapolis, Minnesota)*Mound, Texas (Near Dallas, Texas)*New York (Near Rochester, New York)*South Carolina (Near Columbia, South Carolina)*Minnesota (Near Minneapolis, Minnesota)*Arkansas (Near Little Rock, Arkansas)*Ohio (Dayton, Ohio)*Park Forest South, Illinois (Near Chicago)*New York (Near Syracuse, New York)*New York (Near Rochester, New York)*Island, New York (New York, New York)*Georgia (Near Atlanta, Georgia)*City, North Carolina (Warren County, North Carolina)*Charles, Maryland (Charles County, Maryland)*Antonio Ranch, Texas (near San Antonio, Texas)*Woodlands, Texas (near Houston, Texas)New communities built privately in the 1980s and 1990s*Arizona*Forest, South Carolina*Florida*Mountain, Utah planned for 150,000*Sugar Land, Texas (see Land, Texas)*Laguna West, California*Territory, Sugar Land, Texas (see Land, Texas)*Phillips Ranch, California*Port Liberte, New Jersey*Santa Margarita, California*Florida*Village, North Carolina*Nevada, in the Vegas metropolitan area*Washington *Florida*Florida*FloridaSecret cities built as part of the Manhattan ProjectThe Project was the successful effort by the U.S. government to develop an atomic bomb during World War II.*Alamos, New Mexico*Ridge, Tennessee *WashingtonUnbuilt or under construction planned cities*Maria, Florida*Ranch, Florida  a proposed solar-powered city*Brisbane Baylands, California*City*Arizona  planned for 2 million*California *Springs, Nevada- largest new city  planned for 240,000.*Florida*Ranch, Buckeye, Arizona planned for 250,000*EPCOT*Point Shipyard development, San Francisco, California*Hawaii*South Dakota*del Sol in Albuquerque, New Mexico*Miapolis, Florida*Experimental City*House, San Joaquin County, California*Ranch in Valencia, California*(St. Johns County, Florida)*Valley, California*Texas*Valley, California*Islands at Lathrop, California*Success, Alaska*Mountain Village Rohnert Park, California*Pointe, California*Tartesso in Buckeye, Arizona*Mountain Village, California*Island development, San Francisco, California*Villages of Lakeview, California*Ranch, CaliforniaVenezuela*Guayanaja:
52665
Newcastle,_New_South_Wales
 rainfall                1117.1The Newcastle metropolitan area is the second most populated area in the Australian state of South Wales and includes most of the Newcastle and Lake Macquarie Local Government Areas.() It is the hub of the Greater Newcastle area which includes most parts of the Local Government Areas of of Newcastle, of Lake Macquarie, of Cessnock, of Maitland and Stephens Council.()()Situated  NNE of Sydney, at the mouth of the Hunter River, it is the predominant city within the Region. Famous for its coal, Newcastle is presently the largest coal exporting harbour in the world, exporting over 97 Mt of coal in 200910 with plans to expand annual capacity to 180 Mt by 2013.() Beyond the city, the Region possesses large coal deposits. Geologically, the area is located in the central-eastern part of the basin.(http://www.dpi.nsw.gov.au/__data/assets/image/0007/96847/20758.gif)HistoryPre-European settlementNewcastle and the lower Region were traditionally occupied by the Awabakal and Worimi Aboriginal People,() who called the area Malubimba.()Founding and settlement by EuropeansThe first European to explore the area was Lieutenant Shortland in September 1797. His discovery of the area was largely accidental; as he had been sent in search of a number of convicts who had seized the HMS Cumberland as she was sailing from Cove.()While returning, Lt. Shortland entered what he later described as a very fine river, which he named after New South Wales Governor, John Hunter.() He returned with reports of the deep-water port and the areas abundant coal. Over the next two years, coal mined from the area was the South Wales colonys first export.(Newcastle gained a reputation as a hellhole as it was a place where the most dangerous convicts were sent to dig in the coal mines as harsh punishment for their crimes.(By the turn of the century the mouth of the Hunter River was being visited by diverse groups of men, including coal diggers, timber-cutters, and more escaped convicts. Gidley King, the Governor of New South Wales from 1800, decided on a more positive approach to exploit the now obvious natural resources of the Hunter Valley.(In 1801, a convict camp called Kings Town (named after Governor King) was established to mine coal and cut timber. In the same year, the first shipment of coal was dispatched to Sydney. This settlement closed less than a year later.(A settlement was again attempted in 1804, as a place of secondary punishment for unruly convicts. The settlement was named Coal River, also Kingstown and then re-named Newcastle, after Englands famous coal port.( The name first appeared by the commission issued by Governor King on 15 March 1804 to Lieutenant Charles Menzies of the marine detachment on HMS Calcutta, then at Jackson, appointing him superintendent of the new settlement.()The new settlement, comprising convicts and a military guard, arrived at the Hunter River on 27 March 1804 in three ships: , the Resource and the James.(() The convicts were rebels from the 1804 Hill convict rebellion.The link with upon Tyne, UK, its namesake and also from whence many of the 19th century coal miners came, is still obvious in some of the place-names  such as Jesmond, Hexham, Wickham, Wallsend and Gateshead. New South Wales is a similar distance north of Newcastle as Northumberland is north of Newcastle-upon-Tyne.152.jpg|right|thumb|Christ Church Cathedral dominates the skyline of Newcastle.Under Captain Wallis, commandant from 1815 to 1818, the convicts conditions improved, and a building boom began. Captain Wallis laid out the streets of the town, built the first church of the site of the present Christ Church Anglican Cathedral, erected the old gaol on the seashore, and began work on the breakwater which now joins Head to the mainland. The quality of these first buildings was poor, and only (a much reinforced) breakwater survives. During this period, in 1816, the oldest public school in Australia was built in East Newcastle.(Newcastle remained a penal settlement until 1822, when the settlement was opened up to farming.() As a penal colony, the military rule was harsh, especially at Limeburners Bay, on the inner side of Stockton peninsula. There, convicts were sent to burn oyster shells for making lime.(Military rule in Newcastle ended in 1823. Prisoner numbers were reduced to 100 (most of these were employed on the building of the breakwater), and the remaining 900 were sent to Macquarie.(Civilian governmentAfter removal of the last convicts in 1823, the town was freed from the infamous influence of the penal law. It began to acquire the aspect of a typical Australian pioneer settlement, and a steady flow of free settlers poured into the hinterland.Early steamersThe formation during the nineteenth century of the Newcastle and Hunter River Steamship Company(An Early Link with the New South Wales Railways Wylie, R.F. Australian Railway Historical Society Bulletin, October 1954 pp126-128) saw the establishment of regular steamship services from Morpeth and Newcastle with Sydney. The company had a fleet of freighters as well as several fast passenger vessels, including the PS Newcastle and the PS Namoi. The Namoi had first-class cabins with the latest facilities.Because of the coal supply, small ships plied between Newcastle and Sydney, Brisbane, Melbourne and Adelaide, carrying coal to gas works and bunkers for shipping, and railways. These were commonly known as sixty-milers, referring to the nautical journey between Newcastle and Sydney. These ships continued in service until recent times.()( )World War IIDuring the Second World War, Newcastle was an important industrial centre for the Australian war effort. Consequently, it was considered to be a potential Japanese target during the Second World War.In the early hours of 8 June 1942, the Japanese submarine I-21 briefly shelled Newcastle. Among the areas hit within the city were dockyards, the steel works, Parnell Place in the citys now affluent East End, the breakwall and Art Deco ocean baths. There were no casualties in the attack and damage was minimal.()Economy19th and early 20th Century;CoalCoal mining began in earnest on 3 May 1833 when the Agricultural Company received land grants at Newcastle plus a 31 year monopoly on that towns coal traffic. Other collieries were within a  radius of the town. Principal coal mines were located at Stockton, Tighes Hill, Carrington and the Newcastle Coal and Copper Companys collieries at Merewether (includes the Glebe), Wallsend and the Waratah collieries. All operations had closed by the early 1960s.On 10 December 1831 the Agricultural Company officially opened Australias first railway, at the intersection of Brown & Church Streets, New South Wales. Privately owned and operated to service the A Pit coal mine, it was a iron fishbelly rail on an inclined plane as a gravitational railway(Uncovering and understanding Australias First Railway, Conference Paper, Campbell, D., Brougham, J. and Caldwell, R., Australian Journal of Multi-disciplinary Engineering, Vol. 7, No. 2, pp. 23, Engineering Heritage Australia, Newcastle, NSW (accessed 14 July 2011))(Colliery Railways of the Australian Agricultural Company in the Newcastle District Webber, J & Wylie, R.F. Australian Railway Historical Society Bulletin March, 1968 pp53-63);CopperIn the 1850s, a major copper smelting works was established at Burwood, near Merewether. An engraving of this appeared in the London News on 11 February 1854. The English and Australian Copper Company built another substantial works at Broadmeadow circa 1890, and in that decade a zinc smelter was built inland, by Cockle Creek.SoapThe largest factory of its kind in the Hemisphere was constructed in 1885, on a  site between the suburbs of Tighes Hill and Port Waratah, by Upfold, from London, for his Sydney Soap and Candle Company, to replace a smaller factory in Wickham.() Their soap products won 17 medals at International Exhibitions. At the Sydney International Exhibition they won a bronze medal against all-comers from every part of the world, the only first prize awarded for soap and candles. Following World War I the company was sold to Messrs Lever & Kitchen (today Lever Bros), and the factory closed in the mid-1930s.SteelIn 1911, BHP chose the city as the site for its steelworks due to the abundance of coal.( The land put aside was prime real estate, on the southern edge of the harbour. In 1915, the BHP steelworks opened, beginning a period of some 80 years dominating the steel works and heavy industry. As Mayfield and the suburbs surrounding the steelworks declined in popularity because of pollution, the steelworks thrived, becoming the regions largest employerRecent historyNewcastle as a traditional area of heavy industry was not immune from the effects of economic downturns since the 1970s. These downturns were particularly hard hitting for heavy industry which was particularly prevalent in Newcastle. The early 1990s recession caused significant job losses across Australia and the Newcastle LGA experienced a peak unemployment rate of 17% in February 1993, compared to 12.1% in NSW and 11.9% across Australia.() As Australia recovered from the early 1990s recession, the economy of Newcastle did too and the jobless rate rapidly fell. However, it consistently remained above that of NSW.In 1999, the steelworks closed after 84 years operation and had employed about 50,000 in its existence, many for decades.() The closure of the BHP steelworks occurred at a time of strong economic expansion in Australia. At the time of the closure and since the closure Newcastle experienced a significant amount of economic diversification which has strengthened the local economy.() Despite this, the closure caused a deterioration of the employment situation in Newcastle where the unemployment rate rose rapidly to almost 12% from under 9% at the previous trough just prior to the closure.Since 2003, Australia experienced the effects of the commodities boom as commodities prices for major export good such as coal and iron ore rose significantly. This provided a large incentive for investment in the Newcastle and Hunter region due to its status as a major coal mining and export hub to Asian markets. Large projects related to the coal industry helped to propel the Newcastle unemployment rate to 20 year lows and allow the Newcastle region to weather the effects of the 2000s recession better than NSW as a whole.()As of 2009 the two largest single employers are the New England Area Health Service and the University of Newcastle.(Disasters1989 Newcastle earthquakeOn 28 December 1989, Newcastle experienced an earthquake measuring 5.6 on the Richter scale, which killed 13 people, injured 162 and destroyed or severely damaged a number of prominent buildings. Some had to be demolished, including the large George Hotel in Scott Street (city), the Century Theatre at Broadmeadow, the Hunter Theatre (formerly The Star) and the majority of The Junction school at Merewether. Part of the Newcastle Workers Club, a popular venue, was destroyed and later replaced by a new structure. The following economic recession of the early 1990s meant that the city took several years to recover.However, Beaumont St Hamilton, where many buildings sustained major damage, became a thriving cosmopolitan restaurant strip after the earthquake and is still going strong today. The earthquake helped to rekindle business in this suburban strip.2007 Hunter region and Central Coast stormsFile:Pasha Bulker grounded.jpg|thumb|right|The Pasha Bulker became a local landmark when it was stranded on Beach in 2007On 8 June 2007 the Hunter and Central Coast regions were battered by the worst series of storms to hit South Wales in 30 years. This resulted in extensive flooding and nine deaths. Thousands of homes were flooded and many were destroyed.(Wikinews,Worst Storm in 30 years, Wikinews, 9 June 2007)() The Hunter and Central Coast regions were declared natural disaster areas by the state Premier, Mr Iemma, on 8 June 2007 .() Further flooding was predicted by the Bureau of Meteorology but was less severe than predicted.During the early stages of the storms the  long bulk carrier ship, MV Pasha Bulker, ran aground at Nobbys Beach after failing to heed warnings to move offshore. The Pasha Bulker was finally refloated on the third salvage attempt on 2 July 2007 despite earlier fears that the ship would break up. After initially entering the port for minor repairs it departed for major repairs in Asia under tow on 26 July 2007.MaritimeThe most tragic maritime accident of the twentieth-century in Newcastle occurred on 9 August 1934 when the Stockton-bound ferry Bluebell collided with the coastal freighter, Waraneen, and sank in the middle of the Hunter River.() Bluebell Collision claimed three lives and fifteen passengers were admitted to the Newcastle Hospital, with two suffering severely from the effects of immersion. It was later found that the ferry captain was at fault.()The tragedy was but only one chapter in Newcastles very long history of shipwrecks including the tragic sinking of the Cawarra in 1866 that claimed sixty lives, the 1974 beaching of the , and the 2007 beaching of the .AviationOn 16 August 1966, an RAAF Sabre crashed into the inner city suburb of The Junction.() The pilot, Flying Officer Warren William Goddard, experienced engine troubles and unsuccessfully tried to get the plane over the Pacific Ocean. The Junction is a highly populated suburb of Newcastle and most of the plane wreckage landed in the shopping area of the suburb. In 2007 a memorial plaque was unveiled for the killed pilot.(GeographyNewcastle is on the southern bank of the River mouth. The northern side is dominated by sand dunes, swamps and multiple river channels. A green belt protecting plant and wildlife flanks the city from the west (Watagan mountains) around to the north where it meets the coast just north of Stockton. Urban development is mainly restricted to the hilly southern bank. The small town of Stockton sits opposite central Newcastle at the river mouth and is linked by ferry. Road access between Stockton and central Newcastle is via the Stockton Bridge, a distance of . Much of the city is undercut by the coal measures of the Sydney sedimentary basin, and what were once numerous coal-mining villages located in the hills and valleys around the port have merged into a single urban area extending southwards to Lake Macquarie.ClimateNewcastle has a borderline oceanic/subtropical climate like much of central and northern South Wales. Summers tend to be warm and winters are generally mild. Precipitation is heaviest in late autumn and early winter.dateAugust 2010DemographicsThe metropolitan area of Newcastle is the second most populous area in New South Wales, and includes most of the Newcastle and Lake Macquarie local government areas as well as Fern Bay, a southern suburb of Port Stephens Council.( At the 2006 census it had a population of 288,732.( As of 30 June 2009 the population of the city of Newcastle itself was estimated to be 154,777 while Lake Macquarie was actually larger with a population of 199,277.()Newcastle is often quoted as being the seventh largest city in Australia. This is misleading as the area represented extends well beyond both the City of Newcastle and the Newcastle metropolitan area. The area, officially the Newcastle Statistical District, is referred to as Greater Newcastle or the Lower Hunter Region, which includes most parts of the Newcastle, Lake Macquarie, Cessnock, Maitland and Port Stephens local government areas and, as of 30 June 2009, has an estimated population of 540,796.((() Despite their proximity, all of the LGAs in the region maintain their own individual identities, separate from Newcastle. Newcastle remains the regional hub for most services.Modern timesThe Port of Newcastle remains the economic and trade centre for the resource rich Hunter Valley and for much of the north and northwest of New South Wales. Newcastle is the worlds largest coal export port and Australias oldest and second largest tonnage throughput port, with over 3,000 shipping movements handling cargo of 95.8 Mt per annum, of which coal exports represented 90.8 Mt in 200809.() The volume of coal exported, and attempts to increase coal exports, are opposed by environmental groups.()()Newcastle has a small shipbuilding industry, which has declined since the 1970s.( (see Mr PRICE (Waratah) p.m.)) In recent years the only major ship-construction contract awarded to the area was the construction of the class minehunters.()The era of extensive heavy industry passed when the steel works closed in 1999. Many of the remaining manufacturing industries have located themselves well away from the city itself.Newcastle has one of the oldest theatre districts in Australia. Victoria Theatre on Perkins Street is the oldest purpose-built theatre in the country. The theatre district that occupied the area around what is now the Hunter Street Mall vanished during the 1940s.File:Newcastle 1968.jpg|thumb|Ron Morrisons classic photo of a bustling Hunter Street, 1968. Leyland buses have replaced the trams.The old city centre has seen some new apartments and hotels built in recent years, but the rate of commercial and retail occupation remains low while alternate suburban centres have become more important. The CBD itself is shifting to the west, towards the major urban renewal area known as Honeysuckle. This renewal, to run for another 10 years, is a major part of arresting the shift of business and residents to the suburbs.Commercial renewal has been accompanied by cultural renaissance. There is a vibrant arts scene in the city including a highly regarded art gallery,http://www.newcastle.nsw.gov.au/nag and an active Hunter Writers Centre http://hwcentre.com/. Recent fictional representations (for example Antoinette Eklunds Steel River See http://www.scholarly.info/fiction.htm) present a new vision of the city, using the citys historic past as a backdrop for contemporary fiction.The old central business district, located at Newcastles eastern end, still has a considerable number of historic buildings, dominated by Christ Church Cathedral, seat of the Anglican Bishop of Newcastle.(Elkin, A.P., The Diocese of Newcastle: a history of the Diocese of Newcastle, Australian Medical Publishing Co: Glebe, NSW, 1955. (Privately published)) Other noteworthy buildings include Scratchley, the Ocean Baths, the old Customs House, the 1920s City Hall, the 1890s Longworth Institute (once regarded as the finest building in the colony) and the 1930s deco University House (formerly NESCA House, recently seen in the film Superman Returns). Residents of Newcastle refer to themselves as Novocastrians.Domestic architectureA heritage area to the east of the Central Business District, centred around Christ Church Cathedral, has many Victorian terrace houses.File:Newcastle Street.jpg|Victorian Terrace StreetscapeFile:Weatherboard Terraces.jpg|Very Rare Weatherboard Terrace HousesFile:Sympathetic Development.jpg|Modern Sympathetic DevelopmentFile:LeeWharfNewcastle.jpg|Honeysuckle Lee Wharf Modern DevelopmentEducationMedSci Building.jpg|right|thumb|upright|The Medical Sciences Building of the University of NewcastleThe University of Newcastle (formerly established in 1951 as part of the of New South Wales) obtained autonomy in 1965 and offers over 150 undergraduate and graduate courses to a student population of more than 32,000, including 7,300 international students from more than 80 countries.There are three selective schools in the region. School of the Performing Arts is a fully selective performing arts K-12 public school. Acceptance into the school is by audition. High School is a fully selective academic high school for years 712. A test is used for acceptance. Finally, Sports High is a partially selective sporting high school. The school accepts around half its students from the local area and around half by audition.CultureFestivalsNewcastle holds a variety of cultural events and festivals.The Regional Show is held in the Newcastle Showground annually. There are a mixture of typical regional show elements such as woodchopping displays, showbags, rides and stalls and usually fireworks to complement the events in the main arena.()The festival, founded in 1961, is the official festival of Newcastle with a more traditional country fair type program that combines a parade, rides, sporting events, band competitions and portrait and landscape painting exhibitions.()The Jazz Festival is held across three days in August, and attracts performers and audiences from all over Australia.()The Shoot Out 24 Hour Filmmaking Festival, first started in Newcastle in 1999. This is the film festival where film-makers come together in one place to make a short film in 24 hours. It is run annually in July.()Is Not Art is a national festival of new media and arts held in Newcastle each year over the October long weekend. Since its humble beginnings in 1998, it has become one of the leading arts festivals in Australia dedicated to the work and ideas of communities not included in other major Australian arts festivals. The umbrella program includes the independent festivals Electrofringe, the Young Writers Festival, Critical Animals, Summit, Crack Theatre Festival and other projects that vary from year to year.()The Newcastle Entertainment Centre, located inside the Newcastle Showground is a popular venue for regular events including wrestling, concerts and monster truck shows.MusicNewcastle has an active youth music culture, as well as a Conservatorium of Music which is part of the University of Newcastle. It continues to support local bands and has a large underground music scene. The members of Silverchair, the highly successful Australian band, hail from Newcastle, as does the Australian band Screaming Jets.() It has a fertile rock and hardcore scene, which has spawned successful local acts and national acts.  Visual arts and galleriesNoted Australian artists John Olsen, Margaret Olley and Dobell once lived in Newcastle and today the city Newcastle is home to a wide range of public, commercial and private galleries.( The Newcastle Region Art Gallery is home to one of Australias most substantial public art collections outside a major capital city, and its extensive collection of works by contemporary and historical Australian visual artists presents a comprehensive overview of Australian art. Due to an ongoing space issue, the gallery is currently planning a major redevelopment.TheatreNewcastle has a variety of smaller theatres, but the main theatre in the CBD is now the Civic, at Wheeler Place, (seating capacity about 1500), one of Australias great historic theatres built during 1929 in Art Deco style. It hosts a wide range of musicals, plays, concerts, dance and other events each year. Newcastle previously boasted several large theatres, among them the oldest purpose-built theatre in Australia, the Victoria Theatre on Perkins Street (built 1876, capacity 1750), saw touring international opera companies such as the Carte Opera Company, and other troupes, and played host to some of the greatest stars of the age, such as Nellie Melba, Moncrieff, and Tauber, (it is now closed and derelict); the Century, Nineways, Broadmeadow, (built 1941, capacity 1800) although largely used as a cinema was a popular Symphony orchestra venue (demolished 1990 after being severely damaged by the 1989 earthquake); the Hunter (capacity 1000) at The Junction, had advanced modern stage facilities, but was eventually sold and demolished to make way for a motel that was destroyed by the 1989 earthquake. The decline in theatres and cinemas from the 1960s onwards was blamed on television.Newcastle has also been home to noted Australian actors, comedians and entertainers, including Wynter, John Doyle (part of comic act and HG), Porter, Ireland, Serious and Biggins. The cast of the Dogs show also come from Newcastle.(Media artsNewcastle is home to the Octapod Association, a New Media Arts collective established in 1996. Octapod presents the annual Is Not Art Festival and is also home to the Podspace Gallery.SportBC.jpg|right|thumb|Merewether Bowling Club.CricketNewcastles No.1 Sports Ground was for many years a stopover on the tour itinerary for visiting international teams as they faced the Northern New South Wales XI. In 198182 the ground was allocated a Shield match when the SCG was unavailable, and healthy crowds saw No.1 then become host to at least one first-class fixture featuring the South Wales Blues each year.Horse racingNewcastle Jockey Club Limited races 35 times annually at Broadmeadow, a spacious  turf track with a  home straight. It is the venue for three Group 3 races. In March is the 1400 metre Newmarket Handicap and in September the 1400 metre Handicap and the 2300 metre Gold Cup.Ice hockey and skatingThe North Stars are Newcastles representatives in the Ice Hockey League championships. Originally based in Newcastle West in the 1970-80s, the North Stars now play out of the Ice Skating Stadium in Bay.NetballThe Jaegers (Bank Trophy  Netball) are based at the Newcastle Entertainment Centre. Officially opened in June 1992, the Centre offers 5,000 square metres of clear span floor space and is capable of catering for capacities from 2,000 to 6,500 for entertainment style events. The Centre was built to house the now defunct Newcastle Falcons National Basketball League team and was also home to the Pirates before a lack of sponsorship forced them to relocate to Singapore after the 200506 season, where they were renamed the Slingers. The Slingers played one home game at the Centre during the 200607 season.Rugby LeagueNewcastle sports teams playing in national competitions include the Knights, a team that plays in Australias premier league competition, the Rugby League. The Knights play at Stadium, situated in the suburb of New Lambton. After a recent upgrade, the stadium now has capacity for almost 27,000 spectators. In May 2008, the NSW state government agreed to provide a further $20 million for further upgrades to increase the crowd capacity to 40,000 by end of 2010.() The stadium is the only sports venue of its class in New South Wales that is north of Sydney.SoccerThe Newcastle United Jets soccer team, which plays in Australias highest level competition, the A-League, also play at EnergyAustralia Stadium. The Newcastle United Jets won the A-league competition in their third season, defeating local rivals the Coast Mariners FC in the grand final. The Jets are currently playing in the 2011/12 A-League season, and their tenth in the Australian National Competition.Water sportsNewcastle has an abundance of beaches and surf breaks for which the city is internationally well known. Newcastle hosts the annual surfing contest Surfest on the world professional surfing tour. Four time world champion surfer Mark Richards grew up surfing at Newcastles Merewether Beach, and is a local icon, appearing at many local functions, and supporting local charities. Nobbys Beach is a very popular kitesurfing spot, especially during the warm summer months when there are northeasterly sea breezes.MediaNewcastle is served by a daily tabloid, The Herald (formerly The Newcastle Morning Herald and Miners Advocate and then The Newcastle Herald), several weeklies including the Star, The Post and the bi-monthly The Hunter Advocate.Other alternative media in the city include the universitys student publication Opus, and Urchin (a zine published by the media and arts organisation Octapod).The city is also served by several local radio stations, including those owned by the Broadcasting Corporation and SBS.*AM stations**2HD (commercial)1143 AM**ABC Newcastle (Local Radio)**2HRN (off band commercial) 1629 AM*FM stations**KOFM (commercial) 102.9**NXFM (commercial) 106.9**FM (commercial) 105.3**2NUR (community) 103.7**FM 99.7 Newcastle (Christian) 99.7*Government broadcasters**Broadcasting Corporation***ABC Newcastle AM local radio 1233 AM***Radio National 1512 AM***ABC News Radio 1458 AM***J (youth station) 102.1 FM***Classic FM (classical music) 106.1 FM**Radio (foreign language service) 1413 AM*Other stations**2KY Racing Radio (as part of state-wide network) 1341 AMNewcastle is also served by 5 television networks, three commercial and two national services (which include new sub-channels that started in 2009 for the commercial networks and in recent years from the national services). These new channels are available on digital TV only. These networks are listed as follows:*Television, HD (digital only) and the GO! channel (digital only) : (Network affiliate, incumbent station, (NBN TV) established 1962).*Cross Ten, HD (digital only) and Eleven (digital only) : (Ten affiliate, Southern Cross Ten (formerly known as TEN Northern N.S.W. and NRTV) was established as a result of aggregation on 31 December 1991).*Prime7, 7Two (digital only) and 7mate (digital only) : (Network affiliate, (Prime7) was established as a result of aggregation on 31 December 1991).*ABC Television including ABC1, ABC2 (digital only), ABC3 (digital only) and News 24 is owned by the government. The ABC TV service was established in the 1960s.*SBS Television including ONE and Two (digital only) is owned by the government. This service was introduced in the 1980s.NBN Television produces an evening news bulletin combining local, state, national and international news screening nightly at 6.00 pm.Subscription Television service Foxtel is also available via satellite.TransportLike most major cities, the Newcastle metropolitan area has an extensive system of both road links and road based public transport services (bus, taxi etc.) which cover most areas of both Newcastle and Lake Macquarie and which extend beyond the metropolitan area itself. Rail transport, however, is accessible to only a relatively small percentage of the population along the major rail transport routes and ferry services are restricted to those commuting between Newcastle and Stockton. Within the metropolitan area the car remains the dominant form of transportation. At the time of the 2001 Census, less than 4% of the population caught public transport, of which around 2.5% travelled by bus and 1% used the train or ferry to commute to work. On the other hand, over 72% of the population travelled by car to and from work. Newcastle, like all major Australian urban centres, had a tram system, but it was closed in 1950.RoadNewcastle is connected to surrounding cities by the Freeway (South), England Highway (West) and the Pacific Highway (North). Hunter Street, the main shopping street in the Newcastle CBD, is the major link to the Pacific Highway from the CBD.BusBus services within Newcastle are operated by Newcastle Buses & Ferries, a subsidiary of the Transit Authority of New South Wales. Trips within a designated area of the Newcastle CBD on State Transit-operated bus services are fare-free under the Newcastle Alliances Free City Buses programme.The network radiates from a bus terminal near CityRails Newcastle station, on the waterfront of Newcastles CBD. Major interchanges are located at the University of Newcastle, Wallsend, Glendale, Warners Bay, Belmont, Charlestown, Kotara and Broadmeadow Station.RailFile:NewcastleRailwayStation1.JPG|right|thumb|railway station, New South WalesNewcastle is serviced by two CityRail lines providing local and regional commuter services. The Newcastle & Central Coast Line has hourly train services to Sydney and more frequent services to the Central Coast. The Hunter Line has twice-hourly services to Maitland and less frequently to Scone and Dungog. Countrylink (an intercity/interstate rail service) operate two lines through the Newcastle area using Broadmeadow Station. These provide services to Moree, Armidale, Brisbane and Sydney.Newcastle once had rail passenger services to Belmont and Toronto, on Lake Macquarie, Wallsend, Kurri Kurri and several towns and villages between Maitland and Cessnock, but these lines have today been closed. Since the late 1990s, there had been intense debate about the viability of the rail line into central Newcastle. The New South Wales government had planned to cut the line at Broadmeadow, ceasing rail services into the city and to sell the land where the railway ran for development. The state government has subsequently decided against this decision.WaterThe Port of Newcastle is crucial to the economic life of Newcastle and the Hunter Valley region beyond. Over 90 million tonnes of coal is shipped through the facility each year  making it the largest coal exporting port in the world. The Port of Newcastle claims to be Australias first port. Coal was first exported from the harbour in 1799.Newcastle Buses & Ferries operates a ferry service across the Hunter River between Newcastles CBD and Stockton.AirNewcastle Airport is located  north of the Newcastle CBD ( by road). The airport, which is a joint venture between Newcastle City Council and Stephens Council, has experienced rapid growth since 2000 as a result of an increase in cost airline operations. The airport is located at Base Williamtown, a Australian Air Force base on land leased from the Department of Defence.(;) Newcastle Heliport operates alongside the lower section of Newcastle Harbour.The suburb of Broadmeadow is home to the base of the Life Saver Rescue Helicopter Service.() The Helicopter service is one of the longest running services of this type in the world. Two helicopters operate out of this base and operate 24 hours a day.The closure of Airport, commonly referred to as Aeropelican, in the Lake Macquarie suburb of Marks Point has caused Williamtown to become Newcastles only major airport and residents in the south of the Newcastle metropolitan area must commute up to  by car to reach Williamtown.See also* in Newcastle* List of suburbs in Greater Newcastle* and Hunter Rugby Union* Grammar School* Newcastle High School* High SchoolReferences* Docherty, James Cairns, Newcastle  The Making of an Australian City, Sydney, 1983, ISBN 0-86806-034-8* Susan Marsden, Coals to Newcastle: a History of Coal Loading at the Port of Newcastle New South Wales 19771997  2002* Marsden, Susan, Newcastle: a Brief History Newcastle, 2004 ISBN 0-949579-17-3* Marsden, Susan, Waterfront alive: life on the waterfront, in C Hunter, ed, River Change: six new histories of the Hunter, Newcastle, 1998 ISBN 0-909115-70-2* Greater Newcastle City Council, Newcastle 150 Years, 1947.* Thorne, Ross, Picture Palace Architecture in Australia, Melbourne, Victoria, 1976 (P/B), ISBN 0-7251-0226-8* Turner, Dr. John W., Manufacturing in Newcastle, Newcastle, 1980, ISBN 0-9599385-7-5* Morrison James, Ron, Newcastle  Times Past, Newcastle, 2005 (P/B), ISBN 0-9757693-0-8External links* Newcastle City Council* Newcastle Visitor Centre* * Newcastle Beaches Guide* Newcastle Region Art Gallery, ()(Austrlie)De Cymru Newydd(New South Wales)(New South Wales)(Australia)eo:Novkastelo()(Australie)New South Wales( )Novi Juni WalesNew South Wales(Australia)()()(Australija)(Ausztrlia)(Australi)()(New South Wales)i New South Wales(Australia)(Austrlia)New South Wales()New South Wales(Australia)New South Wales()New South WalesNew South Wales()
